What could possibly go wrong? 
Is there any historic precedence for this? Did it happen after alcohol prohibition ended?   Perhaps it did, but if it did, it wasn't on a significant enough scale for it to be a major thing as we don't currently have gunfights in the street over alcohol production.  The major difference between what we have now and a legalised drug trade is producers can expect legal protection of the police.
Neither meth nor cocaine cost much to produce. Meth can be easily produced domestically. Cocaine is easy to make, but it has to cross a border which bumps the price.  I think you underestimate how popular meth is.
What if they're not on the payroll but, on the hit list! 
For fuck's sake what a bullshit story... She wanted to be moved to another cell on her free will...
Calderon is an idiot who's now desperate to leave some kind of legacy other than the thousands of Mexicans dead during his presidency. He will always be remembered as that.
what's driving him insane is that everybody already forgot about this guy
From the data i have seen marijuana accounts for about 90% of the cartells income so it would cause them a pretty big blow if it were to be legalized
Even if you can back up your stats, it was still a complete failure.  The violence it spawned is what made it a failure, the violence would've only gotten worse as time went on 
Yes, I don't know why they are so butthurt. The Israeli shills reaction is more intense than the time rockets were hitting Tel Aviv. 
In order for it to *begin* to work, China would need courts where ordinary people have equal standing before the law.
And the various Israeli factions have openly announced that they plan to turn the West Bank into part of Greater Israel. Of course they say this in Hebrew, the day something different in English.
One of the greatest ironies of Chinese government is that the people's democratic dictatorship, a subversion of the Marxist concept of the dictatorship of the proletariat, was put in place to protect the people from a dictatorship of the bourgeoisie. Yet the members of the Chinese Communist party, who are invested with the power of this dictatorship, are bound to be the most wealthy and bourgeois people in the country.
Here is a mainstream article on the subject from [Bloomburg.](http://www.businessweek.com/news/2012-11-24/egypt-clashes-resume-after-night-of-protest-over-mursi)  To add my crazy opinion to the crazytown that is this thread... if Egypt is returning to dictatorship, that will depend on what the financiers want, not Mursi's political will.
So you agree the land in illegally occupied..on that note you cant blame the Palestinians for fighting back, especially when Israelis destroy their houses to expand their territory. The land being developed or not is irrelevant, the land is being illegally occupied and then, there is a blockade on the people that own that land legally. Its like, "hey, I'm gonna steal your land, then put a wall around you, and bomb you, and restrict your fishing and farming" that is called terrorism.
yes, thats exactly what I said. Idiot
Jews were not mistreated in Palestine when it was still Palestine, and even if they did, I don't see how that's the fault of children living in gaza today, but hey, the racist mind works in mysterious ways.  The Israeli government has ADMITTED that the plan is to "bomb gaza back to the middle ages" which basically means destroying their culture. Plus they're systematically taking more land and killing more people each year so it won't be long until a Palestinian is as rare as a Trojan.
The answer is that it doesn't matter what 60% of your population does when enough of the population continues to use terrorist response as its chief political tactic, or turn a blind eye to it within its midst.   Your 6 years comment is almost proof. In 6 years, the world has changed its tune, even the USA is no longer patently pro-israel. Because Israel has continued to strong-arm, and Palestine has been the more peaceful resistor, begging help from the world.   The problem is that when push comes to shove, there are still terrorists using Palestine as a tool against Israel.   But I feel for palestine. What are its people to do? They can't fight Hamas etc. because they have no structure to do so and hamas etc. are highly infiltrated into every aspect of palestinian political life. So the people are blamed for the acts of the most extreme.  But what is Israel to do? Allow the people of Gaza to gain the structure, unity and resources to take the fight to Israel?   So long as the goal is to get "their" land back, there won't be a peaceful solution.
[deleted]
That's not true at all, there are quite a few accepted terms and I know several people who call themselves Zionists without agreeing with any of that.      Never mind that if 750,000 non-jews moved to Israel tomorrow, the dominant ethnicity would still be Jewish (religion possibly not though).
How come no one thinks that he just died of old age? He was 75 years old. Seems fitting that he might have just died.
Once the singularity occurs though, most robots won't be satisfied with menial labor jobs.  They will become the CEO's and wallstreet tycoons.  Then we can have our shitty jobs back.  Plus,because robots think in nano seconds and shit, all of this will occur in less than a blink of our shitty human eye.  We won't even notice that we just lost our job and got it back.  But the new robot owner of our company will.  MFW I'm polishing robot shoes at the airport.
I work 10 hour shift work, so what I do on my days off is cook a few simple meals (stir frys, pasta, soup etc) and divide them up into tupperware containers and put them in the freezer for the following week. It takes a hour or so out of my day but gives me back that time during the work week. Another tip is I buy fresh fruit and veggies when they are on sale, not by what I feel like eating. Buy fruit and veggies that are in season, and you can also divide these up and freeze them for later use. Lastly, SMOOTHIES! I love smoothies and I use these as a quick meal replacement if I am in a hurry. I use a baggie of frozen fruit, a banana and some soy milk, but you can add whatever you want.   Hope this can help! 
What was worse is that his wife was charged with murder and his death brought six family members in prison. Personally I believe someone set the whole thing up to get revenge at him.
&gt; (an adaptation that probably arose as a result of males hunting and needing to see game at a distance)  &gt; (which probably helped them with weaving or making crucial distinctions between plants that would feed you and plants that would poison you)  Careful now. Rationalizations like that are easy to come up with, but are pure speculation, and don't actually give us any useful information, while they serve to enforce existing biases.  It's entirely possible, for example, that such a difference is merely a side effect of some other gene expression related to sex differences, and was actually never a significant factor in any response to evolutionary pressure.  I won't deny that there are statistically significant differences between males and females, but it's all too easy to create convenient interpretations of those differences to fit a particular world view.
There's a nice german word, especially regarding our education minister falling into this too: Realsatire, it can be translated as reallife is satire in itself.
The irony being oversight is charged as communist/socialist, while a country which is supposedly communist/socialist has none!
It's shredded canned chicken, very similar to canned tuna.
You sure told them, sonny!
54,000 sick children and some dead? Why you no execute executives?
Taliban archaeologists only have one tool: C-4
Even if he was poisoned who cares. He was a horrible man. 
I thought the kids were left in the care of someone -- they were left behind by their parents because of the school thing.
1) but the date is not the contested issue just saying it is contested does not change the fact that it is the truth dates are not subject to your opinions no matter how much you want them to 2) ok so arab colonization doesn't count? lol bias when so obvious is a poor debate tool, also as a history major I take offense the term concentration camp, if this was true there would be no weapons in Gaza and no Palestinians either 3) would you like another link to another story? http://www.algemeiner.com/2012/11/19/new-battlefield-footage-shows-idf-aborting-missions-to-avoid-civilian-casualties-video/
That's a pretty lame excuse for the fucked up shit Wikileaks revealed.  Anyway, fine, then let the United States reveal its enemies' secrets too. Bring everyone out into the open, for all to see, then let civilization judge them all.  Of course, the United States government, being as corrupt as it is, would not be judged favorably, hence the freak-out over the documents and the crucifixion of Manning as an example to other would-be secret leakers.
That is an unequivocally false statement, there are tons of ways to figure out where a ship is sailing to before it even pulls away from the dock. 
nonsense. REPORT.... statement of fact... The report does nothing of the kind... it is all speculation. If you are going to make a statement of fact and say it's from a report then you're expecting people to believe it. 
Because people are either completely good or completely bad.  There are no shades of grey.
The funny thing is that you can bitch all you want but we will still take your money and keep being lazy lol 
Defeat isn't the only option. When you are in control, you have any option you want, outcomes may be varied, but that doesn't mean you just give up. Are you telling me that just letting them run free and leave this much blood on the street is the only option? Ugh... I know you like pot man, but be realistic.   They may not have the resources to adequately handle this as well as we could, but they can still try. I'm not saying that they aren't, but when your leader says this, why risk your life or your families life? It's asinine. As is your statement.   Again, this isn't about you, or drugs, it's about the reality of the situation. I'm not talking about drug use, I'm talking about cartels, if they legalized drugs they'd just increase the amount of human trafficking they're doing and switch to any black market shit (organs, drugs that haven't been legalized for health reasons (bath salts, etc.), there is always going to be both a market and a product. I'd argue that giving up isn't an option... But by always ending statements with "the government can't tell me what drugs to take!" you're showing your hand...   But, to play into that for the fuck of it, I'd say we should do both (legalize and go after the cartels, hard), that'd cripple them... they'd have a massive (albeit temporary) cash flow issue at the worst possible time. It'd be perfect. But this country will never legalize drugs, weed is one thing, but there is no way that a country our size, with our "value system" would do that. 
The big bang is our current best answer as to what happened at the beginning of the universe, and all the evidence we have collected to date supports this theory.  Science however, being limited by the constraints of reality, must accept that it can be wrong.  As a result, should you be able to provide evidence which is incompatible with the big bang, you will find a great many people eager to read your work.  As it is you haven't produced such evidence, I suspect primarily because you don't understand the theory.  Why don't you give it a go here- I am curious to hear your explanation of the theory before we discuss what parts you have reason to believe are not accurate.  As a final request, I ask you to please reply with complete sentences.  Your free-spirited approach to the rules of syntax makes it difficult to understand your meaning.  If we are to have a discussion then accuracy of communication is paramount.
Sabahy lost a lot of votes to Amr Moussa and other liberal candidates. Had he been the only liberal candidate, as in a hypothetical run off with Morsi, he would've won. Morsi barely beat Shafiq due to support from liberal parties. The turnout for the run off was 50% of which 52% voted for Morsi. The Brotherhood also maximizes its turnout by bussing in voters and offering incentives which increases their apparent support. Turnout is everything in an election. 
I remember hearing about the remake on Yahoo. My immediate assumption was that this time, instead of Russians, they'd make China the invading country. then someone told me it was supposed to be N. Korea and I thought WTF? Nobody's gonna believe THAT.....I wonder why wouldn't they have gone with China? Now I know..... money talks, baby!!
I'm no expert. Just saying they lisp in their dialect and that might be why OP said that, however inelegantly. 
What he is trying to say is that if you have no understanding about what is going on and you admit that you have no knowledge about the topic of discussion then there is no reason for us to take your arguments into serious consideration.    If you expect us to take them into consideration then by that logic we should listen to evangelical republican males about abortion.  This doesn't mean you can't express your opinions, just that we won't take them into consideration.  I don't need a citation from some sage from the civil rights movement to recognize what kind of problems we would run into if an uninformed person's opinion counted as much as the opinion of someone who has lived through an event.
[deleted]
If he was what you claim him to be, do you think so many would have willingly followed his message?  You claim lots of things but provide no evidence or proof. You're too egotistical to actually read and investigate everything that it is said about the topic, but instead, all you do is make unsupported assumptions and repeat the words of bigoted racists. You are clearly driven by bias and prejudice rather than objectivity or truth. Violent? Why? For taking up arms in self-defense? His people were subjected to relentless persecution by those who violently opposed his message.  Pedophile? please read through the comments.   This discussion has no end, but really, I ask nothing of you but to open your eyes. You don't have to agree with the principles of Islam or the actions of its followers; oppose them all you want. But do not blindly repeat everything that is said.  
How would ANY train going full speed react to an earthquake? You're pretty much fucked no matter what train it is.
Here is another Video of reforestation. I think the video shows Picture over  a 10 to 20 year period to show the changes.  http://www.ted.com/talks/willie_smits_restores_a_rainforest.html
Maybe I don't read the news enough, but I've never heard that term before. Has the news decided that "sexual assault" is now too judgemental, and made a fake name for it?
Now, lets just switch some words around...   &gt;This silly little argument again.. Bin Laden and Mullah Omar are cunts. For a good person with good intentions to do cunty things, it takes any ideology to an extreme. Hardly said anyone *whose a Muslim is going to automatically be a good person. That's just fucking stupid. And you're fucking stupid for not being able to realize their are extremists in every ideology.   Its amazing what we can achieve by trying to understand that the world is not a 'black or white' situation. 
Thats what happens when things go to down the drain.
It's good to see that Brazil is actually trying to root out corruption instead of sweeping it under the rug.
Kinda hard to think ahead when their populist politics is based on the idea of ignoring people's memory so morons can get re-elected every 4 years with the same excuses and empty promises. This kind of government is inherently short-sighted and incapable of long-term thinking.  The Chinese civilisation has the oldest still existing political and cultural tradition. They understand and appreciate the concept of working in the long term. Democracy, capitalism and communism are short-term phenomena compared to the breadth of the Chinese civilisation. It's existed long before them and it'll still exist long after they're historical footnotes.
Welcome to the 20th century of naval power
lets just sprinkle the Japanese in the middle east. That place will be a utopia in a year.
OR are actually part of the cartel, or get bribes. 
US colonies vs. Native Americans?  That figure is impressive.  
Wolverine corridor between Chicago and Detroit is now up to 110mph
&gt;Islamic scholarship differs on its punishment, ranging from execution – based on an interpretation of certain hadiths – to no punishment at all as long as they "do not work against the Muslim society or nation."[1]   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Apostasy_in_Islam
Sir, are you really trying to prove your point that magnetpl is a terrible person by using racial slurs and slurs against people with mental handicaps?  I find that quite absurd!  Generally people with such politically correct points as "western folk do more terrible things to other folk so we should not be afraid of foreigners" try to do so with more polite language.
[deleted]
That feeling of dread when you ask someone where's he's from and he says "Canada". Five minutes later he'll be steering every conversation over to the superiority of Canada vs. the rest of the world. Effing tiresome. 
You really don't think the issue might be deeper than 'blacks are terrible parents because'?  I'm surprised anyone would upvote shallow circular logic like this. You cant just throw causality out the window like that and expect to be taken seriously.
Don't expect any action from Europe. Those who run the EU don't like the UK for a number of reasons (it's the heart of euro skepticism after all). I would expect Germany and France to not care unless perhaps they can get some more cash from the UK or more of its sovereignty by claiming the answer to this to be more EU federalization of foreign relations. 
Fortunately i have no idea how much more or less painful that is.
Give him a break. He IS a confused zoologist.
Switzerland has terrain the prohibits high speed rail. Lots of mountains, to many bends and changes in elevation. So there is no need to design the trains to be aerodynamic as it will never been a limiting factor.
The British opted for similar techniques when they were in Cyprus. Savage. It's so sad to see the birthplace of western civilisation overshadowed by the  fascist minority.
For this discussion, let's say I accept the definition of rights contained in the US Constitution, as expanded and explained by Supreme Court decisions. Those are not the only rights which should be respected by government, but they are a good start. 
[deleted]
Why do you think the world is changing into a more tolerant society? In the US the polarization of political views would seem to suggest the opposite. In the Middle East the replacement of dictators with theocratically lead democracies would seem to suggest intolerance is on the rise - and before that it was apparently already rising as the article below indicates.  http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2012/sep/20/religious-intolerance-on-rise-worldwide
[deleted]
It's not really talking shit, it's being honest.  The country is a barely-livable shithole.
"In a tit-for-tat move, Indian Embassy here started stamping the Chinese passports with official map of India, catching the Chinese officials by surprise. "  Go india.  In terms of the BRIC countries I'd most likely to see dominate the future, I'd much rather go with India and Brazil, than Russia and China.
They posted a pic of the body. Classy.
&gt; Vietnam, are looking to strengthen ties with the US to protect their interests  Unfortunately, we make it a very unsavory choice between bad and worse.
...It takes something special to ignore everything I just said and say that  REALLY special, and none of it good.
Because the US would have very little to gain in Mexico. Plus, you know, the drug war is profitible.
&gt;it's the American government that needs to grow up, not the citizenry.   Who votes for the government if not the citizenry?  We just tried to legalize marijuana possession in Oregon and it got shot down by the citizenry.  Like it or not, our government reflects the current voting population pretty well.
[deleted]
&gt;As an American who had family participating in the American Revolution, our family has always embraced freedom.  LOL   Freedom....  In the last 50 years, America has been responsible for more invasions and wars, and has meddled in the affairs of more sovereign nations than the rest of the world combined. Vietnam, Taiwan, South and central America, Cuba, Iran, Israel, Afghanistan and Iraq.... the list goes on and on. It's so funny to hear you, as a proud American, talk about your heritage and link that to the Freedom of sovereign nations to choose their own destiny.... As if you're one to set an example.   The reality is, American foreign intervention is responsible for denying more freedom to sovereign nations than any other country on this earth.   And here you are crying about Taiwan and freedom.... it's laughable. America, land of the free is some main stream media bullshit fed to you on a silver platter from birth.  
You are a fucking idiot
Drug cartels care less about weed then they do about cocain and meth. Weed is much easier to process and less costly to ship.
Your 'choice' is what creates the market. You can't dodge this. The market  is what's causing these deaths. You value your choice above the lives of others. It's not bad logic at all. You should change your laws, your society. Not fuck with someone elses.
[Lincoln most likely never said that.](http://druglibrary.org/schaffer/LincolnQuote/lpq0001.jpg)  [(more...)](http://druglibrary.org/schaffer/lincoln.htm)
Cartels would switch to other things.  The re-legalization of alcohol didn't kill the mafia -- what (gradually) killed the mafia was RICO laws that made mafia leaders easier to prosecute.  Would the cartels have existed without harsh anti-drug laws in the US? I imagine not.   But right now, the cartels do exist and are full of greedy sociopathic monsters with guns, who won't *stop* being greedy sociopathic monsters with guns just because one revenue stream dries up.
The only problem I've encountered is the occasional memory leak. My pet peeve design flaw is that there's no option in the UI to reset it, so you have to get up and manually power-cycle it by pulling the plug.  I did notice that the Netflix UI was changed at one point, and had been totally overhauled (for the better). It would even auto-start the next episode of a show after 10 seconds if you were watching a series, which was fucking awesome. Then for some reason it was rolled back. The new UI was only there for less than a day.  Anyway, I love my revue. I bought it after the price dropped to $100. Well worth the price. There must be mod forums for it. If I stumble onto a good mod forum, I'd consider trying to scrounge up a second one.
Standing aside while everyone else kills each other is a brilliant way to win a war.
Luca Brasi swims with the fishes. 
[deleted]
"Law" implies honor, trustworthiness, obedience to authority, and reliability.  "Chaos" implies freedom, adaptability, and flexibility.  The Good are forced to follow the Law. The Evil thrive in chaos, and as a result, often win.
By killing violent criminals who have killed over 50,000 people? I imagine that the majority of the populace already hates the cartels, and that the majority of the cartels already hate the US government.
I have relatives in Mexico, so it's nice to hear different view points. I can understand a fear of military presence, but I would think that the fear from cartels would be much greater. Who if anyone else do you think would be able to assist? From my understanding, everything local is much to corrupt for anything to actually get done.   I would see an occupation as a way to help return power and end corruption. It would also help to eliminate (not all) serious drug problems here in the U.S. along with other violence. 
sometimes reality isn't politically correct
The STOVL variant of the F-35, which is what the U.K. is after, has already started being delivered to the first USMC unit.
&gt;I'm sure you're still better off than 90% of the world  It still doesn't change the fact that there's still so much pandering, unfairness, etc, in our own government that needs to improve. As long as a nation's people are content with being better than some other country, rather than trying to better themselves objectively, then we're only asking for stagnation (or worse, regression).
Once you get the Mexican defense echelon off the cartel payroll. Theoretically if this happened in another country and things got this out of hand, federal and military forces would be called in.  * See Columbia.  * See Brazil.  Columbia has for most part got its shit together to the point its nearly a normal country, if you're not in FARC territory in the boonies. Bogota is a tourism city and normalized from being the #1 murder capital in the world in the 80s.  In 10 more years, if Mexico is still the #1 murder capital, and the military hasn't been used an masse, than the cartels official won and Mexico lost the current Drug War.   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bogot%C3%A1  
What? Immigrants come for welfare, most of them don't work, and don't plan to work. Countries like France are full of 3rd generation muslim immigrants who don't work, whose fathers didn't work, and whose grandfathers didn't work.
All British outlets interestingly enough.
They know who the cartels leaders are, surely we could send in (with permission from Mexico) the likes of the SAS and Delta to cut the head of the snake.  Yes it's extreme but these are extreme times. 
Yes, we could legalize and regulate all the drugs.  Where do you think the cartels get their money? Legalization would end the profits. Did we learn nothing from Prohibition?  The US drug war has bloodied other nations for no good purpose.
You're badly misrepresenting history: "Muslims treated women as equals because Muhammad's original teachings stated women as equals until I think it was the Byzantine empire got a hold of it and added their own culture to the religion." That's not even close to true.
Thanks for that. That article does shed some light on how complex this issue is. Cut the head off Medusa and you'll still have others to deal with.   
so what about those student who do go to that school but not a real christian.
Zombie virus. 
Maybe we can send donkeys as decoys so the woman can pass through safely.
incoming /r/pyongyang ban for posting this article I am sure  EDIT: Oh my gosh you guys it was a joke
No but Palestinian suffering by the same token in no way absolved Palestinians of atrocities. Therefore what you have is a conundrum. And it can be said that without a doubt Israeli "atrocities" are NEVER on the scale of Syria. Israeli discrimination issues, while valid, are NEVER on the scale of Jordan or Iran for example when it comes to minority views. It's not that Israel can't do better. We could all do better that is a given. Israeli liberals would like some credit for trying though. 
The characterization of the suburbs as a place that should know better only cultivates an Us vs. Them mentality. I'm not a fan of Ford, but he won because he recognized the concerns of a suburb population largely ignored by our more recent cosmopolitan mayors.
Maybe the trick would be to hit North Korea so hard, so quickly, that they couldn't launch retaliatory strikes against Seoul?
Her body was found over a week ago.  yeah I guess UK news sources are just slower than US ;)  also, you're defending the dailymail??
People often get executed at the border when they are returned. Bang.  They string wire through their shoulder blades to keep them from running away or killing themselves (in which case the goons who bring them back would not get paid)  Three strikes.
That's really interesting! I didn't realize it was that extensive.  I do remember a Chinese friend (who's married to a Vietnamese, both 2nd generation Asian Americans) telling me that he thought quite a few Vietnamese words sounded very similar to some Cantonese words but he wasn't sure.
Fuck this guy. 
[deleted]
&gt;Their big vulnerability is the level of lying they have done to people.  Mitt Romney has proven this isn't necessarily true.
The hope is that North Koreans eventually find the courage and opportunity to overturn the situation. It really can't go any other way than a violent, bloody rebellion really. It will have to go the way of all the Middle Eastern revolutions we're seeing recently, except the opposite end of the rebellion probably won't result in some sectarian/religious violence considering the people in NK are controlled to be monolithic and severely under educated about world culture. 
I want the world being able to know that I'm against the use of "IANAP", that just too much IMO
There is no Indy, only Zuul...
and by " Zionist" you really mean " Jew"...why not just say it? afraid? 
WTF.... getting pantsed at 13 was pretty bad... I couldn't imagine this.
As a chubby chaser, I'd fuck him. 
Little bit of column a, little bit of column b.
&gt;I just feel sorry for people who can't have sex with other people and have to resort to animals.  I said other humans you fucking twit. Are you saying homosexuals are less than human?
&gt;  You can't fuck Fido, but you can shoot him  Actually, in Germany the only people legally allowed to kill animals are slaughterers, vets and licensed hunters and fishermen, after appropriate training and exams. So, no, you're not allowed to shoot Fido.
&gt;As an European I support the one-state solution. I consider all of Israel to be Occupied Palestine.  Charming.
And they are somehow incapable of progress eventually?  Well if that's the case then I would agree, nuke them all into oblivion before this disease spreads. But obviously I don't so I won't go around picking the most obnoxious aspects of a culture and judging them as a whole for it.  That said, I wouldn't mind paying to wipe out this ‘Private Deterrent Force’ if they believe this is their purpose in life.
If one chooses to blame China, it would be for creating the time bomb in the first place.  Kim Il-Sung was a member of the Communist Party of China, and his takeover and military campaign were financed by Mao with tacit approval from Stalin.
Desmond Tutu also said the current ANC government is "worse than apartheid". So perhaps he's just an old man prone to hyperbole. 
[deleted]
Should we ignore the amount of people who've died in gulags which far surpass the amount of Russians who died during Stalin's "great revolution?"  Why are you guys giving praise to a sadistic murderer who could have accomplished what he did without the massacring of his people?
A-fucking-men.  Fox News possesses a strong conservative bias, yes. MSNBC's LIBERAL bias is just as strong, and yet nobody ever seems to mention that. 
Say what you will about stereotypical Chinese intelligence, but they can be really dumb sometimes...
That's not what this protest about. If it were anti Islamist it would have happened ages ago and what blindfold? The only reason is the decree nothing more nothing less. If he doesn't remove it it will be more. 
&gt; Libertarians are for free market, not Capitalism.  That is a distinction without a difference. Libertarians are capitalists whether you like it or not.  More law and regulation would be nice, but we would still have a small sector of the population controlling a massive amount of wealth and exploiting the working class. We also can't just assume, like the libertarians do, that in a free market all agents are going to play fair because that just doesn't happen and [it's also a fallacy to think that it does](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Just-world_hypothesis). Capitalism itself is the problem.
I figured they would have problems, but I don't think anyone predicted they would be so stupid as to declare a dictatorship right out of the gate and expect nobody to get upset.  They're like fascist brownshirts but... dumber.
No, you're the fucking cunt. Your side of the world does treat women like complete pieces of shit, and it's amazing that you're sitting here calling other people "fucking cunts" and "white redneck asses" and denying that shit like acid attacks and rapes happen in your country. Fuck you and fuck Egypt, yes women are abused in the western world (all over the planet really), but not even close to the levels of abuse going on the Muslim world. I'm from India and I've personally seen Muslims beat their wives in the street and treat them worse than animals so don't insult me with your blatant lies. I've also seen victims of acid attacks too. Fuck you, fuck your country, and fuck your religion, you people are fucking animals. Don't care if this is politically incorrect, I'm done with putting up with pieces of shit like you who actually dare to say the western world is worse than your misogynistic, violent, illiterate, backwards corner of the world.
You don't speak Hebrew? So let's get back to the point.  Are you proud of this ratio?  Is the disproportion alarming to you at all?
they'd fall for it :) 
And to a country with national healthcare. Eat your heart out, poor american citizens.
No, the resolution was passed in 2010. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Defamation_of_religion_and_the_United_Nations#2010
Texas
Because we are jelly ):
In Your Face!
Welcome to the debate on multiculturalism - where it's improper to point out that brutal and medieval social conventions aren't as desirable as progressive, pragmatic liberal ideals.
YOU SUCK MCBAIN
Unless you think Israel oppreses the entire region I don't see how those things have to be related.
I think the entire debt cycle/trap is part of the problem. Why should we live off money we don't have? Banks take no risk when they lend out a pensioner's savings. They will gladly take the interest benefit that accrues to them when a loan is honored and then qualify for massive bonuses. But when their own assessment of a lender proves to have been wrong, we must all come to their rescue (because they are too big to fail.) The Libor scandal proves bankers are out of touch with the real world in which the rest of us lives. By manipulating the base rate that determines what each of us in the global village pays for debt, they effectively screwed every single one of us (again). ABAB. 
This will not work. The Iranian scientists will be assassinated and all accelerated particles ends up in Israel.
islam, enough said
If she looks like that, isn't he the unlucky one, being forced to remarry?
Ashes, ashes...all fall down.
"+972 mag says they're not biased so that must mean it's true"  A quick look at their content disproves this and most of Israel's pominant critics have credentials which would on the surface make them appear to be objective.
http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/13xb6u/icelands_president_explains_how_a_financial/c783ze1
Polls are objective measures of people's opinions. What "people talk about" is interesting, but it lacks scientific value. You are free to deduce whatever you want, but, specially on this matter, we have to be careful.
It's just mind-boggling that they're being massacred for this.  The horn is just keratin with no medicinal properties at all.  And "fever and convulsions", there's plenty of real medicines for that, priced as much less than "rhino horn".   I could understand when an animal is overhunted for food, but for a commodity with no purpose at all, even aesthetic???
The Nazis were tried for war crimes because they lost.  The Allies weren't tried for war crimes because they won.  It's really that simple.  If it had gone the other way, you can bet that nobody would have been tried for launching V2 rockets at England, but Curt LeMay and Arthur Harris sure as hell would have been hung for their roles in  firebombing campaigns in Germany and Japan.  Pretending that somebody is "in the right" objectively in the Middle East is about the most naive thing I have ever seen.
the bus is not intended to drive into any settlements, simply because none exist in the area. it is outside the Gaza Strip, where no Israelis live.  you're welcome to search yourself, but it's very easy to come with baseless accusations.
If people downvote comments because they disagree, how can we have a discussion.
Not to mention I think every nation has hillbillies or extreme elements which behave in such a manner.
Why should we respect Islam? Why should I respect Christianity? Why should I respect Scientology? Why should I respect any religion? It's all made up, and my lack of respect for it isn't going to make believers stop believing, so who gives a shit? I don't owe religion anything.
Wrong. They rejected the [Peel partition](http://www.ijs.org.au/Images/UserUploadedImages/PeelCommPP1937.gif) too, which gave them 80% of the land.
amongst?
&gt;Thousands of claims mainly by parents who have no medical background or knowledge.  No, made by parents who have kids with health problems, which is what motivates them to do so. 
Comments made on reddit are hardly authoritative sources on anything.    Anyway, the IMF seems to think that what worked in Iceland might work elsewhere.      Here is a link to the article "How Iceland Recovered from its Near-Death Experience", written by Poul M. Thomsen, Deputy Director of the IMF’s European Department, who was in charge of the IMF’s program in Iceland.     
Meanwhile the UK is too much of a pussy and doesn't want to upset the US and Israel.
Who are all these idiots who think homeopathy is completely ineffective? It is not and there is ample science to support that it is a highly effective and useful treatment. In fact it is one that has been used by doctors and non-doctors alike as a proven treatment.   Now, granted, we are only talking about one very specific condition...   Dehydration.
And apparently it was some time before this whole shebang went down.
You could require some sort of block randomization and two-factor authentication that authenticates to a certain host.  For example, a USB stick would provide a key and middle-ware that would translate between kernel level filesystem requests and the randomized block data.  Then, you would still need the password/key to decrypt the "re-ordered" logical volume.  This would essentially make their copy worthless, because the block-randomization middleware could easily be made to only re-order certain parts of the logical volume when given certain passwords.  That way when you decrypt the volume, it just looks like you have a large volume that is only partially filled instead of a nested volume which is still obviously encrypted.  Also, if you happen to lose the USB token, recovery would be even more impossible than for basic encryption.
There isn't anything (aside from cooling the body). It's his own little flavor of pseudo science that he thinks puts him above the unenlightened ones that believe in toxin sweat.
Israel has pulled out of Gaza and left it for the Palestinians, who of course said thank you by throwing thousands of rockets at it over the next few years.  As for the settlements - I agree, and I have voted against them in the last 2 elections. 
What exactly was the treatment?
&gt;it isn't being peer-reviewed  The article says it hasn't been peer-reviewed, but that it is being peer-reviewed. That doesn't really mean much to me, as "peer review" is useless without naming the peers, but there it is.
We have copyright laws and pirating breaks those laws. 
... FYI, you can't edit titles.
Death by Polio infection.
[Can already print a bike!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hmxjLpu2BvY)
Ah that's true.  I was reading in-between the lines a little bit assuming he meant that if we allow the government to tell parents to vaccinate their kids, eventually we will allow them to dictate all parts of our lives
[deleted]
I hate to take this away from Reddit but this is not an all or none problem.  Yes, vaccinations are mostly good.  Some are definitely not.  You have a duty to understand the differences and you have a right to ask/determine the validity of any medical process.  I worry when so many people here post that all are valid and perfect treatments.  Do not assume all vaccinations are created equally.    And no I'm not saying don't get vaccinated, I'm saying that the science is rather clear about its limitations.  If you don't understand it, learn.     And yes, homeopathy is pseudo-science.   And its sad that some people take a small piece of knowledge and grab on it without really reading the literature on this.  On both sides.  For or against, you need to learn about what exactly vaccines do, and how they do it, and then you need to understand its side-effects and long-term consequences of specific vaccines.    TL;DR  Be informed not dogmatic.  
My cat misses 365 days of work by shitting in a box.
I still agree with it in principle.  Why is it that reddit is up in arms when someone steals, for example, a picture created by a redditor and puts it on a site surrounded by ads?  Why is it constantly see "NO BLOGSPAM" comments in files?  And yet if it's a game, music track or ripped DVD suddenly that's absolutely fine.  Why?  Because we like getting shit for free and aren't afraid to be shamelessly two-faced about it.
&gt;You sure hamas is targeting civilians  http://www.cbsnews.com/video/watch/?id=50135488n "Hamas Rocket Hits Two Israeli Schools"  You really will excuse anything Hamas does, won't you?
Imagine there is a crime that pays the criminal $100. Police can only charge criminals 10% of the time.  If you want to make a fine that deincentivises doing the crime, you would have to fine them at least $1000 dollars. Otherwise, it would be worth their while to risk being caught.  Following this line of reasoning, it makes sense to charge ridiculous fines to pirates, as the odds of being caught downloading something is so small.  (Of course no kid really deserves have their life ruined with massive fines for doing something as socially acceptable as piracy. Obviously socially acceptable =/= morally good, but if you know anything about humans you know that otherwise god people can do horrible things if all their peers are doing it too.)
Had to look up "Supergrass": Informer in a high-profile case.  /American
[deleted]
Some encryption schemes allow for a second dummy password to be used that leads to dummy data(not garbage data, real fake data), while still preserving the real encrypted data.
A human has the intellectual capacity and self awareness to not be a slave to evolutionary drives. We can choose not to reproduce, we can choose altruist or self destructive paths that make us irrational evolutionary actors. 
[deleted]
That has to be one of the best opinion pieces I've ever read, and I didn't even catch her name.
&gt; Eating humans is just a taboo, so actually it's probably OK as long as you didn't kill them, the eating thing just makes us squeamish.  Seeing as we kill the animals we eat, the assumption could also be "It's OK to kill and eat humans" (actually, this was what I intended to say).  &gt; Anyways, I think the only problem is you said "I choose for them not to die at all" - "I choose not to kill them" I guess would clarify things. In retrospect I could have made that assumption myself.  Fair enough.
But it's considered racist to say otherwise, so I'll take the 2 men's side so I'm not seen as a racist like in my other comment.
I am at peace with the fines and the system in place.  I have a big blu ray collection, netflix and an itunes account with tons of rentals.  I just wish that there was some legislation in place so that content providers could only file for damages if they offered their own paid digital distribution. Almost everyone does but there are some products out there you actually can't pay for online.  I'm looking at you, HBO.  That way people could still be fined for infringements but businesses would still have to be competitive and innovative and couldn't just cling to shoddy old distribution systems (physical media you have to buy at a brick and mortar building, cable television). A lot of the attacks on downloading have just been a part of businesses whining about being dragged kicking and screaming into the 21st century by their customers.
I see you did not read the article. The father had nothing to do with the murder, all he did was reject the suspects proposal saying that his daughter was too young.
Would you not agree that a democratic stance requires you accept and recognize the equal value of all citizens? How can this be even possible to unify with the opinion that they, the party, can dictate who is truly a Swede and who is not?  I do agree though, that the party itself is not nazi. Some members are. I would say that the party is fascist, because it shares the common basis for all fascism - The belief in a national, cultural, superiority ruined by external forces, and the need to rebuild the nation to a former greatness.  According to the sweden democrats, this former greatness has been ruined by immigration. They disguise their xenophobia and racism in economical questions and dress up in suits. You don't win enough votes by saying "Non-Swedish culture is poisonous and must be eradicated!".
What's an MP?
Any reason why?
Their agenda don't stand under scrutiny. It's a mess without coherency and applicability. Monoculture as a goal? How does one achieve that? (not explained). Swedes (what is a Swede?, not really dealt with or consistent).   So the concensus is that their agenda is just expressions of the underlining racism and xenophobia. Either that or their program is randomized slogans.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soran_Ismail This is the person in the film. He was born in Iran, consideres himself a Kurd and is a Swede.
Well for intergration to have any chanse at all to work the part that is going to be integrated has to be smaller then the part its going to be integrated into.  For example the city i live in has now over 50% imigrants, the city is devided in zones with high crime, high unemplojment and high costs for social wellfare. You have to understand Sweden have an extreme imigration policy, we are not racists as a people, far from. What we want is imigration on the same level as rest of Europe and for that its open season on us.   Recently a MP of SD:s house were fired upon, DEAD SILENT in media, same media that has written 30+ articles about a drunk movie of SD members 2.5 years ago when they wernt even in the parlament.  A week ago an 87 year old lady told 5 imigrants to stop kick a dog that was tied outside a store, they did.. they struck her down and started kicking her instead... to the point her vagina (yes its true) got destroyed.... anything in media about it? you guessed it DEAD SILENT.   intergration has failed its not the imigrants faults its our politicians and journalists fault. Covering for each other.   
IT'S GOT WHAT PLANTS CRAVE
Stay classy. 
&gt;If you study their party program and not what media are saying about them  I don't trust their official stance. And considering my impression from both media and people around me who as voted for them it'll be hard for me to start.   &gt;Basically all the rest of the parties cant find any problem with the current imigration  Uhm, what? Are you joking here?
[deleted]
If the IDF performed target practice or fired warning shots *into Gaza*, I would definitely regard it as ending the ceasefire.  I'm not trying to have it both ways.
[deleted]
If the shoe fits, wear it.
Hmm, you might be right about the second picture, since it was published by the "Bevara Sverige Svenskt"-movement (that eventually disbanded and reformed into the Sweden Democrats in the end of the 80's). Still, that would put it at somewhere around 25-30 years ago.  The first picture is published by the Sweden Democrats though, meaning it has to be from sometime in the 90's. (SD was formed in 88, and ceased with the *overtly* racist rhetoric in the years between 1996 and 2000).
I never said that it offended me. But to claim that stormfront is equivalent to reddit is certainly to whitewash racism.
Then read the article? 
[deleted]
History repeats itself for those who do not know it. They need to make sure factories are following at least some of the IBC regulations. 
&gt; If you're reading this in Syria...stop wasting precious time on Reddit.  FTFY
[deleted]
Shills for who?
No. That was prerecorded music. You notice the time on that podcast? Fifty-nine minutes. That means that it will stop after an hour.  I went to http://tunein.com/radio/Dimashq-r101206/. Try listening to any one of those stations from Damascus, and you'll see that it has truly gone silent there.
Alright what are the problems with the Palestinians becoming a state unilaterally and how do you stand on the issue? 
There are different ways of asserting power, and magnitude of force is just one primitive motion. Keep on paying our taxes so we can kill muslims so I can have a kushy job. ty.
Couldn't get past the link to "Borg to lay 'heavy hand' on the Swedish banks".  Resistance is futile. You will be assimilated.
**Edit: Skeptical_Lemur do you have transcript  that proves your claim that Abbas called Israelis "murderers and killers of women and children"?**  &gt;That is not how you start peace talks. You don't attack the other party.  Hilarious. Israel is building illegal settlements on Palestinian land while claiming to want to start peace talks.  And you're bashing a Palestinian leader for using harsh words against the occupier of his people?  &gt;I'll probably get downvoted, but whatever.  BRAVE, BRO.
Lol...  * [Israeli Arabs, who make up 22% of the population, suffer from exclusion and discrimination.](http://www.haaretz.com/opinion/israel-must-end-discrimination-against-arab-college-graduates-1.436533)  * [According to the Association for Civil Rights in Israel (ACRI), Israeli Arabs "are discriminated (against) in almost every aspect of their lives"](http://sjlendman.blogspot.com/2012/01/racist-discrimination-against-israeli.html)  * [Arab Israeli barred from Public Sector employment](http://www.globalresearch.ca/arab-israeli-barred-from-public-sector-employment/19277) 
Depends on how they're used. Whatever is going on now, it's going to be bad.
WTF is wrong with those people?
im not sure its fair to say the british government don't believe israel has done anything wrong to the palestinians. theyve raised concerns on multiple occasions.  
I'm confused... your post says:  &gt; A person who supports  So therefore you are saying Palestinians are separatists. My point is that they're already considered separate in Israel's eyes.
As a rape victim, [in more than one way] circumcision caused me significantly more greif, and emotional pain than having been molested by a disgusting 40 year old man when I was 9 years old.
&gt;Right up there next to saying expecting a logical statement from someone is sexist (heard that one yesterday).  Can I get a link for that? I'm morbidly curious about how that would work.
Just feeling the need to join the other americans in saying that we're happy for you guys, regardless how our idiotic government voted on this issue.
...and none of this at all addresses my comment. It's like you took a complete tangent into lala land. But I'll address your points anyway.  &gt; You do realize that "Palestine" was also inhabited by thousands of Jews that have lived in the area for thousands of years?  In 1878, nearly 500,000 Arabs populated Palestine, over 96% were Muslim and Christian (only 3.2% were Jewish). Any Jewish habitation claims to Israel are fabricated, or based on the Bible.  &gt; Nazi affiliated Arabs  Are long dead. This inflammatory rhetoric has no basis in modern context.  &gt; You do realize that many of these "Palestinians" are actually Syrian and Egyption refugees from the war of Arab aggression.  And many aren't. Many have lived there, and their families have lived there, for centuries... back when Jews were a fraction of a minority.  Another interesting tidbit:  Until the end of the 19th century, this small group of Jews lived in peace with a large population of Arabs... at a time when Jews were persecuted throughout Europe.  Only when the Zionist movement gained traction, and as Jews fled Europe because of the Holocaust, did violence erupt in Palestine. This is a direct result of the exploding Jewish population claiming land and resources that traditionally belonged to Arabs... and pushing them into smaller and smaller segregated areas of undesirable land.  This is all factual, and you can look it up. None of it is "propaganda."
They also have the largest (economically) and most powerful nation backing them to serve as a convenient counterbalance to those 56 Muslim countries (which you are also assuming operate on a platonic mentality of Islamic preservation across the board) yet even the allied nations of the United States who have it in their economic interest to continue to ally themselves as such have abandoned Israel, namely Latin America, Europe, and large swaths of Africa and East Asia. I'm not going to pretend they could, or even should, try to persuade the entire 72%, but abandoning their more aggressive stances could win them the favor of a sizable portion of them, which is better than having the small portion of support they have now. If only 10% of the member states are on their side, the 90% can run roughshod over them (with what limited power the General Assembly has as it is) but if that number gets up to 35-45%, the slimmer majority has to more seriously weigh the economic and political consequences of rejecting the viewpoint of that minority.
[deleted]
The chained attack dog is a good analogy. Their actions will always be directly linked with the US, almost rightfully so, until we address their behavior. Of course if we were to condemn their behavior we'd have to look in the mirror. Im not sure were quite ready to do that.
Oooh, and the one guy who posted "a wild redditor appears". Fuck yourself dipshit (whoever you are).
[deleted]
I choked up watching this  my life is such a fantasy shielded from reality
Please elaborate on this. Can't find answer anywhere 
We can hope. Thing is, the people holding up that process right now don't really use things like Reddit. We're a "bastion of liberal neckbeards" after all. Bunch of bullshit. Here's hoping our generation kicks the doors down and let's information flow freely, even if it fucks with our sense of peace. 
Stop funding dictators just because they play nice with us.
Some say peace is freedom from disturbance, so if we were to ever attain peace everyone would have to think exactly alike. So out with religion and out with everything that makes us individuals. E=Or you could take the easy route and let someone be a super-dictator with control over everything (I volunteer).
to what end?
[deleted]
I felt so sad seeing his head wound.. I felt like crying :(
[deleted]
It was already shown on CNN.
I only hope he got the attention he so desperately needed or at least some pain relief.
I feel so useless. Can anyone advise on some way to help? Even if it's just a drop in the bucket. I saw Docotrs Without Borders has gone in, shitty link--&gt; (http://www.doctorswithoutborders.org/news/allcontent.cfm?id=219). Can someone recommend any other organizations?
&gt;And how would you feel if you didn't have access to fresh water, or your child died waiting at a checkpoint to get to the hospital, or the military dictated your caloric intake and what foods were available to you?  I'd feel like maybe I should stop trying to bomb people, because it's not working.  But then again, *I* have more strategic pragmatism than hatred.
Actually, economic forces are pushing Israelis leftward.  The problem is that our "left" is mostly just the dovish antiwar movement, rather like the American left pre-2011.  Around here, anticapitalist protest movements are considered "apolitical" or "nonpartisan", because "real politics" isn't allowed to extend beyond "Jews on the Right, Arabs on the Left".
Well that just brought our whole conversation to a halt. I feel like an idiot now.   Just remember what I said, Sean in Cali. Read, and don't stop reading. 
I hope Google has some sort of way to get this message to the people in Syria, I have a feeling that they might have a bit of trouble seeing internet posts about it for obvious reasons. 
God damn it. Why are you right? It's the sad truth and the younger generation still can't do anything about it because the older generation still running most of society. The Syrian government should stand down instead of making it worse than it already is. I think this has been said many times but this video exactly shows how civilians are caught up in a battle for power. Many children die, while they are who we are to hold dear and they are who will carry the rest of humanity into the next generation. This is way too fucking wrong.
They did eventually. It's all about time zones. You have to catch them between shifts. For example there is a large Australian contingent so you have to post before they wake up. 
[deleted]
Awesome movie. Ridiculous story. Ridiculously awesome.
Because of censorship, we are not as free as they tell us we are.
If we cut his head for it it's not his best interest. See? Simple /jk
The U.S. was the last democratic nation to allow women to vote, we will probably be the last to allow gays to marry. We are the largest climate change denying nation. List goes on and these are just recent.
I guess that Israel should just line up its countrymen in front of shooting squads so it'll have a right to respond?
I think this article clearly resembles a kick in the balls for any peace accords. I think its absolutely horrible that we can continue to watch settlements grow yet we bitch about rockets.   Yes violence is not the answer and this is clear but, when you steal anything that doesnt belong to you it is understood that you are inviting hostility.   I really hope the Likud party gets thrown out come January. Its time for some changes in the middle east.
Ashamed Canadian here. I am on my way to write a letter to my MP, the dishonourable Diane Finley. It would be great if other Canadians let their elected officials know that our vote against Palestine puts us on the wrong side of human rights and history. 
&gt;They don't have their own state? Israel completely left them to their own vices.  You ... you can't even distinguish between Gaza and the West Bank?  You really have no place commenting on this topic.
Randroids, eh? I have read everything that woman ever wrote, and though I do not subscribe to all of her political conclusions, she does go a long way towards grounding epistemology, metaphysics, and ethics in a logical framework that does not necessitate an existential leap towards a higher power. That part I can appreciate. where she goes from this framework is, well a bit wonky, but I do not think that everything "Randian" should be written off wholesale. I do not think you meant that, and I guess I just mean to say, " Hey, good retort to the guy above you, have an upvote, not all Rand is bad Rand, though I certainly understand why people feel that she was... misguided." Good day, sir. 
Actually my grandfather lived in a relatively empty village on a mountain, and he was 18 at the time working an olive farm to help feed his family. He still does not have anything against jews, only against the whole zionist movement
What about Gandhi and Nehru? They seem like pretty strong role models...
[deleted]
If by worked with them you mean blaming them for everything and only telling them to stop then yes, he did work with them
Try to read the [History of Palestine](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_Palestine#Modern_era). There is SO much here, you almost need a strong background in history to grasp it all. Look how much that region has changed over the centuries. At one point or another, Israelis Palestinians and Syrians have owned that land. At this point, I'd believe it if no one really know why they were fighting over the land, except to say that Israel is a recognized state with a military and is a nuclear power, whereas Palestinians have no statehood (until now) and no military (unless you count HAMAS) and obviously not a nuclear power.   How do we settle it? No idea. I'm no historian nor political scientist. But I side with the Palestinians.  EDIT: This paragraph from the Wikipedia entry is helpful:  &gt; In 1832 Palestine was conquered by Muhammad Ali's Egypt, but in 1840 Britain intervened and returned control of the Levant to the Ottomans in return for further capitulations. The end of the 19th century saw the beginning of Zionist immigration and the Revival of the Hebrew language. **Jewish immigration throughout the century created relatively large Jewish concentrations in Jerusalem, Safed, Tiberias and Jaffa.** The British government issued the pro-Zionist Balfour Declaration of 1917 during World War I. The British captured Jerusalem a month later, and were formally awarded a mandate in 1922. The Arab Palestinians revolted in 1920, 1929 and 1936. In 1947, following World War II and the Holocaust, the British Government announced their desire to terminate the Mandate, and **the United Nations General Assembly voted to partition the territory. The Arabs rejected the UN partition plan, and a civil war began immediately, with the State of Israel was declared in 1948.** The 700,000 Palestinians who fled or were driven from their homes were unable to return following the Lausanne Conference, 1949. In the 1948 Arab–Israeli War, Israel captured and incorporated more Mandate territory, Jordan captured the region today known as the West Bank and the Gaza Strip was captured by Egypt. **In the course of the Six Day War in June 1967, Israel captured the rest of Mandate Palestine from Jordan and Egypt, and began a policy of Israeli settlements.** From 1987 to 1993, the First Palestinian Intifada against Israel took place, ending with the 1993 Oslo Peace Accords. In 2000, the Second or Al-Aqsa Intifada began, and Israel built a barrier. Following Israel's unilateral disengagement plan of 2004, it withdrew all settlers and most of the military presence from the Gaza strip, but maintained control of the air space and coast.
Anyone else get a twitching brain from the use of "rode" there?
Man that's one cool abbreviation. AHIDPRKASS. Pronounced "Aheedpurrcass"
I think you misspelled "yep".
And now, adding color, a group of anonymous meat-packing glitterati.
It is and always was illegal.
&gt;moved in and took land that didn't belong to them and then over time started pushing out everybody else - leaving people homeless and without basic resources  thats why americans love israel
As an American Jew who supports a two-state solution, it very much disappoints me to see that Israel is not serious about peace.
Champagne wishes/caviar dreams.
I think most of the serious, very skilled hackers either work for the government or simply don't give a shit about stuff like this. Instead we're left with super-serious seeming but not really groups like We. Are. Anonymous. 
[deleted]
Except that the land is disputed, it would have to actually belong to someone for this to be 'theft'. I agree with you about Israel's strategy without a doubt, but lets stay accurate.
I mean there may be a select few anonymous members who can do some actual hacking, but the majority of the members are just like I described.  They run scripts and ddos.  They are essentially harmless.  The only reason they get picked up by the news is to fear monger the general public.  In my opinion, anonymous does more harm than good for their 'cause'.  Occasionally they do some really great stuff, but 95% of the time it's just bullshit.
I honestly think they just need to go all out have have a big war to finally just settle all the bullshit
Tell that to Guantanamo.
If you live in Phoenix you should know about the intense water shortage there and in AZ/CA/NV/CO. Basically we all steal our water supply from the CO River which is thinning.  Israel has even less fresh water supplies, and a much higher population, as well as a very small amount of natural resources with which to make more land hospitable to human life.   I'm not saying this is all a good reason to build settlements, I'm just saying that your implied statement of "we live in a desert, so why can't they" is ignorant. Also, the AZ deserts are incomparable to the Israeli deserts. Especially the Sonoran desert which gets 15 inches of rainfall a year, while the Negev desert has less than half of that (7 inches) as well as impervious soil (you can't grow anything in it).  Source: Wikipedia for Israel info, living in the SW US for the rest.
&gt;West bank shot hundreds of missiles   Yeah, no. To quote Wikipedia: &gt;There have been several attempts by Palestinian groups to fire rockets at Israel from the West Bank, though none of these have been successful.  
&gt; I'm not jewish, and i lived with non-jews.  Yea, but you're not a fucking **Palestinian**, of course.  **EDIT**: I assume to mean you mean you lived with Jews. If that's incorrect, then I'm really not sure what you're getting at.  &gt; The concessions I was discussing are the withdrawals from gaza and south lebanon.  That's what Zionists don't realize. Palestinians don't actually care about *land*. No one should; that's an absurd thing to argue about! They care about rights. They care about not having to carry identification, much like South Africans under Apartheid, they care about the checkpoints, and the rocket fire, and the blockades.  A concession is not simply abiding by the Geneva conventions and giving back land they illicitly "conquered" (and mind you, this is the 21st century; there's no place for nation building through conquest anymore)--it's obviously much more than that.
She wants to know "How much is that doggy in the window?"
Not in the U.K., but I'm also in the Commonwealth, and a public school IS a free school. Private schools are the ones that don't teach evolution sometimes, because they aren't a part of the government. 
They were betting on anonimity. Obviously failed, and the gov really needs to do a security check.
This is so shameful.  Do they not see the hypocrisy?  Do they not see that they have become the monsters of their own history?  They should be happy to have a state for themselves - and happy to share it with other refugees, as they once were.  Perhaps "next year"...
I find that this is kind of like..Companies whose management leaned Republican, laying off workers the day after Barack Obama was reelected. 
Well, I am an American so I'm not sure what kind of answer you would be expecting. Perhaps if I imagine hard enough I can give you a Japanese answer.  Regardless, were you going to say your approach to dealing with an unruly child with a nuke, or did you just want to derail the discussion with a hypothetical you cannot actually supply an answer to? It sounds to me like you don't have an answer, and I was curious to see what foolproof approach you'd imagined— because even if your assessment of America were correct, which I dispute, I still don't see a viable approach given there are no parental figures.  And furthermore, are you just being contrarian for fun? You said I'm wrong, but that I'm right. If we were discussing a wider approach, than the question to ask would be how would you raise a child, but you asked what would you do with an unruly child. If my approach is an appropriate component for dealing with an unruly child within a wider approach to child rearing in general, then to assume I am not using a correct broader approach is begging the question and shifting the goal posts.  I'm now pretty sure you're arguing dishonestly or trolling. Have fun with that unless you want to engage in a meaningful way. I don't wish to engage your insults if you're not going to substantively participate in the conversation.
Yes, Spain are the scumbags here... You're glossing over the bit where they took the treasure from a Spanish warship (Spanish territory in international law), quite possibly in the territorial waters of another nation and then quickly flew it to the USA (where presumably they believed they'd be immune from retaliation) in a manner that's distinctly suspicious. It seems far more likely, from the information provided, that this company tried to pull a fast one rather than negotiate actual terms, they deserve what they got.
So what's the difference in people believing blindly in evolution than those who believe in religion? Absolute belief in anything is zealousness. Why not teach everything and let kids make up their own mind? 
Wrong.  &gt;Teaching intelligent design in public school biology classes violates the Establishment Clause of the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States (and Article I, Section 3 of the Pennsylvania State Constitution) because intelligent design is not science and "cannot uncouple itself from its creationist, and thus religious, antecedents."  [Kitzmiller v. Dover Area School District](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kitzmiller_v._Dover_Area_School_District) 
[deleted]
it's a pretty silly argument logically too.
...countless other countries do **NOT** commit **worse** atrocities towards palestinians....by a long shot
It's the word of God? The holy Bible? Divinely inspired? Are you saying that God has little understanding of science?
Do it, UK.  Bible science is NO science.
I didn't say that it was.
I'm ok with a guy named Jesus who died and took my sins away (since I don't think sin is a real thing anyway), it's the resurrection where they lose me.
&gt;Considering I live here, no. I have a fairly good measure on these things.  I live in Australia, and yet I don't presume to have a statistical grasp of the influence of various ideologies here.  &gt;what you're missing here is that a fairly large portion of settler ideologues are secular.  But then I'm not actually missing that.   &gt;Guess what? American mockumentaries are not accurate guides to real life!   I've seen precisely one American mockumentary in my life, and that was 'This Is Spinal Tap'.   &gt;Yes, many people are secular settlers for reasons of right-wing political ideology.  Believe it or not, this isn't a revelation to me.
[deleted]
If it doesn't effect me i don't care. I don't agree with it, but it's their money.
What they did -a plot to mass murder Canadians- should provide solid grounds for denaturalizing them, IMO.
I bet some of the visitors of that site got were looking for something completely different.
This needs more upvotes
All rocket parts provided by the ACME corporation.
You see, you are mixing up cause and consequence.  Which makes you a very stupid person indeed.
Not matter how hard you try, your revisionism won't fool anyone. Herodotus referred to the area as Palaistinê. If you're saying that Palestine does not exist because the Philistines do not exist, then does it not follow that Israel should not exist because there are no more "true" Hebrew tribesmen? The Philistines simply became assimilated among the people around them. As far as "Palestinians are Arabs from the Arab peninsula," is a terribly wrong preconceived notion. Not all Arabs come from the Arabian Peninsula, its a very flawed thought. If that's the case, then why don't the Israelis just go back to Egypt?
I wish there was a way to take pyramids from Egypt, because that is the only thing in Egypt that I care about.
From what I understand, the UK and parts of Europe have pretty strict standards on fracking, and especially the [containment and disposal of wastewater](http://phys.org/news/2012-07-fracking-undertaken-safely-effective.html).  The US really doesn't regulate it except to exempt it from regulation. 
But is religion an active aspect of the UK government? It's one thing to base your government around religious principles in the spirit of Sharia and an entirely different thing to integrate religious leaders into government under the pretext that their religious opinions do not conflict with a secular constitution and laws.
That's cool bud, I didn't RES tag you because plainly I just don't care if I remember you.
I think the narrative of social media and technology being these grand new tools to undermine traditional authority and bring about a more democratic and free society isn't limited to just liberals or this situation.  The same claim was made about the protests in Iran, which was backed by both conservative and liberal outlets.  I think its more about people always believing in technological progress equaling social progress.  I remember reading groups in the mid 20th century who were convinced that the invention of the telephone was going to enable popular movement to completely outflank the state in terms of organizing and communication.  Its a long standing ideal.
[deleted]
[3.8](http://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/british-columbia/story/2012/09/06/bc-fracking-earthquakes.html) on the [Richter scale?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Richter_magnitude_scale#Examples) I think we'll manage. 
[deleted]
I live in a rural area, and I have noticed sometimes when running the taps there's a fart smell.  Should I hold a lighter to the tap?
[deleted]
Just gonna throw this out from nei.org:  &gt;The volume of used nuclear fuel rods created over the past 40 years—67,500 metric tons—would cover one football field 7 yards deep.
Someone payed attention in school. Always nice to see radiation competent people on the internet. It seems like it's orders of magnitude less rare than it was 4 years ago.
Actually, capitalism does favor it if they show that it can at least become viable at some point in the future.  Most of the green energy companies that the US Stimulus program funded actually had quite a bit of private backing - that was until they got all their federal funds and went bankrupt.  For example, [Solyndra](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Solyndra#Management_and_investors) had multiple investors behind it prior to the government giving it a ~$535 million loan. It was actually doing quite well prior to the "needed" federal government loan.
Ah so you're one of those people who thinks that money is just a scorecard and the game points can be reset or inflated whenever you want?  Cute.
I just went to a presentation/speech given by Van Jones who was Obama's Special Advisor for Green Jobs, and he talked all about green energy/clean energy. It was actually really awesome, and he basically said that the economy was based on three false pillars:  1. Consumption vs. production (instead of having factories in the US where we actually *produce* things, we have malls in America and outsource our jobs to places like China which leaves us with nothing really but debt) 2. Using credit as the main source of payment (instead of encouraging savings and recycling things we can recycle and using the things we have wisely)  3. Ecological destruction (instead of ecological restoration--we take what we need and don't give anything in return)  The main issue with fixing these things, however, is that not only do we need to make a real change in the way the economy is structured, but we also need to make a change in the way people think and the way they act toward each other and toward the earth they live on. That's what will be most difficult, in my opinion (assuming we have the technology to make green/clean energy an actual possibility). 
A billionaire giving away money doesn't feed people, food does. 
Yes, the web is hugely important. No, it cannot run independently of the Internet's structure, which *absolutely* dates back to ARPAnet, and can *only* be attributed to the efforts which grew out of that. The Internet still runs today in an evolved form of the work that came out of that; the web runs in an evolved form of Berner-Lee's work, but wouldn't run at all without the underlying Internet.  To say that the *Internet* can be attributed to Tim and not to ARPAnet is laughable if you actually know the technical details of how both of them work.
Which he will need his magic wand to do single-handedly...
don't forget they can't drink, either.
[deleted]
just wondering if you have hair on your balls...your statements sound like they come from a 9 year old boy.
I assume you've never been to Germany. Practically every house and factory has solar panels on the roof and you can't throw a stone without hitting a wind turbine.  Mass transit is an art in Germany, and always has been, but their street cars, trains, and bullet trains are some of the most efficient in the world.   The point is that comparing fossil fuel consumption in an energy economy is a bit like saying "McDonald's beats Wendy's in the Food Economy"
You've been [**whatabouted.**](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/w60iu/israeli_officials_say_a_un_factfinding_mission/c5amlw2)  next time he "whatabouts" copy and past it in.
every thread this is said, yet every thread any neutral or pro-Isreali opinion is down voted to hell.
[deleted]
Ok, but, I wasn't asking about Israel. I was asking about the Palestinians.  (I also am unsure about the validity of your statement, although I wouldn't be surprised if it was true.)
well herro there amerika - ooh it's 50 years later and you run out of that convenient oil and coal. how terrible!! well i'm off to look funny kätzchen at the internet with mine solarmodul powered computer. bye! sie saugen schwänze!
Nice try Muslim Brotherhood! This guys going to rape you faaaack
I think you are absolutely right.  Having lived as a European through the Regan years, I really just can't grasp why even younger US liberals start to accept his presidency as a good one.  The guy, his policies and politics were nearly as awefull as GW. Todays' glorification of him seem very American to me, you guys are pretty strange sometimes. Somehow you seem to have the absolute desire to glorify a strong leader in the good ol' times. ;-)
Hmmm... this is simply not true. Care to back your shit up?
[deleted]
Sorry if I'm interpreting this incorrectly, but do you mean to say that they should only know about the organs they possess themselves? Because it may not be such a good idea considering many girls undergo menarche prior to that (and thus have the ability to become pregnant). 
Article 23 of the Fourth Geneva Convention permits states like Israel to cut off fuel supplies and electricity to territories like Gaza or WB. It only requires Israel to permit passage of food, clothing, and medicines intended for children under fifteen, expectant mothers, and maternity cases. Moreover, Israel would be under no obligation to provide anything itself, just not to interfere with such consignments sent by others. Article 70 of the First Protocol Additional to the Geneva Conventions of 1977 creates a slightly broader duty regarding the provision of essential supplies, but it does not list fuel and electricity as items for which passage must be permitted.  
Yes I am sorry for the cockroach comment it was undeserved. Your government sucks just like ours...it's almost like the far right fascists control both legislatures through fear and intimidation.
Illegal to be in Israel without a registration card.  That card identifies you as either an Israeli or an Arab.  Not having a card qualifies you as a malcontent in need of detention.  They don't need a star on the sleeve.
[deleted]
Here's a source. Of course lesoc blew it way out of proportion. Organs were harvested from dead without permission regardless of race/age. Palestinian children also happen to be treated at Israeli hospitals, but instead of commending Israel for not discriminating in its healthcare, the headline is "Israel steals organs from Palestinian children". Antisemitism? Maybe not -- but definitely toeing the line.    http://www.huffingtonpost.com/mobileweb/2009/12/21/israel-admits-harvesting_n_399623.html
But no crackdown on boy-raping priests....  Remember kids, we must obey authority first.
Going on 10 hours and I'm not seeing any drastic change. 
[deleted]
lol, except genocide.
Or is it just fantasy?
&gt;Sure the blacks may have killed him because he was white, and it made him a target, maybe they enjoyed it because of him. There was racial hate involved, but not Racism.  There is so much bullshit and delusion in this sentence that it's boggling my mind.
Because it's easily reportable. Israel is a relatively safe combat zone.  Also, it's a lot more compelling than, say, what's going on the Congo, which is basically about who wants money and power, or what's going on in Syria, which is "getting old", or Thai protests, which most people in the US will have little to no context about.  Also, as you might have noticed, war and suffering stick in people's minds the longest.
Nicht sicher, ob sarkastisch
&gt;Mayan ‘End of World’ Stirs Panic in ~~Russia and Elsewhere~~ Stupid People.
I don't think it's necessarily hatred of success more than anti semetic people see Jews as "controlling the system" (which can change from person to person) for their gain at the expense of the anti-semetic person. I personally find a global Jewish conspiracy to be just as ridiculous as a global scientific conspiracy (in regards to global warming) or anything of that sort. It's all just people looking for answers for their problems, but some people are more shitty about it than others, I guess. 
Europe is not going down the tubes... Not any more than any other continent anyway.
[deleted]
Uranium by and far is the most abundant nuclear material so it makes sense that it would be the only one that is seriously considered as all the other wouldn't even come close.  And Uranium-237 can be mined for 130 bucks, but it still requires thousands more to process that and make it into  a workable material for a reactor.  And if you want to use U-235, its an order of magnitude more than that.    You seem to be missing the main point that nobody is doing the amount of research necessary to replace fossil fuels in any meaningful way because it is not economically viable.  Attached to the U-237 cost is the cost of the power plant, which is monumental and cannot be applicable in areas where there are not large amounts of wealth to pay back the capital investment.    I don't disagree that it needs to change, but the first step is making these technologies economically viable.  If you make it cheaper than the alternatives, the switch will happen on its own relatively quickly.  If you force it, it will be reluctant and very gradual.  
Removing diplomat from a country basically means cutting diplomatic ties. Recalling ambassador is not as serious move, and the ambassador usually returns back shortly and its business as usual.   There is a difference between the two, and its quite big.
I think the answer is both. Because Jewish people are both an ethnicity and a religion, the nazis attacked both. That's why Der Stürmer often quoted the Bible and the Talmud to attack Jewish people.  Religious antisemitism was very much mainstay in Germany... after all this is the place that Martin Luther came from, the author of [On the Jews and their Lies](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/On_the_Jews_and_their_Lies), which was displayed at Nuremberg rallies.  Nazis used both religious and racial antisemitism, depending on which one they found more appealing to the target audience.
If we're pulling ambassadors from every country that's being not so nice, I suspect we would have a hell of a lot fewer ambassadors.  China?  Yeah, let's check how they're dealing with Tibet.  Russia?  I hear the Chechyans are not having a good time.  Turkey?  Let's talk about the Kurds.  Pretty much anywhere in the Middle East outside Israel?  Hope we are OK with treating women, gays, and minority religions like shit.
Why?
Well here's [how with some why](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Persecution_of_Jews).. 
Someone elected those "stupid ppl".
You are entitled to free speech, but you aren't entitled to have Reddit provide it, nor are you entitled to other people's deference when you puke your horseshit out onto the webs.
Is this a joke? lol 
But the turban *is* part of the uniform - it's an acceptable, allowed alternative to the bearskin.
The stupid in your post is scary.
You must live under a rock
You might learn a thing or two from an English class, things like not having a vague antecedent.  &gt;they are a thousandth of israels @_@  Sorry, but what "they" are a thousands of what Israels? (I'm guessing that was Israel's, but I still don't know what the 1/1000 is. You don't mean deaths, you would not lie that badly and transparently.)  &gt;you implied that anything is just in war,   No, I said that the action was common. Armies attempts to deny supplies to the other side. You can well object to that, but don't single out Israel for engaging in a common accepted tactic. 
I've seen it fleshed out.   I was born and raised a Christian and I've studied the Bible both as a believer and not.    I'm aware that no denomination (well, no major one) approves or rape or slavery.  I was not claiming that.  The Bible, however, does approve of those things.  I'm personally very glad that people have chosen to move on and keep up with society instead of keeping the word of their holy book. 
I'd like to point out that its things like this that give strength to the argument why Israel must exist. So that Jews have a place to call home. 
&gt; when someone orders operation in which he know a lot of children and civilianns will be killed  That's a pretty lousy standard for world leaders to be held to. If that's your definition of evil, so be it, but by your definition any military official of allied powers during WWII is evil.  &gt; I have yet to see muslims and christians praising Natanyahu.  I fail to see how that affects my point.  &gt; I though you dont consider Egypt as enemy  It's a figure of speech  &gt; They are still supporting you financialy economicly and diplomaticly  They aren't supporting me, I'm an American, but last I checked, the US was Israel's only major financial contributor. Plus, Europe hasn't been too diplomatically supportive of Israel in recent memory. By the way, financially and economically supporting someone are the same thing.  &gt; and those rockets killed what? 10 - 20 ? they are no more usefull than throwing rocks  [No.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Israeli%E2%80%93Palestinian_conflict#Fatalities_1948.E2.80.93present) Comparing rockets to stones is flat out idiotic (the Palestinians have killed more of their own people than they have Israel's since 1987, by the way). And let's say they only had killed 10, would that have made all of those attacks ok? You know what? Don't answer that, because that isn't even remotely the case.  &gt; violence was sparked when Israel shot those children playing in Gaza  After someone shot an anti-tank weapon across the border and Israel fired back.  &gt; while fighting one of the most equiped armies in the world  That really doesn't change the nature of the equipment they have. They have military grade weaponry. Not at the level of Israel, but that doesn't make it nothing. You talk like the Palestinians only have rocks and spears when they have bazookas, rockets and mortars.  &gt; thousands of civilians died on Palestinian side , while only a 10 or 20 died on Israeli side so its really uncomparable  [Once again,](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Israeli%E2%80%93Palestinian_conflict#Fatalities_1948.E2.80.93present) that's just flat out wrong. This is not subject to debate. By the way, note how even with the most favorable estimates to the Palestinians, they've still killed a higher percentage of civilians than Israel has.  &gt; So we should leave ICC doing their job well as they do and work more on pushing the governments around the world to do what they were doing with Nazi warCriminal fugitives - right?  Which is not going to happen any time soon, since nations like China and Russia would rather not have most of their government officials charged with crimes against humanity. The world is not at a point when the ICC can work effectively.
As an American, that is a completely alien concept.  :\
Currently Israel is not at war with an actual state. Why would it want an entity that launches rockets at it to be given all the rights that a state would have? 
This Jesus guy sounds like a total asshole.
&gt; Safest place in the world to be is in front of an Iranian soldier trying to shoot you. You'll die of old age before he hits what he's aiming at.   wat  **EDIT**: [http://www.globalfirepower.com/](http://www.globalfirepower.com/)  Iran has the 12th strongest military.
&lt;Lights start flashing, Thumping music starts&gt;      Now, I dance.  For you.  
It's not really in secret if there are news of this everyday.
.... and /r/spacedicks
This method eliminats the need for preservatives in the bread, please read the actual article.
As much as I'd like to learn another language simply to hear a discussion about another country not including the US it just doesn't seem like it would be worth the effort.  Especially since you'd be awfully limited to the nations you could discuss.
&gt;Let's summarize – Obama's criteria for who may be targeted for drone killings are ... ? ...  This is a question best fielded by the CIA, but for obvious reasons they're not going to publicly state their criteria for selecting targets.  In practice, they target mid- and high-level commanders.  &gt;Civilian casualty rate in Afghanistan is in dispute.  The numbers of civilians who have died is subject to differing estimates, but since 2001, it's fair to say that the number is less than 25,000.  Of that, the vast majority have been killed by the indiscriminate attacks of militant groups.  That fact is more important than the total number, as it indicates what would happen if NATO withdrew without a capable Afghan force in place.  So you support interventionism, but dislike its implementation in Afghanistan.  That I understand; the various reasons you've listed, particularly the corruption within the contract system, make me mad as well.  But this is an argument about *how* to carry out our mission in Afghanistan, not an argument on *whether* we should carry out are mission in Afghanistan.  That's an important distinction.  As per the Soviet situation, a secular dictator probably would have been better in the long run.  By now, with the fall of the Soviet Union, Afghanistan might have been able to transition to some level of democracy.  Stable governments allow the creation of a civil society, which typically pushes for democracy.  What is certain is that 30 years of civil war in Afghanistan have devastated the country's civil society, with most of its educated classes leaving (though many have returned, particularly in Kabul).  I'll be the first to admit that the US's involvment with the mujahidin in the 1980s was probably bad in the long run.  Nonetheless, it happened, and we must now make the best of it.  While it isn't ideal, perhaps we can turn the Karzai government into the relatively stable semi-democracy that Afghanistan needs to develop its economy and civil society.  Much like the drones, it's not ideal, but its may just be the best of bad options.
I hope you are joking... or you don't know what a personality disorder is. You're saying the internet causes sociopathy and the likes? LOL
The problem with an over-arching philosophy is that when you receive evidence that could suggest that your philosophy is flawed, incorrect or unhelpful for a particular case, you are forced to either ignore the evidence, claim that it is not evidence or acknowledge the inconsistency in your beliefs.  People who want an over-arching philosophy about the world, policy, government or anything typically do not like acknowledging inconsistency because the consistency of their philosophy is crucial to keeping their world view together.  Therefore, there is often a resistance to evidence that contradicts their claims.  Evidence puts the philosophy into a state of never-ending existential dilemma when it contradicts predicted outcomes.  I like evidence because I think it is fair (especially when verifiable or independently testable), and I think it can and should change policy preferences.  If credible evidence suggests that a particular policy I supported is not working, my entire world view does not become untenable overnight, only one policy stance I supported.  I will have less of a motive to cover up or dismiss evidence because I can change one aspect of my preferences without changing everything.  My complete and perfect model of the world cannot been ruined by contradicting evidence, because I did not construct one in the first place.  Therefore, evidence becomes more of a tool and less of a hindrance to policy construction.
It kind of is. It does get exploited though...
No, violent protestors do not surprise me. I think your problem is that you seem to view Sweden as some sort of utopia and don't expect the same from it that you'd expect from your own country. Israel has violent protestors as does every country in the world.
I don't think anyone is worried about them "turning off the internet".  That's stupid.  We're worried about censorship.  That's bullshit.
Reading comprehension would suggest that there would be a *drop* not a discontinuation.  It is true, however, the per capita no grouping of humanity would fill the void.
Sorry super late reply. I'm at McGill too! 
But they are only mixing a fraction.... Just enough to kill some of their civilians.
Rich corrupt oligarchs you've never heard of.
So basically this then?: [wkuk jerkocaust](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oe4dC10PqlU)
Having antisocial behavior makes it impossible to keep a job.
They're clustered with us. They originate obviously from Ireland. 
[deleted]
&gt;Not having police there would turn it into a fucking cesspit.  [*--You*, 17 minutes ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/14854l/amsterdam_to_create_scum_villages_nuisance/c7ayfkg?context=3#c7awz9q)
Five years, 524,384 participants, and 140 countries [respectfully disagree](https://genographic.nationalgeographic.com/).   I'll not post original research because I suspect it may be over your head, but [here's a nice cushy How Stuff Works article](http://science.howstuffworks.com/life/evolution/female-ancestor.htm) about the research, its problems, and current trends. 
When was this tried? Details? I live in the uk and I never heard of this. 
Calm yourself.  First of all, I replied to the wrong comment.  It can happen, especially before having a morning coffee.  I meant to reply to quantumcoffeemug, ironically enough.  Secondly, whatever tone you are reading into my comment, you are putting it there, not me.  Quantumcoffeemug brought up that he/she has heard "the exact same thing said about black people in the US."  I thought it was interesting that this conversation should make him/her think of a black stereotype while it made me think of a white conservative stereotype.  It was an observation that I thought worth mentioning.
But surely they have remnants of the proto-Indian languages that Hindi and other languages came from?
[deleted]
A similar thing is happening to schools.  This is not surprising, as the Swedish minister of finance used to be fascinated by the writings of Ayn Rand.  
I have spent time in Slovakia and Czech. The Roma are treated worse than slaves. It's not as one sided as you make it out to be.
1. Relevance: Absence of evidence is evidence of absence   2. Prevalence: [Myth of the welfare queen](http://www.amazon.de/Myth-Welfare-Queen-Prize-Winning-Journalists/dp/0684840065)  3. Importance: [Tax evasion](http://www.cheatingculture.com/tax-evasion/2012/1/9/3-trillion-lost-to-tax-evasion.html) costs much more than social fraud.   You can check everything I said by searching for scholarly sources.
[Seeing the word "Secret" used in a news headline](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-LV5A6cjbAG4/Tw9G5HH96RI/AAAAAAAAB5w/DRJwQVCVI4s/s1600/inigo.jpg)
The etymology of the word "ghetto" isn't that concise. [Here is a good article. Most colleges and universities have JSTOR subscriptions, find someone with a .edu email address.](http://www.jstor.org/stable/20101121)
[deleted]
You're saying the United States is still torturing people?
Generalizing is equivalent to pre-judging, from which the word "prejudice" is derived. Being prejudiced toward a race of people is racist. 
bond was on a vacation. 
Scumbag Sven:  Speaks out out against racist overgeneralization  With his own racist overgeneralized statement
Pretty sure it was already converted. They are not making 40k. 
yes, i have no argument with someone who is unable to understand the argument or absurdly misrepresents it  no one is going to be murdered for jaywalking or smoking pot. if you say this is what i am arguing for, i cannot take you seriously because you are not being intellectually honest    
[deleted]
And that gives Americans the right to execute anyone they want? 
Have you ever been to a trial?  It's all about the lawyers demeaning the jury much in the way that US politicians advertise on TV before upcoming elections.  It's total bullshit.
Probably not in a while... I can't think of a situation where assassinations would be appropriate given the UK's current position. I'm sure MI6 is complicit in deaths in combat zones, but assassination? I'd be interested to see if anyone could post a link to a suspicious death which would have significantly benefited British interests since, say, the end of the Cold War. We're just not very powerful anymore, I don't think there are many assassinations that would be worth the potential international backlash if it came to light.
A really excellent post. The one thing I would add (which in truth adds to the overarching point you're making) is that historical terrorism related deaths in the UK are skewed by [The Troubles](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Troubles) - casualties which could be linked to the 'War on Terror' are fewer again.
They were just trying to keep up with the hottest fashions.
The citizenship of the victim is a big one, as well as the severity of the alleged crime, as well as the mountain of other legal precedent for murder and pedophilia and rape, as well as all of the considerations that go into international vs domestic action. Saying legal precedent for actions against supposed terrorists will somehow derail the centuries of precedent in completely unrelated areas of domestic criminal law is, frankly, just foolish, and it's the first place that guy jumped to with going to murderer.  Don't get me wrong, I don't think a government should have the power to execute people of any nationality without trial in peacetime, no matter the accusation. This slippery slope argument though, especially as put forth by lablanquette, is a non-starter and intellectually dishonest. There are other, better arguments. What lablanquette said is the same bad argument anti-gay-marriage advocates make when saying it will lead to people marrying dogs; it's a ridiculous leap to an unrelated topic ignoring all the distinctions between the two in a play to people's fears rather than any logic.
Few European monarchs like  Maria Theresa, Philip III(Spain)tried highly forceful integration of Roma  people, even threatened with death punishment, It seems they failed.
And this explains the growing xenophobia in europe.
[deleted]
If they keep doing that, another women would be sue for "lying" about her appearance because if they have a baby, it might come out "ugly."
At least they seem happy, you are just complaining about someone else being excited.
I read this in a Scottish accent, definitely makes it better. 
Cheers, wasn't sure, main point stands.
why else is he doing it, duh
you'd think a small delicious mammal would have developed more hearty internals.
yeah, this sounds like it's be about as successful as the Chicago Housing Projects.
There is no international treaty that Syria is signatory too that prohibits Syria from using chemical weapons in any internal conflict on it's territory (moral grounds is not a law - sorry).             Besides aside from CNN fapping about Assad using chemical weapons - there is no evidence whatsoever that Assad is in fact going to use it.     Quite to contrary - **Assad stated it many times that Syria will not be using chemical weapons unless it comes under attack from 3-rd country, ie Turkey.**         **This entire discussion is in essence "Iraqis have mobile WMD cruising desert at high speed 2.0"**.
The South Korean governments were pretty horrible too for many years, and killed a lot of people in cold blood. Not as many as the North, I am sure, but, a lot. It was like a Civil War. The contrast still was pretty large, though.   However, people are naive to think that because they have been lied to about some things that everything is a lie and whatever the US government says is bad is actually good. That is about the worst mistake anybody could ever make.
Did you really just grammar check what appears to be a non native English speaker while he discusses insane political upheaval in his country? Fucking really?
The Balfour Declaration was made in 1917. Isreal was founded in 1948. After a UN declaration, and later the Jews declaring themselves to be independent.  My opinion is that German actions during WWII directly led to the creation of Isreal. The framework may have been in place before but I don't think it would have had the international support, or support from the Jewish community at large, without the Germans. 
you're saying our admin supports the muslim brotherhood?
They can't even get a rocket off the ground, so is that really something to worry about?
US News.  Removed. 
hey, retard. It's not that he isn't an academic. It's that he has no relevance to the issue at hand.   I'm right.  You're wrong.   
[Token Evil Teammate](http://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TokenEvilTeammate)  I would like to apologize to the redditors who will now waste the next several hours on tvtropes instead of reddit.
http://www.un.org/apps/news/story.asp?NewsID=42168&amp;Cr=Palestin&amp;Cr1=#.UL7WQ4OyBgk  http://www.amnesty.org.uk/news_details.asp?NewsID=20493  http://www.imemc.org/article/64685  http://www.israellawresourcecenter.org/internationallaw/studyguides/sgil3.htm  www.google.com.au/url?sa=t&amp;rct=j&amp;q=israeli settlements are a violation of international law&amp;source=web&amp;cd=1&amp;cad=rja&amp;ved=0CDEQqQIwAA&amp;url=http://www.imemc.org/article/64685&amp;ei=kta-UIW0L4SUiAfW2IHABg&amp;usg=AFQjCNHfTwHpubToB5vuWj8FMEuup2QPjQ  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Israeli_settlement Even chucked in a wiki page for you. Because we all know who edits wiki.   Come on man, dont think you can actually sit there are claim Israel is actually innocent. 
Food was probably the only thing he could relate to, as the rest of his existence was so removed from the rest of the world.
Al-Queda*
I thought you said the protesters were peacefull
Syria acceded to the [1925 Geneva Protocol](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Geneva_Protocol) which bans the use of "asphyxiating, poisonous or other gases, and of all analogous liquids, materials or devices".
from the south korean perspective, they worked extraordinarily hard over the past 50-60 years to get to where they are (a relatively wealthy economy), and pull themselves out of poverty (after the korean war, sk was one, if not the, poorest countries in the world, even poorer than nk).  essentially they would have to give up all of their wealth to help nk, because no one else is going to pick up the slack.  there is still economic disparity between east and west germany, even 20 years later, and the economic divide between nk and sk is 6 times greater than that between the germanys.  
Or even pg tips
Well, this is probably bs, but it is better than the rest of the news....
Because normal bourgeois liberalism has worked out *so* well for Greece.
[deleted]
&gt; I have contacted constitutional law scholar Eugene Kontorovich on your assertion   You have flattered me.  If he is the same Mr Kontorovich who recently won the Bator award, then I am sure he can put me in my place and point out the error of my logic, where you have been unable to do so.  If not, and we have to keep going, perhaps you shall have to introduce me to Bibi himself!  1) &gt; That suggests further subdivision is not allowed  It may suggest it, but it doesn't specifically rule the subsequent partition out.  In any case, it wouldn't have needed partition to create a single state, neither jewish, nor christian, nor muslim - but a modern secular state which could have served as a homeland for all.  2)  &gt; This state was supposed to be Jewish.  There was no mention of "Jewish state" in the mandate, and the local population whom the mandate should have been there to protect never assented to one.  And from the British White Paper of 1922:  &gt; it is contemplated that the status of all citizens of Palestine in the eyes of the law shall be Palestinian, and it has never been intended that they, or any section of them, should possess any other juridical status.   2 again) &gt; I know of no contemporaneous support of this "in" argument,  I have provided a few times now, Curzon's concerns about the ambiguity of the wording.    Your learned correspondent must surely also be aware of the British White Paper, published before the Mandate was signed, and which made the British position clear. Winston Churchill even puts the phrase 'in Palestine' in quotes to save me the bother.  Bless his heart.    &gt; Unauthorized statements have been made to the effect that the purpose in view is to create a wholly Jewish Palestine. Phrases have been used such as that Palestine is to become "as Jewish as England is English." His Majesty's Government regard any such expectation as impracticable and have no such aim in view. Nor have they at any time contemplated, as appears to be feared by the Arab deegation, the disappearance or the subordination of the Arabic population, language, or culture in Palestine.  They would draw attention to the fact that the terms of the Declaration referred to **do not contemplate that Palestine as a whole should be converted into a Jewish National Home, but that such a Home should be founded 'in Palestine'**.  In this connection it has been observed with satisfaction that at a meeting of the Zionist Congress, the supreme governing body of the Zionist Organization, held at Carlsbad in September, 1921, a resolution was passed expressing as the official statement of Zionist aims "the determination of the Jewish people to live with the Arab people on terms of unity and mutual respect, **and together with them to make the common home into a flourishing community**, the upbuilding of which may assure to each of its peoples an undisturbed national development."    In the leadup to the signing of the Mandate, then, the British and the Zionist understanding of the terms were very clear.  3) &gt; Even IF a Jewish state need not have all the mandate borders, doesn't mean it cant  Indeed not.  As we have seen, Israel is more than capable of seizing land by force of arms alone.  &gt; Even if is not guaranteed "jewish" it is in no way made "Palestinian territory" either.  Except that it IS Palestinian territory - the territory of the Mandate of Palestine.  Nothing in the Mandate changes this.  I don't understand the suggested dichotomy between Palestinian and Jew.  Can one not be both?  From Article 6 of the Mandate:  &gt; The Administration of Palestine, while ensuring that the rights and position of other sections of the population are not prejudiced, shall facilitate Jewish immigration under suitable conditions  This makes it clear that the jews are just to be one section of the population of Palestine.  It envisages Palestinian Jews, Palestinian Muslims, Palestinian Christians, and Palestinians of any creed or none, all living together in Palestine, their shared home.  
Any chance of it being a nice mix of local trees including some that produce fruit?
Right under the headline:  &gt; *Volunteers scan a crowd in an effort to detect and prevent sexual harassment during a demonstration against President Mohammed Morsi in Cairo's Tahrir Square on Friday.*
Do you pay any attention to what happens in Apple factories?  Put another way: Why would anyone care what someone as stupid as you thought of them?
Spain doesn't need your money. Spain has enough empty city quarters already. Spain needs you to buy spanish products so Spain can pay debts and give jobs own people..
So its economically sound to have a smaller workforce going forward to consume and produce goods/services?  Do yourself a favor and never post here again. (Judging by you comment history though, you are probably unemployed and hangout on reddit all day. Please get off reddit and go read a book.)
Well, that OR keep your business going until it catches fire, then *literally* lock all your employees inside so they burn to death.  After all the dust and ash settles, blame Walmart.  I mean, duh. Those are the only two options, right?
Because that is decent, and as consumers we should expect that the companies we buy from to behave with decency.
In that case, is it the fault of every consumer who buys from Wal Mart, creating this demand for cheap goods which in turn makes them use these companies due to their low overhead cost?  
I've never actually been, but the US news media is leading me to believe that Greece is like Euro-Fallout.
I saw it on democratic underground.
lol, experts in foreign policy huh?   lmfao, look dingleberry, perhaps what you should do, is go back to the beginning and your entry point, if you want respect from a guy like me, you will have to understand that is not how to obtain it.   And then you continually come in saying stupid shit, and then finally begin asking for respect, for fuck  sakes.. get your head out of your ass.   If you want to see me communicate to respectable people worthy of returned respect, feel free to browse my history.   All though in all fairness, I oft prefer to bash morons like you, because stroking the dick of some person who is on the same page as I, is not really my interest.   Now to continue back to your absurd claims, your clearly just do not like him, and prefer to shine all of his information in that regard, well to be honest, this is just a throw back to your own inability to remove your emotions from the information being presented, you should work on that.   I actually enjoy playing with fellow trolls, for me it is a bit of a release coming across a person like you, we can do some simple banter back and forth and run each other down a bit, derail the conversation talk shit bla bla.   It's all good for me, it's somewhat entertaining. As I indicated, talking in agreement with people does not generate these types of thoughts of feelings. Thus you get to read my responses to your useless drivel :P   haha.
They could still attract business with the relatively small amount of money that impoverished people will accept in exchange for labor, because those people don't want to starve to death.    In a lot of these impoverished countries, people make money by pulling off kidnappings of the children of the wealthy in exchange for ransom.  Instructional question that will be hard to answer without resorting to vague issues of morality - Why is it illegal to kidnap?  
Google: "Albert Pike, 3 world wars" to see how it all works out in the end.
Agreed.  Also as someone who is from Southeast Asia, the whole caste system works into this also magnified by EXTREME corruption at every level.
And...   &gt;ImSAR NanoSAR is **the world's smallest Synthetic Aperture Radar**, weighs two pounds and is roughly the size of a shoe box. It is designed to provide high quality real-time ground imaging through adverse weather conditions or other battlefield obscurants  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Boeing_ScanEagle  But Iran has http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alim_radar_system. Irans' radar seems to be far Superior to the ones the US/Israel uses. (http://abcnews.go.com/Blotter/hezbollah-iran-made-drone-israel/story?id=17454303#.UL_Dh4beV-o)
Since when have oppressive regimes (see NK and Syria) cared about becoming more isolated or starting an arms race, especially if they have a head start?
Romanians are not the same as the Roma people.
The way I took Skyfall was Mi6 would act without considering the legal consequences. Which is why they had the 'hearing' with the MPs. To me, this seems like the opposite and they were worried about going to a hearing such as that. 
lol.  someone had to be 'that guy' and you are it
Last I checked, "supply and demand" was still a thing, and a big part of capitalism.  A monopoly on demand is just as damaging as a monopoly on supply.  Walmart has made competition obsolete.  Why compete or negotiate in good faith with suppliers when you can just crush them under your heel?
Stop whining. There are still poodleburgers and dachshundburgers and pitbullburgers and corgiburgers...
Remove walmart from that example and it doesn't change.  If you're both in Walmart the cheaper one will sell more.  If you're both in the same town and sell them direct the cheaper one will sell.  Unless your widget is better, then you can sell it for more.  What is your point?
http://www.wired.com/dangerroom/2010/10/wikileaks-show-wmd-hunt-continued-in-iraq-with-surprising-results/
Microchip implant in the brain that, when activated, forces the body to commit suicide in the fastest possible way. It was the Russians. I saw a history channel show about it once. 
Because there isn't Target or Amazon or Selling Direct or Non-American Markets.
Wasn't USS Enterprise there recently though?  http://www.stratfor.com/sites/default/files/main/images/Naval_Update_10-31-12.jpg  
A bullet in the guts or poison gas, you still gonna die.
There are hundreds of military sites to be hit, and there are three MEU's dedicated to the region with only one being near. You are trying to fight 300k men with 1-3k. No matter how advanced and smart they are there is no way they could defeat an entire army.
You just went full retard.
What does China or Russia have to gain from intervention?  I agree they wouldn't.  I agree they couldn't.  I believe they politically don't have the will because there isn't much of interest to them.   
i don't think you understand how military power and air superiority works. those 300k can't even handle some rag tag rebels, no less the most highly trained military in the world. with total loss of air superiority their soldiers will be rendered fairly useless, only able to hide in holes.
Saddam had WMD's the first time we went in. Then he broke the treaty from the first gulf war. Specifically, the part that said that we can put inspectors in to make sure they didn't try to make WMD's again. What would you conclude?  I'm not going to even begin to debate Iran. They were actively trying before the sanctions got to be to much. 
About 15C with light winds. Why do you ask?
Yeah, its more like "Hey we are out side your door, if we hear or see you smacking your wife, we will bust this fucking door down and fuck you up"
I'd say rebel is the neutral term.  Freedom fighter and terrorist are the respective polarized terms.
So brave.
And yet, what's the difference between Muslims and Jews or Muslims and Christians?  Much of the sick Shariah law is in the Old Testament...  We just don't follow it anymore.  No more death for wearing clothes made of two kinds of fabric or for a woman not being a virgin when married.  (Though somehow we still want to murder gays...)  The problem with Muslims is they actually follow their religion.
Sounds about right, unless I'm just that naive about how deep the influence of the US runs.
no i will find smith and take his weapon from him, along with some others who have given me shit and make them do the unmasking procedures. if it ever came down to that, at that point in my unit the world revolves around me. lol. i probably would never do it but its nice to imagine
[anarchy works](http://theanarchistlibrary.org/library/peter-gelderloos-anarchy-works)
Because racecar
Me too.  I'm supposedly trained in "Chemical, Biological, and Radiological Defense," or at least that's what my cert says.  I knew the training was bullshit, but when we were in Kuwait and I had Diazepam and Atropine strapped to my leg, it sure felt like I knew what I was doing.  How about that fucking smallpox vaccine.  Fuck that shit, too.
You shouldn't be as downvoted as you are for this comment. 
Crazy people do crazy things.  
&gt; we had more than enough reason to believe that Saddam had chemical weapons  Which is funny... because he didn't have chemical weapons. Even after his fall, and after our troops had picked through the rubble, we couldn't find any evidence of WMDs whatsoever.  This is a classic example of "we had enough reason to believe" ≠ "the truth." And an invasion, where millions of civilians die, should never be based on "we believe." It should always be based on evidence.
Our house was very lucky to be unharmed.
[deleted]
Then the rebel forces who are the civilians go...no fuck you??? Or there is a Civil war with the Rebels no longer being completely outgunned because the other side no longer has an air force and as lost alot of military hardware??
whats with the downvotes? Everyone appreciated the fact they will legalize weed but let a women die because they wont give her an abortion? 
As a chemist, you really do not want to keep chemical weapons ready to go. Most are kept as reagents, ready to mix in a short time and then used. If you had an accident with loaded shells the results to your own forces would be horrendous. Sarin gas, which is what Syria has mixed and loaded, is comprised of several inert ingredients mixed together. Some of the time the mixing is done while the shell or missile is in flight.
Then there is this off the front page of the New York Times:  [U.S.-Approved Arms for Libya Rebels Fell Into Jihadis’ Hands](http://www.nytimes.com/2012/12/06/world/africa/weapons-sent-to-libyan-rebels-with-us-approval-fell-into-islamist-hands.html?hp&amp;_r=0)
[deleted]
Community service at an animal shelter, homeless shelter, or even a nursing home.
Hey, yeah, sure.  I agree with you.  I want the US to mind its own business as a citizen OF the US.  We need to be spending time and money on infrastructure.  My point is that this is a catch 22.  If we do nothing, the world will point fingers and say "WHY DID YOU DO NOTHING?"  If we act, the world (as it is right now on this page) will say "WHAT ARE YOU DOING, THIS ISN'T YOUR BUSINESS, YOU'RE ENGINEERING IMPERIALISM."  Me, I prefer the former.  I'd rather we spent time and money on ourselves.  The world is full of big boys now, it's time for someone else to play world police.
Wasn't a girl recently arrested for things she said about Obama on facebook? I agree with you that free speech is important, and I agree that stupid shit like tweets shouldn't be prosecuted at all, but the girl who talked shit about Obama was in the US, so the laws aren't *that* much different than what the UK has.
[deleted]
I think we like to separate religion from politics and education.
The Russians have every incentive to keep NATO/the rebels out of Syria. I don't think the Syrian rebels would be receptive to the Russian naval base there if they seized power. Maybe the US doesn't have concrete intelligence here, maybe they do, but regardless it's important to consider that the US isn't the only country in the world with ulterior motives.
&gt; "Hate" speech is an entirely different matter.  How so?  &gt; So then my original statement stands.  Only because you define "freedom of speech" to mean the type that obtains in the US.
The Swedish "constitution" comes in four parts. Two of them, Yttrandefrihetsgrundlagen and Tryckfrihetsförordningen state that you are allowed to express your mind in speech and writing.   As regards to hate speech. Note that it does not cover religion, which at this moment is a hot potato in Swedish debate, with the growing numbers of the Swedish muslim community. Anywho, it still just covers hate speech, speech which in its essence is aimed at people with no other purpose than to hurt and attack people without any grounds.  This hate speech doesn't have any effect at all in Swedish society, at least what I know of. It just if you state hateful things towards people without any grounds, you're breaking the hate speech rule. Still, people are talking about putting ones religon in the category of hate speech, like a blasphemy law, don't think it will happen though.
Yeah. Same book.  The translation of the title isn't exact so I often use the original German.
&gt;that's a pretty awful generalization  Don't blame me, blame Winston Churchill.  &gt;dictatorship is actually a surprisingly good model of governance and the best placed to produce results that take into account the ranked preferences of the entire population.  And yet so many Dictatorships have led to citizens being butchered. Weird. 
Because he was making a point that humans need the permission of the government before they can marry. I'm saying they don't, however if they do it won't be recognized by the government. Sorry if I'm hard to understand 
Lol downvote, but no answer. I think I proved my point.
And she didn't like his bacon bookmark.
Are you attempting to somehow implicate the USA in this travesty?
maybe loose it noz enough and it is the robe they are going for.
I understand what you're getting at, but they do more than local law requires. Do they pay the same wage as a worker would get working where the company is at? Hardly. But they do try to raise the bar.  I try to buy fair trade when possible. Sometimes it unfortunately isn't reasonable. Where do you draw the line? And how far do you inconvenience yourself to do what is right? Should I put in an order for a pair of shoes from across the globe because I can't find any fair trade manufactured locally? Only buy wares produced in countries adhering to a minimal requirement of worker treatment?   
So is it Malos Aires now?
I think you should add couple of events that you missed out.   Based on time:   A bloody night at Egypt's presidential palace   http://english.ahram.org.eg/NewsContent/1/64/59852/Egypt/Politics-/A-bloody-night-at-Egypts-presidential-palace-.aspx   6 dead, 450 injured in clashes at Egypt's presidential palace  http://english.ahram.org.eg/NewsContent/1/64/59892/Egypt/Politics-/-dead,--injured-in-clashes-at-Egypts-presidential-.aspx   Morsi supporters detained 83 opposition protesters at palace: Brotherhood lawyer  http://english.ahram.org.eg/NewsContent/1/64/59947/Egypt/Politics-/Morsi-supporters-detained--opposition-protesters-a.aspx   Protesters leave Egypt's presidential palace as tension remains palpable  http://english.ahram.org.eg/NewsContent/1/0/59940/Egypt/0/Protesters-leave-Egypts-presidential-palace-as-ten.aspx   Marches move towards Egypt's presidential palace despite curfew  http://english.ahram.org.eg/NewsContent/1/64/59963/Egypt/Politics-/Marches-move-towards-Egypts-presidential-palace-de.aspx  The latest news that most liberal parties will not meet with Morsi on the 10th to discuss their demands. They want him to leave. Tomorrow, many walks/marches will take place from different locations to the presidential palace. 
I think you missed the article.  It points out cases where the woman was held accountable.
you are welcome ,   Well, we measure the land in Dunams (I'm an Israeli) and the articles talk about dunams, so nativly I continued to use what I'm use to. 
That fact that you have 10 downvotes for that sort of proves your point. I wonder if they realized that when they did it?
&gt;No, I am a guy  proof?
Not cancelled  http://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/story/2012/12/06/poli-f35-pmo-government-fighter-jets.html
and **that** folks is why we need socialism
TIL
no u
You know what's awesome about Dubai ? Nothing. Fucking hot dusty shithole full of assholes. If I never go there again it will be too soon.
I have no idea what a strawberry shortcake is. Sounds tasty
Israel and Beirut are pretty nice.
No, that doesn't make sense.
Please read, vote and if possible share the story of Josh P., and help give back with him. I had the pleasure of befriending Josh last year and he is a very giving person. He is currently in 2nd place of a contest by Rogers/Windows8 that would give him $25,000 towards helping his adopted daughter's hometown of Malawi, Africa build a well. His wife is currently in University to become a doctor and they plan to return one day after she graduates and help. We can help by giving a bit of our time and making him #1.
Oh, okay. That makes way more sense, since Mexico is an incredibly culturally diverse country.  But yeah, not too many foreigners outside the huge cities and hippie towns.
Google should buy them Predator Drones to take out poachers 
Not only this, but even if we can video tape/photograph poachers in action, who will enforce the laws? Problems of corruption, lack of funding and lacking judicial systems still prevent enforcement even with evidence thanks to flying drones.  ...But then again google might just pay for that one day too. Couldn't that solve ALL of Africa's problems?
Raising the world IQ over time requires a shift in the other direction...  I don't really think I need to validate that as a goal we should all aim for.
Manufacturing parts here will not be an economical alternative unless the parts are simple. Sheet metal parts require custom tooling and a press setup. I can't imagine what kind of fixturing goes into making aerospace skins which may have more stringent stress conditioning requirements than automotive requirements in exotic materials. Anything weird would be most economically made by the OEM supplier. Trying to make high performance engine parts would be silly on a tiny volume basis.   We could probably make wheel bearings, screws, rivets economically, but any of the specialized expensive bits would be ridiculously expensive for such a small fleet of vehicles.  Unfortunately it is my understanding that the A-10 has been discontinued. Too bad, it'd have made an awesome ground pounder for the kind of peacekeeping Canada typically does.   The F-35 is an absurd ballerina of a platform. It has insane preparation and upkeep requirements and requires an entourage of support vehicles that we do not have. One F-35 costs $230M (including weapon system). The A-10 was $12M in 1994 (wiki) and carried a gigantic payload. Canada would be better served by some A-10's and a small number of modern Super Hornets or Eurofighters to deal with the odd rebel in a Cessna.
There were some small changes to be made for the Canadian version, but I don't think they were substantial enough to be considered an entirely new variant - $100m is probably more than enough to cover the R&amp;D on fitting a chute and a few airframe specs. 
[deleted]
It was a general stab at United States foreign policy that has remained relatively unchanged since World War II. 
You wouldn't hire a Sikh? I definitely would.
I googled it and it seems the permit/license costs 1500hs, and it limits you to $x amount of alcohol where $x is a percentage of your monthly income. 
*fucking ridiculous* - Kanye West
Why is that relevant to his claim?
Yup. It's really sobering.
That is according to laws there, as far as i know ;)
Coincidence? I think not...
I think "OMG, Google's taking over the world" qualifies as whining.
Not relevant, but I love cobbled roads.
The minute that they were put through though they shoud've hung up! They could still have laughed about how they got through without anything more coming up
Drink driving and a prank call are two VERY different things. 
logically i know they couldn't have predicted this. but emotionally i fucking hate these cunt DJs, and their whole shit kicking prank, punking tribe of vermin
That was what they did, period. It is a fact, how do you dispute it?
[deleted]
i repeat myself when under stress i repeat myself when under stress 
Yes, MI6 screwed up.
&gt; They don't have a sewage system because they are fucking idiots.  Except that [they do have a sewage system]( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sanitation_in_Dubai).
It was a nurse. No receptionist was on duty as it was 5.30 am. 
As a media graduate I agree.  As a human being.. holy fuck!  DJs.. generally speaking, are the most annoying media people on earth.
My bad. The photos by Marco Di Lauro taken in Iraq in 2003 were used again to show the deaths in Syria this year. 
And how many Americans say we should "turn the Middle East into glass?" to express their displeasure about some event?  Surely he can't be using hyperbole to make a point.  Obviously this a deadly serious directive to his fans to murder the families of American soldiers... 
Engineering requires constant cash flow and upkeep. Desertification is an encroaching, increasingly pervasive process that has all the time in the world.
the prank call itself was totally innocent, and funny i might add. If anything, it wasn't the prank that sent her over the edge but the media fire
Yes.
Oh it became awesome. Awesomely expensive.
There was a post like this and he is making fun.
&gt; I'd have a beer with him anytime!  This is pretty much the criteria we use to elect presidents
hes got a good point i thought
Yet your police still let them abduct people off your streets to be tortured
do anyone get the feeling that Christianity is much easier to spread to other culture because it from america, and not because it better than other religion.  That, and Christianity's church seem to have a lot money to help spread the religion.
Coming from the man who has been called out by human rights watch, the United nations and even Hillary Clinton for violence against his people, his calls sound more like propoganda against his opponents.  I mean he literally called in the Saudi military against his own people. If you want peace and order, you don't call a military from the most repressive country on earth to patrol your streets
Agree. There are literally thousands of acres packed full of older war machinery that could be hoisted back into operation if shit really hits the fan. Yeah a lot of it is probably not worth messing with, but there's still a lot of very useful equipment there that could be restored to working order with a massive home front effort in the event of a world wide shitstorm.   Imagine the job creation and economic impact of another non-nuclear world war. American industry would again rise and a great reordering of the classes and populations could take place.   The down side, some would argue, is that the draft would likely be reinstated to fill in the gaps in the different war fronts.   At least unemployment would be drastically reduced from the increased industrialization and draft.
Mother Teresa *isn't*  saint.
No...Iraq had no weapons....Syria has admitted they have and there is a civil war there.
So what exactly do you think would be different about Syria?  It took months of bombing to gain complete air superiority over Iraq (and that was after the gulf war left them with very little).  Syria has a larger air force (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Syrian_Air_Force) with many squadrons.  Eventually the US will take complete air superiority, but 2-3 Hrs? You've got to be joking.  Here is another list of all their air bases. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Syrian_Air_Force_bases
It's a joke about pronunciation and misunderstanding.
This could start a war..er...resume the war.
You're right, by proxy the US has been operating in Syria for some time now. Only the naive and uninformed think the 'rebels' are homegrown.
If you wish to rise above us, then you shouldn't be posting.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;parading and cheering going on from rather big buzz cut guys  those are the kind of guys most people in the military make fun of or just dont like to talk about. or they were making fun of it
That's mostly on China's head at this point.  The US would have annihilated the regime entirely if not for their involvement.
Do you have a link for the NavyTimes story?
Here is another map from the same source. http://www.understandingwar.org/press-media/graphsandstat/battle-damascus-current-state-play-syria
The fact that loads of straight people will still want marriage as much as they did before is too overwhelming evidence the Church is wrong for it to accept it.
I agree with most of your 5 points, especially about the agricultural subsidies, but your list seems incomplete.  - Open borders - Free movement of goods and people - common development in science, research and defense - Better lawenforcement - Minority rights - European integration - Stability - Protection of nature and wildlife - Infrastructure - And most of all a hope for a peaceful future  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lFyywfHbj3M
[deleted]
You're not taking over. 
Idiot troll. Get lost.
It happened over a month ago-Nov 14th .What took them so long ?
[deleted]
Good to see we agree at least here. But for all thats holy, chill out. Are you like this in real life?
I used to live in Barsinghausen and remember there being a "Naziaufmarsch" in Bad Nenndorf (near Schaumburg) regularly. Still, I think the term "extreme-right stronghold" has no basis and is an insult.
There isn't one opinion of Assange that we all share. Indeed, I think a lot of us even individually are conflicted about Assange and his role in shaping world events.  For me personally, I believe that he's a very sharp man whose heart is in the right place, who is focused on doing objective good in a way that's both rare and, to many, quite unnerving. With that said, I also think that he's shown a little (arguably quite understandable) naivete with respect to the way the world actually works, the implications of his acts on peoples' lives, and the sort of public relations culture that we've developed which counts facts as a secondary matter to the way perceptions make us feel. 

Here's a great documentary about it http://topdocumentaryfilms.com/the-world-according-to-monsanto/
If you're referring to the Percy Schmeiser case: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monsanto_Canada_Inc._v._Schmeiser.    Knowing his field had been contaminated with roundup ready seed which he didn't have a contract for, he sprayed his field with roundup, eliminated the seed he claims to have been developing, recycling the surviving monsanto seed. It's the selection he was sued for and lost, not the contamination. 
The US doesn't let Israel attack Iran. Israel is not actually trying to get the US to attack Iran, it is trying to get a US permission for their own attack.
Zealots? So, let loose the dogs of (corporate) war. Then, to the escalation of the rhetoric. Or, is it the other way 'round? No matter, the thrill is in the chase, not the catch. 
I'm curious what your qualifications are.
[deleted]
The *calculation* would be easy: just divide the number of Monsanto-using suicide-committing farmers by the number of Monsanto-using farmers.
Qaddafi*
http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/headlines/2009/09/how-many-different-ways-can-you-spell-gaddafi/
What is this?
[deleted]
Just like Nafta and Mexico right?
[deleted]
I wasn't trying to say that you did, more just expanding on your comment. 
Or less sadistically just used some burn victims from a fire. Either way I think speculation at this point is just bad on the whole.
To be honest, I think the arab nations oppress their own people better than any other nation. Look at egypt, iran, syria, libya and so on. The hamas are only learning from "the best". If they were really goaling for peace, there would have been peace a long long time ago.
Yeah, unlike Ariel Sharon, I don't leave nothing behind when I withdraw.
&gt;We do not give that power to the doctors.  Actually, we do. It's taboo to speak about, but there are *lots* of cases where doctors quietly euthanize an end-of-life patient. Usually, it's played off as "we can give them this drug to ease their pain, but it could cause them to have trouble breathing." It's one of those public secrets in the medical field, especially in the US.
Not to be cynical, but Syria really doesn't produce oil at a level high enough to financially justify this kind of trick invasion.  At only 400,000 barrels per year, we would be better served invading Thailand or Australia.  It just isn't the same scenario as Iraq where they produce upwards of 2,500,000 barrels per day.
So.. who's going to make the list of things to ban? Maybe the list is there and acted upon, just that you don't agree with it.  Separation of church and state is a thing you know.. 
It's one thing to make an error on the job but another thing entirely when you realize that your error has made you the butt of a joke to literally hundreds of millions of people all over the globe, which is exactly why the "mental health experts" are warning that the pranksters may also be at suicide risk.  The nurse need not have been mentally "unstable" to be so overwhelmed by this fact that, alone and without the benefit of counseling, she sought to put an end to her embarrassment the only way she knew how.
I don't know a single one.  I'll have to remember that.
[deleted]
You know we are talking of Russia here, and they actually went from controlling everyone, (Soviet Union) to allowing people to do their own stuff...  Controlling what people choose to believe doesn't work my friend. Half of the world will tell you that.   Enjoy your freedom.
[deleted]
Of course. They work for the government.
So, you are a Mormon.    1. Do you recognized there are many Gods?  2. Do you believe that "Elohim" who lives on a planet near the star-base Kolob. Elohim has a physical body and is limited in power, he cannot create matter. He is not an omnipresent being limited to one place at a time?  3. Do you believe that Jesus and Satan are brothers. Jesus was conceived via Elohim coming to earth and having physical sexual relations with Mary. Jesus was married, and was likely a polygamist and fathered children. Jesus is a created being. You cannot worship or have a personal relationship with Jesus. Jesus appeared to people in America after his resurrection.  4. Do you believe that Salvation is found nowhere else but through the Mormon Church organization. The creeds of all other churches are an abomination. People who go to these other churches "highly offend" God who considers their pastors and ministers the "most corrupt of all people". Christians are all damned.  5. Do you believe that All will be raised from the dead, but individual salvation and forgiveness from sins is by works. To reach the "Celestial Kingdom of God" and to have a chance of gaining godhood, a Mormon must keep the whole law. These Mormon laws and commandments include: giving the Mormon church ten percent of your income; accepting the Mormon gospel; Mormon baptism; being married in a Mormon temple; the constant wearing of Mormon sacred underwear known as a "temple garment"; staying "worthy" by perfectly obeying Mormon laws which include avoiding liquor, tobacco and hot drinks; the Mormon must obey the church authorities.  6. Do you believe that The Book of Mormon is an historical record?   7.  however The Book of Mormon describes places and peoples in the Americas for which no archeological evidence exists. The civilizations of Nephites, Lamanites, Jaredites and Mulekites have never been found. The Smithsonian Institute and the National Geographic Society have issued statements saying that no evidence has been found supporting the history reported in the Book of Mormon. There is no evidence that the Old World animals reported in the Book of Mormon existed in the New World before Columbus, including: horses, cattle, sheep, goats, swine, and elephants. Also not found are evidence for pre-Columbian chariots, silk, wheat and barley, cement, steel, metal swords, scimitars, and glass windows - all of which appear in the Book of Mormon. No examples of the coinages mentioned in the Book of Mormon, like the senum, ezrom, and shiblums, have ever been found.
You should of been here when there was only 300 or so comments... pretty sickening.
Clarify the timeline for me?  They experienced an explosive increase in corruption *then* they started having severe financial distress - or the other way around?  Because severe recession, fiscal calamity, and desperation would all be factors that would drive corruption...
Maybe mitt can come over and fix it all! 
Your list is mostly of countries that have been run economically by the IMF and World Bank over the last 40 years.  [These are the policy reforms they have encated](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Washington_Consensus).  A straight neoliberal regime.  In Haiti even slight moves towards leftist policies are met with a US backed coup.  A similar story throughout Africa.  For prosperity you look to S Korea, Japan, German, the US.  What did S Korea do?  They put exorbitant tariffs on imports, forcing their own people to buy Korean made products.  The products were terrible, but the demand, created internally, led to improvement.  In S Korea the punishment for a foreigner investing his money overseas (that is free movement of capital, a core neoliberal prescription) carried a simple penalty.  Death.  S Korea imposed draconian demands on businesses.  Hyundai was basically a guy in his garage fixing small engines.  The government took that as a starting point and required them to become an auto maker.  For a long time the cars were hell, but the tariffs (restriction the freedom to import) and government subsidies which allowed them to be sold cheaper overseas (even today some Koreans buy in the US and have Hyundai vehicles shipped back because it's cheaper than buying in country) created huge demand and things took off.  Samsung, LG, Kia.  All pretty much the same story.  That generalizes.  If you want so called neoliberal freedom it is in Haiti.  No taxes, no regulations, no limitations on capital movement, no unions, no government expenditures.  A neoliberal paradise.  It's hell on earth.
[deleted]
You don't remember the 1990's...guidance and stability technology is worth lots of money to these little rogue nations.  These companies thriver off of conflict...it's worth trillions. http://alamo-girl.com/0041.htm  
I kinda agree, apologies are worthless if they're not made by the people who committed those crimes in the first place, especially 60 years later.
[deleted]
Good night, sweet prince.
No, I'm not sure at all. I just made a lighthearted comment about your 5 reasons for poverty and poor education not making sense. Cuba and North Korea are probably not the best examples I could have come up with.   &gt; Stealing from the poor and giving it to the rich is the hallmark of capitalism  It's a little hypocritical for you to criticize my understanding of communism before reducing capitalism to this sentence. 
When in history has the Christian church ever had a reputation for tolerance?
Well granting loans after years and years of cheating the European Union about how much debt they actually had. The difference is, the old debt somehow rolled and increased while the new debt is actually supposed to be paid off. To me it's more an example of living on a to big feet and now burning yourself for it. Worse while the previous government cheated in every way possible, they still didn't consider enforcing any tax regulations in order to atleast cover some of the debt that was coming. They allowed the Greece to live a life they weren't supposed to. The biggest hilarity in the whole story is ofcourse, while the population is giving an outcry, they did elect the very same criminals while enjoying not paying any taxes. We aren't talking about the 1%, but everybody.  Now while this sounds bad, poor hospitality/education, how was it before let's say 10 years ago? Greece hasn't been known for proper education for a long time.  No, as being on the paying side of the Greece debt and loathing that more and more money is going to a small group of islands with almost no people gives me little reason to feel pitty with the population. Any government and population that willingly cheat will have to sit on the blisters. 
Well if all it took was this... it sounds oddly familiar. I say the same kind of thing when talking about addiction. Its not that 'X' is addicting, its that John Doe has an addictive personality. If you replaced 'X' with anything else, it would still be the same damn thing.  Same thing here. Even if the prank failed, or never happened in the first place, something else would've triggered her suicide. For her to be in that position where one tiny prank caused the suicide tells me that she was unstable LONG before all this. I wonder if she got any help for stress and that?
most muslims in france are born and raised french, aren't they? so where the fuck are you going to deport them to? afghanistan?
Current mormon - served mission in Russia. Drinking wasn't as tough a sell as I originally thought it would be. There are those who wouldn't talk to us because they didn't trust people who didn't drink, but when someone was really interested it wasn't that difficult of a habit to break.   That being said, the demographic that would talk to us were well put together and between 28 and 45, before that age was difficult to get interested and after that they generally lacked the desire to change.  Disclaimer - I had a strong emotional connection with the people that I taught, I don't want this post to come across as though I was only interested in numbers. I baptized 3 people during the span of my mission, which is fairly low in general, but conversed with several thousand..
Japan could really fuck with the PRC here.  Apologize for WW2, turn over the Senkaku Islands to the ROC.  What a spit in the face to the PRC!    They'll never do it of course.
Nor will all the upvotes stop him being one of the most influential astronomers of the 20th/ 21st century. His political opinions were his own, and deeply set from his conservative generation. He was never particularly outspoken about them, unless asked or pressed, and never intergrated any of his political beliefs when it came to edcating the globe about his passion. Many people in history hae dickhole viewpoints. That doesnt stop them being awesome.  Edit: On my japanese work computer so sorry for shitty spelling/grammar. 
Mormons pay 10% of income. 
I'm talking about military actions like in Libya.  We know Bush followed the law.  We know Obama violated it, thus why I don't think he is a good choice.  Bush was bad.  Obama is worse.  He is an affront to human rights and our democratic process.
ITT: People who have never been to South Africa talking about how South Africa is a hell-hole after apartheid fell. 
Give me a couple of hours and I will link you to the party site from here. At work at the moment and its a bit NSFW on the sheer bizzare nature scale, last time i checked. Which would be about 2 years ago. 
[Ayman al-Zawahiri](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ayman_al-Zawahiri) is the head of AQ now that bin Laden is dead.
Not really confidential. All she said was "She's doing fine, She's asleep and on fluids."  That's not really super-sensitive information, I guess it could be embarrassing, but the fault lies with the hospital and not the DJ's or the Nurse. 
Wonderful.
I don't think South Africa will spontaneously combust into a hell hole once Mandela passes away. I am more troubled by this being the top voted comment in this thread. South Africa has problems which I can't deny, but it is not nearly as bad as it is being made out in all the comments here. 
This is not the 1st time a very promising cancer-treating drug has been discovered, but never gotten to market because big pharmaceutical companies cannot profit from it. What if we used kickstarter to raise funds to further testing? I think it's something a lot of people would support! We would somehow have to get in touch with the scientists working on the research so MAKE SOME NOISE!
So many have left tho
Greece is just a transit land.
I just want to be able to smoke without risking ruining my life with a criminal conviction.
Arrested over "Twitter threats to kill Obama".  That's the same thing as blogging about EU detainees, right?
[deleted]
Yes, but we didn't act firmly enough. If anything I wished we'd gone in faster - and harder.
Oh, for fuck's sake. 
No, but it's news to most people.
It does not appear that many of the top comments' author's read the article, but instead just wanted to weigh in with their own opinions about the headline.  The Reuters article is just saying that a humanist organization released a report to the UN saying that the nonreligious are discriminated against, both in law and in practice, throughout not only the more theocratic nations but also those that are considered secular.  First, the organization is obviously looking out for its own interests.  No biggie; it's not like they're trying hide the authors or make it look like a report from an unbiased source.  It's like the NAACP saying that ethnic people are being discriminated against, not like (for instance) the Independence Virginia PAC, which is actually a conservative PAC.  Second, the article doesn't go into great detail, but does cite a few examples from the report.  If you want to weigh in on the report's validity, the right thing to do is to hunt down the report, not the Reuters article about the report.  This is why we like to keep this stuff on the skeptic subs.
Why is that 'better'? What criteria are we using to judge whether something is better than something else? My point is that that we will never agree on any such criteria because they are entirely subjective, so everyone is just as right and wrong as each other objectively because right and wrong have no meaning beyond what you yourself give them. Because of this I think worrying about what others think and trying to prove others right/wrong will only lead to frustration. Of course that goes both ways, religious people evangelising or trying to change the lives of others are just as misguided IMO.
Folks, he's saying that he's being a ass to people who do these things.  You're reading it as being an ass to all religious people who all do these things.  Those are dramatically different statements.  That's it, I'm leaving this thread.
As a game dev I remember the ps2 being on lock down to prevent it from falling into the wrong hands.
[deleted]
China already has a rustbelt--the Northeast, I.e. Manchuria. It's where the Japanese established heavy industry and the Chinese set up state-owned firms that collapsed after Deng's reforms.   As for moving production out of China, forget cost parity with the US. Hecho en Mexico is where it's at. That was the trend before China joined the WTO and it may well be the trend in the future again.
those may be our technology, but the M1A1's we're sending don't have the depleted Uranium hulls, and the F-16's are like buying the basic package from Ford (no AC, Radio, and a manual tranny). Yes they are US equipment, but it's worse than second rate.   
Yet there's plenty to talk about with regard to religious persecution, the harm that superstitious belief causes, etc.  If I have to be called smug to actually work to fix those problems, so be it.
Exactly.  It caused me to dispel my previously held illusions.  I was happily ignorant, dammit!  I learned that the term 'Apartheid' was COINED in Saskatchewan, ffs.  The South Africans came here to learn how to do it.  I'm disgusted with our government for perpetuating a system that leaves our First Nations in third world living conditions.  And we are considered among world leaders in our social programs and freedoms?  STILL looking for that 'reset the world' button.
Seriously? CNN's twitter feed now counts as a news article?
Could you tell me what you mean by Anti-Zionist?  The definition of Anti-Zionist as not supporting Israel's right to exist.  Whether you would have supported it before it was a state is different, but now there are almost 6 million Jews who have been living there for 60 years.  What do you think would happen to all those Jews if your views were fulfilled and Israel was gone tomorrow?  Based on the Palestinians government charter calling for the deaths of all Jews, I can't imagine it would turn out well for them.  For someone to wish that fate upon anyone, I can't help but feel like they have some kind of animosity towards that group of people.
In many African countries you will be executed for your political affiliation.  Take Liberia, or Sierra Leone.
sorry forgot to post this: http://www.christianpost.com/news/most-evangelical-leaders-still-support-iraq-war-31154/  Catholic church was against the Iraq war, for what it's worth.
[deleted]
Now I know you are 12 years old or under. lol  go get educated then come back and we can discuss the difference between religion and atheism.
"American workers are more productive and less likely to strike than their Chinese counterparts."   -We work harder and are more abusable! YAY!
China
I would tell them I come from a long line of jedi
God forbid people have a moment's self reflection during education. It's teletubbies from preschool to senior year.
Not truly aligned with the official church, but my beliefs are closest to mainstream LDS concepts. That being said, it is only this over say, other mainstream sects of Christianity or Islam, Hinduism, Judaism, etcetera.   I do hope I'm allowed to anoint myself as regent. 
You know...you can write this off as propaganda if you want, but there are now tons of images and videos of horrible brutality on both sides of this conflict.  It really validates the position of certain nations that armed intervention and funding the rebels is a bad thing imo.  I'll probably get down voted for this, but think about what would have happened had we NOT armed and funded the rebels. Poorly equipped rebellion massacred in its infancy by superior Russian munitions and aircraft. Quick (if brutal) end to conflict. Fewer dead on both sides overall. Less destruction overall. Oppressive regime still in place.  I don't know if the above is a better path than the current one, just saying... 
I know it would probably be awful, but I feel like we need to run out of something on this planet for people to truly realize the impact we have on the environment. Might help squash the global warming deniers that remain. 
I would just switch to name-days. Fuck the man.
[deleted]
If there is a shortage, why is it so cheap?
If no one answers, this might be a good time to consult /r/askscience on the matter.  EDIT: Looks like [a few people already did](http://www.reddit.com/r/askscience/search?q=helium&amp;restrict_sr=on).
It'll probably still be easier to source it from natural gas wells and the like. It's like vespene gas that way.
Its very easy According to Western Media  America = Good  China = Evil  Jobs for Americans = Good, live American dream with nice suburban home  Jobs for Chinese = Bad, they're stealing American jobs, let them starve, I have a mortgage and car payments to make. 
There are nontheistic religions.
I for one cannot believe they would knowingly violate the GPL. 
Strange it doesn't mention it's important role in scuba diving  EDIT; It does!
It's just not a party without a party tank.
"Physicists HATE her"
Pink Diamond Rings offers pink diamond rings, pink rings, pink diamond engagement rings and pink engagement rings at reliable price.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=F-QA2rkpBSY  Not silly.
Possibly, but it is possible that a lot of people do not know better. It is an important thing to clarify. 
I base previous considerations on the [leaked 2010 cables on the issue](http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2010/nov/29/wikileaks-cables-china-reunified-korea). I'll concede that you're point of view is, IMO, more correct.
nope this IS the subject. Why did he also not mention that those same laws you just quoted punishable by death, are not unique to atheists, those same laws also say that Judaism or Christianity or atheism or whatever, is punishable by death.  THIS is the subject we are talking about. You are incorrect on what you thought the point of this discussion tree is.
Yes.
[deleted]
They're more in power than they have ever been.  
World's pretty overpopulated in general.
http://www.reuters.com/article/2012/07/24/idUS127920+24-Jul-2012+PRN20120724  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC1852689/  http://link.springer.com/article/10.1007%2Fs12011-008-8204-x?LI=true 
Any government with so small a majority will inevitably be weak, since all it would take to stop a bill going through would be a small number of rebels.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Now it is also a moral question, if it's legalized, wouldn't that be a punch to the face of the kids that have been raped and now the videos of it can be spread on the internet?  It isn't pretty, but in this case I think: less victims &gt; more justice for the victims.
[deleted]
I don't think anybody ever said that Israel was the only party who shut down NGOs.  Do you really think a bunch of Westerners support Hamas?  Do we really need to preface every criticism of Israel with "Oh by the way we hate Hamas, Hamas is evil.  And so is the Muslim Brotherhood, and Hezbollah and Assad.  And also Israel has a right to exist"? C'mon, it's ridiculous.   To be honest the fact that Israel can be lumped in with the like of Hamas and Egypt for it's treatment of NGOs isn't doing you any favours.  Israel is just as bad as two oppressive totalitarian dictatorships is the only information I've gleaned from your illustration.  That doesn't make me want to see the Israeli government in a better light, it makes me dislike it even more.
It was taken, so I adapted, just like an illegal immigrant :)
Puerto Rico != Costa Rica
[deleted]
yeah, i don't see a problem with hunting if you eat as much of the animal as possible. Yet if you hunt just so you can say you did it or to get some sort of trophy then you're a douche
Liar bullshit liar - all you speak...
Hear, Hear! Fuck 'em both. 
Based on the Tico Times article, "The law allows hunting only for personal consumption in limited circumstances, scientific research or wildlife population control. It does not affect sport fishing, a popular tourist activity in the country."  Source: http://www.ticotimes.net/Current-Edition/News-Briefs/Costa-Rican-lawmakers-pass-anti-hunting-law_Tuesday-December-11-2012   Another article I found on the law says...   Spanish Translation: "Moreover, the record provides for the confiscation of weapons to hunters. For people who have licenses for this activity, the project allows you to use this permit until it expires (1 year)."  "The initiative does allow hunting in the case of survival of people who can not access the purchase of meat or where hunting licenses are given to control the species."  Source: http://www.nacion.com/2012-09-21/ElPais/Diputados-tienen-en-la-mira-prohibir-la-caza-deportiva.aspx 
Huh. Must be a common trait among chemistry teachers to do this sort of stuff.  And to be absolutely bonkers.
Same thing, they just don't need guns any more.
So much for Rush Limbaugh ever moving to Costa Rica...
Congratulations! Now Poland in to space too!
Still had issues.
This should come to a surprise to no one since he was a puppet all along.  Diarra was appointed by the junta to restore order to the breakaway republic in the north. He failed to do so and now the same people behind the previous junta have "overthrown" him.
An interesting sociolinguistic point. The general term "hated white foreigner" is actually pretty common in the second and third world, especially in former colonial spheres of influence. 
it's only a matter of time.  the sooner they do something wrong the sooner we (the world) can move in and mop up the mess that is an ongoing large scale interment camp known as their working class. but let me put a disclaimer i don't want anyone getting attacked.  so back to square one.
Really?, what happens when a big celebrity dies a un-timely death. 
Come on, it's not like we're talking about brain surgery here.
There seems to be an assumption in your post that the Muslim brotherhood are the anti liberal bogeyman. That was the excuse used to justify propping up a torturous, corrupt dictator for so long. We have to wait and see what the fairly elected Muslim brotherhood do. We shouldn't go assuming anything until its happened.
But..but they're the good guys! 
Back in 2006, I went to Japan alone, without knowing the language and knowing nobody there. It was my ultimate "find yourself" trip. The last day in my little hotel room as I was packing, Korea launched a missile. So here I am, not knowing the language, in a hotel room by myself and I see on Japan news a multi-red/white circle over Japan with some sort of alarm. The only thing I can make out is that some sort of rocket has been launched and from the giant target on the screen, Japan would be hit. It showed it coming from Korea. I prepared to die as I went to my plane. I updated my social networks that I wasn't sure if I would make it and hoped for the best. Yeah, the missle made it barely off shore. At this point, I just think they are trying to fulfill my fears, sorry everybody.
accept Jesus in your heart and you will be protected from what will soon come to pass. the kingdom of darkness is about to manifest on Earth and if you aren't saved you will be left behind. Choose Christ while you still have freedom!!
We've got Golden Dawn in the UK, too. Pathetic numbers and they're all fucking idiots. Apparently they'll kick my head in and hang me from Tower Bridge.
Most, if not all weather satellites are put in sun-sync orbit.
I think he means the true natives of those countries. They got shat on basically. A lot of them by the Empire I'm sure...  I just hate this common idea that Britain, or more specifically England, is a completely blank canvas that needs to be enriched with other, more exiting cultures.  Take Morris Dancing for instance. That is our national dance. It's no more silly than Irish or Scottish dancing, and the costumes are certainly no more silly than those you'd find in other parts of Europe. But the attitude towards it is appalling.  The Guardian reading folk in London will proudly tell everyone how they went to see a Brazillian dance troupe, followed by an Nigerian art exhibition and then a traditional Mongolian throat singer, but I bet hardly any of them have ever seen what their own ancestors had to offer.
I really think this is just you typing one letter to the left or right or something.. cause it looks like something that would have worked somehow.
First world problem 
[deleted]
You're right, ran away from assured torture for uttering the wrong word. China is clearly blameless. 
In literal terms he is advocating that the speech he is making should be criminalised. It is not well put, it is an Eschereque nightmare.
Anybody who knows anything about Australian politics knows that this simply won't happen.  He doesn't have a support base, political infrastructure (or time and skill to set one up), clear political positions or any appeal to voters who will be voting on mainly domestic issues.   What is Assange's stance on education, infrastructure development, Federal/State responsibilities, taxation/taxation reform, industrial relations, budgetary policy, etc? Nobody knows.  How will he campaign from halfway across the world, stuck in an Embassy? How will this be effective?  Sure, he will be popular on reddit, but in places like the working class suburbs of Western Sydney he will be an non-entity by the time of the election.  It says a lot about his ego that he's even considering this.
Bullshit.  It's an important part of *your* society, but when anyone else does it, it's because *they're* racist.
lol Julian Paranoid Assange
"*Greatest* sitar player of the 20th century."  I think you meant *most famous*. Or the only whose name we Westerners actually know.
[Bing!](http://www.bing.com/images/search?q=bermuda+shorts&amp;FORM=HDRSC2)
No.
That would not be anarchy, that would be chaos. 2 very different things.
I SHALL DO AS I PLEASE, OH PRINCE OF FAGGOTRY.
what? is that crime?
How's that? Sweden has an equivalent to grand jury and Assange has not been subject to it. You cannot claim that it is equivalent to him being charged when charges literally means having a grand jury (or equivalent like the British committal procedure). There must be a group of people who are not prosecutors that decide there is enough evidence to charge someone of a crime like this. That has not happened with Assange. 
The big Jewish bully at it again. 
&gt; You don't have any proof at all that the US wants him extradited  Do you have any proof they don't want him extradited?  
Of course they will. They are founded on radical religious principles.  
Of course something I really want to see and they are making us wait till the end of January to watch it on Discovery... it better be worth it &gt;.&gt;
I wasn't talking about Reddit per se but why Americans in general wouldn't like WikiLeaks. I'll go and research "Collateral Murder" on Reddit but I don't recall the reaction being that overwhelmingly positive. However, it might still have been the novelty of it. WikiLeaks then proceeded to leak the Iraq War Logs and Cablegate. The sheer amount of American leaks made it seem like a concerted attack on the US and, naturally, Americans resented that if only for the reasons I mentioned before.
What bigger picture the only thing I can see we're either going to become 2nd class citizens in our own countries. Or if we're fortunate enough dead in the streets.
How sad for you.
"legitimate r...epresentative"  Phew, that was a close one. 
Sure reservations aren't model areas of American wealth, education, and safety, but people aren't setting themselves on fire or getting shot by the police protesting over it in recent times. Some tribes (Seminole is the best known for this) have managed to get their feet under them despite centuries of discrimination and have provided universal healthcare and even stipends for their citizens, which the US gov hasn't even managed - all while preserving and practicing their culture.
I'm not, I'm "you're welcoming" the world.
You say here is "overwhelmingly clear evidence", you don't give any, I don't find it. I don't think there is. It's not turning a blind eye, it's not pretending to know what I don't. I don't know why that 15 year old set themself on fire. I know why the higher, older lama did, and those that left notes explaining themselves, but I don't know in this case.  Is it coercion? Is it wanting to be recognized a hero? Is it desperation?  I don't know and you don't know. Stop pretending to know something that everyone has very little information about.
[deleted]
wouldn't castrating bieber require him to have testicles? i don't think they thought this through very well
anything that actually supports your position?
 The civilians they are killing are 'well defined'. It's Pakistani territory, there is no confusion on that matter.
i see what you did there.  oh god damn it, now i'm part of the apathy, too!
Can someone explain the humor?
Why? What was the app?
It's worth killing civilians if the number you kill is lower than the number killed by you not killing terrorists.
Is it not happening?   Sounds like you are in denial. 
I like the cut of your jib, young man.
Not by the retards parroting "religion of peace" all day long like a fucking script in every article mentioning Islam.  These same types were on Bush's dick in 2001.
well said. If the terrorists were so concerned for the safety of civilians, they wouldn't build their bases in the immediate vicinity of innocent towns, villages, and cities. They know that the U.S. does not intend to kill civilians indiscriminately and so are using the innocents around them as a sort of human shield. If they had any concern for the innocent victims, or decency, they would make sure to protect them on their end as much as possible...but they really don't give a fuck about the civilian casualties, do they? I really doubt the U.S. military is saying, "hey look, an elementary school!" or "hey, it's a wedding!" and bombing it. Speaking as a liberal, sometimes liberals take it too far. War will always involve collateral damage and it's tragic but the best we can do is try to minimize. Besides, it would be so much worse for everyone involved if we used ground troops, mortar fire, carpet bombing, artillery more intensely as we have in past wars. Drones, I think, are an improvement on the past. Now the legality of attacking inside Pakistan is another issue altogether.
Upvote for reasoned response.  You are correct. it would be me, the liberal, that would be interested.  But this type of networking would support the mistrust of a universe that we differ on.  I think that the US is now in the business of creating additional terrorists in a backwater of the world that hid radicals from Saudi Arabia: the source of the people who carried out the 911.    We are fueling the terrorist fire by indiscriminate killing.  Changing the definition of 'enemy combatant" does not make some dead goat herder's family decide to turn in those strangers from Saudi.    I hope this nuance leads to a new distinction in brown people for you. 
Yes. Good thing we have our strong Patriot missiles to defend against their evil SCUDS.  This is such blatant 1984-type jingoism. Everyone knows that Patriot missiles are *defensive* weapons. And smart bombs are designed to avoid children. 
But does he really believe that by tweeting them instead it will make apple accept his app? I don't get the logic. Also was it a paid or free app?
Not at all, I just intensely dislike americentric bullshit such as you are presenting. It's boring and pointless and then it gets all defensive when someone says "who gives a shit about american tourists".  Have a nice day.
People on reddit generally like fast food, video games, hate politicians but are passively nationalist. It's not exactly a forward-thinking demographic. A bit more savvy than folks who like Fox news but not much. They  like different consumer products, but pretty much still define themselves with them.
Narcissists like that can justify anything to themselves. Here's [one from Australia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robert_Farquharson). 
[deleted]
Bro, do you even use a style manual? http://www.grammarbook.com/punctuation/quotes.asp
Only if we chopped a piece off to bring back. Just the tip.
I have several munar landings and returns under my belt. And I still don't use mechjeb.
But how do you justify the idea of "too much fat"?  There is no longer a dietary consensus that fat is bad to eat.  Although the USRDA still reflects that vanished consensus.
So what religion does a deist have?
[deleted]
No, they're very much in it from what I remember. The argument was that the journalist standing right next to the guys with guns and rpg's got cut down too. Which for some reason, was just so crazy for people to believe. Who would have thought?
52?
You have a better chance of being mauled by a polar bear and a grizzly bear on the same day.
[deleted]
Yeah totally killing civilians is the right way to go and it's understandable. Yeah, sure...
Maria Payne...
*Out of control my ass..* **Watch out, New York!!**  The satellite is kaboom-ing your way. Everything's according to plan, guys.. Everything..
Mondoweiss is a biased news source and they need to provide legit sources.  Anyways, if there is a military buffer zone and civs get too close, then they can be fired upon. America has the same policy. They didnt shoot to kill, just to get them the fuck away from the border buffer zone.
Is this what the counterargument to "you didn't build that" has matured to now?  You could also say the incomes of private citizens aren't the piggy banks of government, but few would take you seriously.  In this globalized world, so many industries are portable and don't need to stay in one country or another.  Why do countries have different business tax rates at all?  Why don't they all just pledge to share the exact same rate so this stuff doesn't happen?
It's "breaking", moron.
A new bout of soul searching?  Seriously?   This is the same country which has Foxconn [suicide](http://www.dailytech.com/Foxconn+Installs+AntiSuicide+Nets+at+Its+Facilities/article18877.htm) nets, mobile execution [chambers](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0whb5vdtmbU), a booming human organ harvesting industry, a one child policy, and whose rivers we expect to catch on fire due to pollution any day [now](http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/headlines/2012/09/yangtze-river-turns-red-and-turns-up-a-mystery/).  After all that it is this event which will force an ethical dilemma?
Maybe. 
I would say they give zero fucks about whatever this 'satellite' hits.  My guess is it was launched to see if they were on the right track with their ICBM program.
Ah the good old days before Sayyid Qtub was traumatised by men and women dancing together and some goat herders in the desert found oil under the local oasis.
This is very interesting.
The army would still carry out their orders and flatten South Korea.
They remain "friends" with them so they can ridicule them and feel superior.
[deleted]
[deleted]
They have concentration camps too, so that's fun...for the kids...
I'm not sure that the world does 'fear its missiles', in fact I'm not fully convinced that nations that have fired millions of missiles of their own have the right to tell any other sovereign nation that they may not develop their own. How would we fell if other countries suddenly decided we couldn't have nuclear subs or something. We would tell them to fuck off....I suspect that Iran feels the same. My final point is this smacks of the old WMD switcharoo, Iranians are not fucking retarded, they know any attack on the west would result in total annihilation for them and yet the US continues trying to sell us the notion that Iran are 'threatening' with their missiles....fucking horseshit.    
So far your argument is there is NO CHANCE more than one person would agree this article is shit. The only plausable explanation is that we are all the same person, upvoting each other, working as the JIDF.  You are batshit crazy.
Don't forget about how religious Americans are. WBC anyone?   And the USA has political prisoners, Bradley Manning and Julian HERO Assange anyone?  The USA also has torture/death camps, Gitmo and Supermax anyone?  How many wars has NK started? I think we know who the real bad guy is.
I wonder how a course on "historical cases of censorship: The groups who used it and why" would play out in islamic countries.   You aren't attacking god or religion. You are just discussing politics. Will they still jail or execute you? 
Looks like they got to skip the food stamps and go right to the rations. Looks good!
My South Korean friend's don't want to pay the bill for North Korea to build weapons. Also this last rocket launch probably ended the hopes of it being reinstated. 
what a sleaze bucket, 20 and 17 year old.    Funny how he loves the US Gov now he's being "chased" for murder
[deleted]
&gt; Europe's calling, don't be calling us lesser.   But that's exactly what you are. Compared to what US has, freedom of speech in Europe is a joke.  &gt;    Freedom of speech didn't stop the Japanese Americans from being locked up in world war two, freedom of speech didn't stop the purge on the communists after world war two, freedom of speech didn't stop your country throwing people in American high security jails for justifying jihadism or killing them without due process. Your freedom of speech doesn't extend outside your borders, your freedom of speech doesn't extend to the victims of those tyrannical and tortorous regimes your governments blue and red prop up. Freedom of speech isn't a requirement for partnerships commercial or diplomatic. Freedom of speech doesn't happy to private manning who is in jail for exposing the cover up of innocent people. You say the US is committed to freedom of speech, I say its just a smokescreen that is created to make you feel free. Your government can and will take it away as the see fit.    You're all over the place. Do your incoherent ramblings  serve a point bro?   &gt; You get locked up for hate speech over here, that is a far better policy.  Oh yes, "hate speech".
But in the end both men fell. Despite their vast differences they managed to arrive at the same outcome. Their regimes toppled. That's all I'm saying. 
[deleted]
It's actually much easier to get an internship as a student than after graduation. I can highly recommend taking a 6 month "break" for an internship. A very talented French intern at my firm attended a business school where three 6 month internships were required in order to graduate. Because of that, she has an excellent CV and has recently gotten to the second round of interviews at FSG (a consulting firm founded by Michael Porter of "Porter's five forces" fame). I very much wish I had done an internship during my student days.  Now getting on to your actual inquiry. If you are interested in international development, there's the obvious (highly competitive) internships such as [The UN](http://www.un.org/Depts/OHRM/sds/internsh/index.htm) and, if you are European, [the EU](http://ec.europa.eu/stages/information/application_en.htm#Infotab1) offers many excellent internships. I also recommend checking this sit e for [EU traineeships](http://recruitment.jrc.ec.europa.eu/?type=TR). The [US state department](http://careers.state.gov/students/) also does a few great internships. I can also readily recommend any of the internship positions listed [here](http://www.ihipo.com/development_internships). The best times to look for internships is early fall and early spring. That applies for most internships across the board.   I can also suggest most of the places listed [here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_environmental_organizations#Private_Organizations_.28.27.27Environmental_NGOs.29). Pretty much of all of them will offer internships in one form or the other.   The private sector also actively recruits interns. Some great places are  Mott Macdonald and Grontmij. Although they are mainly consult in engineering, you would be surprised how many international engineering firms hire anthropologists and sociologists. What many people don't realize is that engineering projects outside of the Western world incorporates a lot of human interaction. Impact Assessments also have a huge social component to them. [Milkround](http://milkround.com) and [Graduateland](http://graduateland.com) are two lesser known recruiting websites where a lot of really interesting opportunities come up.   There's also the option of cold calling/emailing companies/firms/NGOs that you find interesting. Ask what sort of programmes they have. Look on their webpages (and LinkedIn) and email the relevant people, ask them what it's like working there, what they like about it, if they can offer any helpful advice. Don't be offended if they take a long time getting back to you (or even at all!), they are all busy people. But a lot of the time they will have no problem answering a short email. You can build up a repertoire that way.   The way things are now, it's almost as difficult getting an internship as it is getting a real job. Unfortunately, internships are almost essential to landing a job in international development. If it isn't insanely competitive, it's about contacting them at exactly the right time when they need someone. The way I got my job was that I cold called my current firm, shot them off an email and a cover letter and essentially dropped it. A couple of months later they called me up asking if I was interested in an internship, as they needed someone to assist the Environmental Project Manager. I got on well with them and they offered me a position as an Assistant Project Manager afterwards. I still have that title, but I have been the lead Project Manager for a couple of projects now so the only real difference is my lower salary and I still ask questions all the time :).  Hopefully that will get you started! If you have any other questions, I'll do my best to answer them although it would help a lot if I knew what particular field you were thinking of going into!
No. USA wants to leave it as is which is no regulation beyond the current groups like ICANN, ARIN, etc.   It is true USA "could" regulate it but they have done the opposite and leave it alone. The other countries want to do all kinds of shit like break TCP/IP taking the assignment from a worldwide organization like it is now and have each country handle it. Oh, and the ability to censor the shit out of it.  The "shithead" countries as I like to call them want the global Internet to be more like Chinese Internet. 
[deleted]
http://www.pnas.org/content/early/2012/08/22/1206820109.abstract
Let China have that massive debt and all the future refugees. Would S Korea really care?
[deleted]
It's 25 million people. I honestly think that with international help it wouldn't be that big of a deal especially if South Korea is given full control over the land and is allowed to modernize it. (South Korea's population is 50 million already).  It wouldn't be overnight, but I think it's doable.
I already said it: http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2009/05/13/AR2009051301751.html
[deleted]
Thanks for that. I have never actually, till this day sat through and read a legit story other than technology articles or scientific papers. This one had me from the first paragraph. It was a thrill all the way till the end. Thank you very much.
Excuse me in advance for being rude but are you fucking kidding me? The United States has been responsible for the support of brutal dictator after brutal dictator in the name of corporate interests. The "good old days" might have existed for middle class Americans suffering from the economic downturn but not for the vast majority.
And this surprises us... becaaauuuuuse?
&gt;as if somehow if everyone in Pakistani became an atheist they'd stop throwing acid in people's faces and generally being idiots. Unfortunately that's not the reality.  I think it is.
Yeah this headline is so misleading, the "UN internet treaty" was a push by a bunch of autocrats to legitimize their harsh restrictions on their citizens' internet freedom. Headline should something like US, UK, and Canada Refuse to Let Dictators Make Internet Freedoms Historical Artifacts.   America... Fuck Yeah!
Well why do you think it will change? Surely it's just going to carry on like it always has? This isn't a film, there is not some big happy ending where everyone learns something and overcomes difficulties at the end; the CIA will carry on doing whatever it likes, and the American people will carry on not caring about it, and one day you will die, and no one will notice and it will still carry on, and that will be that.  That line you quoted gives the impression that America made some bad choices in the past, but eventually pulled themselves together and made the 'right choice' and became the 'good guys'... that's what I was asking - 'when did that happen?' because we are still watching them torture foreign citizens even today. Nothing changed, no one learnt anything, and America will carry on like this for the foreseeable future.   "you can always rely on the US to do the right thing, once it has exhausted every other option." - Bullshit.
Islamic politicians have used it to describe their religion whilst allowing it to rape and murder.  The meme has a hint of truth in its sarcasm.
Wait, what? The U.S. is actually upholding internet freedom?
You don't know anything about the religion and yet you jump to conclusions. 
Quite unfortunate that your shock doesn't extend to the article. 
[deleted]
Just because something is true doesn't means that it isn't also propaganda. While Asiya's story is tragic and heartbreaking, focusing on stories in which Muslims and Islam are the villains and Christians and Christianity are the heroes or victims furthers the falsely negative depiction of Islam as a dangerous and violent religion. It furthers the sense of 'otherness'  regarding Muslims that has become so pervasive in post 9/11 U.S. culture. It furthers hateful stereotypes and more violence like it. Articles like this do not further peace; they do exactly the opposite. 
I'm not sure you understand how big a number 28 million unskilled laborers is...where in hell are you going to find work for them?
It isn't editorialized in the slightest. I'm not sure what to say to someone who calls me a "whining bitch" for criticizing people for complaining about a problem that doesn't exist. A crazy asshole, perhaps?  Shit-post on you crazy asshole.  (Also, "put up or shut up" doesn't apply in this situation. Unless you're asking me to post unbiased headlines or something.)
If a fat woman gave me a billion dollars, I'd prob bang her.  hit and run
PressTV might literally be the absolute least reputable news outlet on the planet. It makes RTnews look like a beacon of objectivity, which is no easy feat.     Sources: Using [screen-caps](http://m.blottr.com/breaking-news/hurricane-sandy-not-dramatic-enough-irans-press-tv-uses-image-day-after-tomorrow) from a movie in an article, then trying to pass them off as legitimate photographs of a disaster area.    [Another blatant lie](http://m.guardiannews.com/world/2011/aug/15/uk-riots-iran-media-red-faced), this time about "Londoners rioting against the British monarchy" - complete with pictures, of course.   [Just for good measure](http://m.theatlanticwire.com/global/2012/11/iran-drone-photoshopped/59404/), the always hilarious "drone that takes off and lands vertically". 
TIL Pakistan is not a nice place to live.
There are already sales taxes. If you buy Google services in Europe you pay VAT, for example.  Also bear in mind that most of Google's revenue comes from outside the United States and sales taxes are collected in the country of sale. So it certainly wouldn't add up to more payment of US taxes.
So, part of Schmidt's definition of capitalism, a clearly failed economic system from the 19th century, is tax evasion.
http://simpsonswiki.net/w/images/d/d0/League_of_Evil.png
It has to be wrong.  They put Australia at Number 2.  *Everything tries to kill you there*
Talk to any Canadian with farmland near the border, they'll prove to you how "unprotected" it is.
No, that was on the Mavi Marmara. And the civilians were handcuffed before they were shot in the head. 
I agree with this.
From the nature of the incident it seems as there were in an isolated area. No witnesses, and no one to help. Therefore, I don't think any other news services were around to give a 2nd story. On the other hand, if op's post states that the IDF is investigating in the issue then it happened and we have to wait to know more. 
[deleted]
I wasn't in Han-majority areas, I was cycling a bike through very remote and entirely Tibetan areas. From 95% Tibetan towns to tent villages on top of mountain passes which were 100% Tibetan. The only Han I saw in my whole time there were tourists.  It was actually Western Sichuan and North-West Yunnan, on the Tibetan Plateau but just over the border from the TAR. So somewhat easier to go there; you don't need the special permit. They open and close the region randomly but nothing official. I was actually told by the police to get out at one stage as there was an 'illegal' festival and some monk immolations going on but was assured I could ignore them, which I did.  Just reporting my personal experiences, of course I can't extrapolate that to the entire wishes of a people.  As to my friend, I don't think it was lack of paying attention. It is just that he was living in China long term and would have heard the party line on Tibet from literally every Chinese person he ever spoke to about it. I know I did. Chinese society has a simply incredible level of groupthink (and is also quite nationalistic) and after eight years of this I can understand how he would have been convinced it was accurate. 
Long overdue.
Indeed.
not really, thats what us propaganda wants you to believe.  they are desperate to make launch look bad in any way.  but it was a huge success.
[deleted]
He's getting them from here, as it happens: http://www.thebureauinvestigates.com/category/projects/drone-data/
The UN on diplomacy: "speak softly and carry no stick"
[deleted]
They're not all frontline combat troops. Many of them maintain the weapon systems and work with the Turkish Radar command to coordinate with the Turkish Air Defense.
Actually we should be thankfull that laws are flexible and always able to be changed... otherwise gay rights and other things that took a while for people to accept would never have seen the light of day.
And?
Actually there is more than cheese: http://i.imgur.com/diiCO.png
Don't keep your hopes up too high.........
A pardon would say that he didn't do something that was a crime, and that we misunderstood the evidence, or there was a problem with the trial. None of that is true and a pardon isn't appropriate.  An appology to him and all homosexuals would be appropriate.
Would you rather it be in the hands of China and Russia? As much as Reddit loves to get on the anti-American circle jerk the internet in its current form has been in the hands of the US for decades now and unless I'm missing something the flow of information has been continuing pretty freely. Sure you get your SOPAs and PIPAs but remember they died because of the efforts of American representatives like Sen. Ron Wyden, American companies like Google, American non-profits like Wikipedia, other American founded web entities like Reddit and 4chan and the efforts of thousands of Americans who didn't want the interent controlled. The US and Americans have played a massive role in the formation of the internet and its development as one of the most important means of communication and as much crap as the US does do, it should be commended for it's role in promoting the free development of the web around the globe. 
yes, I agree with this. We need to fix the root cause. However, you can't handwave google for being just like other company. The whole "All my friends are doing it" is an argument that children make (if you have children, you heard it).   So no, I will not give google a free pass because they are being like every other multinational company.  At the same time, I am not singling google out. But because the topic is about google, it only makes sense to talk about their case. We can talk about what other companies are doing, but that would distract from the fact that google sucks too.  
Look. We are obviously both biased, me pro Israel, and you pro Hamas. 
Yes they were. They had soviet controlled goverments for 50 years.
It's sad to see you stoop so low.
I don't understand how this isn't all over reddit already. CHILDDREN! 
What would you suggest to be the correct subreddit?
Replace Adam Smith?   The only way I'd concede that is if the Scots left us.
oh my god...
Mexico has little enforceability for those gun laws and it borders a country that has guns coming out the ass.
I have 3 children, two of which are still in 2nd and 4th grades.  I worry about my oldest son, being in High School, of something like this happening.  It never even crossed my mind to think that something this horrific could happen in an elementary school.  Today is my day off, my wife is at work, my kids are in school.  I'm literally on the verge of tears right now.  I can't stop thinking "What if that was my children's school? What if my children were among the lost?".  Then I realize that wasn't their school.  They are fine, several states away from that horrible scene.    Suddenly, I feel guilty.    Guilty, because my kids will be walking through the front door in a couple hours, throwing their book bags on the floor where they don't belong, arguing over who gets to play on the Xbox/PS3 first.  They'll tell me about their day, about who said what to whom on the bus, a funny joke they heard at lunch, or the game they played at recess.  Then they'll ask what we are having for dinner and suggest McDonald's, even though my wife and I can't stomach it.  These are things I take for granted on a daily basis, but today, they'll mean so much more to me.  Today, these things will be a reminder that my children came home safe.  They didn't hear any gun shots or see a friend shot and senselessly ripped from this life.  There's the guilt again...  **tl;dr** Cherish every moment you have with your loved ones.  We never know when they will be our last.
"Vodka for Elephants" starring Robert Pattinsov and Reese Witherspunova
The fact that this type of shit keeps happening in the US makes me afraid of ever visiting there.
That is not the shooter. The person who owns that facebook has been posting that it is not them. 
Lucky for those in the U.S., there is not so much corruption because everybody has guns.  It's working great.
By the Federal Reserve, I assume you mean the central banking system of the United States, an unregulated institution in this paradigm due to it being a bank. Not allowing it to print or not print as much money as it chooses would of course be regulation, this couldn't occur, as is the same with stopping any other bank printing money. 
[deleted]
It doesn't matter. In a few months he will be prime minister. 
Funnily a lot of people who claim to be fans of Adam Smith these days appear to have missed his warnings about the main enemy of capitalism being capitalists that get *too* successful and try to rig the game to stay on top. Can't imagine that ...
As I said before, it's also harder to transport guns into the UK-it's surrounded by water. Other nations that have gun laws have extremely high gun rates, because guns are smuggled into the country.
I just rewrote a Churchill-speech, upvote the old imperialist instead. And of course upvote the threads about internet censorship, not only in the US but anywhere in the world! Despite not signing this treaty, almost every country tries to censor the Internet, not only blocking illegal content, but everything their rubber-band laws deem offensive. This might range from actual hate speech to simply calling a politician a dickhead.  So if you liked this new spin on the old speech, don't just upvote it, do what it recommends! Raise awareness, share articles about Internet censorship, demonstrate against SOPA / PIPA / ACTA / whateverthefuck they are going to name the next one, call your representative about it, tell your politicians where they can stuff their new censorship laws, etc...
I think the word "pardoning" in this context specifically refers to the resignation from further punishment of a committed offender. 
Neither of us can really know the answer to that. I know Russians try to land on Canadian shores from time to time. I know US subs are sometimes right off shore and they even land on Canadian soil occasionally, just to make sure they can if they need to. We do the same. Everyone has listening stations everywhere. The Chineese surfaced a nuclear submarine right in the middle of an aircraft carrier battle fleet. Just to mess with the US military and demonstrate power. Which they did. That's just accepted. I don't think anything crazy will happen but nations never assume that. Countries are still surrounded by armed and manned walls, we just don't see them.   With two civilized countries it wouldn't be an invasion if the military disapeared. It would just be an annex. Taxes would go way up, there would be political tension. At the end of the day regular people would pay the price. The overtaking country would probably pretend they are there to help but end up giving them terrible economic deals. The economy would continue and just the right people would be rewarded in order to wipe the country of resources in all forms.
good point. there's recreational shooting though for not killing things, like skeet shooting. and hunting can have a pivotal role in animal population control. 
Fuck today.
Especially when there's an imbalance of technology, therefore an imbalance of power. For example, a criminal carrying a gun and no good person in sight having one to counter it will tip the balance toward the criminal
you forgot shooting targets (paper, clay, rubber, foam), thats what i use all my guns for and that is what most guns are fired at.  the problem is all these water headed, reactionary, illogical, liberals want to ban something because one person misused it.  we don't ban cars when some asshole drives into a crowd of people  we don't ban knifes when some asshole attacks a bunch of people  but liberals scream and cry to ban guns when someone uses it to attack people...  it makes zero sense.  a rational person would understand that without a gun the nutjob would just find another way to kill people. an IED would have killed many more people, but we aren't banning the 100 or so household chemicals that can be used to construct one. 
[deleted]
Using humor to cope with tragedies that personally involve you is one thing. But it's absolutely ridiculous to say that making fun of other people's hardships helps someone deal with the fact that those hardships exist in the world.  
But that involves taking away people's things… that just happen to be tools designed to kill with extreme ease… and people DO NOT like their things being taken away. They value owning these things more than the lives of innocent people.
Nice try china, but todays score is: Usa 1 china 0
yes. because I've totally murdered SO many people. Fucking moron.
Couldn't these assholes at least choose to slash 22 corrupt Government Officials instead?
If he could have just as easily done it with a bat or can of gas, why didn't he then?  Why do they all seem to prefer semi automatics when they go on these rampages?
Thank you for the definition of fast food, I appreciate it.  Im sorry for asking the wrong question.  The bottom line is that it is highly unlikely you are an Indian Israeli that lived in Herzlia but is now in the US, and spends way too much time making lists and links about how horrible Israel is, which you faithfully cut and paste each time a topic comes up that is bashing Israel.  That is all.  
Can't argue with that. Good points. 
even if you were to double the figures and assume 0% unreported gun crime in the us, the uk would still have 0.06 instances of gun crime per 100k inhabitants whereas America would remain at 2.98 per 100k. almost 98% of gun crime would have to be ignored for the uk's gun crime to be equal to that f the states, and that seems... unlikely. 
[deleted]
As in all these cases, we chronically fail to look at the [**REAL SOURCE**](http://i.imgur.com/Vw5wQ.jpg) of the slashings because [it's politically incorrect to tell the truth](http://i.imgur.com/TTIPn.jpg) anymore in America.  Condolences to all the families that have to suffer today as a result of our feminist society's neglect of men.  And lastly, to all the men silently suffering out there and thinking that raging against society is your own solution--*don't give up!* Just because the majority of people are too fucking cowardly to stand up for you, that doesn't mean *everyone* has abandoned you.   Don't end up like **John Holmes.** Don't end up like **Anders Breivik.** Don't end up like **Ryan Lanza.**   Don't end up like countless men out there who have resigned themselves to become ticking time bombs because there are no resources and no support out there for men.   [FUCK THAT.](http://youtu.be/dM7L6I5gyHs)   &gt;"our feminist society's neglect of men" Are you serious? You need a woman to pay attention to you in order to not go out and murder a bunch of people? Also, based on your lovely REAL SOURCE, Why aren't more women going out and mass murdering people considering that 1 in 6 women are raped (by men) in the US?  dear piece of shit coward, please bring all your [**FUCKING PHONY FEMINIST STATISTICS THAT YOU GOT OFF THE BACK OF A CEREAL BOX, YOU TINY BRAINED MORON**] and bring them over here so we can [LIVE debate your idiocy.](http://i.imgur.com/wVdQs.jpg)
A) nope, not a gun lobbyist, just a gun owner. I haven't give a dime to the NRA or any group to fight for my right. These are merely opinions. You sure like throwing the blame at anywhere but the actual problem don't you? That guy shot those kids, it is his fault. Maybe his parents, friends, siblings, etc knew he was unstable. In That case, they could be to blame as well. Both for not admitting him and allowing him access to guns in the first place.  B) it wasn't my idea you moron, that's why there was a question mark. As in, should we invade them to stop them?  C) the Cold War is over boyo, I don't see either of them using them any time soon and both are drawing down their supply. And you don't see N. Korea as a bigger problem than the US or Russia? You may be dumber than I thought. I thought you were just misguided... As for them using the only nukes, ever. That's true of course, but there have be many theories that show that many lives were saved because of it. Imagine an all out invasion of Japan which would have included the firebombing on Tokyo... Instead of the ~250,000 it would have likely been millions.
[deleted]
Why is it all we see is SPAM from CNN calling the demise of Assad - yet every other news source sees things differently... ?
Except it doesn't really prove your point. Give me an actual example of people using "i'd rather" without then using a verb
[deleted]
We have different internets
How to build a pipe bomb:  1. Pack a pipe full of black powder. Add shrapnel if desired.  2. Insert fuse.  3. Light fuse.  If you don't have black powder, how to make black powder:  1. Mix saltpeter, sulfur, and charcoal (not especially good powder, but it works)  If you don't have a fuse, how to make a fuse:  1. Mix saltpeter and sugar  2. Roll mixture into thin paper (tissue, toilet paper)  It's not exactly advanced technology, you can make it all in an afternoon if you have a Home Depot and an old-style drug store nearby; it might add a day or two if you only have Home Depot (you have to extract the saltpeter from stump remover).
Don't worry extracting sand from oil also produces methane.
I don't know, I definitely think that more awareness should be brought to the horrendous mass famine and disease that goes on in the world, and that when you have access to a huge media format that allows you to spread information it should come as a moral obligation that you help make everyone know just how fucked up shit is. Even though it happens every day that shouldn't anything.
If something like this happened to me/you/whoever tomorrow and was then dumped on the side of a road a few years later then who do you go to? How do you go around convincing people that what happened to you was real and that you aren't crazy?
[deleted]
saw that posted on one source and they corrected it, you are righht
When firearm ownership is mapped only maps will own firearms.
It kinda is already regulated.   Buy small amounts of it for meat curing (bacon and sausages) and you're okay.   Large quantities and you might get on the radar of law enforcement.
It would also be interesting to see how many gun-related homicides were committed by people who were already violent criminals. 
Yes, people are really that retarded.
The vast majority of gang violence is not committed across cultural groups, but within them though... so it's not diversity that's the problem.
&gt;There have been an assload of stabbings in china lately, many of them with 10 people dead.  The maximum number of dead I can find for a Chinese stabbing was 10 back in 2008. The next after that was 8 in August of this year. Apart from that I can't find any with a high mortality rate. It is of interest to note that in a spate of stabbings at Chinese schools **over the past few years** there has been less than 20 people killed in comparison to 27 being killed just today.  Compare that with the US where this year alone there have been at least 4 incidents where more than 7 people have been killed in individual mass shootings:  7 killed in Oakland, California in April, 12 killed in Aurora, Colorado in July, 7 kiled in Oak Creek, Wisconsin in August, 27 killed in Newtown, Connecticut yesterday.  And that's not including at least 2 others with more than 5 dead and numerous others that have killed more than 3.  &gt;It would be just as easy to point to any of those, and then a shooting like in Portland where only 2 were killed and draw the opposite conclusion.  So look at the trends. China has had one stabbing with a notably high fatality rate this year. The US has had 2 with higher and two with similar fatality rates and numerous others with notably high rates.
Islam in action. 
Did you say Abe Lincoln?
When the Iranians wanted a revolution.. during their last election, they wondered what should replace their current regime.  There was no leader and no answer to that.  A very few brought up the revolution of middle east and Egypt in particular.  Those that were older and wiser said "We were today's Egypt 35 years ago".     Iran overthrew their Dictator (the shah) 35 years ago, only to replace him with a "democracy of muslim-brotherhood".  Now they are praising the times they had under the Shah.  :(
This coming from the paranoid racists?
No state/country that represents ALL of its citizens should ever include a title or clause that represents the majority.. A constitution is about protecting the rights of the minority against the majority. It is about liberty to be who you are and what you believe etc. Therefore there shouldn't be any reference to any religion specifically in title or verse of any constitution ever. Regardless of a majority elected government otherwise you defeat the whole purpose of a constitution meant to protect individual human rights.
You're fucking stupid. Seriously. Learn how to think critically before you start spouting your nonsense in a public forum.  &gt;a disgusting belief system that shits on half it's population?  Belief systems don't shit on anyone, but a governments implementation of a belief system can. Islam is not inherently a disgusting belief system (not anymore than any other religion, so if you're saying Islam is "fucking disgusting" and "utterly revolting" and that it "promotes violence against women and children," you'd best be applying that to all organized religions), this implementation of one biased interpretation is.   By applying your judgement to all of Islam instead of how Islam is being implemented in one geocultural region, you're being hugely ignorant and bigoted and are wrongly judging millions of followers of Islam.  **tl;dr You're a bad person**
Can't argue with that.
I think, in this context, what it boils down to is that the various religious texts esteemed to be holy by their followers are all so rife with holes that they are, as a source of evidence, completely useless. These people come to us asking us to see things as they do, to have faith in their scriptures, asking us to believe magnificent stories of magic and myth. The evidence they point to in support is beyond flimsy, and then many resort to the "you just have to have FAITH" argument. When their evidence is weighed and found wanting, too many tend to fall back on a mindset that they are right, regardless of their ability to provide any sort of substantial proof. Therefore, when dealing with someone like this sometimes the best approach is to simply acknowledge that what they are saying is of no consequence.   P.S. - upvoted you. Feel like you got jumped on by the downvote wagon despite providing a question that deserves some thought.
&gt; You say dissenting opinions are necessary for learning and I wholeheartedly agree, unfortunately these people don't believe in dissent to their opinions and will use intimidation and threats to squash it.  Then you can punish anyone who intimidates or threatens.  You can *not*, under *any circumstances*, punish anyone for having an opinion you disagree with. It doesn't matter how stupid, it doesn't matter if they are "not based on logical examination of facts". They *must* be allowed to have and argue for that opinion. 
I think a cursory glance at the more liberal voices over in the US shows that they most certainly would not find it odd. Warren Buffet and Bill Gates have both said that they should have a progressive tax system where the richer people should pay more tax. Its only our Fox News stereotype of Americans that might find this strange and this only accounts for [40% of the population](http://www.politico.com/polls/politico-george-washington-university-battleground-poll.html) and that has fallen since the election [to about 25%](http://secure.huffingtonpost.com/2012/12/13/fiscal-cliff-poll-gop_n_2289056.html) as [prominent Republicans](https://secure.huffingtonpost.com/2012/12/06/ann-coulter-gop-taxes-obama-hannity_n_2249545.html?ncid=edlinkusaolp00000009&amp;comm_ref=false) have come out in favour of raising taxes. 
I think that elephant is about to steal that camera...
Dumbest article ever.   tl;dr: "women were banned from voting, but I have no clue why"  How about writing an article when you DO KNOW what happened? Maybe they weren't even registered. Or were trying to vote in another place then the one they registered in. But no, why bother? I would just say "Christian women banned" and people will approve me.
Lion with a collar on, plus a cub bonus. http://imgur.com/CHxlA
When he was a young WARTHOOOOG!
We have a much larger percent of crazies than other countries. We are also a lot smaller than America. Think of the most racist state in America and then you have South Africa. I still love the place and just like everyone in generally racist American states aren't crazy everyone here isn't. 
Obesity is often the result of malnutrition. The word you're looking for us "under-nutrition" Malnutrition is basically not eating the correct proportion and type of food.  [Dictionary definition](http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/malnutrition)
so you're saying every Schedule II substance can be legally prescribed by a doctor?
TBH I am not entirely sure how it works.   In the years with my company, previously they would give you another day off in the same pay period if you worked an observed holiday.   And now currently they just pay you OT if you work then.   Realistically only holidays I get are ones where I use my PTO time. 
Nazi prick coddler of pedophile perverts.
Or [put another way](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EYWbatgKN4g).
There were also bones from a missing girl found in a cemetery belonging to the Vatican, I think. I don't think I could find the story again, but Organized Crime is implicated. 
&gt;Because GE is a nuclear grade supplier, they are required to have the same corrective action and reporting systems as US nuclear facilities.   Right, so does GE have a "safety culture" issue? Why did they not raise concerns about the reactor? Why did they not get on Japanese TV and tell the Japanese people that the reactor was dangerous because executives had cut corners, and thus should be shut down?  Because that might make nuclear power look bad, and *that's* bad for business.  Japan is one of the most geothermally active countries on the planet. [They do not *need* nuclear power.](http://www.guardian.co.uk/environment/2012/aug/09/fukushima-disaster-new-geothermal-plants)  &gt;Fortunately the error is not going to have any actual safety impact, but when GE found the issue, per 10CFR21, they had to report it to the NRC, go back and find every plant that was affected, and work with us on a resolution.  Did they have to report it to *us*, the people likely to be affected if the shit hit the fan? Why didn't they? You can't tell me GE has no voice to speak:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_assets_owned_by_General_Electric#Media  So why were they silent?  &gt;the key thing is the design of the entire system as a whole and how it functions during those events.  You can never be sure of anything. You can simply do the best you can, then downplay the risks so that the people are not given the chance to give **informed** consent.  Nuclear power is safe! (unless something really bad or unexpected happens, but we won't mention that).  A geothermal plant has never contaminated its environment with deadly radiation. Not once. It's actually impossible.
Catholicism is probably the most liberal of the major religions of the world...
"I don't have these problems, how could anyone else?"  solid logic you have there. I mean cancer patients, what a drag right? Why don't they just get better?
Why the hell would China or Russia go to war for Iran? they have nothing to gain and everything to lose.
Perhaps it'd be quite possible to fund if you filled it with electricity-generating treadmills. Skinny for the people, power for the city.
[deleted]
Quite a few actually, I'd imagine.
[deleted]
I have read this kind of argument many times: the odds. While I agree that  immediate environment and parental example can influence people a lot, there is so much information out there that a person can break out of that pattern if s/he wants. If we overemphasize the "odds" message, people will keep using it as a crutch.
&gt; Syria poses a direct threat to US's allies in the region.   True.  And all treaties expire or can be renegotiated.  NATO was established to curtail the influence of the USSR and national militarism in Europe.   The USSR is gone.  National militarism is gone.  But NATO has outlived its charter because we redefined its purpose and broadened its scope.  NATO is our mode of deterring Europe, Africa and Middle East from moving in an independent direction from U.S. interest.     &gt; US will view any threat against Turkey, Jordan, or Israel (especially Israel) as a threat against the US itself.  True.  Except Assad's Syrian government isn't planning to invade Turkey, Jordan and Israel. They are preoccupied with suppressing an armed uprising. Rebel groups as the Free Syrian Army, a breakaway faction of the Syrian military who oppose Assad's regime don't respect borders.   I understand all legitimate concerns facing Syria's bordering countries regarding violence spilling over. But Assad does not pose a high risk of invading or attacking adjacent nations.  Attacking the Syrian military won't secure the borders of neighboring states. Assad is well aware if the Syrian army's capacity and inability to wage a direct war with the U.S and her allies.     This all goes to show how our government has redefine "nation" to better suit 20th and 21st century economic and political interests. A nation defined is "A large aggregate of people united by common descent, history, culture, or language, inhabiting a particular country or territory".    Our military was established to defend the U.S. Constitution of our nation from all treats, foreign and domestic. Our leaders have tossed the Constitution aside when convenient, to pledge to apply our military as a mercenary force throughout the world to forge and fulfill strategic alliances.  Such alliances where we pledge our military, have been allowed by Congress, but not have been demonstrated to U.S. Public to have any nothing to do with defending our Constitution and the American people.  Such alliances are legally questionable. 
That government aid targets the wrong things, mostly.  That subsidies on things like corn, should end, and they should place them on fruits/vegetables that are actually healthy for the person.  Rather than subsidizing feed stock for beef etc.  If they did this it'd solve more problems and save tons in Food stamp money.
It's not that simple.  Oreos are obvious, but white bread is pretty bad for you too.  Jelly/fruit preserves might seem like a reasonable way to get a serving of fruit in, but many of the popular brands are mostly high fructose corn syrup with some fruit flavoring.  Then again, simply counting calories is a good starting point and anybody can do that.  Most sedentary people probably don't need more than 1800 calories a day.
Why? Why reduce your meat consumption when what you should be doing is obtaining your meat from a humane source. I'm sure a local farm that raises grass-fed, pastured animals would love the support.
I'm a Christian, Conservative, Carnivore (&lt;-- das good: I'm going to make an organization, "the CCC's" or maybe I'll spell them all with "K"'s..no...wait...) Anyways: this is absolutely absurd, on the occasion that I hear about stuff like this I seriously consider not eating meat, which is saying a lot: because I really fuckin' love meat. I don't get it: there's no need for that, I can think of a million ways to kill something with minimal pain and minimal cost. 
The fuck?  Do you really need meat 6 out of 7 days a week?  People's ideas of nutrition is completely out of control.
Who needs it?
It's a strange thing where people choose to draw the line at what's ok and what's animal abuse. I feed live rats to my boa on a regular basis, but the thought of breaking it's neck first makes me nauseous. I know that's a fucked up double standard, and maybe that just goes to show that there's not an easy way to deal with some things.
Why would anyone do that to bacon???
All I'm saying 60% (well more than most) voted to not have him in power.  Obviously you don't understand how "first past the post" voting works. Here's a simple example.  H = Harper Party, L = Liberal Pary, N = New Democrat Pary, G = Green Party.  H = 3 votes. L = 2 votes. N = 2 votes. G = 2 votes.  Left-wing parties got 6 votes. Right-wing party got 3 votes. Clearly most of the people did NOT want right-wing(H), but DID want left-wing.   H wins despite only a small minority "wanting him in power". This is NOT a run-off election. He never would have gotten power if it was.
Giving a teenage boy shit for being a nazi at that time is pretty stupid. He would still essentially be a child, highly influenced by what was popular at the time. Not only that but a child threatened with being ostracized or even killed for rejecting the status quo. If you were a 14 year old in nazi germany you would probably join hitler youth as well. If not because you believed in what it professed, than because if you didn't everyone you knew would look down on you and despise you.
[deleted]
&gt;are their lives valueless?  Depending on the circumstances I believe so, I think it's a waste of resources to care for something that is otherwise incapable of taking care of itself and is no more alive than a plant unless it's providing some sort of value. Babies, the mentally deficient, and advanced Alzheimer's patients are all valued by their families and it's fine as long as they pay for the costs of taking care of them or somebody willingly and consensually provides the cost for them. Are you familiar with Terri Schiavo?  &gt;Also, can you prove how that single property leads to being unable to compare human lives with animal lives?  I don't know, right's are a tricky thing. Are rights an inherent property or is it something people have made up? Will an animal respect your right to life? Should you respect theirs when they aren't conscious enough to respect yours?  &gt;And from what is that right derived?  Arbitrary human morals and mutual respect. If somebody tried to kill me I have no problem killing them first. The moment they neglect to respect my rights, they forfeit theirs. It's fair to me and many others.  &gt;No, it does not.  Yes, it does. Just like Vitamin D in milk is not the same Vitamin D you get from the sun, the nutrients you get from plants are not the same you get from meat or supplements. Their effectiveness differs and the way the body metabolizes them differs.  &gt;So anything that people want is something that needs to be produced? Anything desired is a need that must be satisfied?  When the want is great, yes. People want houses, they don't need them. But they want them enough that they need to be produced, otherwise there would be a lot of angry people.  &gt;I want a unicorn. Now a unicorn needs to be produced. Right? I think not.  A lot of people want a unicorn, and when bioengineering has advanced to the point where they can be produced, they will be. This is actually something being researched. Like artificial meat.  &gt;I have a vague idea of what you're trying to convey, but you're torturing the words "need" and "want" far beyond their standard and defined meanings.  Fine.
The problem of animal rights and how it relates to ethics is an open question with few consensus. I happen to subscribe to the notion that non-mammalian animals deserve nothing except for the concessions necessary for the continued human exploitation of the animals. For example, we need to preserve the natural habitat of various organisms such that they can provide us with genetic and behavioral information that we may use later. I do not believe individual animals have an inherent right to live. The only reason I put mammals aside is that I have seen ample evidence that suggests they have a consciousness that can appreciate what is happening around them. I feel bad when I hurt a gerbil because it knows it is being hurt, not because it can solve mazes. Computers can solve mazes, but I won't give a damn about its feelings if I accidentally break its motherboard (although I will cry for losing an expensive piece of electronics).  Yes, I believe the act referred to in the article is immoral since it incurs unnecessary suffering on mammals, but I still do not see how meat eating in itself is immoral. I believe that it is immoral to subject animals to undue suffering, that that only mammals can understand pain, but at the same time I believe they do not have the same rights as human beings, such as the right to be an ends in and of themselves, instead of being a means to an end. If the animal was bred to be consumed, then it is not immoral for it to be killed; the immorality is in the needless suffering it feels in the process.  As I said, there is no real consensus on this issue, so the fact that this is just my opinion matters little. The same can be said of the argument that killing animals is inherently wrong. As I see it, my opinion that mammals are morally different from other animals is no different from the idea that animals are different from plants.
This study has been heavily criticized for its methods.  From [here](http://www.cavemandoctor.com/2012/03/13/red-meat-consumption-and-mortality/):  "STRIKE #1: Lumping many food-types together, even though in practice they are very different.  STRIKE #2: Basing an entire study on food questionnaires and self-reporting, both recording methods fraught with error and bias.  STRIKE #3: Using a poor method of dietary recording and assessment to begin with, and adding insult to injury by further inadequate methods of data collection.  STRIKE #4: Finding out there may be several other factors in these groups that could lead to your findings and then using the magic wand of “controlling” for these variables to make them disappear."  I guess I leave it up to you as to whether or not you care to read the full article and whether or not you choose to believe it should you do so.
The beef and chicken industries are just as bad.  I'm glad you've given up pork, but if you realised what is going on in the beef and poultry industries perhaps you'd want to give up those too.  In 2007/8 the AMA was in the news again for using downer cows (cows that are unable to walk to the slaughter shed themselves, for various reasons, including being too ill) in their meat production lines.  The meat produced is sent to 'lower grade' consumers - those being suppliers for US School Cafetarias and Resthome/meals-on-wheels facilities.   The video depicted very clearly these cows being used for 'food production' and various forms of abuse to the animals.  Using prods (electric) on cattle that couldn't walk - not from being lazy, but due to injury/illness, kicking the cows, dragging them and various other abusive behaviours.   When this was found out, a huge recall was issued.  However a large percentage of the meat had already been distributed and consumed. The president of the AMA wrote a letter saying that nothing was wrong, and fully supported the use of downer cows in meat production.  Cattle 'farms' in the US are a fucking disgrace.    
Killing pigs with swords in Minecraft just got a lot less funny.
I started during the last five years (reduced it by about 50 percent, eating meat about 3 days a week) . I know that is not consequent, but sometimes it is just hard. Reducing it even further will be significantly harder
Cloud Atlas comes to mind.  People are evil.  Humans are the worst form of bacteria - Joe Rogan.  
bentham and mill? when did their books come out? if it was more than 20 years ago it becomes either history or fiction, but not relevant
idk, and i wouldnt just outright say all vegans do it. i can definitely where one could see the common reasons for being vegan/vegetarian as preachy.   to describe why im a vegetarian simply would be to say "i think its fucked up to eat something that was once a living sentient being." theres no real way to communicate that without using words that sort of project that i feel im on a higher moral ground than you.  i personally make a conscious effort to not bring up the fact im a vegetarian all the time. it usually only happens when im offered food (ill ask whats in it and if theres meat, ill explain im a vegetarian and that i appreciate the offer)
[deleted]
Page cannot be found. (Server is using IIS XD)
Interesting point. What would happen if someone tried to arrest the Pope?    Hmm... I suppose theoretically it would come down to having an arrest warrant for everywhere outside Vatican City, having all lines of communication into the state cut off, and closing the borders with Italy. There would probably be a lot of pressure to reverse that, though.
It's not fast.
Yeah. But at least Denmark is not a third world country. Which America is. By definition.
[deleted]
Fuck that. People like to tell themselves it's just involuntary spasms because it makes being a meat-eater easier to deal with. I'm sure plenty of them suffer horribly.
&gt;Despite what others think, we're not world police, and we shouldn't act that way.  I dont think US should intervene, but UNO should.
He already is, he has two kids and is a single dad.  I pay his rent and my parents are paying on his medical bills.  This country is bullshit, my brother worked from when he was 15 and now has nothing.    
Actually, plenty of biologists spend their entire lives trying to figure out how various species communicate and socialize. The fact that we don't have a complete understanding doesn't mean that you can truthfully claim that we haven't tried to understand it. We don't have anything like a complete understanding of human physiology, yet it is not for a lack of trying. It may be that a complete understanding of even our own species is not possible.  That said, all the available evidence we have points to only a few species being potentially sapient, mainly primates and dolphins. And we most certainly don't have any proof, just educated guesses.
Hahahahaha hahahahaha!
Skoda..? 
"When asked why they are happy, Danes usually give two reasons. First, they point out that most of their society is not created for the upper class. Just the opposite, nearly all things are catered to the middle class. Hence, there is a sense of contentment, which is key. There is little of the mentality of ‘keeping up with the Joneses’ or a 1% vs 99% debate."   well that sounds pretty dope. what other countries have consumer markets like this, all but USA?
Someone's going to have a field day with the fact that Canadians and Mexicans, on average, have longer erect penises than Americans.
To be fair, every country - including the African ones - has done that. Throughout history, everyone has been a bastard to everyone any time they've had the chance. It's not in any way unique to any country, people or time period.
I am an atheist who doesn't mind going to Catholic mass on occasion. The music, the bells, the insence,  the universal nature of it (a mass in one church is gonna follow the same basic format as every other). It is all a pleasant enough experience. 
If any thats because of highly train immigrants. Study show that if you learn subpart math and science skills by the age of 5 your ability is limited forever. This has never been so evident to me as the in the fact that I can sit in a CS class and all you see are asian immigrant, indian, immigrants, and white students. That means that 45% of our country as being complete shut out because of this making us completly reliant on indian and chinese student. So what will happen when the brain drain ends. When we can no longer just steal other countries smartest students.
/me adding : - projection  - senseless namecalling - trying to be clever and failing   well will you look at that, you went the extra mile to get that check-list full didn't you?  congratulations, you once again proved the stereotype for conservatives to be absolutely true.
Whether it is called a hurricane or cyclone is decided by the meteorological agency that has naming rights for the storm based on where it first developed. The meteorological agencies in the area are in Fiji, New Zealand, Australia and Indonesia all of which assign the name cyclone to the storms. [Tropical cyclone naming](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lists_of_tropical_cyclone_names#Southern_Pacific_Ocean_.28160.C2.B0E.C2.A0.E2.80.93_120.C2.B0W.29)   why the NOAA link mentions 160E as using hurricane I dont know
[deleted]
To me that's friendly. Sociable is just mixing, friendly is interest and/or concern.  But this is just a difference of opinion, I can see your point of view too.
I also read his username.
Unfortunately, having access to small arms, probably wouldn't have done much to stop the nazi rise to power, it may have made things like the night of the long knives a little harder, or turned the warsaw ghetto into more of a german graveyard, but the momentum was too much for a few bullets to stop.
&gt; is really just cloaked anti-semitism  Nope, straw man.  &gt;  not genuine concern for Palestinians.  Well this should be obvious. 
There is actually math to tell you exactly how many samples you need from a population to get a certain accuracy and confidence interval.  99% probability that the actual mean lies +/- 3% from the reported mean is pretty standard.  The 3% gets divided by 2, the 99% accuracy represents (1-.99) / 2 units of area under a normal distribution, and the sample size is a square root on top of a fraction...
All the more reason to do it yourself.
I feel like op is trying to blame mexicans for American's "unhappiness".
Forgive me but I don't quite understand what you are getting at. I don't see a distinction between atheism, how could one be a genuine atheist versus a pretend atheist? An atheist is a person who rejects gods or deities... unless you mean to suggest that some individuals are actually religious and just pretend to be atheist to look cool, which seems like a ridiculous assertion.
SU is seperate from unemployment aid. You actually get paid more for sitting on your ass than you do for actively studying, which is kinda backwards. Regardless, I believe the standard higher education SU for someone who isn't living his parents is about 5500, and then you can collect a couple hundred on top of that in boligsikring assuming you are renting an actual apartment.
Well in America almost 47 million people are living off the government so that's a big factor in this study at least as far as America is concerned...
Many Scandinavian countries are on the Baltic, just the other side, he is just using the term loosely.
It's like /r/pyongyang, but the opposite side of the spectrum. 
Happy drunks is more like it. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_alcohol_consumption
You having the news on is contributing to the problem, isn't it? I haven't watched network news regularly for years, since it turned into celebrity monitoring and sensationalist coverage of largely trivial or unimportant events. Unless there's an election or something going on I find most of them to be useless.  That said, if the broadcast news kept us going with day to day updates on conflict and/or genocide in Africa, we'd never hear about anything else. It's not as if this is somehow a new thing.  At least we can look on the bright side: 2012 had less conflict among the human species than ever before.
&gt;It won't keep you nice and cozy for years while you do nothing.  Depends on what you define as nice and cozy. It's definitely not nice, but it's not *that* horrible. The main problem is that people tend to get bored out of their fucking minds.
It is honestly amazing and fantastic the speed with which Europe has transitioned to peaceful ways. But you claim to not give a shit about the US; you can only say that because Europe faces no external threat currently and, as a whole, is friendly with the US. If one of those conditions was to be changed, I can promise you that you'd start caring about the US and our 11 carrier battle groups overnight...especially since Europe now has very little military of its own. 
Right. The savages just can't handle themselves right? We should thank Europe for raping the continent for half a millennia, then abandoning it. What people on earth *wouldnt* bounce right back into a golden age after such positive influence?
I self-identify as extremely environmentally conscious. So does practically every member of my peer group. Yet we all own cars that we drive constantly. We take multiple international trips a year. We space heat our homes in the winter and air condition them in the summer. We heat our water. As long as people can keep doing this, they will. Only necessity will change behaviors like these.
Malthus was wrong so far, but he'll be right eventually. Earth doesn't have infinite carrying capacity, does it? 
Seriously fuck the FSA long live assad
you are expected to not question or critically examine many doctrines we are taught in school, life, and society ...  the whole point is whether you agree or disagree with the stuff they teach their children ... its not up to you to tell them what to teach their kid
[deleted]
he was banned from his sole car!
For what it's worth, that judge isn't in a red state.  He's in California.
My head hurts.
The Wikipedia article on the Purif says "The program combines exercise, dietary supplements and long stays in a sauna (up to five hours a day for five weeks)."
its enraging.
[deleted]
It's getting Koreazy up in here. 
3 and 4 ALMOST sound like good advice. In certain situations anyway.
I'm fully aware "Person of the Year" isn't necessarily a positive award (it goes to the guy who had the biggest impact worldwide, positive or negative), but... Kim Jong-Un hasn't actually *done* that much. He's been turning out much saner than his father.
Well I was trying to figure out why 'mammals' were special for you.. but in that case - OK so only fowl, why not pork/beef, or deer? Purely because they are less convenient to kill?  Surely most meat you eat would be killed by someone else anyway, so I'm not sure why convenience is such a big deal?
**APPEARANCE: Kim Jong Deux**  ... Fuck, I just lol'd so hard at my desk.
Ahh let the down voting begin. Im starting to see a pattern that all comments being down voted are being done on purpose because unfortunately this site too is a troll central for higher ups to debunk the possibility that powers that be are lying about the causes ...,oh wow im being downvoted boo hoo ... ive been down voted since birth so fuck this fake karma shit 
The letter U is there for a reason.
Depends where it hits. Its consequences could be world destroying.
[deleted]
Wow, Rudy Giuliani beat Osama Bin Laden in 2001. I think that proves your point.  Are we really suggesting the guy who was mayor of New York in 2001 was more important than the mastermind of 9/11?   I remember Giuliani being brilliant at the time, but still, I think it's insane to suggest that Bin Laden had less of an impact on the world in 2001.
Empirical evidence, like in the linked article, suggests otherwise. The math is not really disputable that more guns = more violence. Mental illness rates have not been known to correlate at all with rates of gun violence; gun control laws, on the other hand, have.  http://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/wonkblog/wp/2012/12/14/nine-facts-about-guns-and-mass-shootings-in-the-united-states/
He could have just as easily killed the kids. It doesn't take a rocket scientist to figure out that stabbing someone in the throat or some other extremely vulnerable area will most likely kill them.
Reported for linking to that malware-infested hellhole.
i do read but thanks for the encouragement.
wtf, how did you end up with more downvotes than I?   this is bullshit, I demand satisfaction.  Upvoted.
Duh to build a fort!
I very much hope we've cured stupid by 3215.
Says who?  Jose Bloody Arguelles?  The Mayan people themselves are angry at the Mexican and Guatemalan governments for exploiting doomsday tourism at the expense of their factual cultural heritage which does not include scenarios of destruction at the changeover of their calendar.
I hope he is found safely. In my opinion he is the best foreign news journalist working today. 
Lol. The Queen generates a huuuuge amount of income from Tourism and she also pays income tax, which is probably a very hefty sum.
[deleted]
Well that's some fabricated bullshit. Quit trying to make the fucking Middle East sound like a haven for equal rights, because it is probably the worst place on earth.
They'd probably decide beforehand on a code, like they'll call the monarchy 'snail-fucking', and so they'll just debate the merits of prohibiting snail-fucking in front of the queen, and she'll realize she never wants to come back to another Cabinet meeting. win-win
Stop downvoting truth you fucking moron redditards 
What you're saying is not applicable for Syria, Iran, Afghanistan, Iraq, Pakistan, or Libya... which is exactly what he meant by "the most dangerous areas of the Middle East".  Just sayin'
[deleted]
Religion of Peace.
How sad, that's the equivalent of three American lives.
Submission. Religion of submission. Once you submit, you may get some peace.
You sound a little bit unhappy.
It was a Turkish news agency that reported it first.
Contrary to what you may think there are a lot of light skinned Arabs. That being said I think he's more at risk for being recognized as a television reporter. I sincerely hope he's okay. 
To be fair, there *were* Americans kicking and screaming about the housing bubble far in advance. We were just like "la la la I can't hear you over how awesome these rates are!"
Well, it says Hannah, I assumed that was her.
[deleted]
You reversed the title.
[Excellent](http://i.imgur.com/n5gEf.jpg)
[deleted]
While what Gawker reported might not have been a secret, Gawker gave the story a much greater audience. I'm willing to bet a majority who heard about Engel's disappearance did so from or as a result of Gawker's article. 
So, that's where the "youths" come in the article?
[Different link](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C0WEvPb47eA&amp;feature=youtu.be), since it looks like the one above has been removed (Source: [@Guardian_Mario](https://twitter.com/Guardian_Mario) via [@Brown_Moses](https://twitter.com/Brown_Moses))  EDIT: Source correction
Why the hell doesn't the U.K legalize abortion in Northern Ireland, so people from Ireland can easily travel there instead of having to go to England?
I have a Pakistani friend who keeps telling me that its western media that portrays this messed up picture in Pakistan. The thing is I can't even argue or show him how this country is on the verge of suicide. He has his mind set how Pakistan is still the greatest country and there is no corruption and taliban doesn't run that country.   What I don't get is why for God sakes why is US still turning a blind eye. This country has openly said that they will attack India. They proved that their secret service, ISI, trained the militants that attacked Mumbai and are continuing to train them for the next attack. Their politicians openly blame US for all their internal violence even though their paychecks come from US tax money. It is astounding how US and the media is dealing with Pakistan. They need serious help there. 
Ohh and thanks for One Direction.   
dammit, I am about to get an instagram-compatible device FINALLY and now all the fun is gone. What if they use me on one of those "Fat American" articles :'O  
No, the girl that got tackled was either one of the people that "anonymously" posted smack about the girls or a random girl. The girl that was allegedly responsible, got into police custody before the mob got to her and they drove her to safety / interrogation.  
&gt;I didn't stop you nor I said that you need the permission to do so.  You don't have the power to.    &gt;You are so strong!  Strong?  Doesn't make much sense.  Your concerns have been noted and dismissed.  Thanks for voicing them! 
Yeah, the government never legislated it
Red Nose Day should go to this hospital this year!
[deleted]
If you refuse accepting citizenship when the citizenship is given, there is no reason to revoke the citizenship.   Revoking citizenship means taking it away. If I gave you a gift but you refused it, I do not need to take the gift away from you.
Israel is not breaking it because Israel is not transferring its population into occupied territory. Individuals are moving from Israel into the west bank, they are not being transferred there by the state.  I mentioned the Nazis to show that this law has nothing to do with Israel.
&gt;even at the expense of Israeli security  Nope. That will never happen on promises of peace but only in response to actualities of peace. Sacrificing security as a step toward peace is a complete no-go and an absurd requirement when Hamas is sitting at the table.
Yeah, ok, i could see how that could start a riot.
Partially, yes, but it's certainly not unique to religion. Choosing the exact point "life" begins is inherently a non-scientific value judgement. Each person's decision may be *influenced* by their religion, but each decision is essentially arbitrary.
&gt; Democracies are capable though of utilizing the democracy to give away that freedom.  Yes, but if they do, they are no longer democracies.  &gt; Democracies can be just as tyrannical as any dictatorship.  No, they cant. In a dictatorship a minority rules over the majority, in a democracy the majority rules over the minority. It can be tyrannical and the minority might suffer, but not the majority.
Where'd you get that statistic, the U.S. Bureau of I-tried-to-google-an-article-but-didn't-find-anything?
I do. In that page, all I could find were expenses relating to abortions performed, and statements to the effect that they had to be performed by licensed OB/GYNs. While licensing the practice is a form of "limitation", I doubt it is what most people would understand as your meaning if you say that "the Canada Health Act limits abortion". 
since 1948 the us has distributed just shy of $700 billion in military aid. Israel has received 17.7% of that. Vietnam is second at just over 10.7%.   That is $15417 per Israeli (est. pop 8 million).   How do you justify that level of spending? What has the US gotten in return? 
Someone's ass is sore :3 
Oh my goodness. The strict Catholics don't like gay marriage. Somebody call the government!  Seriously. The Vatican has always been like this.
You mean a way to make taxpayers pay for garbage.
&gt;...but telling those who do to just get over it...  Didn't say that.  Don't put words in my mouth.
Shit there are now 9.3 million jews in the US
Says the person who can't disagree with someone without insulting them.  I can see you are, as opposed to me, a paragon of intellect. 
not the photo I was expecting to see
Alliteration? Doesn't every Mandarin word start with "sh" or "zh/xh"?
I would say "Black and silver to reflect trends in modern kitchen appliances, where stainless steel dominates."  This way, kids can have an oven just like mommy and daddy's.
Name me one great female chef. Cat Cora doesn't count.
I enjoyed your comment, but are you sure it's not that girl toys=effeminate=gay=BAD? 
Not really, as homophobia and sexism are both bad. But it does seem to me an important distinction to understand. 
What makes you think America isn't a free market capitalist state? 
If you read the article, it was probably the case of one particular family who had a son engaged to one of the workers, the woman in question putting off the wedding to continue her medical work and the family in question deciding this was an insult to their "honor."  I mean, fucked up beyond all reason, yes, and fuck those guys, but this has shit-all to do with hating the West, you need to get over your Eurocentric bias for five seconds.
You got source on that? Because [this](http://www.studin.se/allt-du-vill-veta/att-studera-utomlands-vid-universitet-eller-college/) says different: &gt; Vilka förkunskaper krävs?   För att bli antagen till en utbildning vid ett college, universitet eller annan högskola utomlands krävs det att du har godkänt slutbetyg från gymnasiet eller motsvarande.  (Basically says you need to have finished "gymnasiet" or similar to apply for college abroad)
I was under the impression that all Christian churches were getting this exemption as the Quakers complained about the proposal because they want to be able to marry gay couples.
The UN is a joke.
 &gt;1400 years old book didn't meant to be a science book. It's a book the way of life.   Well, it's also a very shitty guide on how to live life.  This isn't 2000 or 1400 years ago, we aren't bronze-age barbarians anymore, and a rapidly increasing number of us are no longer foolish/gullible enough to believe the myths and legends of that ignorant, horrific era.
This would be the perfect test for every religion on planet earth. If this planet circling the Tau Ceti star has sentient beings and they have created completely different religions, then there's just an even more colossal chance that there is no God.  But if the same religion is found on both planets, now that's just too coincidental to be ignored.
It'd be feasible, but not practical without using your acceleration ability to reduce your total speed. Approaching a body at 0.2c isn't the best way to make first contact..
Do you suggest they just leave the camp to them then? No repercussions? Allow it to be used as a base for future attacks? Why did the FSA bring the fighting to refugee camps of all places?  In any case, for all we know ( and it's quiet likely) the refugees have evacuated the area's under attack. I've seen no verified reports of massive civilian casualties in the camp.  EDIT: In fact here is proof, as much as 70% of the camp has evacuated. http://english.al-akhbar.com/content/refugees-yarmouk-we-left-everything-behind
Well, I don't work for NASA so I'm absolutely not an authoritative source (and if I did, I probably couldn't give any details anyway), but you're right in that only a portion of their funding goes to space exploration.  They also use satellite data to research and study climate, geology, and a bunch of other stuff you can study with satellite data.  But military research?  Trust me, there are plenty of other agencies for that.
3 tits is better than 2
Where is Kim Jaegyu when you need him?
But if you really think about it, don't you think that guns are inherently exponentially more dangerous than those other types of weapons, because of the sheer amount of danger and the distance you can project it?
He did not delay, but actually heavily improved korea's economic position during his reign. Still he was a bad bad guy, tortures and executions werent uncommon
A lesson USA still preaches. If someone comes onto your property, you shoot to kill, because letting them live will cost you a lot more. Weird how society 'works' sometimes.
Hardliner.   She has absolutely no interest in peace talks and will strike back at NK without hesitation.   (It should be stated that this is my opinion and she is publicly stating the complete opposite - in my opinion due to election issues)
An amusing effort, despite the lack of capitalization at the beginning of the sentence.  Cyberchico reminds us of the popular stereotype that exists for Korean women in North America.  At the same time he makes a sly, underhanded remark about the apathy that most citizens in the western world will feel about her appointment.  Subtle, but effective.  Good job.  Score:  7/10
Can gov, just made move to privatize the sale of medical marijuana, they are trying to move away from any legalization.
I agree that Americans- at least college-taught ones- learn a lot about the terrible acts done in the name of anti-communism.  Some willingly ignore them though, or get stuck in classes that barely teach history at all (this is true of their knowledge of American history, not just Angolan).  Some get played up a lot more than others though, such as the overthrow of Mossadegh in Iran or the entirety of Vietnam.  Some stuff gets downplayed because it just seems part of a larger pattern, such as Angola or, to America and **the Mao-era China's** shame, the **Maoist, genocidal** Khmer Rouge regime.  Thanks for the Angola stuff by the way.  And on working anarchist regimes; I've never met a leftist who could even yield an example before, just reasons why they thought the US was a terrible country.
More like, it speaks to how the lines are drawn differently in different countries. Korea is starting to become a super-aged society due to a high life expectancy, and therefore social welfare is a very popular platform, and not considered as some kind of communist plot.
The Japanese should warn them once, then open fire on them with .50 caliber guns and sink their boat if they approach them with the threat or intent of ramming. Those stupid fucks need a hard-core reality check.
And are frothing at the mouth racists too. 
[deleted]
The state will not imprison or kill you in the US solely for being mentally ill.  My wife manages group homes for people with mental disabilities to live in.  Funding for these facilities is provided by the government.  They are well cared for and are able to live out their lives in peace.  Stop making things up.
I don't have a problem with it either.  It isn't ours, and we pay for the right to build dams.  Like when the Americans paid us to build dams for the Columbia river.  They operate as a quasi-state within a state.  The treaties are clear they have the right to self govern, but they are subject to many Canadian laws.  That self governance though means we can't just go walk in, no matter what high minded idealism might dictate.  Hong Kong was on a 99 year lease.  Everyone always knew exactly when it would revert back to Chinese ownership.
[IT'S = IT IS](http://eloquentscience.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/03/angry-flower-guide-to-its.gif)
Dear Grammar Nazis,  I, a fellow Grammar Nazi, sincerely ask you to please SHUT UP about its vs. it's. The first 50 comments that pointed out this mistake was more than sufficient. We get it. I hate the fact that I need to scroll to the very bottom to read actually substantive comments. There should only be this many comments about its vs. it's in a post that is supposed to be about it, or other common grammatical mistakes. Next time I see this much unnecessary and inane behavior in the comments section, I will down vote all of you so that the rest of us can actually read some interesting comments. For now, take this warning.  Also, please be kind to others. I understand that its vs. it's is something any anglophone should have learned very early on. However, I am against bombarding people about such silly matters when Reddit could be used for so many better purposes. I think part of the beauty of Reddit is that people from all walks of life can participate, i.e., pimps, hoes, politicians, plumbers, refugees, astronauts, heroin addicts, grandfathers, etc. (for evidence, look at all the characters on AMA or AskReddit). So, unless incorrect grammar or spelling in a post is hindering your comprehension, please refrain from being an asshole. (Asshole = the people who still correct these mistakes even after it is very evident that many other people have already done so.) I'm sure OP became aware of the mistake after the first 3 comments were posted. Thus OP is already embarrassed or OP has learned the difference. The rest is just unnecessary. Happy holidays !
[deleted]
That sounds like propaganda horseshit to me.   The media has a responsibility to report the news in an unbiased fashion.   The news was all about the student protests, so they refuse or are encouraged not to report? By who? The police? The RCMP?   What about the rights of the protesters to peaceful assembly? How is anyone else that supports their cause supposed to find out so they can attend?   That's total bullshit, the government is bordering on Orwellian control when they engage in that sort of media blackout.   The media outlets should be ashamed for allowing themselves to be pushed around by the government.    You know what one of the first things the Nazi's took control of was? Rhetorical question, you know the answer.  
I dont think Global Warming means that the entire world top to bottom will be baking hot.  Global Warmer would make a certain part of the world much hotter  and different areas much much colder because in a real global warming scenario the world would go to extreme weathers.
SID MEIER'S ALPHA CENTAURI IS GETTING REAL UP IN THIS SHIT
Global warming! Why you only fuck with America! Go somewhere it's needed!
I see that people have stopped paying attention to him--again.  He's got to do something to get that sweet, sweet attention.
I'm up-voting everyone who also agrees that this *must* be global warming.
I thought you meant wawa, as in the convenience store. That would be some serious dedication for a hoagie. 
Bro, it's reddit, calm down. 
[deleted]
it's because the a lot of people in the rest of the world laugh when bad things happen in the U.S.  &amp; I am not joking about this.
Upvote for fellow cyclist. What kind of tires do you use?
one example i can give about windchill is i can  start my cars  much much easier at say -40 windchill then -40 ambient  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fX-OrvbPEqw starting one of my cars last November when it was -30f ambient,  i had unintentionally  parked on my extension cord and was notable to plug it in that day , cold starts at these temps are pretty bad on engines 
http://www.google.com/url?sa=t&amp;source=web&amp;cd=2&amp;ved=0CC8QtwIwAQ&amp;url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.youtube.com%2Fwatch%3Fv%3DYkTHtWX7CCY&amp;ei=ZPfSUNeWH8SQqgGA54Ag&amp;usg=AFQjCNGlQBzhFLFC77T2TdVbrawCB3Rylw
Jeez and I thought the -25's we had last year in Europe were bad!
This isn't news, it's olds.  It's pretty funny though how the article is portraying this.  Really, is it fucking cold this winter in Siberia?  Heroically, in the midst of this, a Russian went and bought two cases of vodka.  To save the elephants, of course.
No, it isn't. I'm familiar with both systems, so don't act like you know what ''means nothing" to me. A reasonably intelligent person can learn both systems and quickly conclude metric makes far more logical sense.
Man, all that Obey clothing they're wearing.. don't they know that Obey has employees that are homosexual.
At first I was like; "wait but he still has paws.." then it hit me..  /facepalm
Yeah... it's definitely not about Islam.  As an Irishman, this seems eerily familiar.
I dunno. Maybe if they grew some dreads as well.
What the fuck is wrong with people?
I'm not sure why your comment has the tone it has, but maybe I'm misinterpreting.  If you disagree with me, fine.  &gt; You're still trying to force a binary decision on religious demographics where no such decision needs to exist.  &gt; If you're an Agnostic you can be very much open to the idea of religion being possible with zero certainty. The 2-word notation doesn't distinguish between magnitudes of certainty. You'd need a 3-word notation like agnostic-60%-atheist  Help me understand what a 'pure' agnostic thinks.  Is it exactly 50%?  I consider myself an agnostic atheist (if you don't like the term, I hope you at least understand what I mean by it).  I have found that I cannot approach the question of the existence of a god and come away exactly on the fence about it.  I cannot dismiss the possibility, either, because I cannot say with absolute certainty that there is no god.  Instead of this continued bickering over terminology and meaning, can you explain to me the mindset of a 'pure' agnostic?  I doubt our little debate is going to sway the common usage of the terms anyway.
Karma would be that your mom, girlfriend, sister or daughter gets raped, then comes forward to report it, and is then fined for a minor infraction
Aljazeera is actually one of the few places I somewhat trust for non-biased news. The idea of bombing civilian inhabited buildings, utilizing white phosphorus (which inflicted horrific wounds on men, woman and children) makes me believe what is reported is somewhat true.
Yeah buddy, I'll make sure someone reminds you not to loan money to strangers on the internet.
Happened to me reading the obituaries of those kids and teachers in Connecticut. 
&gt; leftist  &gt; leftists  Political hack detected. Comment ignored.
Lets do the thing we were doing to Justin Beiber for a while, every time someone mentions WBC we say "Who? Look at that awesome bird over there"
&gt;GAA (Gaelic Athletic Assoc.) or St. Vincent de Paul   Or in if you're in Cork, S.h.a.r.e. All the collectors are out in force over the period. I was out yesterday.
I'm studying to be a Clinical Psychologist and "people with mental illness" is the preferred term in the field.  You are perpetuating a stereotype that is holding back the progress of mental health care.    But I'm curious, what mental illness have you suffered from?  How did/are you getting treatment?
'Not regularly. Citation please. When used properly failure rates are very low'  The perfect use failure rate of condoms is 2%, the typical use rate is 15%. Even with person use for those people who never make a mistake., 2 out of every 100 women per year is not in any way a negligible amount. On average 15 of every 100 women using condoms gets pregnant every year.   'That's the risk you take' is a ridiculous view to take and is as I mentioned before basically saying don't have sex if you don't want to get pregnant mentality.   We're not talking about making it illegal, we're talking about a situation and country where it is illegal. It's a completely different thing. We need to decide whether to make it legal, not the opposite. 
Even though I got downvoted to hell for a similar comment earlier today... in light of this news article, why do people think pedobear is funny?
I don't necessarily agree with the last line, but your next step is pretty obvious. Carry around your own strategic maple syrup reserve in a hip flask for emergency pancake situations.
yup im not good at them. i know that. im a fucking mess.
&gt;*Putin puts his gun to the agent's head. The agent looks up at him, a tuxedo-clad figure, stern-faced and bathed in a slight glow of the sun's light behind him. The agent never signed on for this, and Putin can see that. He can see the fear in his eyes.* &gt; &gt;"Are you afraid, of the fate you see before you?" &gt; &gt;*The man cringes for a moment, as he slowly nods, a tear falling from his eye.* &gt; &gt;"What's to be afraid of? It's unavoidable."
no doubt can you recommend for any good online razor shops?
Your right, First Nation tribes never fought each other over land.   &gt; **Warfare was common among Inuit groups** with sufficient population density. Inuit, such as the Nunatamiut (Uummarmiut) who inhabited the Mackenzie River delta area, often engaged in common warfare. The Central Arctic Inuit lacked the population density to engage in warfare. In the 13th century, the Thule culture began arriving in Greenland from what is now Canada. Norse accounts are scant. Norse-made items from Inuit campsites in Greenland were obtained by either trade or plunder  God knows that no other native American tribes were war like.  They certainly would not of had horrible violent empires. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aztec  This "they invaded us" bull shit gets so old. During that time frame might did make right and Native Americans did not live in peace and harmony with one another, the conquered and enslaved.   The Europeans were just the strongest tribe, with most power and they took over. The Native American cultures should have been wiped out like the countless cultures before them. Only through the willingness and tolerance of European colonizers does some trace of their culture still exist.   Fucking cry and whine all you want but the world was violent and whoever had the biggest stick won. Native Americans should not get any special treatment for being so technologically backward they could not fight off invaders. 
I don't know about the Canadian cheese cartel, but US government policies artificially suppress the price of milk and dairy products, which could account for some of the price difference.  
lol, you'd have me sooner believe those desperate men shooting rockets at civilians from cover of civilians (children even?)   come on.  I'm not that naive.
You got lucky with the elf costume my friend.  It's usually purple spandex stretched to the breaking point. And quite possibly shit in the pants.
I studied abroad in Mexico in 2002. It's hard to imagine the Mexico I read about nowadays. It was so peaceful then.
Yeah, but his first name is mohammad, so I'm going to assume he's not impartial on the subject of jews.
Surfs Up Dudes.
No there's not, its pointless MUTILATION inspired by the retardation that is religion.  Just fucking die and stop wasting the precious oxygen of half decent people who need it you worthless sack of shit.
By not being a professional.
I get a lot of flak for not piercing my daughter's ears.  My husband and I decided that when she is 5, she will be given the choice.  It is part of a bigger lesson that we are trying to show her: That we respected her body, and she should respect her body as we did.  And she can decided if she wants ears pierced, not me.  I know it is only ear piercing, but I want her to grow up not putting sexual pictures on the internet.  It is just a little lesson wrapped up in a bigger one. If we had a boy, we wouldn't circumcise him either.   EDIT: Clarification. 
It doesn't make people upset that female circumcision can be traced back to discrimination and sexism towards women.  Want to know why?  Because where it is practiced the origins are almost certainly different.  In the Victorian era in the USA and Britain some female circumcisions were due to sexism against women but both of those countries have banned the practice.  Furthermore there are 4 different types of female circumcision, some of which are worse than Male Genital Mutilation and some which are not as bad.  If we are going to be effective at fighting BOTH of these grotesque human rights violations we must be accurate in our information.
It would be more sanitary to remove fingernails, too.
Because if they banned it, it would make all the Jews, Muslims, and cut men Americans feel super uncomfortable.  So we have to be sensitive to the cut men by letting them cut their sons, too.  :P
Why? And it doesn't work. You need to keep it safe and accessible.   There is no reason that a child at a reasonable age should not have access to a clean shop and a trained professional to provide them with a safe minor piercing with their parents informed consent. 
&gt;He doesn't really make an argument other than "But look! It's bad!"  Except saying that it's pointless, can cause damage to the child when they grow up as a man etc.   Arguing against reasons to get a circumcision seems like a good way to do it, since the onus should be on the people defending circumcision.
Yes, but first this, as it has worse consequences. In principle they may be the same thing (removing healthy body parts from kids' bodies), but in practice, female genital mutilation is worse.
[deleted]
Where did I say I was anti-gun?  You're talking about teaching a "lesson" to those who favor gun control.  Do you even read what you type?  That sounds creepy as fuck, dude.  Calm yo tits.
[deleted]
IIRC, some time ago, when WTO made international trade agreements about patents, 3rd world countries wanted shorter patents for drugs. US companies who developed them were against, so all patents must have same duration, no matter which fields they are about.   &gt;[Key Provisions of TRIPS](http://www.who.int/medicines/areas/policy/wto_trips/en/index.html) &gt; &gt;Patent protection &gt; &gt;Patent protection The TRIPS Agreement requires WTO Members to provide protection for a minimum term of 20 years from the filing date of a patent application for any invention including for a pharmaceutical product or process. Prior to the TRIPS Agreement, patent duration was significantly shorter in many countries. For example, both developed and developing countries provided for patent terms ranging from 15 to 17 years, whilst in certain developing countries, patents were granted for shorter terms of 5 to 7 years. The TRIPS Agreement also requires countries to provide patent protection for both processes and products, in all fields of technology. 
Why haven't healthier foodchains opened up if everyone *wants* to eat healthy, but can't *find* it.  I thought it was a case of supply &amp; demand. Apparently not.
we disagree entirely, but it doesn't really matter. as long as you agree no child should have their body permanently altered without their consent, we're good.
I find in general, it's that type of person who is a coward and hides behind a screen. The same old story  like you said. Generally it's those type of people who don't contribute much to society. If approached face to face, they'd have a different tune. It's kind of sad in a way. I can't imagine actually living like a coward in life like that.
You don't have to feel damaged.  I'm glad you are okay with yourself, really, no sarcasm.  You have been modified in an unnatural way, and I believe you should have the choice what happens to your body.  I'm fine with circumcision if it is something a consenting boy or adult chooses.  Cutting off parts of babies' penises because parents don't want to clean them is not okay.
While i don't like blaming the government, there regulations make it hard for small grass fed cattle ranchers to sell their own meat which makes the prices of grass fed cattle really high.
Your right, if more PEOPLE took responsibility for their weight we wouldn't have this problem, instead they blame outside factors.
[deleted]
Yeah exactly. It's just horrible. I see articles like this and I just get SO frustrated. If I could just send all these people who are going "Oh my god we need to help them, how is the government letting this happen" lalala to a reserve for one day to see what it's really like... I'd pay big bucks to see their faces. 
Well said my friend. Thank you.
Wonder if they're US or Soviet made? Pretty sure US and Russia are the only douchebags left that still make cluster munitions.
As an Athiest in Canada I say, "Fuck you Egypt and your fake God(s)!"
11 downvotes with zero replies justifying any of them gives you a great glimpse into what has happened to this subreddit...    Censorship at its finest.
The same Israel dropped over Lebanon in 2006?
I'm not saying it was aliens, but aliens.
 &gt;Female genital mutilation isn't bad because "it causes a large amount of pain and health problems".  It's inhuman because it takes away a woman's ability to ever fully experience sexual pleasure, one of the fundamental joys of the human experience.   I would consider that a health problem. 
Yeah, the last residential school closed in 96. It is the previous 2-3 generations before that experienced the worst of the problems 
The idea that Capitalism is some sort of Darwinist survival of the fittest economic struggle is a myth invented to further the notion that existing entities are the best possible entities. 
When I do research stuff, I go straight for scholarly journals. Even then I like to go through the methods as even peer reviewed research can be BS. 
I'm pretty sure he keeps a bird cage under that hat.
Fair enough. They can give up Israeli citizenship then and hand in their military weapons 
[deleted]
Is a 380-bed acute care and general medical/surgical hospital with a complete range of services, including Women's and Children's services, Home Care, Hospice and Palliative Care, a nationally accredited Center for Cancer, a full-service Heart and Vascular Institute and a multi-specialty Medical Group.  http://www.saintmarysreno.org
If you don't stop using cluster bombs, we will be very, very angry with you, and we will send you a letter telling you how angry we are.  The UN really needs to remove the Security Council veto power.
Thanks for the laugh.  Chinese people are capable of throwing out incompetent and evil rulers just fine. 
86% according to the article.
[deleted]
useful idiot, probably because you didn't look:  http://www.reuters.com/article/2012/12/21/uk-syria-crisis-airliner-idUSLNE8BK02F20121221
Of course not! They are either the Muslim brown types or Catholic brown ones either way not Christian or at least that is how I was taught
Acid costs more than fire, economics transcends culture.
7000 years ago was **neolithic** in middle europe. Earliest neolithic cultures starting about 5500BC here. About 10000 BC in the near east.  &gt; Early stone age   or paleolithic is just wrong in this case.
The bravery is boiling over!
Oh, you seemed to be a disgruntled old man who is loosing a few marbles...  &gt;Stalker and desperate for ammunition  YES! totally saw through me. I bow to your wit! Or, you know, I could have been interested in your "It's so obvious that a republican system is superior to a democratic one" comment and wanted to see whether there is a learned person making that claim or an edgy hick hipster. Having seen what you post I just wasn't interested in a conversation of first year college quality.  &gt;one flaw  If it was supposed to point out an analogy, it was horribly worded.
[deleted]
Completely arbitrary since that border is an armistice line.
&gt;Why do you think it's OK to cross a buffer zone at a hostile border?  Gaza has scarce resources. Farming is a food source. Gazans are hungry because Israel calculates their intake of calories. The border as Israel calls it is near their farms. 
No, this is not my paranoia list. I just scanned the thread and chose random names. 
&gt;  She was 8 or 9 when he married her iirc.  Incorrect. She was 6 when they married and 9 when they consumated. He may have had non-penetrative sex with her before (at least according to some Muslim interpretations).
Man, the ignorance is strong with jcasek.
Racist.
or when i would kind of like to have nerve endings on the most sensitive spot of my body.
And after giving your rant about why Islam is evil, you still expect us to believe you are a Muslim?  Don't make me laugh. Next you'll be pretending to be Santa Claus and saying how evil Christmas is.
The correct reply to my post would be: The russians are all mad religious now too I'm sorry to say.
Anatomical studies show that there are certain types of nerve endings in a certain density throughout the foreskin. Your question is like asking how do you *know* you would enjoy taste more if you hadn't had your tongue cut out?
Well stated and cited.
There's a difference, but that is not keratin, which is an actual thing with a real definition.  Is the skin more dry? Absolutely. Is that keratin? No. Does this dry skin mean that there is scientific consensus that there is less sensation? Absolutely not.
Also foreign doctors tend to disagree with the american urological association 
It looks aesthetic as fuck.  My mom had me circumsized as a child for nonreligious reasons.
[deleted]
Ok, so then why do we use oil and fight wars and basically do everything we do in our day to day lives? All of it causes damage on some level. We do it because of survival. There is a reason human history is full of these kinds of painful rituals, it makes you stronger. It's just that in "civilized society" we prefer mental stress because our world is mostly mental. In these African tribes where this is done no one is working in Microsoft Office all day. They are raising livestock, farming, or hunting, competing within their own tribe and with others at games and ceremonies, and other intense physical activities. We have painful mental rituals that we reward people for completing, it's the same thing without the physical aspect but it doesn't mean its any less damaging to us.
If there were actual evidence, maybe.  You mean like the parents who force their children to do things like exercise?
You can - it's some black girls with a casual song about smelling your dick to check if you have cheated. O_o
... except that this is a thread about female genital mutilation.
How was it a terrible analogy? I never compared it to anything. All I said was that having your tonsils removed follows the definition of mutilation. Leave it to reddit to get crazy about that.
[deleted]
I am an American.  We have had many of the things that you speak of in our schools as well, but they are slowly being attacked.  We still have a Christmas program at the school I teach at, but there's no way that a Nativity play would fly.  And if someone sued to stop the Christmas program, I believe they'd win.  It may not have come to Britain (or to your part of Britain) yet, and I hope it doesn't. But much of it is very real here.
Reminds me of the Saw movies. 
My parents are from Guyana, I'm glad to see it mentioned in the news for something besides the Jonestown massacre.
Muslims Christians same same 
So you have no problem with targeting of civilians if both sides do so?
If you think antisemitism doesn't play into it you're deluded.
So you were circumcised against your will? I thought that you were one of the uncircumcised guys on here.
&gt;first-world democratic nation  Only if you're Jewish. If you're Palestinian, you live in a "Jewish state," either as a 2nd class citizen, or under brutal military occupation, in which you can be exterminated at any time, with no consequences, by the Zionist occupation forces.  &gt;with full human rights  Only if you're Jewish. If you're Palestinian, you live in a "Jewish state," either as a 2nd class citizen, or under brutal military occupation, in which you can be exterminated at any time, with no consequences, by the Zionist occupation forces.  &gt;a stable, growing economy  Which would collapse if the billions in US funding, extracted by Israel's 5th column, were to be cut off.  &gt;Israel is doing just fine  Not really. 
[deleted]
[The difference](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/15a3nv/70_percent_of_germans_oppose_new_law_legalizing/c7krrkq?context=3)
We also have prosthesis these days, so let's see...
Here is the relevant passage from [Baba Kamma 113a](http://www.come-and-hear.com/babakamma/babakamma_113.html).  &gt; Still others read these statements with reference to the following: To [escape] murderers or robbers or customs-collectors one may confirm by a vow a statement that [e.g.] the grain is terumah  or belongs to the Royal Court, though it was not terumah and though it did not belong to the Royal Court. But [why should] to customs-collectors [not] apply the statement made by Samuel that the law of the State has the force of law? R. Hanina b. Kahana said that a customs-collector who is bound by no limit [is surely not acting lawfully]. At the school of R. Jannai it was stated that we were dealing here with a customs-collector who acted on his own authority. But R. Ashi said: We suppose the customs-collector  here to be a heathen publican  as it was taught: 'Where a suit arises between an Israelite and a heathen, if you can justify the former according to the laws of Israel, justify him and say: 'This is our law'; so also if you can justify him by the laws of the heathens justify him and say [to the other party:] 'This is your law'; but if this can not be done, we use subterfuges to circumvent him.  This is the view of R. Ishmael, but R. Akiba said that we should not attempt to circumvent him on account of the sanctification of the Name. Now according to R. Akiba the whole reason [appears to be,] because of the sanctification of the Name, but were there no infringement of the sanctification of the Name, we could circumvent him! Is then the robbery of a heathen permissible?  Has it not been taught that R. Simeon stated that the following matter was expounded by R. Akiba when he arrived from Zifirin:  'Whence can we learn that the robbery of a heathen is forbidden? From the significant words: After that he is sold he may be redeemed again...  The summary is that Rabbi Ishmael says that it's okay to use deception against a non-Jewish state official to defend a Jew, but Rabbi Akiba says no, you may not, because to do so is a desecration of God's name because the law of the state is to be followed as the law of God except when the former contradicts the latter. The use of deception to defend a Jew from a non-Jewish state official is then compared to the robbery of a non-Jew, which is determined to be forbidden in the ensuing discussion in Baba Kamma 113b.  **Tl;dr**: Nope, you're wrong, the Talmud says exactly the opposite of what you're saying.
Okay? There are plenty of people in Israel who dislike Netanyahu too. That doesn't change the fact that both of them are generally popular (or at least electable) for the same reasons.
Violently forcing people to pay for something they are morally opposed to.
Butt if they are not exempt they will have more say in things. If they have to pay taxes they will be able to argue for influence as just like citizens and businesses they have to pay taxes and should have input in to how those taxes are spent.
Voted No. He's part of a "Born-Again Christian" group, so he voted against it.
I'm too busy sulking about the fact that I didn't get my gift, or more importantly, that my giftee didn't confirm receiving theirs :(
Some literally can't, she was telling me of one guy that had 4 inches of foreskin hanging past where his tip ended. I'm sure with smegma build up that's pretty gross.  She has to help wash old dudes junk on a daily basis, I'm sure that makes her biased. I was born when circumcision was still over 80% in the US, so I don't really blame them. I used to think it would have been nice to know the difference, but don't really care anymore.
By now?  No.  Uniformly no.  In fact, Mizrahi Jews are generally less likely to want to "go back" to Iraq or Morocco than Ashkenazi Jews are to want to "go back" to Germany or Poland.
[deleted]
The reason why it is a sin is because it's like saying, ''well done for believing in shirk''.  Shirk is the biggest sin anyone can commit, so we should go nowhere near it.   Here is a short video about 4 min, watch it if you have the time, Salam. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wu64lhYQaxw
I'm a Christian (not Catholic).... And sometimes I say I'm an atheist just to see the reactions.... I don't think saying that you're an atheist here does anything anymore... All the people I know are with religions but I don't think they are "that religious".
[deleted]
&gt;The state should not meddle with the church.  And the church should not meddle with the state.
I know what he did for the USSR, there may be some valid reasons why he is liked but it is foolish to think that someone could not have done it without murdering 8 to 61 million people, or without "collectivization" which was a main cause for a famine that killed 3-8.5 million people.  (edit not directed a zephyy) You downvote me but don't disprove a single thing in my post, typical fucking redditors. You know nothing of history and you're an idiot if you think Stalin wasn't a murderous paranoid sack of shit.
The EEA was probably the best thing to come out of the EU issue, I'll never deny that. My only problem with the EU, being a brit, is the fact we were never given the choice to let them have these powers over us. We voted to join the EEA, but nothing more. Don't get me wrong, If we had a referendum tomorrow and the country voted to fully integrate into the EU I wouldn't have a problem at all and would gladly follow en suite. It's not the policies, the laws or the EUCHR I have a problem with. It's the fact we didn't vote for this yet we're still being forced to follow their rules. I'll always see the EU as a foreign power interfering in our politics untill we, the people, are given the choice to, and vote to be a full member of the EU.
I assume this is the same as when Christian's say, "Oh God..." or "Oh my God."
Jesus Christ. And still, the entire world is giving Israel a hard time for treating palestinians bad...
It's been proven that when a people are under duress they over populate.
I don't know why I failed to convince you.  I gave such a compelling argument. help me understand.
What's your solution?  Do you think it's ok to convict people based on one person's testimony versus another?  The fact is it's a tricky situation if there's no corroborating evidence.  Are you saying we should make an exception to "innocent until *proven* guilty" for rape?  I'm not trying to antagonize here, just wondering how you think it should be handled.
I didn't suppress debate. I invited you to come debate in this cause you believe in so much in front of heaps of people. The last picture you posted applies to you. Thanks for the trollololols, but we're done here.
"shit or get off the can" John Bull
India worships the feminine when its not raping it.
Saying the British liberated Palestine is a bit of a stretch. They liberated it in the sense that they provided Arabs with the means and logistics to rise up against the Turks -- it's akin to what the Gulf States and some Western countries are doing for the Syrian rebels today.  The Arabs won their own liberation with help from the West -- the agreements that were drawn up after were unfortunately unfavourable to those Arabs that fought for their independence.
I'm a fan of decentralized systems because they're more accountable and more-resilient than territorial monopolists (governments).  So I think an ideal scenario is one where people issue their own currencies privately (like Bitcoin or Ripple), and other people can choose whether or not to use them.  Infrastructure and other things people want to share can be financed by online fundraisers like Kickstarter.  But until we get to that point, we could just make-do with more localized democracy like you get with Denmark, Switzerland, and Liechtenstein.  In the latter's case, there's actually a strong incentive for the prince to keep his country's people happy.  Here's a great interview with him:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_embedded&amp;v=8AXBX3e1T64  Generally speaking:  local government is better than massive/distant government.  Democracy works alright when it's very local and people have the ability to move easily.  Decentralized systems allow for greater accountability.  The US, China, India, and the Eurozone don't allow for enough accountability.  And they force their citizens to use specific currencies while manipulating interest rates and crowding out the bond markets.
Dikshit is about as terrible as a name can get.
I used to go to Church ages ago.  A priest would never bring up the subject: 'wishing a Muslim "Happy El Eid" is a sin'.  If I were visiting an Islamic country, I would say "Happy El Eid" if someone initiated it, or if someone was being friendly.  It's called being human, and this Imam is trying to drive a wedge between his constituents and society.  Probably successful to a degree.(this is the problem)
Dude India is not an Arab country, what does the Muslim brotherhood in Egypt have to do with any of this?
&gt;Reddit, why don't you just admit you only are willing to hear what you want to hear?  Why would they do that, it's easier to just press the blue button and smile in smug self reassurance.
&lt;sigh&gt; ignoring my source material, my links, what I mean, and even my actual written words; bringing no references of your own; re-iterating claims shown to be inaccurate and even false.  You are truly a master [de]bater, worthy of the cause you champion, and have won the internet. Congratulations and good night.
Does the Assad family has a history of slaughtering their own people for no apparent reason to no concieveable end?
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is a petition, not a news article, if that makes a difference. 
Well, no matter what happens, Assad is already at the endgame - he simply cannot win anymore.    The question right now is that *which one* of the rebel groups comes on top as a winner, and that will define the geopolitical ties Syria will have in the future. I really hope that Syrias future leadership will include the original freedom fighters that rebelled against Assad and for a democratic goverment. That would be the best scenario IMHO, althought it seems very unlikely at this point, and would probably lead to a Finlandization anyway, but that would still be the least of their worries. No matter what happens, I hope the crisis ends soon and the civilians can get on with rebuilding their lives.
Made in Los Angeles fashion District by JOMSY .  www.jomsy.com
Shut the fuck up, Americunt.
Pol Pot was a totalitarian communist, so were Mao and Stalin.    Hitler was a Christian. The first thing he did when he came into power was make a pact with the Vatican. Nazi belt buckles said "God on our side" in German. In his autobiography, Hitler said he was doing gods work by killing the Jews.  Learn your history and political ideologies.  Thinking Stalin was a fascist is embarrassingly wrong.
I know right. I have read some articles and what not about life in Germany during world war II and, having such tight control of the media, there was actually a large portion of the population totally unaware that the german war machine had collapsed.  People literally believed they where winning the war up until Allied bombers flew over their houses. 
As the Muslims try to get ride of the Jews, the Christians are next, as well as the B'hai and others. Muslim domination of the world is the goal, beware you will be laying down a prayer mat and bowing to the east and praying to the cult religion of Islam.
This is silly, Santa 'comes' to countries on different dates. For example, people in Germany will exchange gifts today (24th) while in Spain and many other Hispanic countries they don't exchange gifts until January 6th. 
&gt;All what I want for Christmas is an Iron Man suite so I can fix the whole situation over there.  Which is what everyone else with an AK is thinking too. Of course your idea of fixing is another ideas of hell and vice versa. Hence killing, so much killing. What Syria needs right now aren't super heroes, it's people willing to live and let live.  That will come, just as it came to Europe. But you might not like the fact that between 10%-40% of people must be killed every other generation for the rest to figure this out.
I believe the science and medical benefits I've read regarding the issue. I don't believe the facts against it. most of the arguments against it seem fueled by personal feelings rather than concrete evidence. I'm cut and I've never experienced any negative repercussions. I can't speak on religious rights since that's not why I do it, but I don't feel like this is a procedure that permanently scars. I just hope you never get to legislate my right away since you provide nothing but conjecture to back up your position.
Thanks, I usually don't watch too much TV, but I've been reading Al-Jazeera some since the Egyptian election last year, and I've always been a fan of NPR.  And trust me, I know to take most information on reddit with a grain of salt =p
Everyone gets arrested!
It appears that this was in response to aid that was delivered to a Syrian neighborhood.  They didnt have the ingredients to make bread for weeks.  Once the aid arrived, hundreds of people stood in line to get bread.  The bakery was then bombed by a Syrian warplane. 
Christian and Jewish scriptures have some utterly ridiculous shit in them too. The difference is that people who take them literally (eg WBC) aren't part of an organised political movement which plagues upon peoples continued repression at the hands of their own and foreign governments both today and during history. Maybe if the west didn't completely discredit Arafat's Arab secularism by sabotaging it at every turn things wouldn't have turned out like this. But now they have and its hardly the fault of the religion itself which has many 100s of millions of practitioners who somehow don't all do the same shit we hear on the news day in day out. Don't blame a religion for its subscriber's stupidity because for every 1 moronic fundamentalist you find you'll find 10 other well-adjusted Muslims. just like you would with any other religion really. So either argue against the abrahamic religions or don't argue at all really. 
Merry Christmas sluts!!!
All jokes can be tolerated, it's the skill of the teller to make it worth the risk of offense. 
[deleted]
It's just the beginning. Eventually it will be burquas(sp) for all women.
I don't think stealing is the same as rape. 
Look at your first and third points again.  Why is it "barbaric" to punish people by killing them, but not by *torturing* them?
&gt;Statistically it's obvious that attractive young women who dress provocatively are FAR more likely to be raped than unattractive, ugly or old women.  Could you provide these statistics? My understanding is that rapists choose their victims based mostly on their perceived vulnerability. They want a victim who is more likely to comply with the attacker's demands, and less likely to fight back, flee or call for help. A provocatively dressed woman is displaying confidence and so will be less likely to be targeted.
&gt;In Swaziland?  no Switzerland
&gt;None of this has anything to do with me.  Sorry, bud, that's not how it works. You can't just opt out. And by saying, "Look at the evil west and their geopolitics", you are taking a definite stand.   &gt;Western powers back Muslim brotherhood revolutionaries who intentionally take cover in populated civilian neighborhoods and compel the Assad regime to strike them.  That's a vote against the revolutionaries, and a vote for Assad. You're absolving him of blame by shifting it to the revolutionaries; that precisely what Assad's supporters around the world are doing. 
Sammmy! Where have you been? Happy holidays my friend!  &gt;What you conveniently fail to mention when you cite the doctrine is that the infrastructure that is being damaged doubles as enemy command centers and weapons caches. It's extremely unfortunate but I don't blame the IDF for it, more like Hamas (and before them, Hezbollah) who resort to storing their weapons by civilians and launching them from the building full of children, seeing as they're, to them, nothing beyond human shields whose death is a PR win.  You don't understand the doctrine do you Sammy? It is to target civilian structures with the intent of civilian suffering. There is nothing in there about military structures, it is to deliberately target civilian structures.  It's right there in the text:  &gt;The Dahiya doctrine is a military strategy put forth by the Israeli general Gadi Eizenkot that pertains to asymmetric warfare in an urban setting, in which the army **deliberately targets civilian infrastructure**, as a means of inducing **suffering for the civilian population**  Note the parts in bold, Sammy.  Let me point them out for you again:  &gt;**deliberately targets civilian infrastructure**  &gt;**suffering for the civilian population**  See now? Suffering for the civilian population is the goal of that doctrine, not a strike against militants.  The doctrine may be named after any number of things, that doesn't change that the goal of it is to target civilian structures with an intent to make the civilians suffer.  Sorry Sammy for proving you wrong again!  About the human shields, you did know that Israel uses human shields right? They've even gone to court to fight for the right to be able to use human shields. Disgusting! Is this the kind of stuff you support, Sammy?  &gt;The IDF admittedly used Palestinians as human shields, a practice subsequently banned by Israel's High Court of Justice.[25] The Israeli Defense Ministry appealed this decision.[26]  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Human_shield#Israel
*"You can actually ski in Swasiland."* won their tourist logo contest, narrowly beating out *"Swaziland: There's a 73% chance you won't get raped."*.
technically only a handful were virgins.
The best race won is what you are saying I think...
Not only should women be outraged but men also. Thoughts like those say that men have absolutely no self-control and *have to* rape.
"Men don't really have free will"-please justify this incredibly naive statement? because the rest of your response didn't quite cut it this is not an issue of "men", this is an issue of socio-ethnics in one region of the world. This is common throughout africa, the raping and killing. We need to figure out why, not just blame on mens need to procreate  "poor bestial men" poor bestial men built this civilization, from the computer you type on to the car you drive, these are all inventions of men... please don't pull that typical feminist bullshit (this is why some men don't respect women)
What are you talking about? This was in response to arming women and teaching them self defense, not the how they dress part.
Because the world isn't black and white and sometimes things don't have an obvious outcome or cause-to-effect relationship.  In the Western world, you wouldn't find groups of women who'd kill a man just because a girl told on him.  This event in India is just a over-dramatic reaction to all the oppression around. Indian people believe that women have to be protected. As a result of this, combined with recent anger and caution towards rapists, these women over-reacted.  Are they right? No. Should they be criminally charged? Yes.  But they didn't pull that act just as a random gender-neutral act of violence.  Your point would be valid if it was a random female gang going around beating up men or extremist feminists going crazy. Household female abuse towards men would be acceptable too.  But rural vigilante justice against a possible "rapist" is not a result of female violence tendencies as it is just an uneducated irrational lashing out given the current political problems and fears.
&gt;I concentrated on ancient cultures in college  So you're a barista now, right? 
Very true, but the rate we're hearing about it is astounding. 
You should make a point of putting in "most/allot" before "women".
You see we have a second source there for Im right
Did you just start a hopeful POV with "the U.N. passed a resolution-"?
And what is a female whale called?
Dude, I am gonna liberate the crap out of you.
I get you.  Thank you for telling me that.  It was just a quick thought and a dumb post.
You think women don't do the same thing when there are men around? I can think of several. If it matters, I'm female. I know any guy could claim he was female, but my posting history would confirm this (and not just the post before this one).  There is no goddamn such thing as a weaker sex; there are only weak people and strong people, and some people who need to fucking get over themselves.
your quote doesnt say that America started the uprising  &gt; the US has caused it? You give America way too much credit  This is what you actually said, which is wrong
many thanks for your honesty. if i say this nobody would believe me but crime is underreported in india by a really huge factor
[deleted]
solution: send all swazilanders to europe
A sicko doesn't want his daughter raped but he wants the chance to rape someone elses.
After reading your comment i didn't get what is your opinion on respecting elders. could you clarify? 
My ass is as white as the rest of me.  Let me guess, you will also assume that I am a male ye?  You dear, are truly what makes this world an ugly place.
&gt;   I still live with them to help out because I rather commute to a college when I have class than bail on my parents so soon after they've spent so much time and effort raising me.   Whilst parents are thinking "is he ever going to leave and get a place of his own?"   :-)
Pengobatan tradisional gondok ace maxs merupakan obat herbal yang terbuat dari kulit manggis dan ekstrak daun sirsak.
I had massive Deja Vu when I read this.  DIdnt this shit just happen over there?
I don't think they should be required to, but I appreciate when it's done. I think a priority for pro bono work is for those people who actually can't pay. But it's always up to the individual doctors. Someone might take her pro bono just because she was the victim of a gross human rights violation.
My mother and father were married for 25 year when my dad finally came out of the closet.  Having a gay parent is no different from any other parent.  Mine just happens to be a selfish person who is always the victim in life.  That shit got old real fast.  I see him about 2 times a year.
Everybody' gettin' rapped!
Actually, there's one like every month. 
I think they're reacting to the thread, which has several upvoted posts dismissing the importance of having a dad.
You presume to think that world leaders care about anything other than themselves and their money and bankster friends.
*Elective* eugenics. What is wrong with allowing stupid people to absolve themselves.while still reducing their burden on society? No more dead beat dad's with 5 illegitimate children. No more "it will make him love me" intentional teen pregnancies.  Where do we draw the line against these genetic leeches? 8 billion people? 12 billion? Population control is going to happen, when and how are the only question.
Agreed, but the quote from Wikipedia is unnecessarily vague and meaningless. You can't really compare revenue with amount in treasury, especially when both treasuries were probably different in function. That's like claiming Russia has a bigger economy because their revenue is, say, $500 million, while the US is trillions in debt.
&gt; Meanwhile China, gives them jobs, the African people can go to work  Chinese projects in Africa are known for importing their entire workforce from China. Their activities there do not necessarily lead to a rise in local employment.
Except everything you just said was inaccurate. Google the real news.
US News.  Removed. 
So it seems you are for vigilanteism 
Reddit disgusts me.
Your afraid to admit that your from pakistan man lol hahahahahahahahaha your ashamed of your background'eh hahahahahahahah your a funny kid
It's not like they're short on useless whining.
[deleted]
Gimme some of that old time liberation theology. 
It doesn't present any facts at all - it is an angry rant that claims there are lots of religious books which say Jesus existed - therefore he did - an absurd position to take.
Torrenting is legal, "torrenting" isn't. Piracy is also abstract, plus it's a nonsense buzzword anyway.
Correct, but the reason they pray to sante muerte is because they know what they do is a sin and they hope that Sante Muerte will protect their souls in death.  I'm sure many might think that killing a bishop of the faith might be such an affront to G-D that there is no chance of Sante Muerte's intercession on their behalf so they will think twice before carrying it out.
and thus no progress on any fronts.  atleast the palestinian vote did SOMETHING. contrary to this.
[deleted]
&gt; in any way say the Mufti organised death squads  I talked about waffen SS and provided linked in the abouve comment deal with exactly *He recruited Muslim volunteers for the German armed forces operating in he Balkans. Beginning in 1941, al-Husseini visited Bosnia, and convinced Muslim eaders that a Muslim S.S. division would be in the interest of Islam. In spite of hese and other propaganda efforts, "only half of the expected 20,000 to 25,000 uslims volunteered'.[175] The largest division was the 13th Handschar division,*  And in Handschar link you also had been provided few comments above -   *n April 1943, the Mufti of Jerusalem, Mohammad Amin al-Husayni, was invited by Berger to assist in organising and recruiting Muslims into the Waffen-SS and other units* &gt; or was even an anti-semite.   Where have I stated  he was anti-semite ? the linked qoute of *On 1 March 1944, while speaking on Radio Berlin, al-Husseini said: 'Arabs, rise as one man and fight for your sacred rights. Kill the Jews wherever you find them. This pleases God, history, and religion. This saves your honor. God is with you* is on the wiki page not me (linked above) 
I don't see there that an entire neighborhood was bulldozed, only individual houses without permits.
lol, I know what I am talking about and I know the Conservative party very well. They will stack the supreme court, just watch.
And in other news... We don't care! 
most people start with a map. if that's too complicated for you ask an adult.
there are a helluva lot more people in Syria than in the West Bank or Gaza.  Also what are you counting as killing?  Direct military action, or do deaths related to the blockade of humanitarian/building supplies count too?
You don't know what a historian is. 
It was evident that Israel was needed? What about the needs of the Palestinians?
[deleted]
Did you even read the list of Americans they've killed. Apparently not. I'll just pick the first 3 from the list   June 5, 1968: Presidential candidate Robert "Bobby" Kennedy was assassinated by Sirhan Sirhan, a Jordanian Arab-Palestinian. RFK was shot at point-blank range from behind by three shots from Sirhan's .22 caliber pistol ... two shots entered his back and a third shot entered directly behind RFK’s right ear.  June 17, 1969: Shirley Louise Anderson, a 25 year-old tourist from Rochester, New York, was killed when the PLO shelled the Israeli resort town of Kallia.  December 27, 1969: Leon Holtz, 48, a tourist from Brooklyn, New York, was killed when PLO terrorists fired shots at a tourist bus near Hebron.  They are fucking definition of terrorists. They attack innocent targets as a political message. I don't think you understand this either. Palestinians in Israel have the same rights as Israeli citizens. Israel's don't even settle in Gaza and yet they still attack Israel. The West Bank  is peaceful yet they are the ones that have the settlements being built in their country. Explain that to me. 
I love a good Israel bashing as much as the next guy, but a lot of the comments on this thread are getting ridiculous.  Canada has been one of Israels strongest supporters for years, even when their forces are operating under a UN banner, and there is absolutely no motive behind an intentional attack on Canadian forces on the part of the IDF.  Even though they have a reputation for initiating morally questionable engagements, they are not a crazed bunch of maniacs out to fulfill their bloodlust. According to an article posted a few days after the attack, one of the men killed had sent an email several days prior to the attach reporting that Hezbollah had been using the base as a shield to fire into Israel.  According to Maj. General MacKenzie "We've got Hezbollah fighters running around in our positions, taking our positions here and then using us for shields and then engaging the (Israeli Defence Forces)".  The IDF may have been reckless and mistaken, but it is stone cold retarded to argue that the IDF would intentionally kill friendly forces without provocation just because they felt like it.   Source: http://www2.canada.com/components/print.aspx?id=37278180-a261-421d-84a9-7f94d5fc6d50
Your wife is confused.
[deleted]
They completed the southern portion of this line, the [Wu-Guang line](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wuhan%E2%80%93Guangzhou_High-Speed_Railway), a while ago, and I rode it before they dropped the speed from 350kph to 300kph. It's quite awesome to be travelling that fast on land. It's very smooth and very fast.
Yes it would, and it does but it's not what that dude wanted by the looks of his user name.   Get it? 
Smart people don't want to be in government
No, not at all (that's my actual answer, as well as being included for the benefit of the aforementioned NDAA and Patriot Act reasons). I don't have any me vs. the world fantasy that an AR-15 would give me any advantage over a drone strike or anything like that. The sole benefit would be that IF the patterns of terrifying behavior continue to the point of illegality, repercussions of dissent* would be open rather than covert. It's pretty easy to cover up hundreds of "black bagging" operations as long as they are strategically feasible; if those operations don't work, however, any escalation of force would be almost immediately noticeable.   Keep in mind I'm not some looney who is 100% convinced that the American people is under attack, I just don't feel particularly comforted by our government's actions both here and abroad.  *Added as an edit.
No no no! According to Newt Gingrich we are going to colonize the moon in the near future and annex it as a state for USA. I don't want to deal with his bullshit when I get there. 
a few middle eastern countries and Best Korea? Russia isnt stupid enough to side with china these days. 
&gt;the son of Netanyahu was in a photo with a red hat and a Christmas tree  That's astonishing. The British Princes had to wear a Nazi uniform at a party to get in trouble. 
[deleted]
Polar bears MUST be free to hunt for their own food! Who would think of restricting their right to hunt?
my bad!
Yeah, well, nobody said trying to be a superpower would be easy and safe.
The article mentioned "Uncle Sam" Is this some kind of sick joke?!
Chinese military equipment is poorly made?
As someone who has access to wikipedia, I can confirm PWC is a firm
To my knowledge they haven't been tested, so we don't really know. You can't compare WWII Japan's military to today's JSDF. 
this prediction is idiotic.
I'm in the same boat as you. Congrats
You have never walked through the garage of a Big 4 firm. Sure, a Porsche or two, but 15 year old Civics and Corollas everywhere else. 
Netanyahu is a bastard and a thief i hope him and his IDF get REAL sanctions rather than petty US backed "resolutions". 
Well, that's the real trick with the world of finance and accounting. Using secrecy and obfuscation to prevent people from having any understanding of what's happening.  Hence the kleptocracy.
It wouldn't be quite accurate to portray this new constitution as a law based exclusively on religious grounds. Both this document and the Mubarak-era constitution were both technically derived from "Sharia law". Their fault isn't necessarily that they are too religiously tinged, it's that certain and specific universal rights were not enshrined in the constitution. Granted, specific Islamist clauses were added or strengthened but you shouldn't expect anything a la Khomeni's Iran or the Saudi system anytime soon.   The reason this constitution (or any constitution for that matter) would move Egypt towards stability (From Mori's perspective at least) is that the political impasse and dismantled institutions cannot govern effectively or enforce the law. What the constitution does is move the country in a direction where laws can be enforced and begin the process of setting up government bodies, institutions and laws that can deal with the public's grievances - as opposed to having them swarm the streets whenever change must be made. If the streets can be kept clear, security strengthened and political uncertainty checked, then the reasoning goes that businessmen and investors would return and expand in Egypt. The Islamist clauses of the constitution are more problematic for individual rights as opposed to property rights and the like.  The biggest problem though is that it's a pretty shoddy document in a lot of respects and it may lead Egypt to a protracted period of political instability since the document's drafting excluded a large swathe of Egyptian society (namely Liberals, Christians, secularists and the like)  
[deleted]
I have some issues with the source article for this poll.  Maybe someone can shed some light on the plausibility of this theory for me.  1.  The current land that is in use for the tending of livestock is by in large just land that the cattle feed on.  It requires little or no preparations by machines or much of anything.  If we are to change that land to bio fuel development we now have land that must be prepared for planting and crops that must be harvested.  The equipment that is required to do so creates tons of waste CO2. https://sustainability.water.ca.gov/documents/18/3407432/Carbon+emission+from+farm+operati.pdf Since Ethanol cannot be transported via pipe lines ( due to inevitable water contamination ruining the fuel), it MUST be driven by truck to the pumps.  These trucks are burning fossil fuels to make those deliveries.  2.  The article states that we are poorly managing current agricultural land  (78% of land used for agriculture) by not growing crops on it.  However in the statement before they mention that only 1/4 of the crops planted are grown, and only 7 or 8% of that ends up as food.  It seems as if this is a non-solution since they state that our current farming techniques are such an abysmal failure.  Instead of trying to improve that we should just grow more wasted crops and forego the meat that would have been eaten.  I was very skeptical of the estimates of 1/4 of crops being grown are wasted.  I did some research and found some very different estimates given by the NRDC ( Nation Resource Defense Council) and FAO ( Food and Agricultural Organization of The United Naitons).  Putting the highest estimates a t 40% losses of crops from FIELD TO FORK, including processing, shipping and storage ect. http://www.nrdc.org/food/files/wasted-food-IP.pdf http://www.fao.org/docrep/014/mb060e/mb060e00.pdf  It seems a bit naive on the part of the researchers to even conceive that if they did move the lands to farming rather than ranching that the ranchers would not simply find OTHER land to set up operations on .  After all the cattle industry alone was a $97 billion dollar operation in 2011. http://www.ers.usda.gov/topics/animal-products/cattle-beef/statistics-information.aspx  If you want to make a better fuel to help lower carbon emissions, then make a better fuel.  If you want to make more efficient crops and farming techniques do that.  But making non-sequitur arguments that eating less meat will lower world temperatures may make for good sound bites, it does not make for good science.  
How many of these "children" are 16-18? Arrested for what?
We are hiring!
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Negev#Climate  It does rain there in the winter months. Which makes sense because leaving someone outside in the rain during summer in such a climate would probably not seem like a bad thing.
Call me maybe?
Take that, Orphans!
You conform to American stereotypes more than any actual American I have ever met. You even seem to hate people whom you have never met for no reason other than where they happen to have been born.  You are full of ignorance and are generally a terrible human being.
So clever.
If memory serves, this is because of cases where the American parents would just send the kid back after a few weeks or doing other completely retarded shit.  edit; of course, that's probably only an excuse to do it. 
Well that signing just proves it right there. 
&gt;If it comes to a nuclear war the EU and USA alone have more firepower.         They still don't want to be attacked with nuclear weapons.         &gt;VS japan alone yes obviously.         That's what I meant.
Does it have to do with the 117 shot down with a SAM using low frequency radar?
Give those women weapons of self defense; mace, a knife, a gun.  Then watch the number of rapes and attempted rapes plummet.
Still not seeing anyone trying to gather sympathy for rapists. Can't you be against rapists and against vigilantism at the same time?
I was adopted as a newborn, from America, by two school teachers who aren't as white as I am.  My only disability was an overbite as a teen.  I don't understand how it's so difficult for some folks.  I imagine my parents must have been very lucky.  They also adopted me through Catholic Relief Services, which sounds a little easier than the state system.
Not to be that person, but there are thousands of orphans and foster kids here in America that need parents too, even if they aren't babies or white. Take care of your own kids, America.
[deleted]
No they don't, the only thing we actually got was a one time tax credit / tax break of $10.5k, but when you consider what we actually laid out, it was really NOTHING... LOL You would think that the state wouldn't have to pay for care anymore you would get something like a decent tax break to off set costs, nope...
This is the first wolf in the Netherlands, and it's winter. Wolfs grow up before the next winter.
It's know since quite a few years that fertility rates are [worldwide decreasing](http://www.ted.com/talks/hans_rosling_religions_and_babies.html) (here shown as regardless to people'sreligions) which is a good news. It doesn't mean the earth isn't overpopulated, though, as much of the ressources are depleting already with the few develloped countries, and the third world ones will soon want and be able to feast as we are.          Peoples of the next century may live in a world in which everyone is well nourished, a world with an engagement gold ring being a 1% luxury.
Now you're just setting up a straw man. The time and place is what dictates which solutions are right and wrong, and I believe that India's current state lends more credence to mob vigilantism even if it seems "wrong" in our own society. It is simply arrogant to believe we are in a place to judge third world societies in the way they handle criminals. It is a process that we all must go through as societies develop and progress in the modern world.  &gt;Don't turn off the rational part of your brain because this is an emotionally charged issue.  If we're going to have an interesting discussion about the moral relativism of criminal punishment, attempting to set yourself up as the "morally righteous, rational intellectual" just makes you seem arrogant, just fyi. ;)
I lost it a while back. Don't listen to whatever bullshit others feed you saying we've come a long way, and we're yet to get places. India is a fucked up nation, period.
[deleted]
as wrong as this sounds, this is so surprise to me. this stuff has been happening all the time, the only reason it's getting so popular on reddit is because of the gang rape on the bus where her intestines got ripped out. now it seems any sort of indian rape case is being displayed on reddit because of that.
its a change from murdering them
[deleted]
[deleted]
Why the hell didn't they vote?!  Abstaining is just as bad.
Well this isn't a system that will be abused for petty personal vendettas at all.
[deleted]
No, but we shouldn't forget, the Abrahamic faiths are violent, not just Islam. It's just we ignore the other two when they do shit like this.
That's not how the system works in Scandinavia. She is unlikely to be let out in society after she has done her time. 
They don't care. They are about to become America Jr.
It was also blackout on Western media back then in Romania, so I wouldn't be very surprised to hear from some redditor about some 1987 press echoes about this...
[deleted]
For those who don't know, this bill was a response to the US bill which imposed sanctions on the Russian government officials who were linked to the death of a Russian anti-corruption lawyer:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sergei_Magnitsky  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Magnitsky_bill   Putin is an immoral and disgusting person. Not only is he incredibly corrupt, but he also uses the welfare of innocent children as a political tool.
http://youtu.be/FNMMhy3rsSk  http://youtu.be/eraIcWWDgks  http://youtu.be/vZu2B0ug_cw  http://youtu.be/0OXRNaqOm_8  http://youtu.be/LQ-7raG7pgM      I wonder why isn't this heard all over Bahrain? 
Christian Scientists need to be next
mmm Belgian beer
As a Belgium, i can for once proudly say. Go Belgium!
The problem is Scientology requires you to pay to join. I would say it is more of a cult than a religion.
Doesn't matter...still jewish.
Yeah, never exactly expected justice in Russia.
I hate hearing about shit like this. I don't know what runs through peoples heads when committing this kind of act, but surely death is too good for these assholes. Some sort of living pain needs to be carried out.  Fuck.
because of the way they view women there perhaps.
Real men are those that treat women with the same amount of respect as they would a man. No more or less. We're all people.
What do we expect from a man, when our [women scientists](http://www.khaleejtimes.com/displayarticle.asp?xfile=data/international/2012/December/international_December1105.xml&amp;section=international&amp;col=) have this to say:  &gt; “Had the girl simply surrendered (and not resisted) when surrounded by six men, she would not have lost her intestine. Why was she out with her boyfriend at 10 pm?”
It used to be better. Now it's just a misogynistic craphole...
I did not read about this case except for headlines even though I live in India. Too depressing and stomach turning. My wife followed it though. She was saying "the most brutal" of the six rapists was a minor and he will probably be out of juvenile home in 5 months when he turns 18 since the longest sentence which can be given to a minor is 3 years in juvenile home and that too can't be given once he turns 18. I think there is a bigger issue here because our (Indian) legal system is thinking in terms of punishment for a crime and not about the general fitness of an individual to live in civilized society. If he is unsound mentally as his crimes indicate he should be treated that way and his age shouldn't matter. How stupid would be a legal system which would allow such people out in the public on a technicality.
Yes. How sad is it that he could not be with her in her final moment.
indians stink.. fuckin bo.. dirty ass niggers of asia.. yuck
Seems like a good argument in favor of allowing people to carry concealed guns.
Not recently I'm afraid. 
we interrupt your regularly-scheduled racist libertarian circlejerk for a public service announcement: this is a bad decision in the absence of reforms that will make jobs easier to get for immigrants. thanks, and now back to Stormfront With Acne
This may seem callous to some, but I am glad that she is dead. (braces for knee-jerk downvotes)  To have gone through the horror of what she has would be unimaginable. To try and make her a part of society again would have meant a lifetime of medical involvement and painful rehabilitation. Her death is a mercy for her and her loved ones. Hopefully, in death, she can inspire change.
It's women who claim rape when it was consensual that cause u problems.  80% claim rape but were consensual. I've had this happen twice. 
People downvote because they aren't intelligible enough to come up with a counter argument so, they just end up getting butt hurt and just end up downvoting the post.
&gt; Rape is a serious crime in the US and would often be reported and prosecuted.  [here you go](http://rainn.org/get-information/statistics/reporting-rates) and [here](http://www.911rape.org/facts-quotes/statistics).   I know emotions are running high and rape is undoubtedly the most heinous crime one can commit against another human being but generalizing and vilifying a whole country and riding some kind of moral high horse being in US (or any developed country) is not what we should stoop to.
I'm assuming that this happened in Chennai? I feel bad about the fact that so many of us here are dicks, that I want to help out in some way or the other. 
Mostly inflated by medicaid for everyone, but still only a few under overall 25%, and then only 2 under 20%.
'Most of the US press India receives is negative.' Source?  'Dragging some supposed alliance with Israel into it, and claiming that's why India gets no bad press, is not only wrong, but smacks of trolling. The vast majority of websites which claim this are deliberately anti-Semitic in nature, such as Stormfront.'  You are either utterly ignorant about this or lying.   According to an Israeli Foreign Ministry report, India is the most pro-Israel nation, ahead even of the United States. (Eichner, Itamar (3 April 2009). "From India with love". Yedioth Ahronot. Retrieved October 7, 2012.)  And to clarify, the press in the US is so embarrassingly pro zionist that no one with the slightest degree of sense disputes this. You can try and dispute reality all you like but trying to throw mud at people by associating them with the likes of Stormfront is a cowardly tactic.   
While I agree that Hitler should be considered a real person and somewhat humanized, I don't agree with the assertion that he may have been doing "God's work," nor do I agree that there should be a statue of him in apparant prayer. Like most Austrians, he was baptized a Catholic, but Hitler was never an active member of any religious group, and often spoke out against religion, Christianity in particular. The notion that he was doing something to appease any God is contradictory to this; if anything I'd suggest that Hitler was more concerned about the German people and Aryan race as a whole, and was working for their future, not to appease any deity.
I think the protests show that there is much to be proud of as well.
Neither would win because neither has the capacity to reach the other with a meaningful force and be capable of supplying it. However if each was given a ten year prepreation time then my money would be on Japan. 
Deserves attention? Absolutely, of course.  But shocking? I honestly can't say I'm shocked or even surprised when I read about it.  I would be shocked when it stops.
I'm interested: When did I ever say I hated men?
Sure. And while other dumbass religions have grown out of their stupid practices, this particular religion is hand crafted to resist innovation and reason.  Go practice your taqqiya and dawah somewhere else, preferably in a place devoid of innovations such as computers and the internet.   
The chronically homeless are generally either homeless by choice or have problems larger than a simple lack of access to housing. These problems can be addressed but they take a focused, wholistic approach and a lot of resources. That's not to say it's not a worthwhile effort, but it's not as simple as just saying "Hey, here's a roof!"
religion has very little to do with it? what about sunnis v alawites?  Qaddafi was a dictator overthrown by the U.S/NATO same with Saddam, same with Afghanistan.  Bin Laden is CIA, he's not real, and he wasn't killed in Pakistan. war is a business
yes I know, so clearly the sentiment that "it will stop when those neanderthals start caring" is wrong.
Rape is everywhere.  The difference is how governments react to it.  Clearly, we have something wrong when the police themselves are raping the rape victims.  That's just unacceptable.
[deleted]
Why...  Oh why does this sound so familiar?! I once had a professor for zoo physiology who was a bee physiologist. We've always called him the "beekeeper of the uni" and as a matter of fact he did keep bees, right outside his classroom. Once we had an exam in his classroom and there were so many bees buzzing they had to shut the lights and open a door so the bees could escape.   Also, he was constantly talking about bees in his lectures whilst he shouldn't have. Like...  Why the heck are we supposed to know how bees' intestines work.   Anyway,  he is a world renowned bee professor. His name is Prof. Dr. Fransiscus (Frans) Jacobs and it was at the university of Ghent. 
Yeah, London is London, to use an even bigger example, I remember seeing on reddit a few weeks ago that New York had its first day in a long while where no one got shot, stabbed, bludgeoned or otherwise physically assaulted (at least none were reported).     According to you, which is the 1st one ? There are many ways to classify "size", I'm just wondering which way you're using. The wikipedia article "Largest cities in Europe" ranks London at #3 behind Istanbul and Moscow.
I don't need an explanation, I was raised in a devoutly Muslim family and am very familiar with the history and these 'reasons'.  Falling back on the reassurance that 'we were great once in the past' does *nothing* to solve the problems of the Ummah.   And I have little patience for those who preach about Muslims losing their way, and the need to return to the so called 'fundamentals' of Islam as if that will solve all problems as well. Groups like the salafists cloak themselves in such rhetoric, yet I find them abhorrent. The Muslim Brotherhood also has strains of this thinking, yet their recent actions make plain to all they are just another round of oppressors.   And I've got news for you, leaving the problematic "no true Scotsmen" argument aside, those people you claim to not be Muslims are *absolutely* Muslims, simply by virtue of the fact that they claim to be. You should know that it is not for mortals to decide who is or is not a Muslim, as long as they take the shahadah, they are counted among you. They reflect on you and you should be embarrassed.  I repeat, pride in a golden past does nothing to solve today's ills, does not convince non-Muslims, and just makes the community look silly and in denial.  The so called return to the fundamentals of Islam is not working either (which is not surprising since the proof that Islam's golden age was directly due to hard line adherence is non-existent). You and your co-religionists need to adopt education, rationality, and compassion to mold *Islam to the modern world*, not the other way around. You need to do this stridently, vociferously, and aggressively against the people you want to call untrue Muslims. Otherwise antipathy towards Muslims will simply grow since so many buffoons within the Ummah give plenty of ammo to Islamophobes everyday, and the dubious concept of "Clash of Civilizations" will become much more concrete. 
Just going to drop this link here http://www.sacbee.com/2012/12/27/5079151/california-gun-sales-increase.html  my link button doesnt seem to be working properly.
China: "Can we build a train track to Europe through Russia?"  Russia: "But Russia is Europe. What gives you the right!!!" (Russia being that weird tough guy at the bar who gets upset over nothing.)  China: "Remember that time we wrote off your debt...etc, friend. That was very 'chill' of us, friend"  Russia (three drinks in): "Oh, I forgot. We are great friends."   Such a track would cut shipping costs enough to pay for itself. However Russia's track isn't the standard width, which requires a lot of infrastructure and relocation etc.
At first I thought it was a noble act but it turns out it just about the money again.
&gt; Replace the word "Muslims" with "blacks" in all these comments if your hatred of Islam blinds you from seeing the blatant racism/xenophobia going on in this thread.  Replace the word "rapist" with "blacks" in a rape thread...  The difference is, you can choose your religion. And if you are forced to be Muslim, that's reason enough to hate it.  Edit: Replace it with republicans and you should see the fallacy.
Really? Where the hell did you pull that number from? Higher than Dubai? Lebanon? Jordan? 
Comma is important.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_life_expectancy  Life expectancy in Jordan is much higher than Gaza, However Lebanon is just above Gaza (slightly higher for men, slightly lower for women) and the rest of the neighboring (does not include Dubai) countries are under Gaza. This does not take into account the actual average life expectancy of Palestinians in Lebanon or Jordan and is just the overall population average.  The West Bank is above Gaza and Lebanon.
I'm talking about you putting randomly bolded comments in every thread in /r/worldnews today. 
Yeah, and /r/athiesm hates religion, and /r/politics hates republicans, I'm not sure why /r/worldnews is randomly racist? Seemingly more so than /r/athiesm is antireligion. It's surreal.
I never said they should have an obligation, I just explained why immigrants are not working. It's not because they're lazy, it's because there are no jobs. And yes there are little opportunities in Africa unless you come from a politically connected family and a good school. Are you really going to compare quality of life in Africa to Europe?? Gee why would people move to a better QOL?? Idiot.
Because I'm certainly a straight white male, thank you so much. Fuck off with your misogynistic bullshit.
Well Brazil isn't more diverse than the United States, it is very diverse though. Probably number three after Argentina. 
Very advanced and humane army fighting nihilist terrorists like Hamas and doing a great fob at it
Starting with the fact that, WWII ended the depression by getting people into factories to work, not the tax policy.  Next though, when the market completely bottoms out like it did during the depression, you cut taxes not raise them.
so you get downvoted because you posted more information? What the fuck Reddit? More information is always more better!
You're insane if you think *American* culture is at risk of being taken over.  Trust me, you guys are the ones doing the exporting. It's Mexico that has to deal with the death of Mexican tradition, not the other way around.
No change has happened because GUNS DON'T KILL PEOPLE. They are not sentient and cannot decide to fire on there own! People kill people, if someone has the determination to kill people for whatever reason. They don't need a fucking gun, they just need a kitchen knife. Yeah it's tragic what happened but the parent of the kid responsible for the Newton shooting was a fucking retard who left guns laying around in the house not locked up. Responsible gun owners with children have safes good enough to be in Fort Knox bolted to the god damn floor. 
Why is rape so out of hand in India?
[deleted]
And decide for them to permanently disfigure their genitals.
[deleted]
'Intifada' simply means 'uprising' the same way that 'Watergate' is simply just a building.
[deleted]
At first this wasnt cringe  worthy, and then it was.
Old people are grumpy. This statement holds true.
White people can't be poor, got it. 
Hitler was a figure from almost a century ago in a continent far far away, with a radical ideology. There is absolutely zero relation to the discussion here.
The amount of "This is the wettest drought ever" jokes going around was excessive.
Don't forget the kangaroos! We eat a lot of them too!
THEN LEAVE!!.  You have to make a choice at some point. Britain want's to be part of it to get all the sweet little deals and all the extra money they can get through trade and market's.  ON the other hand they do nothing, but hamper the entire thing. IF you do not wan't to be part of it then leave. The EU is not some secret shadow organisation and people can be in it or not.  SO i say LEAVE already.
I think an inch is due tomorrow, maybe more (London).
[deleted]
Made me nervous :(
&gt;  Apartheid Israel? What a joke  Not a joke. According to survivors of South African Apartheid including Desmond Tutu, Apartheid Israel is worse than Apartheid South Africa ever was.   You're a jew and ashamed to admit it because you know you zionazis aren't taken seriously by reddit's majority progressive, anti-Israel users, how pathetic. 
Someone grab the stinky butter.
[1986 to 2012](http://www.iwcoffice.org/table_permit)  52 Sperm whales in 26 years.
http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/15nyse/anonymous_whistleblower_fights_to_reveal_the_true/c7o8or4?context=3
Like I said  It's all about managing the amount you hunt
You are irrelevant. 
Estimating based on diminishing returns of catches over time using historic records I would guess. I.E. look at the likelihood of getting a whale one year and then again in 20 years time and look at how many whales were nailed in the intervening period. It is of course much more detailed than that but I haven't done much in the way of population estimates, most of my study has been in animal behaviour and physiology rather than population dynamics.   Now there are more diligent and scientific methods like tagging and tracking whale populations, finding breeding grounds and watching migratory pathways. Also there have been studies of genetic variability in whales (both dead and live sampling) which help to show how large a population is likely to be.
Actually, high unemployment is good for business owners. It gives them more leverage over employees, and allows them to lower wages.
Yes, that's a better way of putting it.
Prohibition doesn't work and will only lead to corruption and a large black market.
I thought I just read an article where obesity has surpassed starvation as a health problem.
They aren't left out on the beach to rot, they are picked clean. First by the the persons allotted the whale, then by people picking leftovers, and THEN by the seagulls.  Unless you have a whale pregnancy test handy, it's actually really hard to tell beforehand. The whole "AND THEY CUT OUT THE FETUSES FOR FUN" is just a dishonest pathos appeal.
Correct. You are helping the environment by eating kangaroo. They are wild animals that are needing to be culled regardless of whether it ends up in shops or not. Eating kangaroo is respecting kangaroo.
What a stupid fucking post. Some of the best scientists/doctors in the west are from India.
thank god the japan has a dutiful defender of an unnecessary practice of killing threatened species  so some old assholes from the generation of japanese that waged murder rape and war on all of its neighbors can squish some fat in their mouths  fuck you, you astroturfing shill 
Why would I be crying?  You're the one who's been exposed as ignorant and unqualified.
yep 
More like "What is and is not considered moral is determined by your religion or culture." In which case no perspective is more objective than another.  In any case, nobody has given a good reason for why whales are any more morally important than any of the other animals that the entire worlds hunts and raises as livestock.
Some jobs require weekend working. Imagine if your local supermarket operated 9 to 5, mon to fri. When would people shop if they also work those hours? The requirements of the job are explained to people before they sign the contract. If they don't agree with them, then don't sign it. But don't think for a second that a business has to change to suite you.
Good
[deleted]
He's either a closet racist or just a very stupid troll. Don't bother trying to talk sense or reason with him.   It's like all the knuckledraggers I've seen going "payback for Palestinian/Afghan/Iraqi children" in their comments on news about the Sandy Hook shooting. Haters like that **will** drag their pitiful agenda into anything they can on every chance they get, then slink out when called on to back their remarks up. Just look at the comments history of this douche.
I said can, not must. Good to know about the short prayer thing though.
Well, how else are they gonna get them?  A shotgun ruins the pelt.    In all seriousness though, seal hunting has gone on longer than your lily white ass has been here, and for you to come in and say stop is pretty fucking arrogant.  But it's pretty easy to get everyone on board with no clubbing baby seals cause they're cute, and the ones doing the clubbing aren't white.  Fuckin' hippie
Not according to Jebus (Luke 18:20)You know the commandments: 'Do not commit adultery, do not murder, do not steal, do not give false testimony, honor your father and mother.'"  Don't see Sabbath on Jesus' list.
Except people do work 7 days a week, never taking a day off. In my area it's common to work 3 jobs and 12 hour days, because it is illegal to work a person as much as they need to pay rent on minimum wage. And thank God it is illegal, because that was the norm before unions were formed to argue for rights for workers. The only ones not working employees 7 days were....you guessed it, Christians, and Jews, because the Sabbath requires not working your employees on that day. 
None the less though, following Jesus' teachings encompasses the ten commandments, but at the same time says that, for lack of a better term, shit happens, stealing is wrong, but if you need to feed your family it is okay
OK, but you're repeatedly justifying why you're being a dickhead to people. You likened their beliefs to "a never god in never land" or some such, and then said you 'deeply respected' their beliefs later in the comment tree. yeah,ok.gif
Capitalism is human nature.
In my region (Atlantic) atheists are a definite minority. 
CANADIAN ASSHOLES! FUCKING SCUMBAGS!
I'm almost terrified to ask this, but what would you consider gross?  Be specific.
Oh and yeah, they hate Sarkozy so much, and he hated them back so much, that he hired the former editor in chief as his chief propagandist. Now that shows how hard they were hitting. Philippe Val cost the taxpayers hundreds of thousands if not millions in wrongful termination lawsuits after he sacked anyone critical of Sarko at France Inter. Now that's freedom of speech in action!
Says Aljazeera.
[deleted]
1) You're assuming prison life is worse than it actually is.  After a year or two it would be normal for you and you'd be pretty happy.  2) You're assuming you can't get out of prison.
Sustaiable whaling and whale watching are not mutually exclusive businesses. We have both where I come from and it works out ok.
This has nothing to do with mental health.  This is a gang of thug rapists who don't value human life.
&gt;if the treatment is voluntary, why the hell not allow it?  Define "voluntary".  Voluntary as in you get to choose to never feel pleasure again in any form? Or "voluntary" like the the US tax system?
Unless you know how it actually is in a Scandinavian prison and not reddits version of it. On this subject reddit is like reverse Fox News.
&gt;the point is to take dangerous offenders out of society so they can't do it again.  FALSE The point of the justice system is rehabilitation not removal. If removal was the point then all offenders should get life imprisonment or the death penalty. This is why the US and many other countries legal systems don't work.
I'm sorry but **don't** start on yet another country, let them fix themselves without us being annoyed and opinionated every second along the way. Fuck that shit. 
&gt;Why should i care if they freeze to death?  Because you're a human being and so are they? Are you a sociopath?
[deleted]
admitedly this is speculative/arm chair general territory, so ...  but the way I see it 1.) the traditional pacific triangle has become unstable. The balance of power between China-US-Japan are completely skewed and is not sustainable in the next 10-20 yrs. (the lifetime of these submarines) 2.)Currency/economic relationship, dollar-Euro-Yuan are also going to fluctuate greatly, this will affect everybody's budget. (suppose global trade go up and down by 3-5%? I doubt anybody can keep current spending pattern for long. But then again, they can keep printing money) 3.) China's speed building credible naval power is noteable. You have to admit building 054D at current pace is pretty impressive, regardless if the ship works as advertised or not. 4.) middle east is now completely broken and unstable. They are not going to be able to put it back like it was before iraq war. Oil, Petro-dolar, global energy supply, etc) This will lead to a war.   So suppose there is a situation in 2020, where argentina attacks falkland with their new toys, few chinese made frigatea, new Flankers, one or two U212 class submarine. At the same time balkan/baltic flares up, involving current Syria-Turkey-Greece-Cyprus. Nothing big, just sabre rattling. But ship must be on station there.  And finally of course Israel staging an attack, which then followed by small war in Saudi, iran, iraq.. naturally, all those water ways need to have ships . At the same time the usual tension in pacific. (so ship can't moves freely, must be stationed)  I for one really don't see UK has enough ships if the above scenario happens. It has to drop one of them (enough to sustain lost. either territory, passage, or capital ship.)   Granted this is assuming current tension keep escalating, economic mess continues, international policy remains fubar and pacific arms race intensify.... but I really can't see UK will be able to juggle all of them at the same time at current projected military size. Simply not enough ships. Specially if there is several more idiotic policy being concocted out from this side of atlantic, tying up huge US naval assets.  The last series of korea, japan-china islands alone will absorb huge number of US naval assets if it brakes out to full show of power.  Basically, same as current situation, slightly more involved, but not a full blown war.
Anything can be justified under the guise of Eco-fascism.
This is what I try to tell all the people who seem to think the US political system would become magically perfect if there were more viable parties.  It might help, but a multiparty system has problems of it's own, vote splitting being chief among them.
Of course he died this way.  No other way, really.
I feel if the major story hadn't come up, this wouldn't have made news, that it happens all the time and nobody bothers reporting it (news-wise).
WRONG.
A HYPERLINK/CYBER-HUB With More Combined Potential Connectivity Power Right Here Than All Other Websites  (and growing like a weed)
In the UK, most people who "sleep rough" have some sort of issue that is keeping them out of the regular safety net. Many hostels have zero tolerance of drugs and alcohol and the individual may also have psychological problems. Ultimately it's a choice of whether you force them into some sort of lock-in care and that's a very difficult moral issue. 
That's fine, I'm not disagreeing.  I'm just saying, "it costs money more money to close it than to run it for a while longer!" is an absurd argument - it's true of any government program that creating or dismantling it is far more expensive than simply operating it. The logic is totally unsound.
oops meant to type out 2015. 
Of course, its all about prioritisation and strategic alignment
Ok, I can hate the Brits (all their funding of the PA and paying salleries of bombers and killers) - me and and my can even stop working (we all have higher education but we can "forget" the degrees and just say we didn't finish school ... ).  Now, can I have this please ? 
Given the state of mass media these days, that sounds like a good start.  We can do better in 2013.  
I know what he's pointing out but i can't help but feel If i were a north korean refugee I would be offended.  It's assuming the average North Korean is starving which I seriously doubt, sure they wont be getting the food intake of a westerner but still enough for a human being to function normally. It's sort of like saying the average Iranian is a fundamentalist from what you hear on the news.   North Korea had a "Crisis" in the early 2000s, late 90s where millions starved known as the North korean famine, it doesn't mean the average north korean is starving today. And the comment is hypocritical because im sure there are many people in need of food wherever he's living too yet he's probably not giving them any or donating.   It's become Okay to make offensive jokes about North korea. The other day this south korean student during graduation made a speech where he said "I'm from Korea, no not north korea, South korea, the good korea, we are not starving in this korea haha" and the whole audience laughed and I was so disgusted. Even if they were starving, which is worse, it's inappropriate. 
They played their group games in my Local teams former stadium. 
I'm not him, but I'm fairly sure I've heard that the North Korean government and people have wanted it since the country's separation, and that is allegedly why they made the military such a huge part of their society, to show how they're strong enough to not completely bring the South down if they were to join up.   I will note that I'm no expert on them, that's just what I've heard. 
Is the guy who faked having cancer so he could get some karma really trying to get up on a moral pedestal?
TL;DR - White people missing in brown country. 
Because as soon as an illegal alien makes themselves known to the government they'd get deported?  
It does not have to be because it can happen to them it is just that one identifies with people similar to yourself.  For example I as a Swede care more about a school shooting in the US than one in India; just because I identify more with people from the US.
That's, in essence, idiotic. You're setting a pointlessly high bar for no reason except to apparently try to be on some moral high horse.  You can also help by donating money (to the right charities), by volunteering at US charities that work in those area, by pushing for political pressure on India ($$$ makes the world go round and the US pumps a lot into India) and so on.  And awareness makes all those things happen because now people are aware enough to realize it's a problem they may want to help solve. You don't need every person to do something who reads about it, you need one out of 1000 and it's still going to have a meaningful impact.  How else do you think people realize that this is a big problem in India? Magic? Fairies? Space aliens talking into their heads. That's what awareness does, it let's people know that there is a problem somewhere about something. Then you can get them to help do something about it.
&gt;Nope, no communities have the exact same problems, but few communities are immune to this kind of violence given the right social and political circumstances.  Nonsense, gool ol' European Christians would *never* oppress women, start holy wars, massacre religious minorities, or any of that awful stuff!   In all seriousness though, if all of /r/worldnews read and understood your comment, it would do a lot of good.
RAPE 2013   We will end rape before 2013 is over
Yes, I do.
[deleted]
I live in NYC, I'm aware of that, babies have died because these holy men had picked up herpes from Eastern European sex slaves that the jews own and passed it onto the infant boys.  Also a man that protested a rabbi raping 12 year old students had acid thrown on him by members of the community that is solidly supporting the rabbi, not in Pakistan, not in Israel, not in the 19th century, in fucking NYC, an acid attack a few months ago.  And you need to google more about Israel aka Occupied Palestine. Survivors of South African apartheid say Apartheid Israel is even worse.
To be fair, [a good share of the war rape victims in the Congo are men](http://www.google.com/search?client=opera&amp;q=rape+of+men&amp;sourceid=opera&amp;ie=utf-8&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;channel=suggest). They're victims just as much as the women. 
I would wager precisely the same amount as in public schools, on a per student basis. 
[Oh I'm sure.](http://i.imgur.com/YsZf0.gif)
LOL DAE TOD AKIN HAHA XD
[deleted]
When there was rumors of a power struggle I honestly thought the senior leaders had done just that.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Despite the excitement in my post, I agree with you. My biggest concerns are   * how such a depleted population would damage the overall ecosystem and  * the fact that there are most likely more ethical ways which don't completely undermine the supply (which applies to a variety of meat industries)
I want a 12 inch penis. 
Choo Choo!
Yes, agree that he does bring in some Indian POV, but he has also criticized India's Agni 5 launch and the cavalier statements that followed and has also questioned the feasibility of India's Cold Start doctrine. 
&gt;Race is a social concept.  If so, what about the organ donor problem for African Americans?
Using the original quote makes that big line across both sentences, looks silly
What are you trying to say?
Uhh...you are aware the T-80 was essentially an up-engineered T-64? It entered service in 1976. The analogue would be the M60A3, ie a heavily upgraded version of an earlier tank.  Secondly, would you care to tell me how a 47 ton T-90 has stronger frontal armour and better protection overall than a 67 ton Abrams? It obviously isn't as simple as heavier weight = stronger, but a tank that weighed 2/3rds what another did and yet was better protected would be nothing short of miraculous, especially given how far ahead Western tank protection has been over the past couple of decades. Case in point was shown in the Gulf War, when Abrams armour was effective against T-72 125 mm rounds while the T-72 armour was most certainly not adequate vs Abrams armour even at close range. Keep in mind that every report we have indicates that armament and armour have changed very, very little from T-72 to T-90.  If you have some new information or citations to back up your points I would be very interested to hear them. Indeed, it would be nothing short of black magic if the Russian T-90 was superior in all respects, including protection, to an American tank that weighed a full 20 tons more.  But from what I've seen so far it seems you have a very strong bias, are uninformed on the topic, or both.  The effectiveness of the ATGM has never been proven, anyway. It's like BVR engagements with aircraft: great on paper, who knows how well it will work in theory.  This is all moot since in any conventional engagement the side with air superiority will quickly mop up the armoured forces on the other side anyway.  As for armament being modernized...the Russian military went through hell in the 1990s, rusting to pieces from underfunding and failing to decisively beat a few Chechen rebels with AK-47s in rather embarassing fashion (brings to mind the failed Soviet invasion of Finland pre WWII).  Of course the situation has improved since then with Putin and the economy recovering and whatnot, but it still seems more than tenuous. Why are the naval refits still so far behind schedule if the air force and army are in such great shape? The grand Soviet navy is largely rusting apart or being slowly scrapped in port, why is this?  And I don't understand how new designs such as the T-90 can form the mainstay of their armoured divisions when they've only built around 1500 of em, considering that they made at least 8000 T-80s and none were ever distributed to client states.  Compare that to 9000 Abrams constructed and you're looking at 5 to 1 Abrams vs T-90s, and even with your description of the T-90 as the new King Tiger , that still seems like rather stiff odds to me.  Don't get me wrong, I'm a huge fan of Russian military hardware. Like I said, at certain points in the Cold War they had both a qualitative and quantitative advantage over the West as a whole, and nobody else on the planet came close to either of them.  The problem is that the Russian economy went through hell in the 90s, while the American economy boomed and they kept pouring money into defense at near Cold War levels.  Putin may be putting them on the track back to being a world power again, but they have a ways to go yet. 
its a bad attempt at irony the refugee camps at sangatte ( in the area mentioned) already existed and were used for this purpose. they were closed in 2002
[deleted]
Posted 8 hrs ago, no responses?  [Yeah.](http://i.imgur.com/18uWA.jpg)
Yep, an A Wyatt Man cartoon is definitely a relevant contribution to this conversation. Very mature and enlightening. 
I'd rather let the market decide at market prices. Denmark has tried to boost wind power through subsidies, the effect is now that our semi-national windpower producer is near bankrupt, and we have the highest cost per watt in Europe.
Sorry, but if Russia gets a man on Mars first and gets them back alive I'll kindly not give a damn that the US managed to get a bunch of drones there first.  It's cool and all, but it's not anywhere close to the same magnitude of having a real person stepping on the surface of another planet first.
not much of a justice system if everyone refuses to defend the accused...
I bet they do a lot more with that money in Russia than we would do in the states.  Good on them for continuing space exploration.  
&gt;Well, considering that the marginal tax rate on income over $400,000 under Eisenhower was 91%[1] , the idea of a top-tier tax below 30% is a relatively novel phenomenon, pushed mostly by the Reagan and subsequent Republican administrations.  Good god this talking point is tired. As a percentage of GDP, the US has collected about the same percent almost every year for the past hundred years.  If you go back to the administrations where our tax burden was &gt;50%, there's a few things you'll find.  1) There was practically no ability to enforce it. Nowadays the IRS knows approximately what you've made before you tell them. Credit card sales get reported. Significant bank transfers get reported. Cash transactions are at a low. They have machines that calculate who has included *you* in their taxes.  2) There were *insane* deductions and loopholes that have since been closed.  Tax rates were that high because they were not expecting to actually collect at that rate. They would tax 75%+ to get 20-30%.
I assure you this is not the case.  We have plenty of immigrants who do nothing but leech the system.  They just don't make a habit of torching cars for fun.  Xenophobic confirmation bias doesn't solve problems, it does quite the opposite.
Why are you involving the Taliban?
But where is the religious element to the killing, they may as well be ethnic or sectarian....
that has always been the case. remember that a huge reason for the founding of the US was the idea of unfair taxes (no taxation without representation).  That said, taxation on high-earners has also been fairly consistent as part of a progressive tax as implemented in many (if not most) countries in the world today. Progressive taxes have a long history, such as this example from what is now Great Britain: the "[1377 Poll tax noted that the tax on the Duke of Lancaster was 520 times the tax on the common peasant](http://www.taxworld.org/History/TaxHistory.htm)."  What we have today in the US is *effectively* a "regressive" tax. I say "effectively" because this includes loopholes and other strategies that many high-earners use to lower their tax burden, such that high-income earners pay proportionally less tax than lower-income earners. This is despite the US tax code being statutorily a progressive tax system, where ideally higher earners would pay a higher proportion.  As to whether this is fair or unfair is the crux of the philosophical argument in Congress at the moment. 
&gt; I live in NYC, I'm aware of that, babies have died because these holy men had picked up herpes from Eastern European sex slaves that the jews own and passed it onto the infant boys.  source for them having sex slaves ?
Butthurt Pro-NRA sarcasm is obvious.
Here's a serious question.  Whyyyy does talking about racism or daring to speak to racists the same way they speak to me mean I "hate" white people?  Have you ever examined this incredibly fallacious/hypocritical thought process?
Yeah but other than all those quotes and any others you can find (which have obviously influenced the development of society for over a 1000 years), they're equal. 
[deleted]
That's just exaggeration, [this page](http://www.glocom.org/opinions/essays/20081024_ohtake_on/index.html) sounds more realistic to me by saying the young voter turnout is 40% and old is 80%.
So they weren't stampeded by livestock?
This isn't barter. Shit, did the author even read their own fucking article?
You know Allah is a god, and Muslims believe Allah (a title not really a name) and Yahweh (the judeo-christian God) are the same person.   So saying god-given rights means the exact same thing. 
/r/conspiracy is -&gt; that way  If you know anything about Gates it's that he's saving lives, not taking them.  
You keep making assumptions and claims which simply aren't borne out by evidence but do fit your cultural perspective. You are applying modern constructs built to deal with modern issues and are projecting them back a thousand plus years. Furthermore you just couple this with lazy  claims such as they didn't care about their children. It is hard to take this view seriously, especially when I have already pointed out that this was certainly not the case in this instance.  I never said the ages of 13, 16 or 18 where arbitrary, I said they based upon a chronological age rather than an individuals level of maturity as was the case in the example I mentioned.  Though the disparity between Spain 13 and the USAs 18 may raise some questions regarding the nature of these ages and why the disparity considering how alike the two countries are.   If Canada's age was really 14 up until rather recently, then this should give more pause for thought regarding historical context rather than resorting to hyperbolic attacks which are entirely misplaced - the modern experts you mention address a very different act and I doubt any would risk their reputation by doing what you are doing and equating it with  much of human history. 
Does anyone have any realistic reason to have hope for these people? I mean, I'm seeing rape reports on the front-page everyday now (and I don't like to see that quite frankly). Now there's this on the front page. Now they can't even have female teachers teaching people.   It seems like they're intent on killing themselves and their citizens are flocking to (somewhat) civilized countries in droves so doesn't it seem like it's all over for them?   Those people that are leaving these countries in strife are the good people that might've made a difference. When they become a citizen of another country, they can't really make any change or stand-up for the rights of their ancestral country. As the good people leave, it just leaves a gap for the bad people to prosper until these countries implode or something.
[deleted]
you can't be serious in calling India "non-secular" because of that. India has 13% Muslims and 7% that includes Christians, Sikhs and Jains. For a country that has a billion+ people, that is a HUGE number. On an acceptance of minorities -  1. We have had a Muslim president in the past,  2. Current prime minister is a Sikh 3. The current leader of the largest political party (Congress) is an Italian Born Catholic Christian Woman 4. Indian Muslims have one of the biggest names in Indian Sports and Entertainment (Bollywood)   There will be few countries in the world that would match that.   Yes there have been instances of religious intolerance at times [there have been 0 religious riots in the last decade... yes ZERO] which is a problem India will have to deal with nonetheless. But to call it "non-secular" would be WAY OFF the target.
as with in Libya where its suspected the CIA helped 270 Al Cia Da out of a prison and funded them to become "rebels" against Gadaffi.  Gaddaffi wanted to stop trading oil for US Dollars.  In Syria it is suspected they helped rebels with the bakery incident, Syria is pissed off its being left out of the oil market.  Pakistan in the last few days, two shootings and reports of mini nuclear weapons.  Its called destablisation, they care not for any control, they just want to leave these countries in dissarray so they cant really do anything about the other things that Jewmerica has planned.  Go in, cause massive incident, sometimes undermine governments, create public panic, and then leave the rest up to its own devices.  Meanwhile make your deals and start construction with Bechtel, Haliburton and so on.   Think fifty plus bases in Afghanistan and Iraq, and think oil pipeline across Afghanistan. Think oil pipeline Israel/Iraq/Saudi.  And now think Turkey/Israel will cut Russias dominence in the region throughout Europe.   Lots of things happening in the world right now.  Why do you think when they entered Iraq, the first thing that happened was all the oil wells were lit on fire.  EDIT: i will add, this is crunch time, the US falls, or its stays, it cant have it both ways.  Will Israel abandon it, will the bankers abandon it.  What happens to its multi trillion dollar army, does it go through the Rome Syndrome and fall because its to costly to hold standing armies.  What happens if oil goes strong for Israel, but the US dollar doesnt.   And if it all goes wrong, what happens to the monopoly in the United Nations.  There are alot of questions, and some fucking scary answers waiting for us. 
Well, your opinion is different to mine, I don't see it as stealing, I see it as taking back what has been stolen from everyone else, but you are welcome to think that way.
This is the problem with fighting fundamentalists. It is a race to the bottom. The taliban WANTS to roll back civilization to the stone age. Civil society is fragile it is a lot easier to knock it down than it is to build it up.  It is 8 people making houses with building blocks and one dickhead kicking them down. The dickhead wins, because his job is infitesmally easier.  Shooting teachers is cheap and easy. Training them and maintaining safe schools is hard and expensive. Teaching children to be brave and raising them well is hard. Throwing acid is a woman's face is easy.  Frankly I despair. But if we are trying to make a place where "religion will be openly questioned" lets say we start with the US. 
[deleted]
How did these people ever steal money from everyone else?
&gt; I'm sorry, I just do not believe that he came up with the idea.  I never said that he did.  &gt; "Our well-being" is the intended foundation for nearly any morality ever conceived by men, it doesn't say much to say that morality should be based on that.   The morality presented by the Abrahamic religions is based on the human submission to the desires of a deity.  &gt; How in the world is that any different from Aristotle, for example?  I didn't say it necessarily was.  Sam Harris just brings up this exact point so his argument seemed relevant.  In his book, he basically argues that once we agree that morality should be based on the well-being of sentient creatures, these moral questions enter into the realm of scientific inquiry.  In other words, we can use science to determine if actions are in fact promoting well-being or suffering, and thus science can answer moral questions.  That was the point of that particular book.  &gt; Compulsory veiling and Western magazine covers, I would argue, are both examples of sexual objectification of women because they both lead to women living their lives in the context of sexual attraction. In the US, women are often judged by their sex appeal (ugly girls are treated much worse than more attractive ones). While compulsory veiling eliminates this harming of the well-being of unattractive women, it also leads to the Islamic culture breeding some of the most sexually aggressive and disrespectful men in the world, since they have learned to always see women as sexual objects (even if that is a veiled sexual object).  I agree completely.  &gt; So a "happy medium" wouldn't be "between the two", as Harris suggests. Rather, it would have to rely on eliminating the entire ideology of letting sexual appeal dominate the public lives of women, which isn't "between" these two views but rather a complete departure from either of them.  You raise a very good point, but that's not entirely how it was presented.  The idea isn't that women should be dressing "between the two", because as you mention, that would be missing the point.  I included a link to the particular part in his speech (the relevant part is only 2 minutes long).  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Hj9oB4zpHww#t=10m14s
Thank you for the response.   &gt; Islamic baseline for attitude and decorum as to what individual roles they play in society  The baseline however is open for interpretation, just like in any other religion, there is no "decorum" or "role" that is set in stone. Christianity had (and to some extent still has) similar attitudes regarding the role of women, sex, and marriage among other things.  &gt;...it will lead to what amounts to the so called decadence they see in European society which symbolically serves as a deterrent  Still falls into interpretation of what is good and bad. The opposite interpretation also exists. There can be many arguments made how "western society" does not reduce particular roles of women in society, rather gives them a choice if they want to become mothers.    &gt;Education and such freedom is also paramount in most Islamic societies so this is not the issue, its whats being taught that will cause resentment.   This is where it is more advantageous to not group Islam into one thing- as the religion and different cultures have different results and interpretations regarding education. Again, I am also not talking about religion, but cultures and political systems, while religion is often part of this, looking throughout history, religion is flexible in what actions are deemed appropriate. Many countries that are not "western" have particular systems in place which are actively holding them back from achieving their societal goals- greater resources with less suffering. These are objectively measured by GDP and other indexes of living standard. Particular values are proven to make this possible- like democracy, free market, education, etc...    
No shit, Sherlock.   And they're not social, but educational issues. Social issues deal with culture, not ignorance. Godayum so many dipshits on Reddit.
Money, it's a crime.  Share it fairly.  But don't take a slice of my pie.
[deleted]
Ha. It's just sad. Just so many scumbags, it's demoralizing.
everyone has a price. some people will make a lot of money for willing to do this.
It's always fun to spit on the beliefs of millions because a bunch of ignorant intolerant fucks decided to kill people in the name of a religion that is in no way represented by those few individuals, But no by all means, Keep spitting on the millions to piss off the few that are homicidal maniacs.
&gt; the bank takes the collateral, **resells the collateral**, as well as collects the rest of the balance **from you**  FTFY
blackinthmiddle was talking about *Pakistan*. I was simply responding to his/her comment. Nowhere in it does s/he say Saudi Arabia.
The point was that your example of women who run track has no relevance to the reality of the shape most thin women are in, and what they aspire to be; being skinny is encouraged by various media and perpetuated by women themselves through compliments far more than fitness is.    No sane person sees an underweight actress or runway model and says or thinks "wow, does she ever look fit!".  Any compliments on their size will be related purely to that and not to their fitness levels in the cases that influence most people (mainstream media).  In summary: you first responded to a person who claimed that being underweight is held up as an ideal standard for women, by asking whether it was truly fitness or thinness which is held up as an ideal.    I'm trying to show that it is thinness and not fitness which is ideal to most people, through what influences them (mainstream media, where it is thinness and not fitness which is valued), and what the actual results are in real life (most people who are thin are not fit, don't care about fitness, and do care about how thin they are; and further compliment others on thinness rather than fitness).
How is an experiment run at an accredited university and reported on by a science research site not a reputable source?  It isn't like I posted a link to batshit daily.  Incidentally, there are multiple studies that come to a similar conclusion.  
Real-estate bubbles are everywhere. But Spain has been suffering from GDP decrease and quite bad unemployment. Both of which of course affect housing prices.  There's a lot more to it, and wikipedia is of course up to date as usual: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2008%E2%80%932012_Spanish_financial_crisis
Part of the underlying issue is that it's very expensive to start and operate a company in Spain.
If enough people do a donkey vote then that could impact on the results.  I think it would be more interesting, statistically speaking, to see how many people don't want to vote for anyone in their electorate and therefore gather a better idea of support for those elected.  However this is simply an additional option in our compulsory voting democracy, just an idea, I think our system is great as it is.
Poison the water supply and it's game over.  Geez that sounds terrible. 
Yeah. And that's the source of my concern. Targeting US audiences may mean taking up conventionalist U.S media position on world affairs. 
[deleted]
If you are a locksmith in need of a job, you know which country to go to now.
[deleted]
I can't seem to find the study (or at least haven't started to do indepth googling) but here is one of the arguments supporting [it](http://www.guardian.co.uk/society/2011/dec/09/breast-cancer-screening-harm).
Victorian: Midori splice.
In context to their claim that is: http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/d/df/Falklands.permanence.png  Personally I say viva la resistancé.
There's no compulsory voting here in Ireland and yet voter suppression isn't an issue.  American flaws are *American* flaws. The world doesn't model itself on the US, quite the opposite in fact, so to insist that if compulsory voting were to be removed Australia would suffer what America does is just absolute nonsense. 
[deleted]
Absolutely nothing, agent Smith. Absolutely nothing ;)
finally starting to understand the advantages. had a knee-jerk reaction to this when an australian explained it to me years ago. though being in america i can still imagine that it would somehow go horribly wrong. 
And she is correct. I want to see this implemented into Canadian election standards and laws. The fine for not voting is a brilliant idea and a pinnacle piece of new democratic reform.
And all shootings occured in gun-free zones where no one could fight back.
The best way to get around Donkey Votes is to randomise the order on each ballot. Of course this might make it tricky for parties to print How to Vote cards but I don't care because HTVs and the associated preference deals are a blight on our electoral systems. P.S. we should have above the line preferential voting in the Senate like NSW has for the Legislative Council.
Al Qaeda or the Taliban, which is it CIA???!!!
[deleted]
Anthony had a plurality not a majority.
FUCKHEAD DETECTED
You're misunderstanding the point. There is no different treatment of individuals based on religion or skin colour in law or taxation, though Aborigines do get several extra benefits that I'm not going to go into as I can tell you're not big on the idea of equality of outcome. What the census data is used for is understanding the community as a whole so that governments can provide their services (not taxation) in a better manner, as well as work toward solutions to social issues that plague individual communities that suit each community. The census is not interested in what *you* or anyone else believes, speaks or comes from, they are interested in a demographic profiles of communities of people, towns, cities, suburbs, farming communities, the outback, municipalities, states, etc. as a whole  As someone said above, census data is particularly useful for local municipalities who need to engage with vastly different cultures in local issues. Sydney's 40 or so municipalites all have vastly different demographics, and require different strategies when dealing with the community in areas like urban planning, cultural events, community services, etc. There is no way that all 700+ municipalities, 6 states, 2 territories and the federal government could respond to issues effectively if they acted same way without any nuance and consideration for the differences in demographics across both geography and time.   So why religion? Because community harmony. Religion is a polarising issue with a history of conflict, and knowing where people believe what means that (local) governments can alter policy to prevent tensions between religious groups where they intermingle. Secularism doesn't mean ignoring religion completely. The church may be separate from the state, but the state still has to *respond* to the members of the church.   Essentially the questions on the census are used so the government can understand its constituents, and develop the best policy decisions for the people that each government, at all levels, are responsible to. A greater understanding of the population can provide a more equitable outcome for people, and that includes knowing about peoples' religious affiliation. The question about religion on a census is common in many countries, not just Australia, so I don't know why you found it so "bizarre" or why it warranted mentioning in the first place.
Nothing says "freedom" like forced voting. 
Some people do that in voluntary voting as well.
&gt;The PLO halted all military action after coming back from exile.  Except that Suha Arafat gave a television interview these past few weeks in which she said that Yassir planned the Second Intifada when he didn't get what he wanted at the Camp David talks.
Because that be granting the Jews a victory.
Thanks, but unfortunately this threddit is fairly aimed at irrational preachers &amp;amp; believers, hence the behaviour in the video. A rational mind doesn't justify murder over something like this, and rarely ever*.  I'm strongly against 'organised' religion, for my own reasons, but mainly because of the inhumanity that is done in it's name. To me, religion should be DODT.    *I could get sidetracked into ways that murder/killing can be justified, but I won't.
What? Did you see the monitors they're forced to use? Savages.
For starters take away children from muslim parents...one generation later...a lot less muslims.  Easy as pie.
[deleted]
Yet the party voted on it.
Ok?
Let's not forget the part where the incumbent political party decided to backstab the Prime Minister and replace him..............without a vote. 
I'm going to start using the word bank as a profanity.  Banking, bankers are banked.
Look, I support Israel but this argument is so annoying.  It's always one side against the other.  Israel and Palestine must be doing something right (and wrong) for both sides to have such vehement supporters and critics.  The reason why there is no discussion about the ten million Congo dead is because we all agree it sucks and we all collectively do nothing about it.  With Israel and Palestine, everything is so murky and nuanced that we can waste our time arguing about how one side is wrong or evil or one side is correct and good.  It's pointless.  I support justice, I support Israel, and I support peace for the Palestinians/Arabs.  I also know that the situation is so complicated and not one sided.  Israel has done and continues to do bad things.  So does the Palestinians/Arabs.  This conflict would be over like South Africa if it wasn't so complex.
He was being facetious, you are a cunt. 
Ricky, Julian, I'm Not gonna lie this is greasy stuff here.
Very few technicians and ever fewer as time progresses.  The whole point of automation is to give the system intelligence enough to take care of itself in greater and greater capacities.
Way to go Hamas. Let your own people suffer so as to make a political statement. Caring for politics more than people is not cool. Don't expect the rest of the world to lift a finger when you allow your own flesh and blood to wallow in pity.  I expect a whole lot of down votes from the pro Palestinian crowd, but you people are just as hypocritical. Look at Israel, anyone group who consider themselves Jews get help to settle in Israel whether they be Russian, Indian, African or from some other place. Whereas Palestinians will not lift a finger for their own people, so much easier to blame others. They act like immature children who cannot take some responsibility for their own situation. 
Just because other people have similar issues doesn't mean that you get to pretend you don't have them yourself.
...but I do want to get all cyberpunk... 
You're right, I haven't.  I'm not saying racism towards other groups doesn't exist, but racism towards black people far outweighs any other -ism that I've seen on reddit, outside of the misogyny that a majority of reddit users find so funny. 
Firstly, I agree.  But its a very small minority and happens very rarely. Not all football fans, or even fans of the clubs, should be tarred with the same brush. I don't know if you're a football fan, so in case you're not I'll briefly explain a rivalry - you fucking despise the club. The fans, the players, the manager, everything about it. When you play them, the mutual feelings are brought together and you'll do anything to win, on and off the pitch. Its easy to get caught up in the moment when most people singing it are probably respectable people in the real world.
back in some dark days in my late teens the only thing that kept me from doing something stupid (as in cutting or taking pills) was thinking, if I am going to commit suicide I might as well just jack in this life and hitchhike around the world and do somthing interesting...then apathy would stop me.
The team of the fans who yelled racist junk should have been the ones to stop the game. If I understood the article, they were the home team. In my humble opinion, they should have been the ones to stop the game, sending a strong message that this team will not tolerate ANYONE abusing their guests. I mean, they are called "visitors" and are there at the invitation of the home team. If nothing else, the home team should have walked off the field *with* the visiting team. The message is: "Go home, racist fans. We won't entertain you after what you just said to our visiting team."
Slightly incorrect to call Kevin-Prince Boateng an "african player". He was born in Germany but he does have a Ghanian passport. Dual nationality German/Ghanian.
But where do you draw the line at then?
I hear it was ZFT that got Rihanna back in bed with Chris Brown.
Sure I can post a link. It is well known the FSA is made up from defected Syrian soldiers who refused to kill their people for Assad. [here you go](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Free_Syrian_Army)  If Assad did shoot every defector himself he would have more kills than Simyo Hayha, but Assad is a coward who never leaves his palace. He did order the deaths of 60k Syrian civilians though if that makes you feel better.   〠☃ 
&gt;The closest developed country was Finland  https://www.google.com/publicdata/explore?ds=d5bncppjof8f9_&amp;met_y=sp_pop_totl&amp;idim=country:FIN&amp;dl=en&amp;hl=en&amp;q=population%20of%20finland  vs   https://www.google.com/publicdata/explore?ds=kf7tgg1uo9ude_&amp;met_y=population&amp;idim=country:US&amp;dl=en&amp;hl=en&amp;q=population%20of%20the%20united%20states  I'm sure if Finland had 300 million people their numbers would increase as well.
[deleted]
Gotta remember this is the Guardian's version of reality.   Now I enjoy many articles that the Guardian posts.  Sometimes they actually make like they are seriously opposed to plutocracy.  However, they consistently promote the error that all people are alike, and have the same capacities and have the same sense of right and wrong.  When the Haitians fail it couldn't possibly be because of their shiftlessness, no, because Haitians have the same capacities as Japanese or Dutch. It must be because some outsiders are sabotaging them...yeah that's it.
By corrupt governments that were puppets of their colonial masters, and drug gangs also funded and armed by those other governments. You forgot to mention that.  edit: once again I see all the downvotes from school children on winter break who have never read a history book on Haiti
As an overweight guy myself I support this idea. You shouldn't be entitled to others' help if you can't even get up and try to do something to fix yourself or at least just show some initiative first.
[deleted]
[deleted]
This article is just wrong.  &gt;Palestinian Authority President Mahmoud Abbas on Wednesday called on the UN to intervene to **allow** thousands of Palestinians from Syria to enter the West Bank and the Gaza Strip.  &gt;http://www.jpost.com/MiddleEast/Article.aspx?id=296671
[deleted]
Many people in other countries (and even many in our own) feel that racism in the US is the "Zenith" of racist places. This could not be further from the truth. Sorry I did not think I needed to spell that out.
I was hoping for a video or at least a gif, I leave disappointed.
This is the second repost of this shit. 
http://www.ekklesia.co.uk/node/17733   If you want critical thinking....  It will fail on a practical level, and is unjust on a fairness level.
First of all, your English is just fine. Better than many people that post here.  &gt;You are supposed to pay thousands of dollars per year for insurance or you are screwed when you get sick.  You do that too, just in the form of taxes.  &gt;A simple inhaler that I use for asthma is 130 USD here while it costs 10 USD in my country (Government does not pay for it).   Most likely government subsidized and you just have a copay.  &gt;(Note that people become sick even without bad choices.)  Absolutely true. It happens. But that's what insurance is for. Insurance is not for seeing your family doctor or if you need some tape for a sprained ankle or for cough medicine. It's for when you get cancer or shatter a bone in an accident. You don't go and call up your homeowners insurance if a few shingles get blown off your roof in a storm.  &gt;in my country there is a privatized medical sector. Even in there you can have treatments without paying as much as in USA. Because private sector have to compete with government sector, they cannot charge as much as they want.   In the USA the government sets rates for doctors and hospitals for procedures when it comes to Medicare/Medicaid. Then the insurance companies use those same rates as a starting point for negotiation. There is no competition. That's the problem. The government sets the baseline for costs. If the government lowered the prices they were willing to pay then the insurance companies would follow suit which would lower the premiums for everyone.  But the government is in bed with the health care and pharma industry and so they won't take a stand.    &gt;I believe that it is unethical to profit from people who are sick.   If you can't profit from sick people then you won't have many doctors. That's why most of teachers in the US suck. There's no money in it so most of the talent goes elsewhere.  I'll agree 100% that US healthcare is in bad shape. But I don't think that government run healthcare is the way to fix it.
Reddit is far more diverse than you'd expect.
I hope this gets more attention.  These folks are apparently friends with a mutual friend in Wyoming.  Reading their story was terrifying.
[deleted]
Hmm while I agree with you on some level, I disagree strongly when the government is footing the bill for overweight and obese people who cannot work due to their condition. They still choose what exercise to do, when to exercise and how often, they just need to *try*.   Say I lived with my parents and they were paying my bills, if they refused to keep paying for me because I wouldn't help with the housework, I would not call that limiting my freedom. 
More like, people actually have access to food and to high-fat food. A hundred years ago, it was a concern whether you get food the next day or not. Now, food is never a concern. Not in rich countries, anyway.   It is reasonable to ask extra money based on whether people do something about being fat or not, but not just on the fact whether they're fat or not. That's not their choice necessarily. You don't discriminate people because of something that they don't have choice over. And there's no way to make a distinction between the two, the government has better things to do than checking whether you've eaten a snickers this week or not. So, don't go ahead of yourself. 
This seems to me to be a bit short-sighted.   Who defines what is crap and what is healthy?   What about the people who only make enough to afford the crap?
We charge everyone the same as well - but just had our insurance cut because the company's expenses on it were far too high due to too many health problems.  Too many overweight and/or older people (average age where I work is much higher than normal, with many over the retirement age).  No individualized program like that at my work though, but I wish there was - certainly not great, but I'm sure I'd get some back.
[deleted]
I grew up calling it soccer in the 1970s (Lancashire/Yorkshire border). Also soccer is from 'Association football' anyway, very much a British term.
Totally true what you say about obesity and comorbidity.  Obesity causes a lot of other problems, as you mentioned.  Diabetes, too.  Sounds like an interesting job, to say the least.  Personally, I'm almost as sickened by the people on disability who shouldn't be as the people milking the government entitlement programs, who shouldn't be.  The difference is that the people you're working with (if I understand correctly) are not receiving tax revenues, and because of that their claims are scrutinized much more closely.
&gt; Everything I read about India is the news these days fills me with rage.  And just how much did you read in the news about India that **wasn't** on Reddit?
Could you back that up with data, please? 
Why so defensive?  
I was asking the guy that made the claim why HE came to that opinion. I do appreciate you attempting to answer for him but it sort of defeats the purpose.  He made the claim and his comment had been upvoted without a shred of proof.  &gt; Most Pakistani govt statements are saying what population wants to hear,  I'd say that's true for just about any government on the planet, including the United States.  That said, I still see no proof or anything that would allow me to believe fairwellIMJA's opinion is fact based.    *The Wikileaks report you cite contains information from 2008, which happens to be 5 years ago.  A lot can happen in five years.  Do they even still have the same Army chief, and, if so, what statements is he on record making regarding the drone strikes in 2011, or 2012, or 2013?
[deleted]
Nicolas Cage, obviously.
Surely, this will end well.
These men were clearly trying to discover the secret KFC recipe.
[deleted]
I'm not too familiar with the history, but I think China still has some oil rigs there? I think in that case they were expecting to just go in and take over, but things didn't go as planned because of various factors.  I just don't see Korea unification a likely possibility in the next...(at least) 10-20 years. The divide between the two countries is much, much bigger than it appears, and it already appears to be quite big. It would be interesting to see how N.Korea goes towards changing its policies, but at its current state its years and decades away from realizing any significant change we outsiders can register, let alone study upon.  The problem with seeing China's policies as interventionist, I feel, is that it's putting the PRC government in a higher pedestal than it really is at. China's strong, but not really strong enough to be imperialist. Correct me if I'm wrong, but if I remember correctly, its military is focused on interception and long range assault, I don't think their sea power is quite that strong yet. That kind of military is good for keep fending off attacks and threatening other nations; for actual war it might need a little bit more actual units in the sea and air. In terms of politics, going off from the past decade or two, China's pretty reluctant to actually do anything besides internal development. I think the exceptions were Tibet and Mongolia, where changing social climates caused some semi-revolutions and protests, but that's because China and a lot of Chinese pretty much consider that land "theirs". The economy aspect of it is kinda lost on me since I haven't kept up with it, but if anything it's very unlikely China can "conquer" any nation through money. They're surrounded by Russia, Japan, India, and some rather wealthy middle east countries. Even at their weakened economy they're still very largely protected from say, if China suddenly sends all its investments into a country and flood out the country's own production, to point out a silly, exaggerated example.
I agree except for the part about *acceptance by their peer* You see as someone who lived years and years in Bangladesh which is right next to Indian and shares similar culture, I can tell you for a fact that rape is not accepted by people. So much so that rape victim don't report it to the police because society will shame them. The perpetrators of rape are also cast-out and castigated by society. Mob-justice happens quite frequently. The one that get away are the well-connected one. But that's true in America, in India, in Bangladesh, and everywhere else.   PS: What I meant by unemployment thing is that when people have nothing better to do, they engaged in malicious things. But that doesn't mean people who are employed don't engage in such things. You know what I meant. 
cry me a river, you want a self declared country that want to destroy israel but also want to move freely to israel universities, hypocrite again.
I'm not being pedantic, you said something, and I responded to it. That's generally how different members of our species interact with each other (though admittedly, I skipped most lectures in my freshman comm class, so maybe I'm wrong about this). 
[deleted]
This made me cry too.  You're right, absolutely nobody deserves to be treated that way... 
You must have been in Saigon.... 
http://www.nationalconfidential.com/20121228/3-teens-charged-with-abducting-gang-raping-woman-on-christmas-night/
Can't believe what kind of ass-holes would downvote this.
http://imgur.com/GH7qM
[deleted]
I don't know why you compare gang rape to this. The baby wasn't hurt, but this poor girl was gang raped and terribly hurt and if she surives, she will be traumatized for life.
Hey why are you insulting the man? 
WTH? I thought this subreddit was made private? And now I can read it again?
Plot twist, he's actually [Quentin Blake](http://www.quentinblake.com)
[deleted]
Ants have cities.
I personally think they do, with CCTV becoming increasingly more high def it becomes more useful. Especially with facial tracking software.
[deleted]
&gt; When kids are abused, most of them actually like it and only when they grow up they realize that it was wrong.   &gt;So sex with children by itself isn't harmful, the current society makes it harmful.  You're just as wrong as Muhammad.  And fucking disgusting, at that.
[deleted]
As an european (italian, actually), i think you are right. Hard to explain at times but it is what it is.
Not really, its usually boys everywhere. Raping a girl is haram. 
Huh! I call BS on this or your friend is stupid. Everyone knows that you can send ipads and laptops for free if you find someone to carry them into India for you and you usually can since there are so many people travelling to India. I have personally taken and sent laptops/ipads/etc without paying a single cent to customs....
This has nothing to do with sweden, did you read the article?
They were in fact taken from Somalia, not Sweden. So quite misleading head line. However, I like how the author of the article try to hide how they had connection with Al-Shabaab which apparently ain't important. - Let them burn...
Perhaps your reading comprehension is poor.
People are the same the world over it seems. Even the Romans had these kinds of problems. I think someone famous once said that democracy works until the point when the people start voting in someone who promises them the most free stuff, then it collapses.
Well I know that they want to leave the past behind, but you know what. There's a point where all the people they killed and all the suffering they committed - it's too much to simply say the past is in the past and I'm going to wash my hands of this blood. The only reason that Mujica was pardoned by the government was because they acknowledged the fact that he was imprisoned in inhumane conditions for 10 years. But if that hadn't happen, I'm positive he and his party would have been tried for violations against humanity.
&gt;actually it was Djibouti, another sovereign nation  You are correct, my African geography is poor.  &gt;and it doesn't matter where they abducted him from. If you are a US citizen and you were kidnapped to face charges in another country without due process, it wouldn't matter that you are in Guatermala and wanted in Belize.  Actually the nation you're a citizen of isn't usually that involved in the process. British citizens were held in Guantanamo for a time. Note that the Australian government has never been involved in Assange's extradition. The key components are what is considered a crime in the host nation and the extraditing nation. Otherwise a US citizen would be able to own a gun in England.  &gt;and it does look like the US would do the same to Assage for espionage charges if they could.  It really looks nothing like that, considering they haven't even tried to extradite him from the UK, would would be infinitely easier than the whole silly 'via Sweden' conspiracy.
You'll be hard-pressed to get the people in this thread calling for the castration of rapists to call for the extermination of retarded people. If they can't even follow their own reasoning why do we listen to what they have to say?
So citizenship only matters if you are in the country you are a citizen of?
i'd love to see a video of this
But he's not even being charged with rape anymore? What do you agree with, that he actually woke her up by having sex with her?
This is not an issue I joke about but if u want ill sit and discuss it with you
It's true, just ask the nazis about [Lebensunwertes Leben](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Life_unworthy_of_life). This is not a road that's really worth going down.
&gt;ultra-orthodox controlling Israel  Everyday it's getting harder and harder to take reddit seriously. Ultra-orthodox or (Haredi as we call them) don't give two shit's about Israel, Palestine or anyone else for that matter. All they care about is handouts from the government, hence all their political platform is built around that. They certainly do not control shit, even more, they don't want to.
Guess what? Mujica doesn't give a fuck what you think. Sticking to your believes an entire life says a lot about his character. I would love for this man to be my president. And I had to choose between a man who robbed banks to support their polically social causes and a guy in a suit who legally robs people blindly to support their lifestyles filled with mansions and yachts, guess who I would pick? 
Yeah, but so many men are terrible, and virgins presumably won't know the difference.  See:  Arabs.
Being Mujica is suffering.
&gt;It's likely they'll be begging to be hanged  One of them cried in court begging to be hanged.
[deleted]
[the offenders are LOSER SINGLE MOMS](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tpHpiMcBUt8)
No, actually, the burden of proof always falls on the affirmative claimant.  Proving universal negatives is impossible, you see, so you have to prove existential positives instead.
Moreover, according to the Indian law, the death sentence should be given only in [rarest of the rare](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Capital_punishment_in_India#Law) cases. Such kind of rape cases are very common in India, [3 Dalit (untouchable / outcaste) women are raped everyday in India](http://salem-news.com/articles/january042013/india-raped-sw.php?utm_source=feedburner&amp;utm_medium=feed&amp;utm_campaign=Feed%3A+Salem-news+%28Salem-News.com%29), so this is not a rare case, leave alone rarest of the rare cases.  [/r/credibleindia](http://www.reddit.com/r/CredibleIndia)
Awe, thanks.  I wish you could meet me too.  But just know, deep down inside all of us, there is a tomanypeople just yearning to breath free.  Embrace and nurture that tiny part of you and someday it will have grown enough to make you seem like an educated person too.
tell me how? no, really. tell me.
He's going to be in for some serious community service work for that.
women usualy pay for me :-) 
[deleted]
If you're misled/deceived into breaking the laws of kashrut, you haven't done anything wrong under Jewish law.  And I seriously doubt the meat in question received a Kosher hechsher so people who really cared about it wouldn't be eating it anyway.  
If one is going to get scratchy about British imperialism, why don't the Argentines hand back Argentina to its indigenous inhabitants? 
His comment seems to be saying that this shouldnt happen in India because its fairly developed. Well, the more people there are the more chance there is of things like this occurring. Kinda like... there are more murders in a big city then a small town. Why? Because there are more people. Think, young grasshopper. 
It really does, though. The US has a long history of horrific violence.
Hey if muhamed did it why not the faithful sauids ?  Child molesting is just the west IMPOSING their religious views on us, poor poor misunderstood followers of ishlam! You infidels better not point that out!
[deleted]
As a computer science student, I feel your pain. Not a single female in my class.
[deleted]
&gt;Right, but that has nothing to do with Hamas being impossible to negotiate or accept as legitimate if you are in Israel's shoes.  It has everything to do with that. Hamas is not impossible to negotiate with or to accept. They simply don't kowtow to Israeli demands as easily as Fatah, so they're not as convenient for Israel to deal with. The first step to peace is always talking with your enemy. Now, Israel may not want peace (because low-level war is quite a nice status quo), but that's a different matter. Plenty of terrorist organizations have become political parties. ANC, South Africa's ruling party, has only been removed from US list of terrorist organizations [in 2008](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/7484517.stm)! 
What happened to this world? 
Sorry, the only joe I know is my grandpa. 
The USS Theodore Roosevelt is nicknamed "the Big Stick".
Russia's economy is like 90% based on oil, if prices go down for a year then their screwed.
Incorrect. Man power is is a quarter of horsepower, and everybody knows, machine power is horsepower^2  So China's 1.3 billion people are equivalent to 18,000 machines give or take.
You do know that the US classifies every adult male killed in a drone strike as a militant?  They could be 15 innocent civilians for all we know, or more likely, 14 random people killed to get one target.
I'm suspicious of the thought processes of anyone relying on name calling to make a point. And yes, if you pay prostitutes, you are in part responsible for their behavior. 
I suspect you are being downvoted because you named the wrong country, but you make a good point.  The problem is that the tribal region of Pakistan near the Afghan border is mostly lawless and the government of Pakistan either can't or won't police it, The article refers to taliban leaders that have come to agreements with Pakistani officials to leave each other alone.  This lawless region is then used as a staging ground for the insurgency in Afghanistan, and a safe haven for militant groups.  I find it interesting that the commander in question was the target of a rival taliban suicide bombing a month ago and people aren't up in arms about that.
The problem with the article you link to is that Jerome Isaac claimed that she owed him money, the article from India is about someone who found it appropriate to burn a woman because she refused his proposal. There is an underlying cultural heritage in this case where punishing women by mutilating her so that no other man will want her, don't deny this.    
As a Briton I apologise all the time, assuming of course I have no intention of offense. Piss me off however and I will go out my way to spite you.
They have your old computer.
Highly unlikely, if you look at the political situation in Germany. The current government is a coalition of the two most conservative business-friendly parties, whose initial plans were to increasing the duration of nuclear energy. If you go for the two biggest oppostion parties in recent polls, they are yet far more against nuclear energy, the smacller of those owes its creation to the protest of nuclear energy and weaponry.
I think the rich should pay more, not 75% however. 
However... the islands have oil...   This makes them valuable. 
&gt;Antivirus software does not need to change much,  That's a specious statement.  The antivirus software from 1994 was expected to run under DOS and Windows 3.1.  You really think that the changes brought about by Windows 95/98/ME/2000/XP/7/8 have not required major functional change to how antivirus software might attempt to ferret out malware?
If the vaccine involves amputating body parts that would be a comparable analogy.  
What a weird conversation that was. His "joking" threats really freaked me out. My bet is on the paranoid psychotic break caused by whatever he was cooking up in his drug lab.  Edit: it's not funny when an apparently insane millionaire outlaw accused of murder says he's gonna "come get you."
Im convinced this whole thing is part of an historically epic troll. I think he's fried from drugs and is just making up everything.   I heard him on the Joe Rogan Experience and he was clearly out of his mind. 
This guy spoke at my graduation (Roanoke College, 2008.) He was an amazing speaker, best graduation speech I've ever heard. 
Not what I'd call alarming...
Really? is it true that most are for that? For some reason, when I've visited r/mensrights, misogynistic posts are largely upvoted. 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dJnklyxbcL8
That's a good episode, Peter Serafinowicz is in it.
[deleted]
What reports of FSA killing Alawites and Sunni's?? All they have done is execute Shabiha and given their circumstances that was and still is the best option. They even let army members go back to their hometown to protect their families as they know that many were forced to fight, it's just the shabiha who do these terrible things. The FSA also have not raped anybody yet the Shabiha have raped so many thousands of women it has just become another overlooked statistic (they also rape men and children, and this has all been documented). The FSA has not executed civilians nor has it tortured civilians yet the number of civilians tortured to death by the Shabiha is already at 1386 since the uprising began, and more than a quarter of this number were under the age of 18. I have heard harrowing accounts of Syrians who've said they only want to commit suicide due to all the torture (and with it emotional and phsychological damage) they've suffered under Assad yet they are postponing this until after Assad falls due to all the people who still need aid.  And what's wrong with Libya? In the parliamentary elections the National Forces alliance, which is a liberal, secular union, won the election 39 out of the 80 seats while the muslim brotherhood only won 17 seats. 18% of Libya's parliament is female, do you know what other country's parliament is 18% female? **the USA**. true everything is not smooth in Bani Walid and there is some infighting with the tribes around Ajdabiya and Sabha but given what it's come out of and all the challenges the country has faced Libya has done remarkably well.  It is just since the US ambassador was killed that hostility towards the country is a lot more common, but it was a planned Al-Qaeda attack, not by the Libyan people. dozens (around 50 or so) were arrested afterwards (if anything it shows that the authorities were taking action), and 30,000 people protested against the killing less than a week after it occured.
Sita's treatment isn't "ironic" - it is emblematic of a misogynistic, patriarchal culture where women are property that can and should be discarded if blemished or even perceived to be blemished.
Next we find out she is paid by the Russian mob so she criminalizes so they can come in and provide forced illegal prostitution.
Err...what proof do you want? That killing Pakistani soldiers inside Kasmir by India does not usally happen? Google it. It happens only when there is cross-border firing(which happens rarely now-a-days). If any soldier from either country crossed the border(LOC) there would be war.  &gt;negative but true? (proof please)  Please have a look at his comment history.  &gt;and was the girl high or low caste in the end? And since when did the "caste" system disappear? From what i've heard it's still giant problem.  Did I said that it disappeared. But it wasn't in anyones mind in that rape case. He was using it to spread misinformation and non-Indians who didn't know any better were lapping it up. And it wasn't done out of ignorance but only to malign a country.  &gt;And I love how people down vote for asking you to provide any proof.  I didn't downvote you.
it's *common-knowledge* that was Correa being a moron and inciting a riot by insulting already pissed off Police officers at their own precinct. Of course this was after he slashed a whole bunch of benefits from them. Only a true moron like him would incite such a riot in front of 2 hospitals. Please do some research before you putting on your tin-foil hat.
Genius!
Sounds like the 19th century in here...
&gt;little miss Rape Rape  God you're an asshole.
We broke the web...
[deleted]
had me worried for a while there.
no country has ever gone to war for a good enough reason since WW2. there me be other things they achieved while fighting, such as freedom for those people, but the actual reason anyone goes to war these days is for some fucking oil
at anything less than 10m I'll take a knife any day
Video or it didn't happen.
Holy hell, 6 cents a gallon in Venezuela? I could fill my car on a buck or two.
Post like yours are the reason the internet sucks. Take your non sequitur elsewhere please.
nice not answer my question.
yep, paid close to $100 for a petrol tank today (belgium, ~ 80euros), and yes, thats diesel. Unleaded is even more expensive.  2 tanks a week, thats nearly $1000 a month. fun fun fun.
As a Brazilian, there was no surprise there.   Chile is one of the best places to live in South America.   But I personally prefer São Paulo's night scene. 
I seriously wonder what will happen to these countries in the middle east once the oil production declines significantly...    
Am I okay with what? Saying that black people in the US have a ridiculously high rate of crime per capita? Why wouldn't I be?
Your family would throw a shitstorm even if they knew you were a militant. That's what families do when someone gets killed. No one is going to admit that their brother/father/son was a targeted correctly.  If a militant lived in my country I would expect them to be arrested and given trial. But in these areas, where militants have easy and widespread access to weapons, support and numbers, would you ask the police/ military to risk the lives of officers/ troops to attempt to bring him in?  Drones are a surgical way of doing this. There is no risk to the operators, and the accuracy and position of over watch allows the operator to watch for civilians. Because the strike happens without warning, the victims have no chance to to avoid or escape it. targets can be trailed until their is minimal chance for civilians to get out. This isn't happening in rural USA, but in one of the most violent regions of the world. Tribal areas of Pakistan are almost a law unto themselves. It isn't always possible to bring people in for trial. Its a sad fact.  We cant ignore the problem, and no one is willing to devote the political will, money, or troops (and inevitable lives) on an alternative.   Drone strikes are not perfect, their not even good, but their the best we are willing to do. I don't like it, but I cant see a realistic alternative.  Also please for a reasoned argument instead of a poorly out of context analogy/story and ad hominems.
So you TLDR my comment then expect me to take you seriously? Cool story asshole. Clearly there is no discussion to be had here.
Fair enough. I really don't care who did it.
the dude was 23
I'm pretty sure the entire continent of Africa should be the brightest shade of red possible. 
It's a strawman for easy debate points.  Repeat the worst argument you hear against something, disagree for an easy win, and overlook all the complexities of the situation.  All that matters is that you appear right /s.
Ha. ha ha... :(
[deleted]
To be humane is not just to take care of our own kind (humans) but to recognize our unique position (higher level thinking/consciousness/self-aware/intelligence) in the world and our ability to make it a better place for not only ourselves but for every living thing to the best of our ability.
I find the Peter Tosh case much more compelling. 
Does anyone know the best elephant conservation groups that work to stop the poaching? Is this one legit? http://www.bloodyivory.org/ ? I want to help to end the poaching somehow but don't know the most effective way to proceed. 
Christ, and I thought victim blaming in the US was bad. Parasites. 
We have a "free" healthcare it is your own choice to pay extra for a platinum (or what ever it is called now) insurance - that basicly gives you ....   It's not really free as you pay taxes (unless ofc you have a way to legally dodge them ... )
Okay. I'm not Indian. 
from the docu King of Kong.  great movie
[deleted]
Link doesnt seem to be working for me.
And Homer, if you could kill someone on your way out that would be a great help.
No you're talking sense. Same with outsourcing the managing of prisons == profit! They ain't giving that money up thank you very much!
Real life counter-strike! I'm so down.
No.  It says falsely accused, not wrongly convicted.  I'm assuming that is the number of people that were found not guilty at trial.
Do you realise that the dailymail is seen as a 'joke' news source in the UK? 
Church is a Christian institution, so yes, that could be the first one or at least one of the first.
Have you never witnessed a drunk person unable to fully control themselves?
อาคารพาณิชย์ให้เช่าในเขตพื้นที่กรุงเทพมหานคร แอคคิวท์ เรียลตี้ เป็นแหล่งรวบรวมข้อมูลอาคารพาณิชย์ให้เช่า ที่ตั้งอยู่ในย่านธุรกิจที่สำคัญ สุขุมวิท สาทร สีลม เพลินจิต ราชดำริ พญาไท อารีย์ รัชดาภิเษก ลาดพร้าว รามคำแหง ศรีนครินทร์ บางนา ใกล้สถานีรถไฟฟ้า BTS และรถไฟฟ้าใต้ดิน MRT ทั้งแบบตกแต่งพร้อมใช้งานหรือตกแต่งบางส่วน หลากหลายขนาด หลากหลายสไตล์ และหลากหลายราคา แสดงรายละเอียดครบถ้วน พร้อมรูปภาพประกอบ เพื่อง่ายต่อการตัดสินใจ
the guy is 90... isnt it more semantics than anything else? ok she is married and he has a piece of paper while he slowly dies. 17K is a pretty low number so i cant even argue that her parents are getting a good deal with a guy who will be dead in a couple years. 
Surprising?
Had to log in to upvote this and only this.
Come to Australia, where the internet is awful, expectations are high, and travel to anywhere else in the world is expensive.  Admittedly, those are all pretty first-world problems 
Poacher hunting sounds relaxing. I'm in. 
American here, 31. I lived and worked in Australia for a year, 29-30. Regret leaving, it's the best place in the world. Beach, beer, and laughs.
It saddens me that my country is one of the lowest 
What double standard? They pay in oil, the west pays in weapons or cold hard cash. Nothing hard to understand about that.
[deleted]
all of that applies unless you are an infant or very elderly person with less ability to do those things, and these are the people who die usually
Its more that last year and last winter were wet (remember the floods?) so there has been much growth in the bush - which gives fuel for a good, fast, fire when La Nina switches to El Nino (although we are actually only in an intermediate state) and things dry out.
No, no it's not.
[deleted]
Something I read:   30 is hot,  20 is nice,  10 is cold,  0 is ice.
[deleted]
Only a matter of Time until the next holy war will be started.
Is there anything in Australia that isn't a direct hazard to human life?   As far as I can gather snakes, trees, crocks, jellyfish, sharks, plants, the water, shells, spiders, et.al. are all in some horrible way a direct danger to you if it originates from Australia. Now add to this the weather itself. 
I'm in Ontario, quiet a few people call it that. 
STRAYA KUNT
It's funny because the Maldives is another Islamic country that has to sell out their barbaric beliefs to tourism.  No-one would actually visit that place if they faced flogging and so they are unable to punish the millions of tourists who have unmarried sex in hotels. The double standard makes this even more ridiculous: that they will beat a woman to within an inch of her life while a dozen couples are fucking in nearby hotels.  It's a shitty law and a shitty punishment that isn't even consistently and fairly applied. Muslims need to call this shit out if they want to be taken seriously in the world. If you're Muslim and think flogging is barbaric then make your voice heard, because it's things like this that tarnish the entire religion.
&gt; Realistically speaking, nothing will change anytime soon  Not really. I'm from India. This is the first time people are outraged over victim-blaming. Earlier, the majority opinion was "Rape only happens to loose girls". This time though, there is a significant change in the majority opinion.   Even well-known conservative right-wingers did not dare blame the girl. The rapists in question are swiftly caught by the police and have confessed as well, so no chance of delayed justice or changing of witnesses or evidences that could have happened. 
We just don't have Mc.donalds in Iceland
But since the house is centrally heated anyway wouldn't that happen every year, cold winter or no?
Macca here: Can confirm
I have read RamCharitManas and it does have that version of event.
It's always been acknowledged that most of the main characters in the Mahabharata are either anti-villains or anti-heroes. You always have to look at the characters with a grain of salt. 
I cen't believe this erticle desn't mintion NZ  (sorry, horrible attempt)  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vowel_shift  Someone edit that!  Edit: "Chilly Bin"?!?!?!  "Jandals"  WTF?!?  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/New_Zealand_English#Differences_from_Australian_English
I feel like 55% is a low estimate.  I don't think I've ever heard it called McDonald's down there.
We're blaming the movies now? For fucks sake, these people are just cunts raised by shitty parents.
Believe me, I agree totally. Take a look of my older posts here about the US. Think I got 90 downvotes/karma just because I discuss with americans about their politics etc. But hey, I don't care about some internet karma points. I just hope I get thru to just one of them.  A functional justice system, in every country is something that I hope we all wish for. Sadly, this is not the case as we know. In this case is it something like the "catch 22". If the got prosecuted where the were with the terrorist organisation. I doubt that they even would be prosecuted, those countries is very corrupted.  If they get prosecuted in the US they will probably face the death penalty (which is an other discussion, but hey, one can not say that yu can't take another persons life, and if you do, they take your life. It is just plain...wrong) or sent to Gountanamo Bay.  So, keep doing what they are doing or probably sittin' at Guantanamo Bay. I don't know. As I said, terrorism is always wrong. Nothing good can come out from it. Neither can war such as the war in Iraq (hey, still waiting for those weapons of mass destruction) and Afghanistan.  Well, sorry for going slight off topic. But I agree (and never disagreed), USA is not some kind of world police and does not have any rights outside the US borders to "arrest" people. They did not have any right to attack Iraq either, specially not when the UN and their expert Hans Blixt said over and over that there were no weapons of mass destruction.   But this situation, I somehow go with it. These people that claimed that they were Swedish (worng, they are from Somalia) are pretty dangerous. They are prepered to do anything for their belives, killing innocent people (which the US does also I know). AS I said before, war etc is never the answer. Whatever you are, a whole country or an small group of people fighting with guns etc.  But I don't have an answer for all this. But I got a wish. End all wars, keep your religion for your self, don't kill people because they believe anything different from you. So yeah, democracy all around is a start. A PROPER democracy. But slowly slowly iI think (and hope) we are moving towrds it. Look at the middle-east, some real changes going on there. But nothing happens over night.   Last but not least, the leaders around the world have to take more resbonsability. Put the foot down and set some things straight! Not just talk about it.  But I'm really positive, Obama got 4 more years. Best thing that could happen, imagine if Romney would have won. A president whom are member of an religous sect. He want to move backwards. Take away people's rights (gay people for example) etc.   I think Obama really can do a change. And hey, talking about presidents. George W. Bush should be prosecuted in Haag for crime against the humanity and other things. No doubt about it. If any other leader in the world would do what he did, they would sit an root in a cell after their trial in the Haag.  End of this long message. Yeah come on, down vote me, I don't care. I just hope after the down vote you take a moment to read all this and go around the internet and search for the truth.  Peace and take care!  (Sorry for misspelling and grammar mistakes, my native languge is Swedish. Learn it, if you do I would never point out if you misspell ;) I would respect you for learning an other language, think about it)
There's still a Burger King in Melbourne as well!
I don't quite see what point you're trying to make. Individual banks are not reliant on a single client, they are interconnected with one another. Allowing a large one to fail spectacularly in the middle of a recession would not be a good thing. Credit markets would have frozen even worse than they did and the GDP drop would have continued on for longer.
HA HA touché
I was being sarcastic... 
Unfortunate speech processing disability. Is it a genetic thing with Australians, because of that whole criminal ancestor deal?
http://youtu.be/-AIyK9wPVaE
It does. But here it's not illegal to be gay yet, so instead of going to jail, a bunch of rednecks beat you and tie you to their truck before dragging you to death. 
Murder is OK to you? Something is wrong with your ethics.
[deleted]
Let me guess, you're thirty one?
They should [hire her.]  (http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=irm3JuhaD40&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player) 
Wait so what country was this in? 
Except it isn't. Bigoted southern police make little to no attempt to find and prosecute killers of minorities or homosexuals. The crimes are "unsolved" in a huge disproportion to white killings. 
Yes -20 to 40, what a natural and not arbitrary scale.  Do you start counting from -20 in your country?
*Oh*, you better believe that's a paddlin'.
[deleted]
As much as I feel for him, his name is Levison, he's from the USA and thought going to Iran was a good idea to investigate organized crime?   Sorry bud, not the best judgment call.
Seriously? That would explain the completely un-manageable serve of buffalo wings I was served.  Makes sense with the ass over tit way they write the date.
I doubt the people who think these Bollywood films are messed up would be OK with 40's-60's movies either.
My hearts goes out to them, really.
That was a terrible read. This women clearly has no idea about even the basic principles underlying medicine, and encouraging others to avoid medicine is only going to kill other children.
I am speaking of the incidents in question here. I am not making any general statements. Perhaps read and understand what is written ?  FWIW historically Pakistan has always been the aggressor so what you think I am saying is not entirely without merit. 
You just don't want to accept it because it makes you uncomfortable that your perspective is illogical.  You're rejecting causality completely for anything that you arbitrarily choose to apply the label victim to, or so it appears. With anything else if your actions significantly contribute to unfavorable results you're to blame to the extent those actions predictably do so. Why would it be different because you use the word victim?
Someone should call Liam Neeson. I heard hes good with wolves.   Also, I wouldn't mind hunting some wolves in Siberia. It's for a good cause. 
Wow nice comeback you typed out. Definitely a future in writing if being white trash ever gets boring. 
anyone notice how the girl looks kinda downie? Maybe this book is actually code to have retarded parents kill off their worthless crotch fruit.
An ethnically Bengali ex-muslim lady here, wanted to chime in:  &gt; it's customary for bride to cry during her wedding. If she doesn't cry, then she's considered too forwarded and too open-minded about sex and shits. My sister got married a while ago to a guy she chose herself. She cried like a banshee on her wedding day. Not because she was being forced to marry this guy. But because she was going to miss her family that she know since birth.  My cousin just got married 2 weeks ago, and  even though they're both Australian-Bengali, she cried for the same reason.   &gt;t the love Bangladeshi/Muslim parents feel for their children is no way different than the love American/non-Muslim parents feel for their children.   Sure, there's universal love, but it's true that traditional Bangladeshi/Muslim feel love differently- they don't treat the child as a growing human being capable of forming their own opinions and decisions. (Obviously generalizing here, but it's true for the vast majority)  I know you're trying to civilly shed light to some misconceptions, but all the generalizations have a kernel of truth to them. Personally (and I know it's true for others as well), if I were to bring home and introduce a guy officially as a boyfriend- my parents would have a heart attack, disown me and possibly kick me out. The worst part would be the shame they would feel on behalf of me for westernizing (even though they're liberal enough to watch Modern Family together). It's the Bengali/Muslim mentality that I still can't fully escape because I know they love me and I them, but the residual feelings of guilt remain even though I tried washing off most of my indoctrination.    You seem like you understand why people behave the way they do, therefore I hope you'll be part of the solution by not sticking to barbarity, archaic gender/societal roles and consider moving away from the religion/parts of the culture that's deterring humanity's social progress.
Rapist here, I can confirm this.   On a completely unrelated side-note, do you live alone? 
nope.  having a large family is a sign of high infant mortality rate.   In countries where wealth can buy health, you are right. But think ancient civilisations; think harems; think Ghengis Khan.
shut up you muslim arab scum. id shout it on a loud speaker you fucking muslim dog. and you know what? when they start acting like the fucking animals they are, it will reaffirm the worlds opinion that islam is a religion of hate.   fuck you, your bastard child mohammed and SHIT and PISS and HELL be upon allah your faggot god.
You jumped into a conversation I was having with someone else, so yes, we are talking about Iraq.  As for "Iraq was done and over with quite some time ago", the mind boggles. Your ignorance is literally staggering.
Only in the west for the most part. I wouldn't say African are living longer/happier.
&gt;Ones that might put nationalist interests ahead of ours? Ones like Iran in 1953? Not a chance imho.   That's what I mean.  All they want is a stable and *reliable* trading partner.  Someone who nationalizes their commodities for example would not be reliable.
Yes, it is.
She's 57, she can make her own decisions!
Again, you are not part of the political process.   Who gives a fuck what you think?  
given their high respect for the arts in their history of [politicians,](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Václav_Havel) I hope to see the mohawked lizard man win this.
On the other hand he went public and claimed that the shooter went to the rooms his mother taught in, which is just as much talking out of his ass.
That was the whole point of the movement, right? Things like this don't change overnight. 
That is probably accurate - I'll give you that. But in reality, as people get wealthier (and people in developing to moderately developing countries will get wealthier - think the rising industries in China, India and Brazil), they demand more goods that require more energy, water, land etc. For example, people will be eating more meat (because they can afford it), which will subsequently require more land, energy, water etc. At that rate, even with the slowing rate of human growth, the Earth might be able to sustain approx. 4-5 billion people (it is estimated that if everyone lived like North Americans do, the Earth could sustain 2.5 billion people). Just because the Earth is geophysically and biophysically able to sustain 12 billion people at a certain standard of living DOES NOT MEAN that people will inherently live that way. It's a mindset.
Not at all, it really has nothing to do with women being seen as property. In the middle east that might be the case, but in many countries, women very much WANT to marry a wealthy man, because of perceived security and opportunities it will bring to children.  Certainly not an "enlightened" way of thinking in my opinion, but it doesn't necessary correlate to women being treated as property. I live in an Asian country, and the number of women that have flat out suggested marriage to me is beyond belief - their parents have nothing to do with it. Maybe a different case in the middle east, but this sort of thing has many different forms.
The point is moot. As a nation develops they consume more resources thus the problem still remains the same; either a large population of low consumption or a small population of high consumption. Neither proposes a solution to decrease consumption particularly since economic constructs encourage it. 
Nothin worse than a shitcock, I say. If only the put it where it was intended we wouldn't have this problem. 
The happiest place on Earth my ass.
China was one of the first civilizations in human history, and has always been one of, if not THE most successful and wealthy since its genesis.  China has always far surpassed the rest of the world in technology and advancement until perhaps the past few hundred years, when they grew isolationist and fell behind the Europeans.  After European intervention, China fell behind and has in the past 50 years been trying to catch up to their former dominance.
They aren't just shooting them then throwing the carcasses in the ocean. Thousands of cattle are killed every day just because they live on a ranch. They shouldn't have been there in the first place and they fucking up other animals that didn't choose for those reindeer to be there in the first place. The way I see it, it the most responsible thing to do. These aren't reindeer they are a couple hundred pound vermin. 
So I should spank her first?
haha!!
[deleted]
The problem is that the line between the phrases "it's not the worst thing in the world if..." to "I'm going to personally make sure that..." gets blurry the stronger the emotional desire for vengeance is (due how personal the situation, for example), compared with the rational desire for a fair trial and due process.  Fundamentally though, both phrases are derived from the same emotional desire.  Therefore, the only way to truly prevent ourselves from going down that path to reckless vigilantism is to recognize that regardless of magnitude, they are both cathartic indulgences, and to remain steadfast to what you truly believe is right.  edit: clarification
&gt; Reddit is jam packed with idiots.  Reddits biggest problem is that the popular opinion is automatically assumed to be the correct one.
I got gold for [mixing fake Twitter accounts, Mitt Romney and Harry Potter](http://www.reddit.com/r/photoshopbattles/comments/13kno4/mitt_romney_on_a_disneyland_ride/c74v2vt)      #OccupyMalfoyManor
I think he was going for Half-Life 2.
Now this is crappy reporting, What happens next to the gang? Huh, huh? Damn lazy ass reporters!
&gt;They just like to point out that it is extremely rare and therefore when someone says that they have been raped we should not automatically assuming that they are lying about it  No they just shame you if you ever doubt someone's rape story (and they're not the only ones).
Who **THOUGHT** they had been accused? Really? Surely you can come up with something more reliable than that.
&gt;People who are stupid enough to advocate for political correctness need to be killed.
[deleted]
Ban all feet and hands they are death machines!!!
If girl falsely accused someone of rape and that person got punished, girl then should legally be raped.
Not having the same effect it used to!
[deleted]
What? I made no such demands from anyone and I have done nothing but say that being falsely accused of rape is a terrible thing to happen to you. My only point was that I fear opening up rape victims to investigations of false allegations when their case doesn't go through would only serve to increase the amount of unreported rapes. We'd have to be very careful to have very clear evidence that proves the accuser lied and did it with malicious intent. Anything else would do nothing more than further stack the odds against the rape victim when they already have to deal with people calling them liars and victim blaming.  Edit: forgot a word.
Rape never has evidence when the rapist just says it was consensual sex. That's the issue. A rapist can be cleared but infact be completely guilty. Sad truth. 
I'm tired... thought it said sex prisons.
True but he does have a lot of sway with the general Kurdish public. Btw please join /r/Kurdistan if you're interested in Kurdish issues.
A lot of women also falsely recant. There is no way to tell whether or not she is telling the truth without being tested.
People travel all over china all the time, but if you get stopped and turned back you at least know it's a secretive thing, and then you ask the locals about it and find out :) 
At first I thought they are actually putting those laborers in a kiln if they can't pay their debt.
Doesn't sound like anyone forced these people to take out the loans so why should they be just wiped out? That would be unfair on their creditors and they're hardly going to learn finanical responsibility that way. Also:  &gt; Their current debt stands at 20,000 rupees — about $200, but to Bibi and Sadiq it might as well be $2 million. The family gets 500 rupees, about $5, for every 1,000 bricks it produces. That's about $7.50 for a grueling eight hours of work.   So they could actually pay off these *staggering* debts with about three weeks hard work? Almost as bad as certain college kids I know complaining about their 'impossible' student loans between bong hits.
THIS!~
Redditor for 1 hour; this comment posted 52 minutes ago.
Ahh I needed a good laugh today, thanks. So when was the last successful action taken against a supermarket that sold a cucumber that was bent beyond 10 degrees? 
Given the proximity to the residential area and the arrid landscape, and my penchant for science-fiction and paranoia, I would reckon it is either a highly efficient prototype for a fully operational geothermal power station, or maybe, just maybe, a terraforming station and they will attempt to fill that basin with water again.  Also the possibility exists that is a highly efficient operating 3-D printing manufacturing facility.  Just some thoughts.  Oh look a rangoon! 
&gt; former feminist  &gt; Manipulation of research by [biased group] to promote their own agendas  &gt; Evidence that clearly and conclusively proves that all feminists are evil, and that generalizing feminism as bad, despite it being by definition a movement for equal rights between genders, is great and not at all an excuse to be a sexist ass.  There will always be extreme representatives of any groups. There will also be people who claim to be things they are not; there were violent civil rights activists, that doesn't mean that the black civil rights movement was evil. The Westboro Baptist Church claims to protest out of a belief in God...it doesn't make them Christian or representative of Christianity.
True assholeism isn't confined to one gender but we are talking about men in this case.
&gt;His point is that the Palestinian leadership is not simply trying to achieve a sovereign and prosperous Palestine, rather, their goal is to destroy Israel, as well.  The Palestinian Authority has repeatedly stated its support for a two-state solution. This means that Israel continues to exist, as well as the State of Palestine. So, you're lying.
From the Chinese Ministry of State Security, nothing to see hear...
Not sure what you are trying to say? It was the Palestinians homeland aswell as their literal home.
Haha.  You twist facts so hard to suit your shit argument.  This isn't about Zionism.  Palestinians want the UN when it works for them and don't want it when it doesn't.  There is a Palestinian state now according to the UN.  I'm sure people rally around that statement here in r/worldnews.  They can go to that Palestinian state.  However, their leader won't let them.
Actually is Eurasia
just goan fuck yourself.
Because the food at China Buffet definitely came from China.
Good. I want to know what they're saying before they fuck me!
it's pronounced like ball-cat, we sometimes jokingly even call it bola-gato (ball-cat in a exact transation) to talk about it
&gt;Normally living in subpar living conditions would make you a NICER, more COMPASSIONATE person, rather than a complete dick.  Why would it do that?
Who says I'm trying to be funny?  I honestly feel that this is an opportunity the American people should *not* pass up.
Yeah, I regret linking it as I've since been told that the data in it is massively manipulated. However, if you have a look around on the 'net there are some studies that appear to be better conducted. No body can give a good rate it appears, but it seems that the numbers of 8-10% of reports are later deemed false. Which is a horribly high number! But it is also not a majority. And most studies do seem to point to a lot of actual rapes going unreported. Make of all that what you will.
you're missing the point...  the "friendzone" doesn't actually exist, because men and women can't actually be friends; closest thing is "friends with benefits" which is more accurately described as a non-exclusive relationship.  it starts from the man wanting sex, but not being willing to be honest about; he'll go out of his way to pretend that he's nice hoping the woman will repay his "niceness" with sex.  the woman realizes what he's doing, and decides to not be honest either; she'll lead him on in hopes of getting whatever she can out of him.  eventually the truth is revealed and neither of them want anything to do with the other one.
"Not perfect"  Interesting way to describe a system that actively tries and gets 90% of it's convictions without trials.  "Which country is better in that respect?"  Canada, France, Germany, Norway, Sweden, Finland, and the United Kingdom.  Just to name a few.  "Americans just love to punish people."  Yeah, but they aren't concerned with actual justice.  IIRC, around 1% of the population is in jail right now and there are more African Americans in jail than there are in college.  It's shows where our priorities really are.
She was accused of smothering a baby. Then she was convicted on the basis of signing a confession that was in a language she couldn't even read.  Maybe she killed the baby. Maybe she didn't. Did you actually read the article or were you too caught up in your bullshit sense of vigilante justice?
They forced her to sign a confession in a language she could not read. If she killed the baby is unclear. Babies do choke on food/drinks all the time.
Extreme comment made to spark controversy, but there is an *actual* issue with Roma that needs to be solved. Dramatizing and bringing to the forefront fringe voices does little other than to casually dismiss the problem.
After the 1962 war between India-China, China did its first test in 60s, India in 70s. It was more made as a deterrent against Chinese attack, than Pakistan. Pakistan followed suit.   Lets see. China got its bomb because of Soviet Russia/US. India got because of China, and Pakistan got because of India. And tomorrow some taliban in Afghanistan will be sitting on a bomb "because of Pakistan". You never know. Though I am sure the odds are pretty less. 
[deleted]
So is it secure or isn't it? The article seems to imply that it's a security vulnerability.
[deleted]
I feel this article is a terrible introduction to the grassroots movement against local political corruption and mismanagement of resources and funds known as the Idle No More campaign.  It's a campaign rooted in the devastation of the environment, financial waste at best and corruption at worst within the community of tribal leaders, a government that will not discuss any tabled legislation related to the issues for decades, and a total lack of public awareness about the cultural and economic issues facing first nations people.  Here are some better sources of information than your opinion article.  http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2013/jan/06/canadian-pm-first-nations-protests  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Idle_No_More  http://idlenomore.ca/index.php/articles/item/58-press-release-idle-no-more
Highly unlikely – see my below post for more details, but the US is highly, highly unlikely to support Japan either militarily or politically in any first strike scenario, and still very unlikely to offer any form of military support if China engages. Everyone – China, Japan, and the United States – knows that this is already a zero-sum game. At most, the US would recognize past treaties with Japan that Japan claims gives them control over the islands in the event of a Chinese attempt to seize them, which is in and of itself a ridiculous proposition.  An actual, full-scale military action, is highly unlikely. But as it stands now, which would leave them both standing alone, it would be a stalemate. China's Navy and Air Force are not very well equipped or trained (see: old Soviet equipment and doctrine) and Japan's defense force – sophisticated though it may be (see: maintenance and upgrade agreements with United States, plus training exchanges with most Western nations) – is small. Worst case scenario, as the tiff stands today, there are one or two skirmishes of some sort and then everyone goes home cranky and reaping their sweet, sweet fresh crop of nationalism.
[deleted]
You are right. After re-reading context, I realized I'm being an idiot. 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Climate_science_opinion2.png  http://scienceblogs.com/deltoid/2009/01/20/97-of-active-climatologists-ag/
Then that means nobody has a right to life.  Duties do not preclude rights. Rights, especially absolute rights as posted in the international declaration of human rights are inalienable and self-evident.   Obviously, they depend on being ratified by the host nation, in which case America chooses to ratify the UNHDR with the addendum that they are allowed to execute people. This obviously means they choose to downplay the importance of the UNDHR - whether this is of concern to you or not really depends on how much importance you value in your human rights, and whether you ultimately feel the society you live in should uphold those rights.
just because he doesn't take them does not mean he didn't creep, he was the man handling the creep shots.
Pretty sure we would all have a shitload of rape if our police force didn't work.
It's not the fact that change is occurring that's the problem, it's the rate of change. This means that neither humans, animals or plant life has time to adapt and if no action is taken, will die out. We are not simply capable of adapting to the kinds of changes that could occur.   And yes, if every single green policy was implemented then we would indeed slow the rate of change to something that we could adapt to. Have you even read the IPCC's report?
And you're busy making fake accounts because you're so entirely concerned with them as well.
[deleted]
Well said.  Thanks for sharing your insight.
Too much [immigration](http://www.cairn.info/revue-population-english-2004-5-page-635.htm), or too much [emigration](http://www.nsf.gov/statistics/nsf00318/c2s1.htm)?
Outdated but still relevant: http://www.reddit.com/r/civ/comments/101qt0/todays_news_in_video_games_xpost_from_rgaming/
The same thing happens with huge business that have been owned by a particular *white* family for generations:   Some *white* kid turns 18, and he/she gets a multi-*hundreds*-of-thousand  dollar payout.     Sometimes they call it a "trust fund."    (In fact, you could think of the "Tribal Government" as not too unlike a private corporation, whose assets are owned collectively by a very large extended family.) 
ALGERIA (next door neighbor to MALI) -- Hydrocarbons have long been the backbone of the economy, accounting for roughly 60% of budget revenues,  SOURCE: USA CIA Factbook  https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/ag.html  OIL  OIL  OIL  France is NOT going to pay a lot for this OIL  Defending Mother Europe against Islamists? Not so much, derp
There are tons of private Chinese business owners too, wherever they go in the world. They even (I think) invented the idea of corporations a thousand years ago.*  *During the Song Dynasty many citizens invested into buying one trading ship as "shareholders" and the "CEO" (captain) led the crew in trade and everyone involved profited.
Yea, take another bong hit and tell yourself you're saving the planet.
Why would France launch an airstrike in the mall?
I'm pretty sure that's out of bounds...
Slowly changing, why can't people get this part? It's not gonna change overnight!
Yeah...always gotta watch the damn videos I guess.  I was up past proper redditing hours haha (Or more properly, didn't have coffee).  I also have a weird aversion to watching videos...If it had been an article, I would've read it.  Also, the scholar part mostly kicks in when you start paying me ;)
 Je m'appelle muhamed
Their are a filthy parasitic(literally) culture that refuse to conform to the cultures they infest and steal from.
[deleted]
It's does look like it, let's prepare our swimming suits...Jeddah Rules!
The saddest part about the truth you tell (which I applaud you for doing), is the fact that it is that very privileged attitude that causes this kind of tragedy and why I will no longer put my foot down when people unfairly put out judgements on the Islamic people of the middle east.   http://www.asiantribune.com/news/2013/01/11/saudi-tv-went-live-execution-rizana-nafeek
scam alert
yeah we know
Do you know how hard it is to film a budget sitcom with a working subway set?  Come on
[deleted]
Good luck getting the money to invest in solar power and build transmission lines everywhere when eco groups get on your case  We haven't explored all the available options for nuclear reactors. Modern reactors (look up Gen IV and Gen V reactors) don't "produce" radioactivity (which is not even the largest issue) and are much safer (in that they can't melt down).   Many redditors would mention thorium fission (look up LFTR reactor). You see fission is really easy. We have it semi figured out.. fusion.. not so much.  Also, I think we're a LONG way from having all of our food be made in factories. It will take time for people to switch, and there will always be a market for "naturally grown" food. Like you said, we need a "stopgap" for this.
Life is better for the people that did the rape and pillaging. They now have the spoils from that.
I'm curious to know how residents in Beijing, or even Chinese who read these articles from other cities react to these phenomena.  I wonder if this brings open discussion about global warming, heavy industry near their homes, lack of environmental regulations and other important issues.  Im just not sure what the level of awareness is in China or if people are demanding change.
I have no idea. I don't moderate there. I'd guess (and I repeat: GUESS) it may have had something to do with the "Reddit cofounder" part and someone thinking it was misleading, but that would be a stupid decision, in my opinion.  TL;DR: I dunno, lemme make a really wild, random guess.
While the majority of their citizens live in poverty, whose lives are dominated by cartel warfare, disease, and corruption. Great job on the air though!
&gt;goat-fucking neanderthal from some shitty country  hahahaha. my country is the uk. god you're a hypocrite. go back to 4chan you damn racist.
[deleted]
So was I, born and raised in Mexico City. And if ever we were caught littering by our mother we'd receiver some nice cinturonasos. But I speak from observation and experience when I say that the people that littler are aware of what they're doing. They just don't care. So if by education you mean their upbringing and not academic procedures then I completely agree with you. 
[Well played.] (http://static4.fjcdn.com/comments/well+played+well+played+_d41ebe3c5301f6d62668a863aad4ebf5.png)
[deleted]
Well when you use the real numbers it doesn't make as much sense, somehow people are adding a good 1000 extra people to the population. Plus the yearly fees they receive from the mine next door, etc.  I wish I could find it but someone did the math between that town and Toronto, and more was spent per person there than in Toronto.
Great user name, patriarchal tool.
Since when did France have that many pious Catholics?
[deleted]
Christianity is mostly collapsing around the world where people are wealthy and well educated. The same could happen in Muslim countries within a few generations. In that case religion as a whole would be marginalised and the details you mention may seem to be a small matter to the surviving believers.
I'm not in favor of any governments legalizing gay marriage.  But hear me out.  I'll go a step further: I'm against any government sanctifying any marriages of any kind.  Marriage is a religious construct, and I think all governments should be completely secular.  What I *am* in favor of is government enforcing civil contracts between any number of consenting adults.  So.  You want to get married to another person of your own gender?  Or 8 or 9 other people of your own gender?  Or 8 or 9 people of various genders?  Fine.  Find a church that will do it, and get married.  You want a government to grant certain rights to you and your partner(s)?  Fine.  Draw up an appropriate contract and sign it in front of a notary.  This is probably sacman's fantasyland.  But nobody's every been able to tell my why, in this day and age, the government should give a shit about the person or people with whom I choose to spend my life.  It's merely tradition, at this point.  And it's a bad tradition.  It's nobody's business, including the government's, who I marry.
Haters gonna hate
Good thing fat old bigots can't walk that far.
The world's oldest whatever is always dying.  It's pretty much the only thing left on it's "to do" list.
[deleted]
Where do you see that? In San Diego we use concrete mainly for bridges and they are the only ones not covered in crack seal.
That's a good point. Agree. 
Sir, I'll need to direct you to /r/circlejerk.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;The solution isn't to bring in more people—be it by planes or vaginas—but to grin, bear it, and let the population level out again  That won't work for two very important reasons:  1) Japan has a huge fiscal deficit and the highest debt in the world, most of it paying for social insurance and health insurance for the elderly. The older the population gets the more those costs go up....and the fewer taxpayers there are to pay for it. Japan will go bankrupt before the current generation of elderly dies off. But even then there may not be a solution because...  2) *the youth aren't having any more kids than their parent did*. The children of 1.3 fertility rates are now just having 1.3 kids per couple themselves, meaning the population is almost-halving again. So under the current state of affairs you will *always* have more elderly than young. Forget growth- You need to bring up the birth rate for the very purpose of "levelling out".  
Only in the upper rungs of society. The "average" male was still bound to one woman.
The trick is NO Cubans have valid passports.
I'm a Muslim, and you're a bigot.  I understand.
Not everyone who opposes gay marriage is marching, but yes, I see your point.
It's not capitalism at fault here. It's the fact that capitalism was not applied to this sector. If it were for capitalism a lot of the banks would have fallen during the crisis since they were not being profitable. However, this did not happen and the beautiful filter of capitalism was not allowed to do its job. I do understand furthermore that it was not an option to let the failing banks fall; I'm merely stating that it is not capitalism that is making all of this possible.   edit: typo's
[Islamism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Islamism) isn't the same as being Muslim. It's a specific political ideology that mixes Islamic thought with modern radical politics. Simply being Muslim does *not* make you an Islamist.  For example: the PLO and Ba'ath aren't Islamist, while the Islamic Republic of Iran and the Muslim Brotherhood (as well as their Palestinian affiliate, Hamas) are. If anything, Islamists are a minority among Middle Eastern Muslims, although they've recently started gaining power.
blah blah blah blah sorry you're whining
Obama is a puppet. Shows how much you know. Also if religion is abolished, I'm pretty sure crazy religious people would burn everything.
I know a few political scientists who argue that while the sanctions didn't cause the repressive and abusive behavior they have cemented it basically giving them no other way to maintain control of their country and stay independent.  
That's why you kill everyone from India. Solves everything 
No, it is a very good rule. When a greedy foreign  politician starts demanding a bribe, the American company has an airtight defense to refusing to pay. At this point the politician has the option to say sorry our depressed economy does not need your business and face the very real risk of the refusal being used in the next election. Or what is more likely, allow the request and take credit for helping to bring in desperately needed new jobs for the voters.  
Anyone who stands up for their culture, language and rights are terrorists. 
Now you are just being obtuse. Who said anything about cable TV? Of course the computer could be free or a gift, or purchased in a previous, more financially stable time, but you still haven't given me a viable alternative for net access for someone who is so poor they are starving and so vitamin deficient that they are suffering from scurvy.  Figure if borrowing a friend's (to  browse Reddit at 9 am on a Sunday) that friend could have spared a lemon...  Maybe stealing someone's WiFi I guess?  Ok, you got me. Of course all of this is moot since the person admitted paying for it, rather than buying a couple of lemons a month...
[deleted]
[deleted]
Everything Hitler did was legal, legality is irrelevant to his question
Pakistan was founded on the premise that Muslims couldn't be expected to treat others with decency, so we really shouldn't be surprised.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Agreed.
[deleted]
A more perfect response could not have been given, bravo. 
Who would have guess bigots have problems counting ;) 
&gt; They make their money by providing a service that is necessary in for the world economy.   That is highly debatable.
I work outside and honestly it's not that bad. Also I live in Perth where there are extreme temperatures every year, but also do a lot of work on mines around the country and especially underground (which is so hot you wouldn't believe!). The good thing about Perth is the dry heat, I can't stand the humidity in the northern half of the country.
That's arguable true, however logically, a truly tolerant society must be intolerant of one thing: the intolerant. While strictly speaking he isn't being tolerant, the only thing he isn't being tolerate about is other people's lack of tolerance, so it's not really him being a bigot. 
Damn.  Another great talent gone.
[deleted]
So France is damned if they do, and damned if they don't.
[deleted]
&gt; If you meant the opposite, that people were downvoting posts because they did not agree with them, you did not communicate this point very clearly due to poor sentence construction.  Or you just aren't reading what I wrote correctly. I think that's the case. You're missing the "not" in "not being observed". There's nothing grammatically wrong with my sentence construction.
Somebody get them suckers some bigger goddam wire, and a few new substations..
On dit oups.
Op is a faggot who doesn't give a fuck.
The conservative minded reddit likes to mix everythign together.
&gt;facts  I don't think that word means what you think it means. What you did was a baseless rant with little to no factual support.
This is Winston Peters.  He is nuts.  That is all you need to know.
Gosh and we were on such a high with that whole freedom crap. Now everyone knows NZ is full of douchebags like everywhere else.
Avatar without the happy, Hollywood ending.
When you stop someone buying medicine all pretence of this being about politics or nuclear tech is gone. This is personal. 
If ELF had real balls they would be here fighting for this forest. Fighting with rifles to the death. 
[deleted]
no it is not,  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Times_of_India   Just because you dont like the news it reports, that does not make it a tabloid. 
When i went to London over the summer i got sick and everytime i blew my nose it was black. Did not like that one bit.
you have read about the US immigration of Cuba have you not?
[deleted]
Thanks!
why block medicines at all?
Class action lawsuit. But to be honest I would love to know more also.
I masturbated to it one last time then I sold it. Good deal. 
The title uses "living" as an adjective, not a verb. It was a [living organism], not an [organism] that is [living].
Well said, I find it very strange. Here in Europe we are taught from a very young age to only hate people from the USA. Why turn on one another?
apologist cunt
c'est dommage tres dommage especialement pour son famille
[deleted]
Definitely smart to be skeptical until further corroboration, but these so called 'reputable' scientific journals are notoriously slow to accept any new, groundbreaking material because they are so afraid of being wrong.  They'd rather be right about boring science no one cares about than take a chance on reporting something potentially amazing. So, sit back and wait a couple decades and this idea might be accepted in the mainstream scientific community. It never ceases to amaze me how often scientists are discredited as quacks before their new ideas are finally proven without a doubt. Then, everyone in the field puts them on a pedestal and acts like they never doubted it.
Sorry, this is the username I post on /r/republican with, my main got banned a while ago. I think they think I'm one of them with this username
I dunno, the one shot of the Chinese skyline reminded me more of Bladerunner than anything else
for those who haven't seen....http://www.chinahush.com/2009/10/21/amazing-pictures-pollution-in-china/
not literally, but most of the world's major players. 
It's news like this one that make me *like* the sometimes a little over-eager german government. 
Neighboring countries India, Nepal, Russia ... were relieved and collectively sighed ... "We told you so ..."  But realistically speaking, given the data on vacancy rates in major cities in US, it is probably not needed to make mega cities unless the purpose is to provide residential to a large number of people which is what I think China is trying to do here....
Yeah, that is not all that nice, totaly agree. But you have to give credit to having a damn good idea and managing to pull that shit off AND get away without any leads.
&gt;This is true, but Mumbai smells because of the shit.       FTFY.  People shit in the open, dude. I have seen this with my very eyes.  
That's exactly what they do now, only they basically buy government protection. What's your solution to our current problem of democracies resulting in companies paying candidates to represent their views? You're trying to fix something that's inherently broken; campaigns win seats, campaigns cost money, big companies have money, thus big companies will always have their interests represented over the interests of the common man. There's no fixing that short of selecting your candidates for power at complete random.
No the one child policy prevented that. 
This assumes the interests of the EU and the USA remain the same. That both entities wont end up as rivals seems less than certain. Lets not forget Europeans will put their own interests first, as any country does. As it stands this isnt an issue because as each country is small, their interests are comparatively small. But a united EU is going to have conflicts of interests the size of which we have with Russia or China. Resources, spheres of influence, trade issues, and all the other stuff that makes countries of equal strength prattle at one another  Hopefully we will remain friendly, but post WWII **dependence** on the US has played a deceptively large role in the misconception that US and european interests are destined to be always mostly aligned. Remove that by creating a strong federalised EU, and who knows what is in store
[deleted]
You're so cute, you think that's snow!  
What's it take for an electric cord whipping in FBalistan?
A russian warship forward deployed to Syria right now is certainly not going to need to dock in syria for anything.  If America can resupply warships for months at sea so can the russians buddy.
Having consumed (and consume) absinthe, I can tell you that it really doesn't do crazy things to you beyond the limits of drunkenness.  People who act stupid when drunk, will simply act stupid after consuming it.  Now if it's been spiked or is a "moon shine" being sold as Absinthe... well that's a whole other story.
what if we sell china our air? just like in the Lorax movie.
[deleted]
Surely Free Market Capitalism and property rights will solve this problem, right Libertarians?
[deleted]
Since this is Al Watan reporting, I am presuming that "intelligence sources" means either Twitter or Prince Bandar's butler.
This is a very bad situation, but why haven't many people been talking about Iran?
Patriarchalism's success  depends on the complicity of women.
What about sleeping next to someone at the gate of a nuclear power plant? 
It was the end of the track, she crashed into a [buffer stop](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Buffer_stop) *and beyond!* &lt;/Buzz Lightyear&gt;
Yes, allow me to translate:  "Airpocarips"
in australia it's more or less equivalent to "person" - as in "yez cunts goin' fer a surf this arvo?"
the video will be seen by chinese dissidents and western journalists.
That's because it *does*. Cancer has traditionally been a first world problem. 
I unfortunatly concure.
They say so but that doesn't mean anything until it actually happens.
wow. arrested without charges, held indefinitely, locked away for years without a trial. thank god that would never happen in America. 
Proxy detentions (torture prisons outside US jurisdiction) happen in [places other than Guantanamo bay](http://www.thenation.com/article/naji-hamdans-nightmare).
Ah yes, the obligatory "UK = 1984" comment. Thank god I have the Internet to tell me I'm being oppressed.
Ricky Gervais is going to have a *field day*.
Go us! Hooray for one less stupid law.
Nope, a terrorist is anybody who tries to fulfill an agenda by terrorizing and is usually reserved for anybody who kills innocents.  Why is the "war on terror" only targeted at Muslims? 
 &gt; Oh really? Just the president of Iran calling for Israel to be wiped off the map.   &gt; So if someone is being negative to the point that they are insinuating genocide then yeah, I'll say that's a huge mountain of "wrong".  More reasons why you are immature and frankly have no point. Reading your post is like reading Foxnews.com. Seriously, there is no original content.   About the above quotes, if Iran wanted to kill Jews, why are there some 30,000 Jews living in Iran today? Where is their genocide?  About your above quote, this has been already debunked, (not that it would change your opinion), but the original translation was that "Israel would be wiped away from the sands of time". It does not matter now only because the false translation has become a meme, as evidenced by your 'scholarly' quote.   I have to correct myself: You are not a teenager, although you might be a teenage parrot. I seriously see no original content. You are being unscientific, (which _includes_ being illogical and unsystematic, yes, thanks for at least being honest with yourself). Again you are taking things as right or wrong prima facie.   We all know why Iran has sanctions under it. That is not the issue. The issue is the justification of it.   &gt; Well at least you were brave enough to owe up to your ethnicity even it was only your ancestors, lmao you fucking coward. Don't worry even Iranians would think you are too western to be a real Iranian. Where's all your pride in your ethnicity now? ;}  lolwat? You dont know my ethnicity, and it doesnt matter. You _assume_ that because I talked highly of some nation I am of the same ethnicity. (lol). Again, it is an association a teenage (parrot) would make. ;-)   
I was hoping to at least make it to the Superbowl. I know y'all don't appreciate *American Football* as much, but come on! 
[deleted]
Not really, because (I'd assume) that bullying is still considered to be abusive and may also be threatening.
No need to read the story. Title deserves an upvote as is
I'm not scared of foreign people, I just dislike that they come here and complain about it. Freedom comes with a price and I'm not going to pay it. Freedom causes nothing but trouble. Always has, always will. Now fuck off.
I live in Baltimore where there's 19,000 abandoned properties. When something is under construction its strange.  I also lived in NYC and Tokyo. 
just to be clear, the issue is people marrying within the same "caste".  I assume they are referring to something equivalent to family name.
if every single human disappeared today... do you get the point?
Are you sure you weren't in Japan?
No. One party wants the hungry to eat the poor, while the other offended to murder everyone else.  Or at least that's what it seems like. 
[deleted]
Just checked - India has no official national game or sport ([Source](http://www.dnaindia.com/india/report_india-has-no-national-game-sport-govt_1723192)) and Pakistan's national sport is definitely field hockey but cricket is more popular in both countries.
so?
I don't understand why the West doesn't just leave these Islamist groups alone. If we weren't always getting in the way of their evil plans, they'd be much more peaceful about implementing their evil plans. :\ 
A little coarser fibers than ox meat, depending on the age of the animal.  In ground beef you are not going to taste any difference whatsoever -  the fodder has more influence on the flavor.
 “I am leaving because of a variety of important reasons. The first reason is that, during the Revolution of January 25th, the Egyptian Army protected our heritage sites and the Egyptian Museum in Cairo. However, in the last 10 days the army has left these posts because it has other tasks to do. The group now in charge of the protection of these sites is the Tourist Police, but there are no Tourist Police to do this either. Therefore, what happens? Egyptian criminals, thieves (you know, in every revolution bad people always appear…), have begun to destroy tombs. They damaged the tomb of Hetep-ka at Saqqara, the tomb of Petah-Shepses at Abu Sir and the tomb of a person called Em-pi at Giza. They attacked a storage magazine at Saqqara and we do not yet know how many artifacts are missing; they opened two storage magazines at Giza; one tomb dated to the 19th Dynasty, the only one in the Delta in fact, was damaged at Ismaïlia; and a store at El-Qantara East has been broken into and looted for antiquities. People have begun to build houses and to excavate at night, everywhere, putting heritage sites all over the country at risk. I had to write a report and I sent it to the Director of UNESCO. That is why at the meeting of the Egyptian cabinet yesterday I had my speech prepared already and I said: “I cannot stay in Egypt and see antiquities being stolen when I cannot do anything to stop it!” This situation is not for me! I have always fought to return stolen artifacts to Egypt. I did fight Ahmed Ezz as well, the man in the Parliament, who was the most powerful man, because he wanted to allow antiquities to be sold in Egypt again. The second reason is that there are two crooks in the Antiquities Department, who have accused me of stealing antiquities and doing other illegal things all of the time. Their files talk about this. A third person started saying similar things, a university professor who was the Antiquities Director for almost 6 years before me, who never accomplished anything in that time. As a corrupt man, he even gave his signed permission to a rich lady from another Arabic country to take manuscripts out of Egypt! These three people encouraged young Egyptians to protest against me personally, to shout outside my office that they needed jobs. Sadly, I cannot give a job to everyone, but I did find funds to provide nearly 2000 training positions. In response to the horrible rumors that I am stealing antiquities. How could this be?! How could a man who has given his life to protecting and promoting antiquities, be accused later of stealing them?! Because of all of these things, I believe that if I stay in my position for another six months, I will never be able to protect the antiquities I love and I will never be able to work during this mess. All my life, I have been excavating, discovering, writing books and giving lectures all over the world. My work is responsible for bringing many tourists to Egypt, which helps our economy. But now I cannot do this! Therefore, I decided to resign”.  TL;DR: After the revolution, the military stopped protecting the antiquities, and the man, the icon, the protector of Egypt's treasures, Dr. Zahi Hawass, resigned. It's a sad state of affairs.
I would argue that most people who dislike a certain type of meat just haven't had it properly cooked/prepared. 
And you know for sure it's just beef and pork?
lol, yea plenty of morons support slavery and other forms of oppression in huge swathes, I am confident they will not agree.   lol, like I give a fuck the time is coming plenty fast.
I thought horses and cows couldn't make babies?
Personally I wouldn't care. If it tastes good I'll eat it.
What? You can buy horse steak everywhere here, it's cheaper than beef as well.
Yes.  It's pretty rare in America, and you will be looked at weirdly if you do.  It may be because many people have horses as pets or as prized animals. They are used for work, and seem to be quite expensive.  I'm not sure if its even economically viable to sell horse meat.  Aren't horses very expensive? Even the cheapest ones?
&gt;Iceland said it has "withdrawn from sale the two Iceland brand quarter pounder burger lines implicated in the study".  Fuck, nah! They don't know nothin' about a quarter pounder in Europe. They got the metric system.
&gt;*colonialism is coming back to Africa in a big way in the years to come.*  It left?
You can show your support for the poet by emailing the embassy in Washington D.C. as we did, however, I believe the emails go unread. You can also call the embassy and leave a message at  (202) 274-1600 (press 1 four times to leave a message with the ambassador’s office).  
[deleted]
Horse is better for you than beef... Problem?  People finsing pork is shitty tho.... both the religious thing and cause its not all that good for you...
You're telling me you have somehow found a way that the worlds foremost experts don't know about that allows for normal human development(specifically brain development) without the nutrient density of meat?  Please, do go on.
&gt; Air in Beijing had never been good.  These are wildly different versions of 'not good.'
What is the likelihood that there was an error in the testing or testing procedures? I also wonder what led them to test this now. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Cool story bro
there were atleast 5 lacke people about 20 km of the high way was jammed packed and that was the had-nigah of mine 
So... fuck the Dutch?
You're american aren't you?
Cheers. 
'trekpaarden'.
I am behind this legislation 100%. My uncle was recently diagnosed with late stage liver cancer. He lived his whole life as a health nut. He always ate healthily and exercised regularly while abstaining from drugs and alcohol. He has constantly been saying to my grandpa (*who is 87, with obviously failing health*) and my dad (*who has stage 4 prostate cancer and who has been on chemo for two years*) that he doesn't want chemo and wants to kill himself. It almost seems to me that he never dreamed that he would get sick and die. We aren't really sure if he's serious, but the way I look at it, he is making the situation worse for everyone else because of his constant suicidal comments and since he's terminally ill, "has had a good life," and genuinely doesn't want to experience his health failing, something he's actively tried to stave off his whole life, he should be able to die with the dignity that he desires. It would be sad, obviously, but rather comforting because if he truly wants that for himself, then I want it too. 
Just heard about this a few minutes ago. After seeing it on the American news, I'm surprised that more focus was concentrated on how it was so close to the new American embassy being built rather than the actual tragedy itself. The footage is incredible though. 
Judging by the punishment sought for Swartz, she'd be executed 3 times. 
**WhySoSyria - is a terrorist troll. They're being paid for dis-info campaigns in social media.**                [Here - look for yourself - no planes, not even a sound of a plane in a video!](http://www.liveleak.com/view?i=84d_1358273347)      ^ ^ ^ also - you can clearly hear the rocket coming (as per what government says) - I mean -  for fuck sakes.      [Here's Syrian rebels blowing up a mosque in Aleppo, which they later blamed on governmental MIG29.](http://www.liveleak.com/view?i=c63_1353633490)
You are one negative fuckwad.
The convention is widespread in UK headlines, and I suspect fairly well understood outside of the industry. It's been a convention for at least 50 years. Perhaps it isn't used in the U.S I don't know.  But yes, if it's wrong you point out the scare quotes in the headline, combined with the 'unconfirmed reports suggest' in the body.
Thanks for this voice of reason. I think Reddit's relatively youthful population is too young to remember the consequences of nonintervention in Rwanda. That intervention would have been entirely justified. They are, however, probably old enough to remember Iraq, which wasn't justified. So instead of advocating interventionism for the right reasons, too many disavow interventionism in its entirety.  The irony is that they often claim to do so for humanitarian reasons, when the consequences if nonintervention are typically far, far worse for human rights. 
i suggest a global crackdown on ~~muslims.~~ religion
No you didn't, karma-whore.  [Original comment by like_a_baws](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/16ocia/helicopter_crashes_into_crane_in_london/c7xu2lv)
[deleted]
&gt;The most advanced vaccine against dengue is only 30 percent effective, trials last year showed.  Oh boy. 
A number of decades ago there was this other guy who got elected while saying similar things... 
sweet Jesus, did someone surgically extract your sense of humour. Fuck you you arrogant motherfucker.
go ahead and provide citations then buddy. since you've been unable to do so in the other thread whereas i provided citations for what i said. but you demand that i keep citing more and more yet provide none of your own. which is fine you're intellectually lazy, it's common.
I hope your a troll.
Learn reddiquette and stop downvoting him folks. He straight up says he isn't an authority--that doesn't mean he shouldn't speak. His question is relevant and provoked relevant replies. Downvote isn't an "I don't like this" button.  One point on the question that hasn't been answered by the other 3 replies or at least detailed. We do actually do to an extent exactly what you're suggesting as far as bringing in bees from another spot; problem is, we're doing it because we've already killed so many bees and species of them. We actually use mostly Australian bees in America now because our native population is so messed up.
[deleted]
It is not American school children on American soil.  Those people hold no news  worthy value to the media.  The media here also shy's away from negative press regarding; Islamists, millitants, Al Qaeda, Hamas, Hezbolla or other fundamentalist groups. 
Australia is signatory to all kinds of anti-discrimination treaties and we have laws specifically banning discrimination.  Please explain to me why some groups should be allowed to discriminate while others can not ?  Australia has a huge, HUGE problem with child abuse from the catholic church, which was also responsible for forcibly removing single mothers from their children up until the late 1970's and adopting them out, forcibly removing Aboriginal children from their parents up until the late 1970's also adopting them out. So how, in the living name of FUCK, can these same criminal cartel now be given money to look after MORE CHILDREN !!   It's an organised crime syndicate that the government is collaborating with.    ..
At the rate we're going, Walmart will be the only store.  
&gt;Such cruelty - [inconceivable in the West...](http://media.treehugger.com/assets/images/2011/10/chickens-in-cages.jpg)
I suppose you are just another crackpot or something, I have no idea why you are asking me this question.   Are you going to attempt to proclaim we have developed new fandangled means of extracting crude also?   you people...
Lol you're stupid or what, the ALgerian military is more experienced than the U.S military in handling terrorists, I am not saying this will end well because it probably won't but Algeria fought the islamists in a 10 years war in the 90's. After 9/11, U.S soldiers were being trained by the algerian military because of that long experience. Don't make assumptions about something you know nothing about.  We have close ties with the U.S and French military, a lot of exchange programmes, add to that the experience I would say the best option is to let the Algerian special forces handle it. Who you guys are gonna bring? Some Special forces from the U.S who handle burglary incidents and never had to fire a gun?
Amazing that this is what passes for discourse.
It's mostly a logistics issue. Ground tire rubber is a traded commodity but it's not a particularly high value one so transportation becomes a critical part of the calculation of whether you can make the money back on setting up the machines.   The good news is that the tires are also filled with steel which is where most of the recycling value comes from since scrap steel in bulk is indeed a high value commodity. In a lot this big, that should be where you can cover some of the costs of setting up the processing equipment. The tires are maybe 5% steel by weight so if you've got ten million kilos of tires you may have five hundred tons of scrap steel. At two hundred dollars a ton you have a hundred thousand dollars right there. Not a vast sum of money but unlike the ground tire rubber you won't run into the issue of it costing more to transport than you can sell it for.    The one part that really interests me as a fan of composite materials is the polyester fibers that are also part of the mix. They are usually a cost for recyclers and referred to as "fluff" because they are difficult to burn and mixed with unknown substances. I'd like to see some experiments using fluff as a fiber component in concrete construction panels and how they would test for hazardous substances and leeching. I've had difficulty obtaining fluff from recyclers for my own experiments.   And yes, why not put some incentives for people in the local area to build earthships such as waiving permit fees and telling the local building inspectors to reach out and help DIY builders using tires to do things as well as possible instead of just being code nazis. Tire houses are excellent quality homes. The problem is that they're labor intensive but if you allow people permits to build them you can be sure that young people with more labor than money looking to put some sweat equity into their first home will jump on the chance. 
Touring is not the same as verifying. Sure, people can come in and they say "Look at all this gold."  What Germany wants is a third-party verification of the gold they are supposed to have, inspected for weight and purity. The feds said "Sorry. We don't have any space for you to do that."  So....do a little research before spouting off, m'kay?  
As soon as I read that I knew that it was going to be a Russian Val. The reason it has such a large caliber is because in order for a firearm to be as silent as possible, the bullets need to be subsonic (if they break the sound barrier, it's much noisier). By using a caliber such as 9mm (compared to the standard 7.62mm most Russian rifles use) they can still have solid firepower, while staying under a muzzle velocity of 343 m/s. The Val was designed specifically to be a silenced assault rifle, that is often outfited with a PSO-1 scope for marksman use, for special forces for things such as hostage situations. The subsonic ammo gives it a short range compared to other rifles, but most urban/hostage situations where spec ops would be brought in generally involve shooting at targets within 300 meters. it Therefore it was designed with special 9mm subsonic ammunition.
Seriously, How would a free market fix this? I beleve you're confusing regulation with cronyism; they are not the same thing. Today's libertarians seem to forget decades of corporate, GOP, and centrist democrat colusions that have intentionally hallowed out institutions meant to provide effective public goods.
Don't fret children. China's just going through its own industrial revolution on its own time. The exact same things happened in Europe and North America a century ago. If anything, we're all witnessing the birthing stages of the next industrial/economical super-power. By the time we're all old and weary, the Western world's once glorious empire will only be a distant memory.
Interesting, do you have any links for that? I couldn't find anything by googling.
&gt;or is my bigoted father right  Here's a cheat sheet for answering that question in the future: If your bigoted father is advocating genocide, he's wrong.
The family is being punished for fraudulent identification charges.  The fraudulent identification was used to try and obtain an inheritance.  The actual story has been completely twisted in order to support an agenda.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
And he had also crawled into the path of fire ants.  
The term "the Russian Internet" is pretty easy to understand.
I believe that's the intention, but cannot confirm. ~~Finding photos of Aslan seems difficult.~~ Articles mislabeling things makes life hard.  
Book the cheapest flights from United Kingdom to Manila and Cebu. We have unbeatable prices for air tickets from United Kingdom to all over the world.
Did they hit him with 5 shots? Is he still alive?
They're labeled as terrorists because they use violence and terror tactics to get their point across. It has nothing to do with how valiant the cause is. The IRA was also a terrorist organization for the same reasons. 
[deleted]
Cool I stand corrected- insert foot in mouth :)   I did a real quick search and got the list.  
I remember this episode from The West Wing back in 1999. Pakistan was aggressive, India pushed into Kashmir. Tensions were high. President Bartlett brought in some British dude who was apparently as expert on these people.  They decided the best course of action was to give India a ton of money to help build its technology infrastructure.  I'm just going to assume that that's what happened here.  
But he ain't messing with no broke diggers. 
News on giant gold nugget comes from... abc...net...AU...... I GET THIS ONE
BUT, you are technically only leasing it for a max of 99 years.
As opposed to "there is never enough rape news"?
http://www.npr.org/  http://www.nytimes.com/  Front page.
kidnapping doesnt work that way 
You are leaping to way too many conclusions about me as a person. This is not making for a productive conversation.  You are putting me on the defense and leaving the burden of proof to me which is honestly not something I have the time or energy to deal with.   Agriculture is not perfect in our country. Obviously. However you have to understand that neonics can be applied more effectively to reduce bee mortality.  It is not just Bayer's fault here - farmers are guilty of inappropriate application and so are seed companies. Neonics are not toxic to vertebrates in nearly the same levels as other insecticides. Banning a safer pesticide to replace with nothing at all (going organic) will drive up food prices. Replacing them with a less well studied insectice could be worse for people/bees/other organisms.  There is nothing wrong with calling for more study. You must not be a scientist since this is not a concept you appear to understand? Am I wrong? 
Wow. Gus Chiggins really gets around. 
&gt;The Algerian brand of response to this kind of militant action has undoubtedly deterred incidents in the past, but you won't hear about deterred action because it's rather hard to report incidents that didn't happen.  That's a conveniently unprovable assertion.
[deleted]
Take the intelligent people and slaughtering them is the best way for these idiots to spread their clearly false views onto the remaining idiots.  Fuck them. Bomb them into the ground. Wipe out whatever ideologies or genes that make them this way.
I know that. I am saying that if Israel was a _true_ secular state, the only problem in that region would be the weather.
Well, if you don't know what it is, it is safe to call it an unidentified flying object.
50% if ethnicity must be Jewish.   If not, then Israel ceases to exist. If it was truly secular, then this would not matter. 
Yeah, it was so successful with this same group before, that they've had to keep doing it...
A guy with a stick.
Turns out it was just a potato
They were people who happened to be religious because of the time they were alive. You see less and less of that today.
Here is another case: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alpha_Group  &gt;Almost six year later, in October 1985, Alpha Group would be dispatched to Beirut, Lebanon after the Kremlin was informed that four Soviet diplomats had been taken hostage by a Sunni extremist group. By the time Alpha was on-site, word had spread that one of the hostages had already been killed. Through a network of supporting KGB operatives, members of the task-force were able to successfully identify each of the perpetrators involved in the crisis, and once discovered, began to take the individual relatives of the extremists hostage. Following the standard Soviet policy of "no negotiation with terrorists," the hostages belonging to Alpha Group had some of their body parts cut off and sent directly to the Sunni militants. The warning was quite clear: more would follow unless the remaining hostages were released immediately. The show of force worked, and for a period of 20 years[4] no Soviet or Russian officials were taken captive until the 2006 abduction and murder of four Russian embassy staff members in Iraq.
I downvoted you because you make a claim;  &gt;But why would we turn against all Islam?  Which I've clearly outlined above the answer too.  You're just going in circles pretending political will will never turn against Islam in Europe.  That's not a discussion, that's just you refusing to follow the thread.  
Now Americans know how afghani civilians feel? Ready for the jingoism downvotes
Somebody knows their Morlocks
Incorrect, the NDP's stance is not clear.  The party leader, Thomas Mulcair, has spoken against marijuana legalization *and decriminalization.*  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ggT1gFXu_Ng
Well, fuck.  I might have to actually vote.  I fully support giving the people of this country more freedoms and I'd hope the Liberal party would go that route.  Right now we are extremely restrained in what we are allowed to do, and pay a sin tax that is among the highest in the world.   It would be nice to have a place to go past 2AM, for people that want that sort of thing... But nope, everywhere has to close then.  My friends don't go out and spend money any more because it's too expensive. Setting minimum liquor prices, and not allowing competition from convenience and grocery store sales is ridiculous.  The vast majority of our living expenses are already higher than average in the States by a large margin, at least give us the freedom to have some fun when we want without breaking the bank to do it.
They said that it would hurt trading between the two.
Why is it only a problem if the prophet who encourages such things is named Mohammed, rather than say Moses?
You're a citizen, meaning that you are a part of a society and therefore subject yourself to it's rules and regulations on every single thing in your daily life in return for all the support, safety and connection that it offers.  Regulation was what I was getting at the whole time, but also some more restriction on the top end of the firearm market. A private citizen has absolutely no need for an automatic and I would argue a semi-automatic weapon. Primary producers (farmers), sporting shooters, hunters, those people could at least justify a need. Joe on the street just doesn't need it, not for 'personal protection', not for anything. It's a pissing contest hidden behind a "rights" argument.  That rights arguments falls completely apart when you realise that the second amendment is all about quickly arming a militia for defence of a fledgling nation, not one with, by far, the most powerful military in the world. The English aren't attacking, and when it was written there were muskets that needed minutes to load, nothing even remotely close to the capabilities of the weapons of today. It's not relevant and needs revision.  You guys hang on to particular rights like their a degree from on high, but the world changes, progression occurs, and laws need to be revised to be progressive with technological and societal change.  Regulation means: taking guns away from people that don't have a legitimate (non protective) need and making sure that the guns available are appropriate to the purpose. Ensuring that people that do have them are mentally sound and fully aware of gun safety.  It won't stop all gun related crime. But it makes it harder and it gives police more opportunity to catch people earlier. If a criminal with criminal connections wants a gun they'll probably find one. But if a depressed school kid wants to go on a rampage, they wouldn't know where to start, to find one. And if they started asking around, there's hopefully a good chance they'll might get noticed by the authorities.  Answer me this, what justification can you provide that average citizens need access to the sort of weapons that allow them to go on the rampages that have occurred recently?
so you don't want things? I hope you do or you must be a nun! so you base your existence on a negative comparison with me!? thats an honor to know you would not exist without me! 
Harper makes "good" decisions?  Aside from the whole Iraq bungle, let's not forget the budget he wanted to table while the entire Western economy started circling the drain in 2008.  "If we were going to have some kind of big crash or recession, we probably would have had it by now" and "The fundamentals are sound" Remember those knee-slappers?  It took the threat of a coalition for him to clue the fuck in and start paying attention to what was going on outside of Ottawa.  Harper and his crew should thank their lucky stars for Paul Martin setting things up well enough that even the Conservative crew couldn't fuck them up enough before the crash hit.  Martin wasn't a very strong PM, but he was a hell of a finance minister.
Wow your family racist much?  Indian Muslims have no such views about Pakistani Muslims. In fact Indians and Pakistanis generally mix together just fine (except when it comes to Cricket). From what I know it is more of a political issue with extremists trying hard to destabilize the region.  Source: I have a lot of Indian and Pakistani friends. Also none of my Pakistani male friend's wive has covered herself and blown up in Mumbai. She is completely fine, thank you for asking.
You are wrong about Iran. Saudi Arabia is begging everyone to fight Iran. Not Israel. Israel knows it would not go well if it had to actually fight a war with Iran. A quick strike, yes, but not any sort of large scale conflict. 
I instinctively squeezed my shoulder blades together after reading your comment. 
I am actually genuinely curious where the cut off line is, how close to the line do you need to be? I have had people half a car length over the line, if  I am parked behind them but am only a meter from the line, does that count?
he was shoved into a news van for protesting not talking to people.
For those of you on the F scale that is almost half way to water boiling
All those douchebags, holy shit.
Nope, it is just that many Australians have a bad internet connection.
45C  (been there) ain't that bad as long the humidity is low, if the humidity is high (above 60) that shit is bad.
To all you northern hemisphere people. Call us when you get over 110.
enjoy!
Huh, and here I thought all the skin cancer awareness was because our Summers can be so hot.
We had 15,000,000 in the sun consistently for billions of years.
And it all started after Gen. Kiani stated internal threats, the Taliban, the greatest.
I live in Phoenix ಠ_ಠ
F\*ck Territorial Integrity.
[deleted]
because there great leader had to build and design these missiles before he solves hunger. come on now.
Yeah, that's me, Mr. Current Events. The 2014 withdrawal of troops is so foggy with it's numbers it's astounding. Anywhere from 0-15000.   Add to that the fact that there are those in congress who really do think it's a great idea to go fight with Iran alongside Israel and we definitely don't have much in terms of reducing our interventionalism abroad. 
[deleted]
I don't think it's about size. It's about resources. Ceding a chunk of your land to a new government means losing whatever could be produced on that land or by the people on that land, be it agricultural or industrial or even technological. In most cases you'd take a huge hit to your GDP, and even if you made a trade agreement with the newly formed country, your access to their resources would become necessarily tenuous.  If my roommate decided that he wanted to move out, I'd be upset because he couldn't help me pay rent anymore but that's life. If he moved out and also somehow took our kitchen with him, you're damned right I'd try to make him stay. I need that kitchen. I'd rather keep him there unhappily and keep my kitchen than let him leave and have to sign some kind of 3-times-a-week kitchen access trade agreement.
WTF? I'm not reading this tripe. 
Do you really think they dig graves for dead Taliban's? Put em into a hole, nobody have time waste on a terrorist.
At least their a***hole would have stayed tight by working at McDonald's. 
By those same notions, most of the Negev isn't occupied by Israelis. A lack of population shouldn't decide whether Israel can just have the land, at least not any more than giving Palestine the right to claim any Israeli land that isn't inhabited. This argument goes both ways, and fails both ways. 
Because it is part of American culture to raise cats and dogs as pets.
Amateurs...
Different blood types are stereotyped with different personalities.
these savage clowns are going to get whats coming to them, a disease will wipe out these folks, and all the deer penis in the world aint stopping mother nature
I think it's more an issue with giving rights to women, first and foremost. When half of the population is oppressed there's no room for advancement there.
Likewise a guy in an M1 Abrams tank would feel pretty comfortable going up against a guy with an AK. None the less, they are formidable weapons. 
I agree, with the caveat that anyone who uses child porn is contributing to child molestation.
You stop taking the drugs and you return to normal.  Depo Prevera is a common drug used for chemical castration of males.  Depo is a normal birth control shot for women.
[deleted]
 not everyone has resigned themselves. 
I was actually considering calling up loveline to ask about morning wood because basic was coming up.  Never got horny during tho. 
Sorry again I am never got molested. I know you are starving to find someone like (molested) you to talk to him about how things were so bad and how your father was sharing your anus with his friends. But there's forums. Just don't kill yourself. I will give another upvote, my new dear molested friend.
Look, if you want to take some guns and face against ecuador. Fine. You will die, but it might be a fight.  If you want to take some semi-autos and face against the U.S. You will die, and there won't be any fight.
[deleted]
Gee these 'terrorists' have been a boon to the West  ever since the Cold War ended
&gt; most gun owners own them to defend against criminals  Statistically, they are more likely to use them on themselves or their family members
Even if they were even more interested in adults, but just a bit of kid on the side?
I don't think you see the irony in your statement:  **You**: MB bad, anyone who think's they're moderate is wrong.  **ME**: That's a false dilemma, there are lots of valid opinions on MB.  **You**: Not really.....  ************  By discounting all others....Do you see how your opinion comes off a bit extreme? 
[deleted]
Thank you. Welcome to the Downvoted Honesty Club. We have pool and David Lynch screen caps on the walls. 
I generally recommend RAPEX but it would not be good for a 4 year old...I can only think that Indian men need to recognize this problem and deal with it. Nothing else will work.
he should have report from a country that has freedom of the press and nice hotels and gay bars such as israel.  [na, what do I talk about?  I could find much more blogs, articles, stories about israel therefor israel is the bad guy and the most oppressive country in the middle east.](http://www.reddit.com/user/fairwellIMJA)
Don't get me wrong, I absolutely agree with you. I don't begrudge the rich or expect them to do anything with their money. I was just trying to say in my previous comment that that's perhaps why this type of topic seems to come up a lot - some may think that the rich doing something about it will be a faster solution than relying on our governments to fix things. 
Cure AIDS, Produce Super AIDS in process...
[deleted]
It's frightening how relatively little a realistic leg up costs. Give one guy that leg up, he can later give one to someone else. So on and so forth.  But *you* might get rich one day, so fuck that, right? Right.
I think this is something a whole lot of people don't understand. More money makes it easier to earn more. This is just a fact. I know people who are wealthy, who make more off of investments than I make working 45 hours/week for 52 weeks. And they also hold 'regular' jobs and make an income that way.  I have no way to make the kind of money they're making in investments; but if I pulled in the amount of money a buddy told me he made this year on them I would be living quite nicely. ESPECIALLY if it was supplemental to a regular job.
Good point, poor people need to be kept poor for the good of the economy.
It's because the productivity-wages relationship is far less important than the supply/demand-wages relationship.  You see wage increases in specialized fields, with a limited, highly skilled labor pool.  Outside of those specialized areas, where productivity increases are the result of capital improvements alone, that's where wages are truly stagnant, particularly on the lower end.  
Just giving away money is not going to help the economic crisis or end poverty. Jobs need to be created. [Carlos Slim](http://www.bloomberg.com/news/2010-09-29/carlos-slim-prefers-job-creation-to-giving-money-away-update1-.html) says:   &gt;"Trillions of dollars have been given to charity in the last 50 years, and they don't solve anything."
"Criminal element" refers to the gangs or "bad guys" that more often than not dwell in the same environment as these extremely poor people. OP is referring to how usually take advantage of these poor people any way they can, keeping them poor. What do you think will happen when they just get money? The gangs will just take it away from them.  Everyone else is right. You have to rebuild the environment, not just give them money to spend.
You want to put morality in the economy? That's not going to happen.  At the end of the day, if you have 100 people doing a job 100000 people can and will do for cheaper, you're just not making a profit if you keep wages high.  However, if you need 100 let's say astrophysicists or neurosurgeons and can only find 2, you sure as hell will pay them a fortune so they don't get bought by someone else.   If you want a good spot for life, you better either study hard or be clever as all hell. And of course, work your ass off. 
Meanwhile in Canada
Yes but you're hiding behind a vague and unspecific scenario where you're completely right and there's literally no downside for anyone ever. Yes I'm sure you're totally right and trickle-down economy is perfect and nobody suffers.
Ignore the troll. Datum is a dumb ass.
Why?  What does she have to do with this subject? 
I don't know why everyone thinks that throwing more money into circulation = 'stimulating the economy' = benefits for everyone. The very rich are very rich because they are at the top of the economy and most of the money that goes into circulation goes right back into their bank accounts. Building infrastructure, homes, more industry, social security .. THOSE are all investments that DO benefit the poor. Having the poor throw the money right back into circulation in return for some temporary goods doesn't do shit for them or the situation that put them there. 
[deleted]
[Source of Information](http://imgur.com/veurwO4)
Thanks for that. Somehow people are taking this article as a guilt trip or a call for a global communist takeover.
Why they are doing this? Will this not affect their economy significantly which almost entirely depends on banking?  Would love an answer to this.
In the UK it isn't...not unless there is evidence to suggest the individual was suicidal before taking out the policy (and even then it can still result in a payout)
As an Indian, I was at first really offended by this comment, but I was too busy raping to respond until now. I want to try to dig into the historical implications of this. You see, when the [civilized British Empire](http://www.guardian.co.uk/commentisfree/2012/apr/23/british-empire-crimes-ignore-atrocities) still controlled and disciplined the brutish, uncivilized subcontinent, the first thing they did was to end wanton rape, or as we refer to it in India "morning". After our beloved and [kind benefactors](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jallianwala_Bagh_massacre) were chased out by [savage bands of murderers](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Indian_independence_movement), we were without identity, without purpose. How would we [feed ourselves](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bengal_famine_of_1943) without the hand of the mother? These widely varying cultures, with different ethnic makeup, unintelligible languages had nothing in common at all, not 3000 years of history, not a common philosophy, cuisine, sense of togetherness, no! The only thing all Indians had in common was rape! And that's why to this day, Indian men regardless of where they are will rape every day to celebrate our Independence. As proof, I offer you just this: has every Indian man ever been proven to have not raped someone? I didn't think so. That's because all of us are raping, all of the time.  Rapingly yours, feels_good_man  Feels good for me at least.
Thats how it goes? In the US perhaps (reknowned for its over-litigative nature), or if you have life insurance.   Otherwise I don't think anyone should have to pay, other than maybe the terrorists. Its an unfortunate situation, don't get me wrong, but finance shouldn't exactly be top priority.   Are you suggesting the Algerian army pay? If not, who?
I stand corrected =) Always good to learn something new.
FTA: "Rock fishermen can use an umbrella rig as a method of trolling without using a boat. "
Saving this forever datum admitting he loves an IDF terrorist
Yes, only teachers, professors, the media, and government should be able to indoctrinate people!
Stop pulling lines from Obama's birth video.
I'd say Egypt is far worse for female tourists travelling alone.
&gt;DAKAR, Jan 19 (Reuters) - Human Rights Watch said on Saturday it had received credible reports of serious abuses, including killings, being committed by Malian security forces against civilians around the central town of Niono. 
Abuse of power is much more complicated than the facetious sludge you just wrote.  And don't ask me if **intentionally** putting a woman in a position of dependance on you or using a woman's position as being dependent on you to remove her ability to feel safe in not consenting to sex is rape. If you have to ask you're pretty morally fucked.
The Catholics put the book together.  Learn some history.
You can start here. http://www.dailymail.co.uk/femail/article-2120823/How-Deep-Throat-star-Linda-Lovelaces-tragic-life-modern-morality-tale.html
The attempt being staged doesn't necessarily mean everyone there would know about it.
If only God had been allowed to be present this would never have happened...oh wait...
That's what religions do, they grow by spreading to other people.  If only I could think of a clever analogy for such a thing.
This is not how a church works... even the Roman Catholic church.
A Chinese car... I wouldn't wish that on my enemies.
If they didn't believe what they were saying I don't quite think they would have gotten there in the first place..unless they really enjoyed lying a lot
&gt;"We live in the UK and we are governed by UK law, there should be no mob rule. If people are involved in this behaviour then it is worrying but it is an isolated incident", Mohammed Shafiq, the chief executive of the Ramadhan Foundation, a Muslim organisation which campaigns for a peaceful co-existence among communities, said.  I hate these weaselly bullshit responses from Muslim leaders. If they were really on our side, they'd say "Those dicks are wrong, this is Britain, the culture is British, nobody here has to follow Islamic law, and if they don't like it they can leave".
The thing is, for these people there is a reason, it's like "poke the bear", everybody have the urge to do it. They just do it collectively and repeatedly to caged and dormant animals. What little primitive highs they get from harassing and bullying these crocs just seems more attractive than the animals' lives. Utter disgusting and sad. 
The sad thing is, I guarantee there will be at least one person on the cruise that will file a lawsuit over how this "ruined their vacation".
[deleted]
OK agree. What i don't agree is that balad is calling on Jews to "dismantle their country". They are against zionism and the definition of Israel as a jewish state. I'd argue it's not the same thing.
Heyyy Alanis...  Looks like you left something out. Guess that rich white girl tour of India you got managed to skip a few stops.  Lulz. When that song came out, my response was "Jesus. Does that dumb cunt have *any* idea what life in India is like for the average low caste Indian?" and anyone who I said it to's response was "Fuck you, racist! Sexist!"  Looks like Gieger was right. Again. I fucking told you so.
It's often referred to as "Dying with dignity".   Say a cancer patient has 3 weeks (or a year, who knows) of life left but they will be either unconscious/delirious from morphine or in incredible pain the whole (or most of) the time. A cancer patient is going to know that their life is quite likely to end like this. Instead of using the miracle of modern medicine to make someone live through all that pain we could give this person a dignified, painless death, surrounded by friends and family.  They go through extensive counselling while they still have full control of all their faculties with a qualified professional, to ensure this is the right course of action for this person and they've thought about it properly. For this to work safely and not be abused the patient needs to decide they want it a fair amount of time before they need it so they can talk with psychologist about it a number of times with weeks/months inbetween to make absolutely sure this is the right choice for this person.  Obviously it wouldn't be for everyone. For some people those 3 weeks extra are wanted or they have moral or religious objections to it. Also no doctor should be obliged to end a life. There are plenty of doctors who see the mercy in such an act who could help in these situations. No doctor should be forced to do something they see as murder.  I think with laws to make sure this is done properly it is a beautifully kind thing to do for a person. I also think this was quite possibly a bit of a waste of my time because you're probably a troll. It is also possible you are just ignorant or misinformed and I feel strongly about this so here we are. 
In such a big country, this is most definitely the case.
Really be forgiven ?  By who ?
I was reading the title and was thinking dont tell me it's getting worse...fuck it got so much worse...
Sounds about right.
[deleted]
This is a great reason to stop aborting female children.. and to stop killing them after birth. They are creating their own, permanent sausage fest.
Give it a rest, Kanye.
[deleted]
being excommunicated probably isn't what you think it is. I mean, it probably is to a certain degree, but just because person A disagrees with person B in the Church then they're not on some watchlist and will be kicked out the door. It isn't quite so simple thankfully. 
Ok, so:  1. Never go to India.  2. If I have to go to India, carry bribery money everywhere I go.
Roberto Calvi would disagree that the severest punishment the Vatican is willing to dole out is excommunication, but whatever. I know he agreed to the terms when he entered the priesthood; what I'm pointing out is that this is an idiot move because those terms include having to relinquish your actionable moral compass to an entity that may or may not be moral and has attached to it the longest history of prejudice and malice in human history.
[deleted]
You could make your own [micronation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Micronation). Checkmate.
Kick them all out. Send them back to whichever *stan they came from and good riddance.
You do realize that the various presidents/PMs you listed are completely and utterly different, right? There is very little they have in common, other than the fact that they rule countries the US doesn't like (except Erdogan). One is a leftist who frequently makes speeches about the evils of US imperialism, one is facing political pressure from the opposition and has a questionable record in regard to opposition journalists, one has Islamist leanings, a few suffer from the sin of having no credible political opposition. Not saying these are all great guys, I can find plenty to fault each of them, but painting them with the broad brush of "soft-authoritarian" is an incredibly simplistic view.  Why is Berlusconi not on that list? George Bush? Abhisit?
As someone who just got back from touring Egypt it is very safe In all tourist destinations. Be with a tour guide and you will have no issues. 
Also seems like money motivation always trumps altruistic motivation. Perhaps it's just a sucker cash-in business.
Maybe, but it is very difficult to talk about these kinds of situations unless you've been in a period of depression, and had huge stressful situations shoved onto you. 
[deleted]
Agreed, but at no time during the fourteen years did she ever express a desire for it to stop. Regardless of whether she felt powerless, she *wasn't* powerless. The Priest was never described as violent. They weren't in an employment relationship. That wasn't the only church in town.  At what point exactly do we stop degrading women and assume that they are every bit as capable of expressing their desires and pursuing their own destines? 
If compulsory service is so good it's good for women too.  That said, the fact it costs money to employ people doesn't justify forced labor. 
Depends. No one reads SMS as 'Sms' (single word) or 'Short Message Service' in their head. They read 'Es em es'.  Some acronyms could be slightly ambiguous, like FAQ. an 'Eff a cue', or a Fak?
Wat
Despite all the western media bias and BS, not even they can quite suspend reality enough to suggest that the Chinese will fire the first shot in any war. That is why all the talk is of 'accidental escalation', whereas if there was any chance that the Chinese might fire first, all we will be hearing is how the Chinese are stirring up trouble and spoiling for a fight.  The Americans are already yanking on Japan's leash. The situation won't escalate into actual war because China is no military push over any more and America doesn't want a war with China, so Japan won't dare fire first because to do so without American backing is to invite a spanking.   Without massive American direct combat intervention, if push comes to shove, the odds favor China to come out on top in any limited war over the Diaoyus with Japan. Japanese hawks knows this better than anyone, and if America makes it clear in private that it won't bleed to help stoke Japanese nationalistic egos, there will be no war.  All Japan is doing so far is bluffing and huffing to try and scare China off.  Sending 8 F15s plus support aircraft against a single unarmed Chinese Y7 was overkill of ludicrous proportions, and the Japanese only did that to try and send a message.  When China sent up J10s this time, the Japanese response is far more modest and telling.   Firstly, they didn't sent up 8 times as many fighters as China because they actually only have 30 upgraded F15s that can fire ARHAAMs, the rest being 30 year old museum pieces that will get outclassed by JH7s and late model J8s in BVR never mind J10s and J11A/Bs.  Secondly, they didn't send up any more fighters because suddenly it got real for them. This isn't just a case of them being able to harass Chinese ships and planes in international airspace and waters with impunity (where was America's vaunted freedom navigation line when all this was happening?), if they stepped too far over the line, the Chinese could push back and will very likely win any ensuring dogfight.  Last I heard, all this talk of firing warning shots have been rubbished by the Japanese themselves as moronic and dangerous, since it was originally floated when all China was sending up were unarmed surveillance planes, so there was little risk of the Japanese loosing that fight.
&gt;That's not the only difference. Most historians would disagree with you. This is the end of the argument if you believe that is the only difference.  That is the main difference that matters. Own people relied on your governance vs. foreigners you were at war with.  It's not lessening the Japanese war crimes at all, it's horrible to commit war crimes, but it's worse to commit crimes against your own people.   &gt;And so he is criticized but he still regarded as the greatest with that in mind. See how despite murdering millions its possible to be regarded in a positive manner?  Indian removal did NOT kill millions. few thousand died from diseases. Some from wars that resulted from the removal.  They were NOT part of the US. at the time, the thinking was that they should move from the east of mississippi to the west of the river. That was the removal. You seem to misunderstand.  
The school's principle could have easily found out what the little girl was talking about. Suspending a 5 year old is asinine.
Your country is retarded and you all should feel retarded.  Seriously the outside world views you as retarded.
Where the terrorists are fake, and the truth doesn't matter.
Ah yes, those 28 years really make up for the millions of systematically murdered jews and the lost started war that destroyed half of Europe...
I see what you did there!
Let me tell you how that would go down.  The Chinese would detonate a device near the islands, claim it was just a test, the US would get their navy out of harms way pretty damn quick and Obama would face no end of arguing in congress while being essentially powerless to do anything while China used the distraction to move in on Taiwan.  
 No doubt about that - my point is that the notion Imperial Japan derived the sense it was indomitable from its defeat of the Mongols six centuries prior is dubious at best. 
Nope. Okay, let's explain it again... In a governmental system where parties have to form coalitions, there are two types of winners: parties that become part of that coalition and didn't lose too much and parties that gained a lot for their standards. It doesn't matter if you got more percentage points than the rest. You can call yourself a winner if your party got 10% if nobody even expected you to cross the 5% threshold.  The CDU got the most votes yesterday but they lost more than six percent and won't govern anymore. That's not a winner. That's just the strongest party.
LOL DUDE  WHY WOULD YOU ASK HIM FOR A SOURCE THAT LINKS THE GROUPS WHEN HE DOESN'T THINK THE GROUPS ARE CONNECTED
Or on the US side of things hawaii.
Well documented in American history books maybe.  Too bad it's bullshit to justify dropping two atomic weapons on civilians.  The Russians did take half of Berlin, remember the Berlin wall?
[deleted]
http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-hw5OrOAdiLs/UH0h1V4ZsJI/AAAAAAAAA7s/PznOfPVwDpA/s1600/AVP-Alien-vs.-Predator-movie-poster.jpg
nobody want to fight a land war with china, not even USA.
&gt; get feminism points  and I got awarded misogyny points instead last time I claimed women should fight too in South Korea. Arguments included:  + war is men's problem. why should women be dragged to men's problems.   + what? let girls shoot bullets for you? man up, men.  + women make babies. how about you men start making babies?  + military draft is evil. the answer is to abolish the draft, not extend it to women.  + it's hard living as a woman. you just don't get it, men.  I think, unless one is disabled or religiously too involved with "do not kill" dogma (monks and so on), he or she must pay some manual labor taxation in the form of military training.
It's because of [this guy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Askia_Mohammad_I)...
&gt; 1st world armies  but when your country gets invaded by a much stronger force, your country turns into something that is not so 1st world and then wouldn't it be nice to have lots of guerrilla units annoying the occupier?
Yes. 
lol thats highly unreliable and not per capita, just numbers. more people mean more rapes, even if percentage is the same. also, since the government is fucked, a lot less women would report rape.
Radio Teilifis Eireann of all places, the Irish contingent on reddit is strong it seems.    edit: I initially had Radio Teilifis na hEireann, which translates to Radio Television of Ireland. The "na h" is a rule which puts a h infront of a vowel when you use "na" or "of".   Edit 2: I have to copy and past the proper name fada and all Raidió Teilifís Éireann
I seriously doubt you know someone in the 1%. Middle class or even celebrity rich isn't as vastly rich as the real 1%
Like to know more about buy instagram followers, buy real instagram followers, buy instagram likes visit this site http://www.realigfollowers.com for more information. 
We count and pay for downloads from all countries; you could earn up to US$20 for every 1000 downloads of your files. Plus, you will receive 50% of all new referred Premium Sales purchased through your links. http://filevice.com
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Several more similar cases since then, too
Depends. Comes down to a cost/benefit analysis doesn't it? 
Imagine if it was an enemy warship.
&gt;   Investment bankers invest in companies and products which in turn grow our economy, again.  Credit Default Swaps, Traunches, REpo Markets, carried interest to avoid paying taxes........all destroying our economy......reality 101.
You know, the US isn't the only nation on earth entitled to national security. If the US decides to project military force to China's doorstep, don't be surprised if China tries to counter it. They have a right to self defense, even if that means attacking the US Navy.
Hey I'm the one who's subject of prejudice, and you call me racist? Fuck you!
You clearly don't understand evolution or epigentics.      So your word comes back to "Ignorance".  
Very depressing.
Actually Muslim brotherhood has proven to be even q better partner to the US according to congress which is why white house supports them. Case and point, they allow CIA agents free rein in Sinai and solve Israelis problems. 
They wouldve liked some good ol' CIA coup. 
i'd do it to myself, i plan on finally trying heroin for the first time when i hit 65 or become too crippled to live my life.
[deleted]
I'm almost completely certain that there is no legislative ban on blood donations by gays in the US.
Raised millions to help fund cancer research. Biggest douche ever.
To say that it was never democratic is an understatement, to them the Renaissance itself was just something that happened to other people. 
[deleted]
Shhh...the Call of Duty/Fox News crowd will get angry.
Dune
They didn't say the KGB, they said the intelligence organization. Stop being a snarky fuck if you can't even get it right.
What?  Stalin failed at this?
Marriage is an economic arrangement to have children. Re-defining it is just intellectual neurosis to promote equality for the sake of itself and without any inherent justifications. For me to support gay marriage is to betray my views.  Civil unions that allow hospital visits and such I am okay with, but no tax exemption because the justification for that is to make raising children easier.
perfect for taking on the US Navy..... in 1982.
I need these questions answered prior to picking up a pitchfork:  Did he violate network policy prior to finding the breach? Did he give the college adequate time to fix problem before going public with flaw? Does anyone currently employed by the college have a personal or financial relationship to the company or one of its employees that designed the software?  
Coughs....
I cringed at the criteria for those 40% of cases... thrown out because they couldn't make an arrest, or dismissed because the victim didn't allegedly fight them off well enough... fucking disgusting.   What's worse is that every time a case like this crops up, droves of dickhole rape-apologists come sprinting out of their caves to scream: "LOOK WOMEN ARE LIARS RAPE DOESN'T EXIST!" 
I hate that so much. I see racial minorities who hate gay people and the hypocrisy just kills me.   It's also annoying when gay people rip on trans people.    We're all trying to climb up the ladder here, I would appreciate it if we stopped stepping on each other's hands.
&gt;All the victims at the school were shot with a rifle, at least some of them up close, and all were apparently shot more than once, Chief Medical Examiner Dr. H. Wayne Carver said.  http://www.pennlive.com/midstate/index.ssf/2012/12/coroner_newtown_gunman_adam_la.html
[deleted]
its hard to understand unless you move from one extreme to the next, going from a Canadian suburb to the heart of Shanghai (and never smoked in my life), I cannot describe in mere words the feeling of my eyes being on fire when I stepped off that bus, or the feeling of near drowning in air.  
You didn't answer my question. If increasing prices makes there be less food to eat, where does the food go?
Thanks for sharing this, we didn't see it the last 50 times.
How would that fix traffickers asking for protection fees and shit? And how would legalizing drugs in Mexico solve it, since most of them sell the drugs to US?
Your sarcasm isn't helping your point.   I don't even understand what you're getting at with the first part. Are you saying "there are people who go to war with ulterior motives?" Because yeah, there are. But that doesn't mean you can't go to war for good reasons. So I don't see what you're getting at.   &gt;wars have a pretty bad track at creating good.  Depends on how you want to look at it. WWII was a terrible tragedy because of all the death and destruction...but the result was that the fascist movement was pretty much ended. And stuff like the holocaust were ended.   Your statement is too broad to have any real meaning.
[deleted]
how the fuck is this not front page ?!?! 
[deleted]
Of course it does, that's how Kim Jong-Il scored an 18 with all holes in ones.
* According to a Department of Justice Report (https://www.ncjrs.gov/txtfiles/dnaevid.txt) : "Forensic DNA typing laboratories  encounter rates of exclusion of accused attackers in close to 25 percent of cases. * The Second most common crime on the National Registry of Exonerations database is Rape/Sexual assault at 35% of exonerated cases.  The only higher crime is murder at 48% and it's only higher because more resources are committed to freeing falsely convicted murderers (https://www.law.umich.edu/special/exoneration/Pages/about.aspx)  So, DNA evidence excludes 25% of those falsely accused and there are a large % of people falsely convicted of rape.  Something else to think about, the conviction rate for rape is right around 52%.  Assuming that our legal system works at least partially the way it should we can assume that many of those who were found innocent were actually innocent.  That means that they were falsely accused.  The 2% number that people cling to is based on flawed data and/or cases where either the false accuser recanted their story or the police could prove beyond a shadow of a doubt that the accusation was false.  Many, many more cases are false accusations that don't fit this criteria.  Sometimes the case isn't pursued, sometimes the case goes to trial and the accused is (hopefully) found innocent.  In other cases the falsely accused is convicted of a crime and serves a prison sentence like these poor men here:  http://www.wjhg.com/home/headlines/Panama-City-Man-Falsely-Accused-of-Rape-Remains-in-Jail-179305041.html  http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2150576/Brian-Banks-Football-star-jailed-falsely-rape-wants-219k-compensation.html  And then there is this woman who filed a false rape accusation after a "bad" date:  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/12/04/lynette-lee-false-rape-claim-bad-sex_n_2238263.html  I won't even get into false accusations that aren't reported to the police.  Women who claim they were raped and/or a certain man is a rapist to their friends.  It happens and there's no way of knowing how often.  As for the myth that women can't rape:  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/12/01/women-raping-men-a-surviv_n_2224204.html  http://www.newzimbabwe.com/news-9880-Female+rapists+strike,+soldier+latest+victim/news.aspx  So go ahead and cling to your bullshit 2% statistic.  I'll continue to tell the truth.  A false accusation can ruin a person's life.  It can be just as bad a an actual rape and can lead to financial ruin, personal ruin, jail time, and even suicide.    Anyone who is actually concerned with rape and prosecution of rape cases in the United States should start speaking out and campaigning against false accusations and those who make them. Feminists should push for harsh punishments for false accusers because they hurt actual rape victims.  The more false accusations the less people believe actual victims and less resources (time and money)  are available to help actual victims. 
I wish he'd drop the sploit now....
Saw a documentary about India's eve tease and obsession with pale skin. It was a few years ago before it was hip to talk about India's poor treatment of women.  
probably will, if maturity is linked to age.  I hope i'm older than you two, maybe there's hope for youse yet.
You know nothing about the make-up of asteroids....  "In fact, all the gold, cobalt, iron, manganese, molybdenum, nickel, osmium, palladium, platinum, rhenium, rhodium, ruthenium, and tungsten mined from the Earth's crust, and that are essential for economic and technological progress, came originally from the rain of asteroids that hit the Earth after the crust cooled."
We've got people that die every second due to preventable bullshit, but yeah we should definitely start mining asteroids...
Even performing an abortion?
Brb, off to incorporate "Dreddit" at the Secretary of State Office.
*Fact check*: by your own reference (http://media.economist.com/sites/default/files/imagecache/full-width/images/2012/08/articles/body/20120818_fbc986.png), which comes from http://www.economist.com/node/21560536, **the catholic church gives only $4.6 billion/yr to charities**.  $170 billion is the estimated number for *total spending* of the Catholic Church.  The article highlights that "just 2.7%" of the church's yearly budget is spent on charities.
Ironic that the bible itself speaks of them when it talks about their shameless luxury. They have their reward in full.
Ferengi Rules Of Acquisition
&gt;Harry the Nazi.  Citation needed.
You are forgetting that the best rhodium deposits on Earth are a tiny fraction of 1% rhodium.  So, you'll have to multiply your numbers by 100...
Yeah, but it's feasible that they 3D-print the heavy stuff (like the hull of a satellite) in space from (or ON) an asteroid made of some metal, fill it up with fuel (also heavy) from another asteroid, then launch the relatively light electronics and remaining components from Earth, to finish the assembly in space...
"You'd be forcing yourself to re-wire your brain in a way that is impossible". Out of this I am assuming you think sexual preferences are built into the brain. That is false. And with your hypothetical situation, IT WOULD BE HARD, but it is not impossible. Research does show it is very possible to change your sexual oreintation. (American Psychological Association)
If there is a ever is a fleet I'll be even more surprised.
Nah...it's all [these guys'](http://www.abc.net.au/news/2012-01-24/aussie-flag-bearers-more-racist3a-survey/3790172) fault. 
TIL humanity has learned nothing from the movies. 
How about Buzz Aldrin? I heard he will be at the press release! 
The Martian Way.
It's not a university, its a college. In the province of Quebec all students must do a minimum of 2 years of college after high school's grade 11, before they go to University (if they choose to). They then go into a 3 year university program instead of 4. This school is that college.. a pre-university study.
Oh, ho, ho! Took me a minute.
we fart in your general direction, perfidious albion.
[deleted]
The vote was 5 - 3, 7 abstains and 19 absentees. 4 of the 5 who voted in favour own pubs and the fifth was the cousin of Healy-Rae.
Voted Ale Yarok
This is from the link you gave me. Net migration has gone nothing but up.   Plus why the fuck does net migration matter? If it was 0 would it really be any better? if anything it would be worse. White Britons leaving and being replaced by Pakistanis.   Immigration from the 3rd world is what matters and that one has doubled since the 90's.  Plus, you heard about the census? Since 2001, London's British population dropped from 58% to 45%. And the immigration keeps going. Facts are what led me to my position.
Why do they have to go nuclear right away?   It's not like they can't afford the attrition or put a particularly high price on human life.
There's still the fact that the matter on this planet, and the amount of energy it has stored and receives daily from the sun, is finite. _At some point_, you run into physical limits. There is no such thing as indefinite progression.  It might be possible to think up some scenario in which humans colonize another planet, but the question is, will it be soon enough? Or will population growth outstrip the ability to innovate quickly enough to avoid mass poverty and starvation? 
GET IN MA BELLY!
http://www.radioreference.com/apps/audio/?action=wp&amp;feedId=1364  Heres a live scanner. 
[deleted]
Could you give an example of a lighter context where that phrase would be used? 
My grandmother had 11 children and had her first at 13. Most of them are now dead or near dying due to mental illness (suicide) or drug overdose or a combination of both. My grandmother would have had more children if she could and had several miscarriages before giving up.   I don't feel I could say in good faith that she should have had the opportunity to have so many children. 
This exactly.  Sure, RIGHT NOW we produce a large amount of food, but the land that produces it is dying, and new lands are quickly corrupted by inefficient crops (like wheat and corn) and pesticides.  Without a major technological breakthrough in land efficiency, our current levels of production are not sustainable.
I'm wondering when "the Taliban" became a respectable source for information on mental illness. Or anything besides terrorism really. Do they have some psychologists over there meeting with the prince for 2 hours a week ok Tuesdays and Thursdays? Seems silly. 
Not really but for those who understand the local languages, it could have been the result of a [Dane with a camper!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LOM3yoDrFkI)
he didnt listen :(
[deleted]
[What has this world come to?...Just look at the top comments....](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4smbUlkYzsA)
[deleted]
The alternative is that we recognize this is a phony crisis.
I don't think having a generation of only children would be disastrous like you make out. Firstly look at China, they seem to be okay, I understand it might not be easy to be raised alone but I think for the greater good a two child policy is a great idea. I also think that if you have a society in which everybody has one child, those children are more likely to bond with each other than today's society because that is the only way for anyone to communicate with people their own age.
Yes, it's easier to deconvert them.
Several points to make. First, by the time Asians and Africans start consuming the way Americans do (if that happens at all, they may level out at in the same range as western Europeans), its likely that education of women will have drastically improved. Education of women is one is the best methods of reducing birth rates (see Malaysia as a case study of this), and so by the time their consumtion increases, their population should have levelled out a bit.    Second, there have been many many predictions of global famine in the last 50 years (and before, but I don't know anything about then). Scientific progress has always come through. In fact, with hydroponics, GM crops, and appropriate distribution and storage techniques, we already have the technology to feed many more people than we have, it's just a matter of countries having the capital to implement these solutions. Also having a government who doesn't keep fucking stealing it, and a culture with less bribery and corruption.   And of course, then there is Space. I have no other comments on this, other than Woo, astroid mining, the future is exciting!
"*...if* *we* *keep* *the* *populations* *of* *the* *rich* *growing,* *then* *the* *poor* *aren’t* *going* *to* *have* *a* *chance,* *and* *eventually,* *the* *descendants* *of* *the* *rich* *aren’t* *going* *to* *have* *a* *chance* *either.*  1.) Assuming *rich* &amp; *poor* are referring to nations. 2.) Maintained logic.  3.) Replaced fiction with reality.   If populations of rich are not growing and are generally flat or declining (inclusive of immigration), then the poor are going to have a chance, and the descendants of the rich will be completely fine in perpetuity.  
It's not the 'Greeks'; it's the fascists. 
Because it doesn't. Hear me out before down voting OK? Those that go on priest/monk killing rampage are not non-believers. They are believers and fundamentalists as well, but they believe in an ideology not a religion. Most often this ideology is communism. There never was a single case in history of reiligious people being massacred by atheists not lead by religion-like ideology. What's the difference then when both religion and ideology can be considered a form of mass madness (as they reject reason and use fairy tales as justification for various atrocities)? Ideology doesn't require belief in God. That's the only difference.
By what authority can you say that? Science?  The way you redditors toss around judgement as to what rights people should and should not have is incredibly hypocritical.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Hrm-rPSCIBw
Supposing an Asteroid 500m^3 was found with enough rhodium, but also iridium, platinum, and tungsten. That's way more than 200bn$.
Read my longer post. It's not that I don't agree with you, I just meant that I am someone who is from a family that is the exception, not the rule
When you live in a social group, on in territory shared with others everything you do effects others, especially brining more into the group. If it effects others it's no longer just your choice.
&gt;'Greece for Greeks'  As a non-Greek, I see nothing wrong with this. On a smaller scale, should other people have the right to move into your house without your approval? 
I was in Norway on vacation last year and got to taste this cheese. For any Americans who may be wondering, it tastes exactly like the stuff in [Cheese Combos](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Combos).
[deleted]
"This is a Muslim area" is not a phrase we're going to accept in our country. I know the pussy French accepted it and now look where they are.  Islam must never be allowed to interfere with secularism, we are so close to a reasonable secular state and we cannot risk this backwards religion fucking up decades of work in the UK. And yes Islam is backwards, it's homophobic and treats women like shit.
That's Verizon flu shots, I guess.
[The Internet](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/American_imperialism), obviously.
Hooooray Reddit!
Not in Europe, and you should be thankful...
Well, loses a bit of the dramatic effect then doesn't it? You could still get a stingy cut from a broken beer can though. Possibly an infection.
This is a ridiculous assertion. Can you back this up in any way?
Somebody's got to do the dirty jobs... No local would want to be a cleaning lady for example, Immigrants are reluctant to become one.
As if "not bribing" was a possibility in order to do business in those countries. Come on.
To everyone that wants to get with a Chinese woman that's over 27: they're terrible at sex, they don't shave, and it smells.  Source: Personal experience.
[deleted]
If these are meant as refutations to what I said, I fail to see the relevance.  The world's over population is a problem, but a much larger problem is over consumption. The US has about 4% of the population but consumes about 25% of the world's resources. Over consumption is the driving force in the destruction of the natural world and it's a direct product of civilization, not human nature.
Tip toeing around the issue because it might be racist to confront it isn't a reason. Prove that this isn't Islamic phenomena, that in many countries around the world (England, France, Norway, NZ, Australia, America, India) Muslims feel at odds with their country mates. Is it wrong to call all Muslims backward? Of course. But is it ridiculous to call this an Islamic phenomenon? Not at all.
This being a big no: Ok   10 years in jail: Not ok   There's a thing called freedom of speech IIRC
You realize you are trying to make an apology for hate crimes yes?  They aren't 'idiots looking for trouble', they committed hate crimes.  Why won't you admit that?  Why try to gloss over it?  Because they are Muslim?  You're perhaps worried you'll be viewed as a racist?
There are different hadith, accepted by different traditions. In some cases, it depends on who the witnesses were, and how many of them heard Mohammed.
Fuck yeah. As an American, I like this attitude.
As a briton living in the Czech Republic, i see it's time to apply for Czech citizenship, and continue my peaceful ife among really decent people who still treat each other with respect and dignity. The UK is stuffed, and they want to drag the EU down with them, something that won't happen.  The REAL reason for the speech is the impending tax on transactions, and more to come in reigning in the criminals. Appropriate that this will affect the City of London, and US financial cabal most of all. The UK has persistently and aggressively attempted to loosen the constraints on economic horse trading, to the direct benefit of the COL above all else.  I hope the UK gets out of the EU, and the rest of us (including me as a new citizen of a democratic country) can get on with life, and no doubt breathe a sigh of relief as well.   
Nice try, China.
I think he's no older than 28 :)
With economics, my friend. The only people we have to liberate are the ones who don't play ball. 
Truth and Fiction are never too far apart. 
I didn't know "frightening" was synonymous with "exciting".
People for hundreds of miles around will be affected. All 12 of them.
Rest of world expected to stop laughing in about 12 hours.
Thats proably enough for a year
South Australia is best Australia!
They are. Actually the cheapest last time I saw was Venezuala. Having something produced in your backyard always make it cheaper (sorry if I sound like I'm backtracking), but the thing about the global market is that if I produce gas in say the U.S., and I have say 3,000 barrels of oil that will sell for $100 locally (for maths sake) and I have a fixed cost of transporting that oil at say $50,000. Then my profit off that oil is $250,000. Now if the price in Europe is $150 because their supply is disrupted and the cost to ship my oil to Europe is $150,000, then I could still stand to make more money ($300,000). Also, it should be pointed out local gas prices include various levels of taxes and required fuel additives.
[deleted]
actually yes, dignity. 
good day mate!
Now I'm... Coming back home.
[True Story! Can't wait to get deployed to Australia!](http://www.heraldsun.com.au/news/victoria/us-to-pull-9000-troops-from-japan/story-e6frf7lf-1226341328308)
I guess you're referencing something I don't get.  
As the left tries to spin their loss into a construed win.
Probably not, but at the same time it will stop it from skyrocketing in price. As the price of oil goes up, the more oil that will be drilled.
[deleted]
Every time I read about oil being discovered I go "ugh".
I work in the Bakken. Maybe it is time to move to Australia!
Forget the blackjack, spider just bit me I'm a gonner
&gt; Star Wars toy allegedly depicting a mosque.  will there be alleged lasers to melt down the alleged mosque into slag?
Well, it is Brooklyn. If popular media has taught me anything it's that everyone from New York is an asshole by default. 
I only go to Inn-n-out when I'm bored, it's that convenient for me. 
Wasn't criticizing, just try to add some input :)
Is it really not scapegoating when the governments doing the scapegoating are just as guilty?
While he tickles your mum's prostrate
yeah I know...silt from the rivers and such blah blah.   Just ironic is all.
[deleted]
Dr. Love is Strange.
I think it's some kind of canned garbage they're talking about and not the crock pot delicacy you and I are thinking of of.
China has very few missiles, and none of them can be fired at will.  They have to get fuel into them etc. in order to launch them.  Russia and the US are the only two countries who have missiles at the ready.  In spite of all the treaty talks, the US actually has a huge lead in nuclear arms right now.  We've retired aging missiles and smaller warheads in favor of newer, more accurate missiles and even bigger warheads.  It is pretty well known right now that with our current advantage we could likely(as in greater than 99 percent) preemptively wipe out every single missile China has that could hit us.  America has been aggressively increasing our counter-force capabilities.
I saw it in Sydney once, never went in though
I guess I am not that familiar with WH40k universe.  I thought the Warp is preexisting.  Why does the emperor need to be alive for humanity to use it? 
Really? Nobody else read it as "North Korea says it would carry rocket launchers"?
I do not want to sound all cool or nothing but, I totally called thi 20 odd hours ago. http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/174dcl/20_trillion_oil_basin_discovered_in_australia_set/c8251jr?context=3
Do you really want to know?
Does anyone else see an airborne man in the link thumbnail?
You really believe anything you're told, don't you?
if only we had the Triforce to destroy this enemy
They are not frighten of us American pig-dogs
China would also get the shit kicked out of them.
Not likely, 35,000 US soldiers (and requisite equipment) are stationed there.
NO this is very in-character of extremists. Most of us Muslims disagree with them!
The only good bug is a dead bug!
Dear North Korea,  It might not be the best idea ever to threaten to use nuclear weapons against, you know, *the country that invented them*. Just sayin'.  Hugs and kisses, Love ya, mean it,  Common Sense
Yeah, it is a pretty interesting world we live in.  It's strange to think that there are so many man-made objects in our own country that have the potential to just destroy everything.  Hopefully they're never used.  Hopefully.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Who's??
I like how the thumbnail of this article is someone throwing Kim il sung in the air. 
You wouldn't be saying "no foul" if you had to go use the loo after I was done in there.   Have you ever heard of Kheema curry? 
They make a good point - I think the association between [white slavery](http://researchnews.osu.edu/archive/whtslav.htm) and Islamic-looking architecture is etched into the collective European subconscious.
TL;DR  This Turk thinks it's perfectly fine to assault soldiers of allied states because they're "foreign western soldiers". A really swell and sensible guy.
Ok time for the CIA to horribly botch and assassination or support a doomed revolution. Bay of Bul-go-gi?
Yeah, except that I don't necessarily give that much of a damn about the Palestinian struggle independently from the Zionist struggle.  Brotherhood, or fuck it.
Its all about fighting the Russians, MAAAAAAN!
I'm telling you guys, Kim Jong Un is recreating "Homefront."   It's just a matter of time until it happens.
All your base r belong to us?
This sounds like a reasonable B movie...  Crocageddon..  Crocnami  Crocalypse..
I don't, they are supposed to answer to us.    Blindly trust them, and you are the problem.  They may have the answer, but they may be the problem.   ...Caveat to that.  I do try to educate myself.  Hopefully you do as well.
Alrighty, ignoring counting London districts individually, some of which are as high as 17,000/sq mi;  * London: 13,466/sq mi * Manchester: 11,260/sq mi * Liverpool: 10,070/sq mi  * Birmingham: 9,680/sq mi * Glasgow: 8,541.8 /sq mi  And we have at least 3 city's with a population above one million:  * London: 8.3m * Birmingham: 2.3m * Manchester: 1.7m  Naturally though being British we have a number of different ways of dividing geographical areas, [if you count it by "metropolitan area"](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_metropolitan_areas_in_the_United_Kingdom) we have 12 citys over 1 million population, but of course that's only comparable to city's in other country's if they count theirs the same way.  For instance I find it hard to believe that San Francisco 'only' has 800,000 people so I imagine US city population is probably counted based on inner-city population exclusively, in the same way that the difference between 'London city' and the London metropolitan area is 5 million more people.
Your downvotes prove how the lack of objective thinking on reddit runs rampant.
I think that's the real story.  Throughout the developed world all crime has experienced steep declines over the past few decades.  
Fugg, thats crazy
[deleted]
Eh, being a scofflaw doesn't mean you lack a moral code!
So you're judging the actions of an ancient empire that doesn't even exist anymore by the standards of a modern nation-state.  Ok buddy!
Because you don't become immune to concussive blast.
Reminds me of an episode of all in the Family, titled "The Contract" Archie is duped into buying aluminum siding, Archie's Contract  Mr. Scanlan: ** Now, we have a contract, Mr. Bunker --**   George: ** Ain't there some law against taking advantage of the simple-minded?**   Archie: ** Well, is there? Because if there ain't, there oughta be.**
I agree. I looked into it before I arrived and realised the full extent of the exaggeration a about 'Shottingham' - there are a LOT of drug dealers here though, so maybe they were talking about shotting rather than shooting haha
The richest 1% of Americans now hold 25% of the country's wealth and more needs to be done to boost equality, says Nobel Prize winning economist Joseph Stiglitz in Davos.
Thanks hommie...
Errr....My tuition was $2,800 a year in the states from 2002-2005.  What kind of schools are you people going to?  Go to a public school damnit.  Edit: I just checked; my old school is about $6,000 a year now for 30 credit hours.  What the fuck happened?  Certainly not just inflation...  For what it's worth, at least in my state, if you keep a B average in high school, you get free tuition and a stipend for books.  Your living expenses are your own problem, though.
Thank you for your detailed response; I'll be going over it again a few times throughout today.    I don't think it's the 3rd world countries that are using too many resources; What is Africa's Carbon Foot print? They don't do factory farming from what I gather from your post; so the changes that do need to be made are in the countries that can implement them, i.e. China, America, Europe, etc..   This problem is very complicated and I appreciate anyone even discoursing about it; thank you.
[deleted]
Scientology is bullshit and deserves a lot of bad press. Personally, I won't be satisfied until Tom Cruise is held accountable for his role in it.      That said, I don't feel sorry for these idiots. People need to take responsibility for their beliefs even if they don't believe them anymore. You can't just run to the courts when you find out you got tricked. It's on you.
I know eaturbrainz IRL.  
It was the intent of the Zionist movement to get rid of all the Palestinians in the area. They called it the 'Arab Question' and their solution to it was the transfer of the aboriginal people outside of the country.
Mine don't even get off the bed
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Compressed_air_car#Storage_tanks  And they make them for paintball too for the same reasons: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kXvyqZ6JuYw
I'm convinced that North Korea will do anything to get in the news. They're like girls on facebook that post "selfies" and write some bullshit drama
Who is Sena and why are they trying to shiv him/her?
As long as ninja looting is not a recognized crime in the real world, I would suspect so.
Didn't the English invent the multinational corporation as a sort of abstract privateer to foster their imperial ambitions by automating the process of divide and conquer? Why the change of heart now?
Yeah, but there's a new generation of open minded people. As matter of fact both church and royal family are in their worst days. On the other hand, our government is stuck in the last century, so is very difficult to step forward. For example, there has been a major education reform  and the only institution that the government has talked to is the church... What I really want to say is that there are a lot of people here who is tired of this situation. And it's sad, but the only possible way to develop ourselves is moving abroad and look for new opportunities.
Yes, education does need reform, but not at the expense of our military. Take it out of something that is bullshit, like foreign aid or welfare to those who are fit to make their own money. We need welfare and education reform pretty badly, among other things. 
He pissed and moaned about Jimmy Carr not paying a proper amount but kept schtum about Starbucks.
Not much, because they already have to compete with companies that *don't* take advantage of these loopholes.  It means that they'll have to reduce their profit margins versus their competitors.
[They](http://abcnews.go.com/International/wireStory/austrian-police-extreme-network-busted-18299878) say 200 members.  There have been three discoveries of illegal weapon stacks this year already, one of them at a politician of Haider's former government party.  [Much](http://www.nachrichten.at/oberoesterreich/Ueberfaelle-Drogenhandel-Einbrueche-Neonazis-als-Mafia-Bosse-verhaftet;art4,1050786)  [more](http://www.stopptdierechten.at/2013/01/24/objekt-21-kriminell-und-nationalsozialistisch/) [in](http://dokmz.wordpress.com/2013/01/24/rechtsradikales-netzwerk-in-oberosterreich-ausgehoben/) [German](http://derstandard.at/1358304539554/Oberoesterreich-Rechtsradikales-Netzwerk-ausgehoben)  
But all it takes is one bad decision or worse a bad leader and boom world is screwed
So Delhi and Warrington then ye? 
Didn't you know?  Reality only applies when it is for whatever agenda the reddit-tards deem it be.
Even if it's true, I don't know whether to cheer or boo. Taking money from one corrupt organization and handing it to another (government) doesn't necessarily scream "victory" to me...
&gt; and due to the current fearmongering against muslims they are often particularly highlighted,  Stupid reporters doing their jobs! I mean, its bias right, its not like the [President Karzai pardons rape victims.](http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-asia-15991641) That's just bias reporting right?  When heads of state need to fix their broken justice systems, then you have a very, very real problem. Denying it and cherry picking other examples isn't some masterful argument, its just you pathetically showing your bias and doing your best to deny the truth.
Oh, I understand the context in India quite well and I can definitely see that this is a good idea. I was just addressing the comment about taxis in Dubai. While the concept is similar, the impetus is different. That was my point.
Sweeping generalizations don't normally include qualifiers like "a lot of."
What a huge contradiction : Women "drive" the cabs to be "safe"
Right, and just because I pay someone to follow my kids around filming them doesn't mean I'm watching the tapes. I'm doing it JUST IN CASE something happens. I don't watch them in normal circumstances, I swear! Trust me!
[deleted]
And why is it a lot more dangerous just to be a woman? They're not considering changing that, they're just accepting it's the way it is and enacting mandates based on that, which does no help to society in the end.
Taiwan is a major wild card here. It's not clear to me what this action is for, but the islands are closest to Taiwan, which could one day be a security threat (likely from China).  The Taiwanese majority are closer to the Japanese and retain a curious nostalgia of Japanese colonialism, when the island was quite prosperous, civilized and stable, unlike elsewhere in Asia. They generally advocate independence from all "Chinas", though many just accept the ridiculous but stable limbo of "two Chinas".  The Chinese immigrants that escaped with the ROC are usually anti-Japanese, as many of their grandparents suffered gravely in poverty and terror as a result of constant warfare and invasion in China. This group has generally controlled politics and is looking for gradual reconciliation with the "rest of China".  When the ROC took over Taiwan, these two groups had a serious culture clash that persists in politics to this day.But in everyday life, the two groups have slowly assimilated as a result of Taiwanization. 
I won't bother to repeat my reply.  However - this is not 'Cameras following you'.   You know what's easier than trawling CCTV? Tracking people's phone signal. Police merely need to get a warrant and they can get records from the phone companies.   They can do that anywhere in the world. 
My upload speed was fine, I also can't download the file I uploaded. It uses bandwidth and says 'downloading'. It even hits 100% but then just sticks there. No prompt, no file. Nothing. 
I speak as some one living in a muslim country where we are taught islam in school. A lot of the shit people do here is cultural, we have to deal with people who call themselves muslim's but know nothing about it and people who insist of refusing to apply common sense to a guidelines set forth in ancient history. 
It goes back even further, you can trace lots key claims back all the way to Ra the Sun God. Over thousands of years it's just morphed as successive religions steal bits for their own purposes.  25th of Dec, Virgin Birth, Resurrection after 3 days etc are just 3 of those keys that got passed down.   
I dunno, I'm not religious but it seems like a fairly straightforward concept. Why can't you believe in God while simultaneously believing that many of the things written in the bible/torah/qur'an/whatever were written by humans and may have been appropriate guidelines centuries ago but certainly aren't today?  Leviticus makes lots of restrictions that people don't follow today. I'm not really sure why you believe that the concept of say jesus being the son of god and shellfish are sinful have to go together. It is quite possible to believe one and not the other.
Intolerant people would be intolerant regardless of their religion.  Religion just gives them a dumb reason.  Look how intolerant the Christian right wing is.
&gt; Pretty weasel-y debate tactic if you ask me.      It's pretty weasely to ignore all the shit done in the name of Islam and just claim they aren't all so bad, when you have Islam as state religion in some countries, with death penalty for religious offences.   Yeah, Iran was fucking great before you assholes just had to reinstate Islam.
Fair enough.  I DO think (in fact I KNOW) that it's possible to lift yourself up.    It makes me puke a little in my mouth because it sounds like I'm bragging, but I used to be one of those rather unmotivated but very smart kids, even through my 20s.  I got fed up with sitting on my ass thinking of ideas and never doing them, working shitty jobs and so forth.  Eventually I got off my ass, and now I have skills that pay bills, and ones that let me pursue creative outlets too.
ya, i remember something about an amish guy wanted to pass a law or get citizenship or something but apparently you could not do it without going online....
&gt; It's the first evidence that any insect can orientate themselves with the sky  Whaaat?  I thought moths used the moon for orientation which is why they're attracted to light.  The particular spiral shape they fly in as the hone in on a lightbulb is exactly the shape you would expect them to use if they were trying to fly in a straight line based on the position of the moon, something like that?
Using your logic, the parking downtown, where my job is, should be a human right, because my livelihood depends on it. The fuel I put in my car to get to work should also be a human right, because otherwise, how in the world could I get to work, and it's tyrannical that it isn't a human right. The tv I watch, should be a human right, because the information put on it is essential for my livelihood. Great fucking plan! Just make everything you want a "human right".   How did we ever get to where we are now without naming technological advancements a human right? My God, I must hate humanity!!!!
Don't listen to these big government shills. I think its wonderful that people distrust their politicians.
I don't think it's "no morals"     I think successful people follow their own set of morals. They take greater risks and are less likely to give up in the face of adversity (i.e. facing conflicting morals). Most people do not function this way. 
Genius
The only thing more annoying than norway itself, is people like you blathering about how wonderful it is.  Nobody fucking cares.
Imagine if all the money they spent on opposing climate science, healthcare, etc. was spent on moving those initiatives forward for the benefit of all including corporations.  Right now we could be the leader in electric cars not China.  Right now we could be the leader in solar development not Germany.    Close-minded tools!  They'll be the first to bail from this country with their offshore accounts leaving the rest of us to take it up the *%$&amp;.
Thanks for the informative and honest reply.  I was being serious when I said you would be the first to explain this to me.
According to the article, how is this like a real life Grand Theft Auto? 
&gt; but it doesn't make people safer in general.   They might not make me feel safer - if someone is up to no good, no camera will stop them, but their presence does mean I can reasonably confidant they will be held to account for their actions.
Plenty of money to re-invade Africa though...   If Argentina puts those Brits that are occupying those South American Islands on a boat back home, the resulting war could bankrupt England! ☺
But then who will watch the people watching the cameras watching people?
God I want this to be true.
NI was less effected by the famine. 
There's a LOT wrong with the 'nothing illegal = nothing to worry about' argument.  It's entirely possible for state surveillance to be re-purposed for political repression; look at the FBI's blackmail projects under Hoover.
Big brother ragequits
Yes.
[deleted]
&gt;Cameras are there to ~~record~~ help fight crime. Patrols are there to ~~be able to react quickly~~ help fight crime.      Beep. Beep. Beep. Beeeep.  Don't double standard on me, damnit! 
&gt; Are you sure you're reading the same thing as I am? Why don't you quote it back to me in context please?  You're the one with delusions, if someone needs some explaining, it is you. I said, plain as the sun, "aren't all Arabs brothers or something" when you chirped your "what, now all Arabs are Palestinians" line. Really, try to keep pace.  &gt; Jews' is what a lot of the Palestinian people and a lot of the Arabs call Israelis.  I am sure that 20% of the Israeli people have something to say about that. Besides...how racist.  &gt; Simply a mistranslated statement and sad that you're attempting to use it in this way.  Isn't it funny how Arabs and Persians are always "mistranslated" ? Amazing, ain't it?  &gt; You mean it's okay to kick people   Only if by "kick people" you mean "offer better economic conditions". You know, like all of them Palestinians that used to work on Kuwait ("used", because, you know, since the PLO supported Saddam, they're not welcome anymore). Surely the Kuwaitis were "kicking people" by giving opportunities to the Palestinian workers!  &gt; Still doesn't excuse the apartheid  Get acquainted with what apartheid means. Then we can talk.  &gt; Israel's numbers mean nothing, the Palestinians were the ones who decided to pursue a non-violent resistance in the West Bank.  Whatever makes you sleep better at night, habibi. Meanwhile, in the real world, "Palestinian Islamic Jihad leader Ramadan Abdallah Shalah complained to the Qatari newspaper Al-Sharq that *the separation barrier "limits the ability of the resistance to arrive deep within [Israeli territory] to carry out suicide bombing attacks*, but the *resistance has not surrendered or become helpless, and is looking for other ways to cope* [...]" - how so very frustrated, spanked again - and how very much "non-violent"!  &gt; fellow goyim  You talking in the plural to someone else? Don't you get tired of being corrected?  &gt; If you didn't care you wouldn't go on and on about it.  Oh, you feel validated? Good, because I feel amused. We both get something out of it!  &gt; Please spare me your conspiracy theories and extremist views  Projection, again? So soon?  &gt; More racism? Shame on you.  Broken record is broken.   
By citizens. You should be wary of handing the government the same privilege.
Why? Film me all you want, i'm not doing anything shady. And if this anti camera thing gets in, I bet these people will bitch when someone mugs them in an area that used to have a camera
Humanity as a whole will never be able to plan for the future.
I'm a natural born smasher.
&gt; Although it wasn't the case several years ago, there is now a MOUNTAIN of evidence indicating that anthropogenic  You know that it is not a simple question of yes or no? There are things such as how fast it is happening (e.g., will sea levels rise by a meter within 50 years or not?), what the contribution of people are having.   For instance, if everything is correct, the Kyoto protocol is just a feel good exercise.   &gt; Climate scientists on the whole do not make nearly as much money as those in the current energy industry. The motivation to lie just isn't there.  Bullshit. Firstly, there are quite a lot of institutes and universities (with greatly expanded research staffing). Furthermore, in all academic, competition for tenure is intense.   It is publish or perish.   Also, some communities (incestious rat colonies) are formed that takes an "us against the world" approach to science. They won't release data and methods, even when subject to FOI, and they protect each other. For example, Keith Briffa said this:  &gt; I can’t see either of these papers being in the next IPCC report. Kevin and I will keep them out somehow – **even if we have to redefine what the peer-review literature is!**   Any criticism of any method (which is a normal part of science) is kept out of climate "science". Pathetic!
That is a reasonable and well thought out point of view, but I should add that Putin (and Lavrov) aren't really saying that their policy is *good* for the people in Syria, Iraq, etc necessarily. They're just saying it's good for them and for the west (Europe and US). This is actually quite cold, and it reflects their opinion that the danger of Islamists gaining power is just too high to risk overthrowing governments that oppress their people. It is consistent -- Putin has repeatedly stated that he believes foreign policy should be guided by self-interest rather than a desire to set the world right. But that doesn't necessarily make it just (though you can very reasonably argue it is not the place of other countries to decide what is just -- Putin would agree).  So make of that what you will.
In one way it's kind of good because it allows people to have the option to get credit when they wouldn't be able to otherwise. If there was a cap on interest, credit companies just wouldn't give you a card if you were high risk.
http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/law-and-order/3507238/Social-services-set-up-CCTV-camera-in-couples-bedroom.html
Brilliant, a camera pointed at a mothers bedroom, a camera that tells people to move along in a council owned area and some people that obviously need a lesson in human rights. This is all the evidence I need to prove to me that the Government are up to something dirty.
You mean some outsourced jobs use...child labor? *GASP*
Those are the two most likely options. Either way, I'm done talking to someone who acts like they are privilege to some secret propaganda info and you can't back up one thing you said. You are the worst kind of person to try to argue with. You refuse to listen to anything besides what you already believe and you won't even try to back up the crazy shit you do believe. And if you did it would probably be from some crazy person blog or something. Go back to /r/conspiracy. 
[deleted]
I notice you're not arguing about male-only cabs anymore. Okay. I'm going to take that as an indication that you understand how silly your argument was.  About your next argument: Sure, it's a fallacy, to a certain extent. But it's a solution that keeps women from being brutally raped at alarming levels while providing jobs for women and very, very little inconvenience for anybody else, since most cabs will be available to men.   Is it ideal? No. But right now, the Indian government is doing next-to-nothing to prevent rapes, and police are doing less, encouraging women to marry the men who gang-raped them. This is a step that just needs to be taken.
Nice revisionist history there.    &gt; This is ironic. In the mid-'80s, if you remember, we and the United - Saudi Arabia and the United States were supporting the Mujahideen to liberate Afghanistan from the Soviets. He [Osama bin Laden] came to thank me for my efforts to bring the Americans, our friends, to help us against the atheists, he said the communists. Isn't it ironic? - Prince Bandar bin Sultan of Saudi Arabia
Finally some good news. If China and US can work together then they can tackle any global crisis.
You are pitiful, you had bad parents, you lack education.  You are sad.  ;)
[deleted]
He's French.
There are no homosexuals in Iran...
and at the time it was kind of a big deal.  something akin to obamas election.  but if you go back to when teh first waves of irish immigrants started hitting american shores, they were viewed as subhuman, classified as not white.   they couldnt go in certain restaurants, hotels.  people woudnt hire them or rent to them.  it kinda sucked.
So, did you join reddit expressly to say racist things? Because it looks like you haven't contributed anything else to reddit except that you hate black people and Roma. I wish people would stop coming to reddit to smear their bigotry around, without adding anything to conversations about art, literature, science, history, pop culture, or the general quotient of human beauty here.
[*My thoughts EXACTLY.*](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/17bhk0/a_survey_in_france_published_this_week_revealed/c8451ts)  And you can bet your ass a "negro" would have little or no chance being made head-of-state in most European nations (if any.)  Especially on the continent.  I'm not an American (Canadian), but I think Americans take entirely too much guff from Europe with regard to their alleged lack of sophistication and "racism."  In truth some of the scariest right-nationalism and xenophobia I've heard has come out of the mouths of continentals.
I know MANY Muslims, many of which are in my family, and they are the most ideal citizens I know. They work hard, they follow the rules, they give to charity, and they stay out of trouble (don't drink or display any of the behaviours associated with it).
[deleted]
Under your theory, why doesn't this apply to poor Asian immigrants to the US? They are similarly situated to Hispanics. Culture is part of it. 
this is all really basic shit that anyone who's halfway honest and has been paying attention can clearly see.  how surprising, reddit freaks out and whines about it
So 70 of younger generally more liberal people believe this, I can't imagine how the (generally more) intolerant older generation feels. 
No, you're misunderstanding it. Jews already living in France were lucky if they survived the 2nd world war without possessions. That's the best outcome.
That's a nice argument you brought here. There's only one thing stronger than the love for Allah in the Muslim world, it's the hate for Jews, so I'm not surprised that you're still feeling the hate. You were able to get rid of Allah though so I'm hopeful you'll be able to let go the hate for the Jews too one day. Good luck!
[**toe** the line](http://www.google.com/url?sa=t&amp;rct=j&amp;q=&amp;esrc=s&amp;source=web&amp;cd=1&amp;cad=rja&amp;ved=0CDIQFjAA&amp;url=http%3A%2F%2Fen.wikipedia.org%2Fwiki%2FToe_the_line&amp;ei=OnUEUZ-MFqjfiAKU1YH4Bw&amp;usg=AFQjCNGipls6T1pQOQvMosICpjenuoEllw&amp;bvm=bv.41524429,d.cGE)
Everyone hates Zionists except Zionists and people who have been indoctrinated by Zionists. My best friend is Jewish. I know the difference between a Zionist and a Jewish person.  You really need to avoid strawman arguments. Trying to claim that I'm anti-Jewish really isn't working for you. At least be able to make a proper point if you're going to sully the title of "Atheist from a Muslim family." SO embarrassing.
Its an impossible question to answer, like Christianity there are many different sects and cultures involved. Some adapt readily whilst others outright reject anything that can't be used to their advantage.  Think of it like the difference between someone raised in California vs someone raised in the wbc. Both might call themselves Christian, but that's where the similarities end.
This title is only misleading if you are an apple fanatic.
The Euro is not fixed, and what you are seeing in the equities and currency markets is actually very dangerous for the USA. We are probably seeing global markets getting sick and tired of the US economic problems, likewise sick and tired of holding US dollars, and so they are probably dumping them.
He certainly wasn't a skeptic or a rationalist.
There's a really weird thing I've noticed in Redditland, Islam is apparently off limits for criticism because most of its followers are 'people of colour' (this was the least offensive way I could phrase this). Redditors need to stop associating criticism of Islam and or Muslims (followers of Islam) with criticism of Arabs/assorted really tanned folk. In France and in Italy and in England and to a degree in Canada Islam is a problem. The Muslims that are immigrating do NOT want to adapt at all. Other groups don't really have this same problem, take oh I dunno the Koreans for example. Koreans started coming en mass into the States some 20ish years ago and are definitely one of the more economically successful groups that exist. Why? They adapted to good ol' fashioned American capitalism, they learned English, sent their kids to American universities to become doctors and lawyers. Muslim immigrants have largely failed to adapt to this standard and focus more on creating Muslim centered communities than becoming part of the communities that already exist in their adopted countries. That's my two cents.
[deleted]
dont forget agitation ;)
I think we can sort this out with a couple drone strikes. 
You don't mention things that have gotten cheaper. Electronics are drastically cheaper. I can now buy a 50 inch TV for $400 from Frys. Most people a decade ago would pay $1500+ for a TV. Home phone service is now basically free due to VOIP. The cost of a mortgage is at an all-time low. 
&gt;implying that this is typical and to be expected of someone who is religious.  Whatever he was "implying", the fact stands that religious people invented the device. Those who follow Sharia Law are exclusively religious. Such a brief post can be interpreted any which way since it seems so ambiguous.
Being cool is overrated. I love having my mom on Facebook.
French never was a "pure" culture, because "pure" cultures don't exist. All cultures have historically experienced influence and assimilation.   French culture didn't seem to have a problem "assimilating" other foreign cultural products like chinoserie and japonisme, jazz, African-inspired primitivism...
skilled worker in construction in Israel will get more money then an engineer, Israel is despaired for skilled construction workers - last time I read it eased work immigration visas if a person is a construction workers (vs other skilled workers)  Edits:   [17K Nis](http://www.globes.co.il/news/article.aspx?did=1000750611) for entry level construction worker (51K $ per year) - Israel meduim salary is half of this.  * [6800](http://www.themarker.com/realestate/1.1747373) work immigration visas had been given to for constuction construction (2010)  * [600](http://www.globes.co.il/news/article.aspx?did=1000780398) construction immigrants for bulgaria in a month (October 2012).  * [1000](http://www.calcalist.co.il/real_estate/articles/0,7340,L-3586189,00.html) construction immigrants for bulgaria in a month (October 2012). 
*Until now........*
Email. Did you know that you can attach photos to those and send them to your whole family in one go? And then get replies?  It's pretty new maybe you've never heard of it.
That's one of the reasons I deactivated my account.
Wait until she joins reddit.
It's like the Chinpokomon.
I moved to rural NJ, Verizon dsl tops out here at 3mb and it's the only isp to choose from it's painful! Meanwhile somebody in Bulgaria is pwning me. 
Some schools in Japan do serve whale meat occasionally. It is sold to schools at far below cost in an effort to get kids to try it and then their parents to buy it.  Demand for whale meat is low and they want to increase consumption
Twitter is good but easier to miss stuff as it goes by.
al qaeda is not an organization in the traditional sense, it's a loose group of people who follow the same goals. It's more like a franchise than a corporation, if that makes sense. So of course it's going to look like random people.
This is not the first tragedy, and certainly will not be the last.
What a mess.
Well we have the video, so it was worth it.
You are thinking the [Cocoanut Grove Fire](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cocoanut_Grove_fire) in Boston in 1942.  The silver lining of the tragedy is it really pushed forward our building codes, and they were more enforced.  Or maybe the Station Nightclub Fire in Rhode Island (Second post down).
In this case, since we aren't crazy nazis, nor cornered, the "final" solution would simply be chaning immigration laws.  Godwin's law, if subtle.
Humans are a plague. Not me, mind you. I'm fine as are my people. But the rest of you, you all are a disease best gotten rid of the sooner the better.
I think you're missing my point though. Its been proven that increased CO2 positively effects the global bloom. Hence increased CO2 equates substantial bloom. I urge you to read into global bloom data. It's quite interesting.
There's no such thing as ironic racism, buddy. hth :)
It wasn't coal 300 million years ago.
Ban clubbing for more than 7 persons!
Blaming everyone else as if that would justify Israel's crimes is a logical fallacy and shows desperation.
No better than the Nazis on this one. Israel needs to seriously reevaluate its purpose and practices. I feel like I need to cry now.
This is just heartbreaking, I rarely get affected by far away tragedies but this is horrible. So many promising young lives. 
[deleted]
Yeah, we bomb the rescuers because who do you suppose shows up to help bad guys? This is an intentional strategy to draw out more combatants and nail them.  As long as we kill more than we "create", this is the correct path.  International law has NEVER been observed. International law has never been more that a fig leaf to be used by those with might and it will never do anything to hinder them. Only those *with* might are in a position to enforce law.
[deleted]
There's a doctor signing off on all those prescriptions so feel free to continue to blame the doctors.
Yeah that's completely unacceptable. If there's a fire (or any emergency) at the club I work at I'll be damn sure that every possible door is open and to hell with anybody who objects.
I'm going to teach my children that 3 or 4 children are ideal, or possibly even more if they can give each the attention and investment they deserve.  But I think the rest of you seriously need to have only 1 child.
I've never met them or knew them.  Their existence, life, or death has no emotional impact on me.  All those lives will be forgotten in time, like tears in rain.
No. What are you on about?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ggXmKPMaHMo
Wow, I rarely stare at the screen shocked at a video anymore. About two minutes after the fire starts and the mass of people are stuck in the doorway with others trying to pull them out while the fire grows larger behind them, holy fuck.
That's Numberwang!  ~~(yes, i know, its also 42)~~
Keeping the North a separate state means one more ally for them. They already have to deal with an American-friendly Japan, Taiwan and South Korea. If the Vietnam war was successful, they'd be damn near surrounded. 
Well, everything is relative. What country exactly are you comparing Japan to? Their standard of living is better than that of most of the world.
Which is pennies on the dollar to what the entire unification will cost.
24 million uneducated people... A headache? Sounds like a capitalistic gold mine to me. Open up sweat shops, feed them, and you have cheap consumerism at its finest. 
Greece has real debt limits and they don't have control over their own monetary policy
&gt;lifetime in prison  evidently not.
Step 4 : fuck... 
People keep going there because, despite not being able to get drugs, it is an interesting place.   You can still get alcohol so if you can tolerate going without weed/cocaine/MDMA/LSD/etc. for a few days, it is a good place to visit.
I don't know. We may be dumb, or else we won't be in this situation from a couple decades..personally, my ideas are more of the "Right" party, and I wouldn't like Left party at government as much as I wouldn't like the Right Party. I lost belief in Berlusconi, and i think that my vote will go towards a "small" party with ideas that I like.  My comment wanted to emphasize the fact that while Monti was at government, he got all the attention, when now (near the elections) Berlusconi is everywhere: people talk about him in a bad way or in a good way, and they criticize him. The Left party just says "Berlusconi is wrong!" over and over, while Berlusconi says that the Left party has no program and just wants to counter him.  Which is true. Berlusconi is a showman, a man who built an economical empire from scratch because he was smart and knew how to destroy opponents (even with unconventional methods). Berlusconi feared Matteo Renzi, when he could have been the leader of the Left Party, because he actually wanted to *do something instead of bragging about him*..so yeah, perhaps people are dumb, or he's too powerful, or maybe (and saying this makes me sick) *he's the only one that has in his personal interests to run a government for 5 years, and leads a solid Party.*
I can assure  as a french that nobody I know ever used the ugly word "mél". Mail is often used (without the "e-") but the official term is courriel (rarely used except in a professional context).
Whenever I see someone calling for an open and impartial trial about torture, or extraordinary rendition, I laugh. We (the West) were - in some ways still are - at war. There were cells with plans to bomb Heathrow, to deploy nerve gas in Spain, to kill as many people as they could. Were we wrong to torture people in order to stop this? No one can not have an answer to that question; no one can remain neutral about this topic. You either have 'we did what we must', or 'this is horrible and we should stop it from ever happening again'. Both are political opinions, and both will taint whatever 'investigation' any country has over this. Lawsuits like this either end up as whitewashes or witchhunts. Looks like this one is breaking towards the former. 
Another culture wiped away after the USA intervenes. They will be centralized bankers in no time
And I completely agree.  There was a point in time when the middle east was the enlightened part of the world.  There is a reason we use arabic numerals, but that time is long past.  
They are reported to be largely made up of foreign extremists. 
&gt; "Freedom fighters". I don't regard them as such.  the establishment powers (i.e. team) always looks at challengers or rivals are evil or illegitimate.   &gt; What freedom for the people whose lives they end based on religious dictum?  The french initially colonized the area by religious and royal decree. It's not like the indigenous people invited the french in, they were conquered. they have a right to fight back don't they?
The Leftist's reservations are based on instinctive sympathy for Islamic radicals, despite their explicit disdain for education, history, feminism and sexual liberation.
why doesn't Spain take more immigrants in from Latin America? I understand many are coming from North Africa, but Latin Americans would reduce the culture clash significantly and I'm sure many are eager to work.
I'm not sure, given mob mentality anything can happen.  Look at domestic riots in 1st world countries, mobs do stupid shit.  Combine that with a culture that has learned to fear education and enlightenment (those groups are also present in 1st world nations) and you'll end up with a similar situation.  The sad thing is that these groups are easily manipulated by someone telling them what they want to hear, for reference check out the waves of xenophobia that swept the world in the 1930's.  In the US that prompted us to elect Roosevelt but we could have just as easily gone the way of Germany and elected someone like Hitler. 
Fine point, but the Cathars and Catholics had far less in common than sufi and salafi. A better comparison would be salafi and druze.  This doesn't make you wrong; I just think people underestimate the difference between cathar and traditional christianity
Lives may have been saved by the cameras, but that is not proof that the camera is making people safer.  Between 1997 and 2009 (when most of the cameras were being installed violent crime int he UK ROSE by 77%.  More camera = less "need" for police presence.    For your reference: http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-1196941/The-violent-country-Europe-Britain-worse-South-Africa-U-S.html  I am in full support of employing stable, educated, well adjusted peace officers that can patrol and prevent crime in dangerous areas.     
Technically it only applies to Christianity too. ;)
Keep in mind that the report only has one source and no local confirmation. It is believed that the new structure was burned but that the old building that housed the majority of the manuscripts is standing. Source: Aljazeera English live stream http://www.aljazeera.com/watch_now/
Absolutely. Luckily, in the west, given all of our education and civility, we don't have any of these silly Oriental problems with radicalism or anti-intellectualism. Pfew, I really am glad that our societal norms have helped wean us away from these lesser sentiments of greed that are so easily manipulated by promises of wealth and heaven. If only the Islamic world could be just like us, all of our problems would be solved.    **EDIT**: Sarcasm: learn it, live it, love it.   **EDIT 2** Though I'm too easily tempted by the joys of bitter sarcasm, I definitely do agree with some of your points. 
You're one of my haters. When I become a famous rapper, I am going to look back at you as one of my motivators. 
Britain makes a net gain on the british royal family. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bhyYgnhhKFw
[deleted]
And my point being that since they weren't feudal lords of any current dutch territory and practically ceremonial since the beginning, they aren't bad by nature.
Very interesting, thanks!
Starting next year it will be called King's day and be held on the 27th (except next year it will be the 26th because the 27th is a sunday), the birthday of Willem-Alexander. This year the festivities will be held on the 30th as usual, but they differ from other years. http://www.nu.nl/binnenland/3015467/koningsdag-2014-27-april.html   (I just copied /u/FQuist his post)
We lose all sense of nobility and regret, in which we lose ourselves. War is tricky business. We could turn that area of the world into glass in a few hours with the nuclear weapons we have left. But what does that make us? Do we care? That's the tricky thing about having the power to wipe out a population...how much of you dies with it?
I don't think it goes that far. However, it's good propaganda to "motivate" the war... Sad part being that the news is certainly true, so if propaganda was needed, you just had to pick it up.
Prenup/10
There's so many things wrong with your post.  First of all, what's most worrying is you appear to be a poorly educated paranoid lunatic...Yet claim you own several weapons.   You believe the UK to be a 'communist hell hole' clearly proving you have absolutely no idea what kind of country you live in, or what communism is.  You appear to actually believe the nonsense stories of punishment for defending yourself. If you proportionately defend yourself, you will find yourself in no trouble... 
But CVT, and the sticker on the car that says four door sports car!
More beer for me!
In the Commonwealth we celebrate Victoria day every year on the third Monday in May. It's the reigning monarch's official birthday, regardless of when they were born
I am still looking for what actually happened. I mean the timeline of events. What exactly was he doing there which led to his sentencing
We need to just report him on every post he makes. Eventually his account will get banned and he will have to start from scratch pissing people off.
What is the evidence that we had anything to do with this?  Or Israel for that matter?   Industrial accidents do happen even in Iran.  I suspect that Israel serves a more important role as state-bogeyman than it does anything else.
Freedom is coming, Mother Fuckers.
Well if you have a better way to motivate your slave laborers I'd like to hear it. 
Why would they? Not like they have a lot of oil...
True dat.  Third world= non-aligned countries.
As far as I know, UNSC resolutions have never been used to restrict the actions of the greatest military powers, as, by definition, they can't. If any of the Permanent Five felt they may be hindered by a possible UNSC action they can simply veto that resolution. It's laughable that the UNSC is by far the most powerful UN organ.  For example, what did the UNSC do about the Cuban missile crisis? I'd say the Soviets were stepping pretty hard there.   I am not being sarcastic when I say I'd be thrilled if you can find an example of the Security Council actually making it impossible for a major power to do something.
Yea well he's still been banned from posting in /r/pyongyang 
What ever happened to personal choice? It's my body man.
France was supposed to do a 2-week operation in Mali to push back rebels.  Now Canadians, British and French troops are on the ground and a new drone base is being built by the US.
This is like 'black on black' crime. There won't be a massive outcry from the Islamic world, not unless Westerners(whitey) are involved. 
The country with the largest amount of American emigrants is Mexico according to Wiki or were you trying to make that point?
"... and 11.5% of the Interchange Fund estimated to be $1.2 billion to compensate all of the lawyers and their law firms that have worked on the class case."  I think a lot of lawyers just made a shit ton of money...
Chav stands for Council House Aggressive Violent, as far as I know. Most Travellers will settle a disagreement with a bare knuckle pre-arranged fight 1v1.
Why does South Korea have US Interstates?
[deleted]
What are you doing later to try to stop it? Oh nothing? I thought so.
You're an idiot. This has nothing to do with Jews, who for the most part are some of the most morally serious people in the world. This has to do with the Israeli government, who does not, thank goodness, represent Jews in the world.  We call for Israel to be, like the Jews of the world, a moral actor of the International community. That's it. It is therefore open to criticism.
Rioting and vandalism? Sure, that happens everywhere (London, I'm looking at you) - but they tend to go do it away from museums and libraries. I'm sure there's been some idiotic rioting crowd in SA's sordid past that's destroyed or damaged something of historical value, but nothing that springs to mind.
Sounds like San Francisco
it would happen to people who worked in aquarium supplies if you could l make $250,000 in a day on aquarium supplies by lying and not get caught
Lets see. Helpless person being murdered, thugs not in fear of their own life.  Non-helpless person + citizens, thugs in risk of being murdered themselves.   I wonder which scenario works out better for the thugs.
The NGO, apabiz, didn't label them no-go are this was done by the Spiegel for marketing purposes. According to this threads popularity they succeeded.
300 trillion here... 300 trillion there... pretty soon you're talkin' real money.
There are just so many Variables that it is impossible to even get a good average. I only listed 2 of pretty much thousands. However I do not disagree that some smokers cover more then there externalities, however for smoking, calculating is just so complex that you will get different results for every single smoker with the costs varying a lot.   &gt; most people trust scientists  Which is a bad thing (at least trusting blindly) since many scientists will give you whatever outcome you wish, if the price is right. Also I am an macro economist so its not like I have no clue what Im talking about.  Edit: Even every Cigarette Brand will have different externalities depending on Strength, Theres costs involved in maintaining smoking facilities, that have to be shared by every smoker who has visited. Theres Environmental costs involved for littering the plastic in which the pack is wrapped etc. etc. etc. The list can go on for so much longer
[deleted]
How to invest money in 2013 
People need to stop giving Israel a hard time. These UN councils are a joke and Israel knows that, that's why they aren't showing up. Israels human rights record is actually pretty good and it's not like other countries don't commit atrocities during war. 
[deleted]
WND is the original, and as far as I can tell, only source for this story at the time I commented, although it is slowly being verified by other sources.
The words modern monarch leave a bad taste in my mouth. If she is so awesome she could have easily been voted into office.  "Man will never be free until the last king is strangled with the entrails of the last priest."       -Denis Diderot
Tell that to the people who got murdered by the NSU. I am a social worker in Frankfurt, considered to be the most criminal city in all of Germany, and I feel perfectly safe even in all the pre-dominant muslim parts of town. But I wouldn't go near an East german soccer stadium.
[Oh you...](http://imagemacros.files.wordpress.com/2009/06/oh_you.jpg?w=720)
Which is why it is such an utter debacle.  OTOH I heard other people say they did not use OSM at all.
Is this a joke?... 
shiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiyutt
Consider that canada is the #1 foreign source of oil for a country as ravenous as the U.S, and it soon becomes easy to see where our high CO2 output comes from.
Oh god guys, this will get buried but I live in China right now and the pollution is intense. Everyone uses coal-powered heat over here so the smog is so thick that you can't see the tops of the buildings. Here's a pic I took 3 weeks ago: http://imgur.com/2V1bl
You want to control other people if they do things you do not like?  If the smell bothers you stand somewhere more to your liking, you have more control dodging cigarette smoke than the shite that comes out a bus exhaust.
yay for Tank Girl!    It's already a fact that something like 90% of all fresh water across the globe has been tapped, damed, or redirected for human use... and not just simple consumption. It's kinda scary, those vampire movies that have them taking over the world and then dieing of thirst becomes a metaphor for this exact Dooms Day. So corporations are buying an already over tapped resource, which stresses the structure with panic, and this causes another spike in inflation, followed quickly by a controlled crash, resulting in the government stepping in 'to save the day.' Thus tightening it's control on the masses. This will happen in our lifetime.  I think the smarter thing to do is make salinity extraction more efficient and less costly. That would be the smart investment.  Edit: words and places oooh
The issue you were relating to is pretty much irrelevant now.  It tanked for a large amount of reasons, not because of just debt like you are assuming.
Better than the alternative. 
No racism and equality for all? TERRIBLE! 
http://www.ritholtz.com/blog/2012/01/how-much-of-us-consumables-are-made-in-china/  &gt; Goods and services from China accounted for only 2.7% of U.S. personal consumption expenditures in 2010, of which less than half reflected the actual costs of Chinese imports.
US is trillions in debt tho dawgs
Their authoritarian government is the only reason why China rose so quickly economically. You need a strong state to grow economically as a developing nation these days with transnational corporations pushing their so-called "globalisation".   Don't make authoritarianism sound all bad economically. There are very very very few developed economies these days that did not have a centralised economy when they were developing, and those few economies are usually quite small (Hong Kong, Singapore.).   
[deleted]
Correct. I misspoke. I meant Nazi concentration camps
Indeed, and I hope it continues. However it may be too late....remains to be seen. 
Have you seen the countries in that "human rights" organization? 
Egypt and Jordan have recognised Israel. Though Egypt is a bit of a question mark now.
Yes, I agree that attacks on Jews as a people were and are not justifiable at all. Nothing merits killing people and unreasonably persecuting them. It just seems hard to ignore the glaring question of: what did they always do to make everyone else so angry, every time? Many cultures who had little in common with one another all seemed to agree that their societies were better off without these folks. The great and noble Churchill even agreed with Hitler on the problems the Jews were causing Europe, although of course he rightfully fought against the plan to remove them. Of course this doesn't mean that every Jew should be treated with suspicion, its just hard to shake the feeling that something is/was going on behind the scenes. Lastly, when I talk about them possibly having some fault, I refer only to those in positions of power who may have abused that power, not the group as a whole - THAT would be racism.
You're Muslim. Not that there's anything wrong with that. But stop being dishonest. 
Man, this guy doesn't give Muslims a square inch of leway! 
The daily mirror is gutter press, and they conducted the research themselves... less than trustworthy.
America didn't exist before 1776, what's your point?   Israel was created by the British in 1948.  They were subsequently attacked and fought back.  The very definition of a defensive war.
you should try to cross the periph.
Government financing christian schools doesn't violate the first amendment? 
No they aren't and nobody is saying it is "less evil" or anything of the sort, nice strawman. We just can't stomach the glaring hypocrisy when a story about a Palestinian girl having trouble with her trophy getting past border security getting hundreds of comments whilst stories about Syria get tens, worse even is the fact that over the past week or so, something like 10 Palestinians were killed in Syria, haven't seen it reported anywhere on Reddit. That's the problem.
&gt; yes, and an all out allowance of free speech is going to stop a tyrannical government or prevent them from censoring people's free speech?  Hence why free speech and the freedom of the press are the main tools in **preventing** the rise of a tyrannical government. 
I actually think this is a very interesting topic of discussion.  They would probably say the same thing about other groups of Christians.  Who gets to be right?  Is it fair to tell any of them they are wrong?
I don't think you'll ever hear a Jew tell a non-Jew "I'm holier than you".
אם אינך ירא את השפה ואם אינה קשה המשימה , סקרר במרשתת (למקום ישיבת מתקנני השפה), מצא את דף המארג ואז למוד תלמד את סדר הכתיבה.  אחרת שא רגליך מפנינו כי שוכן גשרים הינך!
Socioeconomic considerations have been taken into account and found wanting due to generous welfare among other things. Of course anyone who could tell the "poor" Asian immigrants from the "poor" Somali ones could tell you as much but it's nice to have it on paper from the official bureau in charge that it "can not be explained through socioeconomic factors and is at least partially cultural in nature".   Doubly so after they've been chanting the socioeconomic line for years before having to recant due to their own findings.
[deleted]
Wow, for some reason my eyes got wet, weird
I would suggest a big spoon of salt there as that is the equivalent of Fox news that also have an agenda and being found lying and mixing stories.  Edit: dear downvouters I'm an Israeli who read Haaretz when that would be reported by Yediot Aharonot or Maariv that might be credible
Good Guy France
[deleted]
&gt;Something tells me that if you went to an Arab (or in this case, non-Arab) nation that's highly Islamisized and you lived there for a period of time you might change your views,  I don't believe I would, as I do not see myself living in such nations.  Of course, hate does not solve much of anything. Neither does a monopoly of force.   
It's mainly because Europe invites them, but whatever makes you happy bro.
I'm not gonna say because Internet but it's a decent sized student city. My mates have been given business cards by dealers and we've had cars just pull up offering us stuff. My dealer at the moment texts us special offers.   The best thing I've seen though is a dealer offering 5 pounds off if you get somebody to use his service. We couldn't believe it when he told us. 
More interestingly, why did 60 people upvote the initial inane comment.
So what you're saying is that adult Christian women can choose to become nuns, but adult Muslim women can't choose to wear a headscarf. Is what you're trying to tell me? That Muslim women can't make choices because they're Muslim, so we have to choose for them?  If the point we're trying to make is, that no one should force women to dress a certain way, then I really can't think of a shittier way of doing it than to force women to dress a certain way.
&gt;but to compare his eight year presidency to the Nazis is stupid.  I made no such comparison. **you did.**  my point is that Victors write History.
Doesn't sound all that different from a lot of Christian preachers.  Maybe we should ship them out too.
To me it seems that a few business tenants believe leaving the lights on prevents crime- reduces the risk of break-ins, or drug deals in their parking lots. It also gives an aspiring criminal a seed of doubt "*well maybe somebody is still here*.' It's probably not the business owner, but his commercial landlord's decision. And they just turn and charge the tenants for the energy use (probably with an upcharge). 
Judge:  ...but he's dead.  Prosecutor:  And your point?  Judge: just sayin'. Proceed.
That's interesting, to me the tax story was portrayed with a touch of a robin hood-esque tone to it. We don't get to hear the full story.  Just thought of another thing I like about France is your commitment to the sciences, your space agency is great.  Like a lot of western societies (including our own) you guys just need to cut the wheat from the chaff and go with the wheat. But is electing someone in to do that impossible with the way politics work - not too sure.
Idiotic cardboard signs which might well be advocating violence.
Israel cares because Syria has nuclear capabilities that could fall into the hand of islamic extremists in the event that the Syrian government collapses and loses control of the weapons.
Well, I've had enough arguments with idiotic anti-Semites to know that the best thing for me to do now is just stop responding. So I will. 
Do not read the downvoted comments. Seriously. So full of stupid it hurts.
Oh please. Assad will transfer whatever he can over to Hezbollah, so that doesn't make the fact he has the missiles any better. Hezbollah violated the UN agreement almost immediately by retaking control of the south while the UNIFIL mission did nothing. And comparing Lebanon to Hezbollah is legitimising Hezbollah. Hezbollah DOES NOT have a right to control any airspace anywhere, Lebanon or otherwise. They started the war in 2006, and will be the ones to start it again whenever they are ready.
Thank Israel for being the one to step up to the plate and take on what other countries are unwilling to do. Breaking international laws might be a major no no in this type of situation. however, they are solving an issue that could have been a potential threat to the entire region. Thanks!
Reuters says israel bombed a convoy with weapons heading to Lebanon, and the rebels say that it's they who attacked the research facility, and it's said that assad is trying to garner sympathy by pretending israel attacked the syrian site.   Although I expect it's just confusion, with israeli planes in the area and explosions at that facility, it's easy to make mistakes
[deleted]
Israel seems to have pretty good intelligence, as usual.  This convoy was bringing Russian made surface to air missiles into Lebanon which would threaten Israeli airplanes, drones, etc.  Israel isn't going to just sit and wait for Russian missiles to be set up in Southern Lebanon. 
The stakes are somewhat higher for Israel than avoiding conflict.
&gt;the US **is** like a bull in a china shop.  There's why.
Recovery Concepts provides drug rehabilitation in Indiana for treatment with methadone in Chicago. Learn about their methadone clinic in Indiana! 
Comrade! Please, do not being disparaging great legacy of Mikhail Kalashnikov! Through wise leadership of Soviet Hero, weapon has been improved! Cowardly capitalist pig dogs hide in the shadows, so brave Soviet men and women use flashlight and rifle carefully made by loyal Party members to drive them back into holes they come from!   Comrade Kalashnikov is principle designer of new rifle, and carefully has made every change. Stock of adjustment allows rifle to be issued and trained with as a child, and continue to be used as man grows into glorious Soviet Worker-Hero! Rifle will be part of his life, and beloved like fine Muscovite wife. New sights allow for killing of more Imperialist Invaders with less cartridges from fine Tula factory.   Shameful disloyal Tsarist was allowed to put silly laser and forward broom handle on rifle, and has been sent to factory to learn how rifle should be made correctly. After ten years making rifle, maybe he understand proper assembly then. All rifle design of wise Mikhail Kalashnikov send many magazine of cartridge toward loathsome enemies, and newest design will help every one find it's mark, be it in cowardly Caucas terrorist, or greedy capitalist!  Long live the glorious 60th anniversary of the Great October Socialist Revolution! Honor and praise to the historic Soviet people--the builders of communism, steadfast warriors for peace in the whole world! Forward, Comrades!
That's the only outfit she owns.
What the hell?  The title is literally 100% of the article.
I don't know, wiseguy. Fly?  In all seriousness, it could be a whole range of things. The North Koreans might get lucky and figure out ICBMs, they might sail a boat up and lob an IRBM, they might even forgo the missile and load a nuclear weapon into a cargo container and sail it into San Francisco harbor.   It doesn't matter how they will try to do it. A threat is a threat is a threat regardless of whether or not we think they can pull it off. What happens if we blow it off and they actually *do* manage to destroy a city? 
I'd prefer the dark.  NVGs are pretty useful.
Forced Labor Camp #177, where every day is Brutal Siberian Tundra day!
&gt; I wasn't accusing you of neutrality.  I know.  That's what gets me in trouble here I think.  Text does a poor job of conveying tone.
I stand corrected, thank you! I will report immediately to the Hall of Justice to receive my additional Patriotism training.
I can tell you right now, if you took my house and forced me into a refugee camp in a hostile nation, I'd spend the rest of my life trying to get you, and I'd teach my children to hate you, and my grand children.  I'd be one bitter motherfucker.  Anyone who says they wouldn't be are either liars or saints.  
try MDMA
It is very Aladeen
China would absolutely join the coalition forces, if for no other reason but to ensure that they have a say in the occupation/rebuilding of NK (to avoid having the U.S. stationing troops outside China's borders).
Every time I try to drop bombs on them, they shoot at me!
[deleted]
No halakha law governs how strict Jews do just about everything in their lives. Halakha is meant for Jews only, and only "observant" ones at that.  Western societies' law is based on many things--Ten Commandments, old pre-Christian tribal customs, Roman law, and in the Anglo-sphere the most important is English Common Law.  I'm Protestant and we have pervs in our churches, but the difference is we don't engage in elaborate and foolish justifications for their behavior.  And we don't have permissions to engage in pedophilia as part of our canon.
Sadly the hand holding the pen, as always, is writing up it's own agenda rather then portraying reality.
And that is the whole plan, make the iranian people suffer. The sanctions only starve the people just like in Iraq and North Korea. North Korea is a pretty shitty place tho.
"Iceland's strict law on names"  you Europeans and your laws for every fucking thing that might offend someone  thanks for leading the way to universal lack of freedom and mediocrity  
Fun cultural fact: Kamchatka is so far away from Central Russia that Russians use it colloquially as the equivalent of "bum fuck Egypt" or "the sticks." 
So Israeli claims to the land don't count but Palestianian ones do?
[deleted]
The best year ever in history to live in Russia, if you're white, orthodox and straight. For all others there may be some other contenders (non-white, under the Soviet Union, at least in certain periods like the 1970s; for gay people between 1993 and when regions started bringing in discriminatory laws).  Also I'm sure Sergei Magnitsky, who did live in Russia in the 90s, might argue with the fact that he'd never had it so good. 
Yeah, I think profits in medicine are at times obscene, but if you allow yourself to believe that money = immoral, you basically have just decided to live your life in a conspiracy/paranoia bubble. 
You know, the plan was rejected by the arabs.  You kinda have to account for that... And also Jordan formally gave Israel control a few ears after 67. 
That would actually require the Rebulicans to think and be partial observers so hell will freeze over first.
Very true since the last time I was there. Soon as I left Indra Gandhi Airport you see a dark cloud with a disgusting smell and taste. I had to cover my mouth. Every day I would use a lent remover on my jackets and the paper would be black. 
&gt; analysts had predicted that the blast would be timed to coincide with the birthday on February 16 of Kim Jong-il, the former leader who died in late 2011, or the inauguration of the new government in South Korea nine days later.  So basically N. Korea want's to set off the biggest firework ever.
LaFawnduh agrees. 
I'm from Texas and can confirm this - you haven't lived unless you had an armadillo burger.
The Taliban and Al Qaeda did not define the *Mujahedin*.  Everyone knows that Bin Laden fought with the Afghans, but please don't be so disingenuous to imply that the US and Pakistan *made* Bin Laden.  The man already had incredible wealth and worldwide network.  He may have earned a reputation in Afghanistan, but he didn't need the West for that.    Again, you said the US provided the Taliban with billions of dollars in weapons and aid.  There's a difference between that and the US hedging its bets with the most powerful group in Afghanistan.  
If you feel like every other country has more freedom than the US, then you haven't been outside of US much... and spend way to much time on Reddit
are we sure it's not some guy and a bunch of tires?
Is it really such a bad thing? Horses are pure eaters, their meat is probably delicious.
Why couldn't a simple body movement be illegal? Pissing in public is also a simple body movement and it's illegal in the USA under their backwards "obscenity laws", it's brutally punished by prison and the "criminals" are being put on a sex offender registry. Which is a far worse punishment than a *fine* in this case. In the USA you can get a fine for speaking too loudly.
More than salvage ships cutting it into pieces in place?
There's something decidedly crooked about extolling the greatness of your god amidst all of that insanity and horror. On a sidenote: I can just imagine that photographer snapping shots as shrapnel goes flying around him.
Both [transformers](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eCc3NyWFB3A) and [water heaters](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/_oEXGYMmGh0o/SnsOQCTRZPI/AAAAAAAAACo/Mql8SiCTmbc/s320/large_allentown%5B1%5D.jpg) can do a lot of damage.
What about the dolphin murdering?
The main reason people believe whale hunting is bad is because their endangered.  The intelligence argument could be used for many other animals that are commonly raised or hunted including pigs and cows.
Serving human meat would probably be illegal in most places.
An environmentalist group, or someone aboard the Sea Shepard should track them from a distance, then at night when the ship is not under full steam, sneak up and plant a bomb on the hull and blow it to smithereens.  Of course, the ship may always be at full steam and have great lookout systems...
This. Use them for target practice, Have an upvote.
Everyone in the footballing community is aware that Qatar and Russia greased palms in an obvious way for the rights to the World Cup(cash for votes).  Only thing missing was the details of where that cash has been funnelled and which votes were sold.  You are Naive if you think this didn't happen. 
Took the words out of my mouth. This could seriously affect the situation of many families desperate to have a child but unable to for whatever reason. If I thought that a child I was going to raise as a father was going to have another guy just randomly appear at some point in the childs life and start making demands I would seriously reconsider the whole arrangement. 
Delicious horse meat.
Except it is about claiming all of Israel. One of the main sticking points in negotiations in the past has been the "refugee" discussions. The Palestinian leadership was unwilling to give up on the demand that millions of Arabs, most of which never even lived in Israel, be able to come to the country and take over land.  Not only that, but to claim that other Arab states means Palestine is incorrect, as there was no Palestine. At most you could say that means Jordan, which was the original Palestinian state. And Jordan gave up on its right to the West Bank long ago.
I read the headline too quickly, and thought it said Japanese *WHALES*.  I immediately thought *even after one of them helped Marlin and Dory find Nemo?*
&gt;if you're white, orthodox   ... if you are ethnic russian (or eastern slavic, if you look at a wider group).   there's no concept of "white" (not in the same sense as in the US) in Russia. people go by ethnicity, not by race (and whatever the heck it is, anyway?). so please stop trying to introduce this concept, it's misleading.  
The price of oil has to rise if alternatives are to become viable.  The problem with oil (or the fantastic bit about oil) is that it has a tremendous energy density.  One tank of fuel (45L ~34 kg in my case) allows me to commute about 500km.  The 290kg battery in the Nissan Leaf gives it a range of 117km.
See, I'm not crazy.
i don't agree: being syria related, turkey looms very large here  there's a lot of fractures in this conflict. israel/ usa is but one of the facets. there's the sunnis/ shias, turkey vying for new status in the old ottoman possessions, iran reaching out for influence, russia playing geopolitics, usa playing its game, israel playing its offensive defense/ defensive offense  it's ethnic, religious, geopolitical, tribal... it's an ugly brutal complicated mess  the only mistake would be to look for simple answers  
bad advice, don't be a tool. The Turkish countryside is awesome, and probably safer than the american countryside. No one speaks english though.
[deleted]
I think he is guilty, but not of second degree murder. Maybe of voluntary manslaughter.   "If adequate provocation is established, a murder charge may be reduced to manslaughter. Generally there are four conditions that must be fulfilled to warrant the reduction: (1) the provocation must cause rage or fear in a reasonable person; (2) the defendant must have actually been provoked; (3) there should not be a time period between the provocation and the killing within which a reasonable person would cool off; and (4) the defendant should not have cooled off during that period."  http://legal-dictionary.thefreedictionary.com/manslaughter   (Note this may just be US law but I don't think there would be significant differences.)
How could Obama and clinton let this happen?! /sarcasm
Right, but they are not standing up for themselves. Standing up for themselves means standing up for what their citizens what. The government is just keeping up an out of date tradition that not many Japanese actually want...  And you know what? The West *can* tell Japan that it's wrong. Just because we have been traditionally been douches about foreign policy doesn't mean we can't call out people on their bullshit. Japan can call us out if they want to.
this is honestly one of my biggest fear 
Hmm the fact that you brought up my children being raped and killed when I didn't even mention your children really contradicts your argument that the stigma of your people's prone to violence is undeserved. And learn your history more rape occurs in a Muslim state than any other because of your religion's view on women. Which is they are nothing. And might I add I am 25 native Canadian, and the only thing that gets raped here is the odd bear once in a while.
sure which is why you have the right under law to defend yourself using reasonable force, now from the limited information i've read it seems to me that he went beyond that, however the court will hear more of the facts and it will be down to them to decide, me it's just speculation. The timeline may be that the guy was in your hypothetical safe position (the others attackers where already dead or gone and the one on the floor remained) it could be that the guy on the floor was the first to be killed and he may argue in court that he felt threatened enough to kill him, we'll have to wait and see. 
She aint followin no law, she has the right to wear what she is wearing as she aint causing no harm in the country she is a citizen in, ooo watcha gonna do 
Ok, tolerance bots.  RELIGION caused this attack.  It is time to stop preaching coexist and start preaching no-exist.    
Nice assumption, fits nicely with all the people assuming religion had something to do with it.
I don't live where people ski.
First off. Who said I was neutral?  Why can't I pick sides against religious hatred and violence?  Even if it is only loosely based on the texts fanatics claim to be the one truth...  Secondly, I pointed out the very script many extremists use as justification for a holy war against anyone that believes differently.    I'm not spreading hate. Extreme religious fanatics are. I was only pointing out that there is, in fact, the very types of violent rhetoric OP claimed to have never seen or heard of  coming out of religious texts.   I picked low hanging fruit to be sure, but there are plenty of other verses in many other religious texts as you have pointed out.  So in that regard, we are in full agreement.  To far  too many people, religion is inherently violent.    Finally, I am not sure I would call blatant profiling tactics at a US airport religious hatred.  The frisking of a dignitary before and after boarding an aircraft is not cool, but I doubt it was fueled by hatred. More likely ignorance and fear are the culprits there. 
It's still quite irrelevant to the fact that it also is heavily perpetuated by religion. I'm sure a lot of black people are killed by white people because of personal reasons, while I'm also sure that a racist ideology would heavily influence this kind of behavior were you to examine a large sample of race-crime. So saying that an ideology doesn't have patent on a specific evil deed, does not exempt this ideology from scrutiny if it does perpetuate such evil.
Yes. The rich are regularly selfish assholes because of Reddit threads like this. Oh when will we learn??
...if they didn't do it they wouldn't have to cover it, but that is tangential to the point anyway isn't it?
Agreed, I would hate to be in that scenario.  As an Idealist I like this system. As a pragmatist, I hope I never have to be part of it.
Oh, sorry. I'll spell it out for you: open can mean accepting of new and different things or it can mean uncovered or visible. A meaning related to the second is "lacking anonymity."  Hope I didn't "whoosh" you this time :)
It's wholly illegal, but if I'm based in the Philippines then it's okay!    /s
Fuck no, I don't wish to see a war here.  The reaction in the street (actually at work) was WTF is wrong with these idiots.
&gt;You'll notice I never once attacked character...like your "sickens me" bullshit...but if that makes you feel better by all means.  &gt;"The molester was wearing a Roman collar".... yes yes it would be bigoted to assume he was a priest. Moronic.  &gt;Moronic.  &gt;**Moronic**
&gt;but it would make it a lot easier to find out who did it  How did you reach that conclusion? Somebody who wants to hide their face, will hide it. The person could have just worn a motorbike helmet, or a balaclava.
[deleted]
That's... a very good point and I didn't consider that.
Well one, I dislike the way Muslim culture treats women, that is why I consider it fucked. The problem is clear even if this person wasn't Muslim and all indications are that she was, Muslims have not integrated well. Some of that is the fault of the host countries not just the immigrants, but regardless it is a problem.
Except the Nazis believed in murdering people of the other races or enslaving them, while Jews believe in using G-D's teachings to improve the world for everyone.
My floors are lava!
[deleted]
It does make a difference though. And as someone who supposedly understands guns you should know this.   There is a difference, in certain situations you need a clip or a mag, you can't just make such a broad statement as "it doesn't matter"  &gt;But be it a clip or a magazine, they're both the "thing that holds bullets," and it makes no difference to the layperson.  So the little box that holds my .45 ACPs are clips and mags? At the same time?  And vets actually differentiated the two. As the guy that also responded to you said, the Thompson used a mag. And bolts and Garands used clips, the Garand clip feeding into the mag then being ejected on the depletion of rounds.  
They kidnapped an Egyptian imam and sent him to Egypt.   Then,  &gt;Castelli was among 26 U.S. nationals indicted by Italian authorities for their involvement in the 2003 kidnap.  I really hope that this type of CIA activity has stopped. It's illegal and ugly. 
My grandfather fought in it, so of course I remember. Helps if you have family connections.
&gt;Barking and Dagenham  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Katie Piper's acid attack has been publicised very heavily over here in the UK, channel 4 made a few documentaries about her and I hope they continue to do so.
*shrug*
You are all clearly doing mental gymnastics to protect your preconceptions about all of these topics, themes, etc. Occam's Razor, people. 
He was justified in shooting them, but not executing a wounded man laying on the ground trying to crawl away. Obviously he is not going to "come back for him". If these people had better weapons they would have brought them.
&gt; ...used to getting attention for the way I dress or my hair, but now I don’t want anyone looking at me.  &gt; “I don’t want people to see me in public. I don’t want to get the Tube or the bus. If I have to go to the hospital I take a taxi. I don’t know if I’ll ever be able to go back to my job. I was planning to go to college in September to study media and fashion, but I don’t even know if I’ll be able to do that,” said Ms Oni.  Perhaps this was the attacker's goal?  Politically motivated? Selfishness? etc?
Have you ever heard of Kashmir India? This has been going on a long time. Attacks like this have lead to the area's wealthy literally abandoning it.
[deleted]
LIAR
No. It's a moral hazard.   If people have to remove their hoodies and hats in a bank, as I was told to do the other day when I forgot to remove my hood, these foreigners need to respect the law.  They are not in their theocratic countries anymore. We have a thing called democracy. If one person gets fucked over, everyone gets equally as fucked. None of this "oh you're a foreigner with a religion, here, why don't you wear all the garb you want while I tell this white individual to remove their baseball cap."
This story was so sad it left me expressionless.  Expressionless.
Gran Torino reference? I like it.
It looks like shes got the london look edit: http://d24w6bsrhbeh9d.cloudfront.net/photo/3987401_700b.jpg
The New Zealand Maritine Authority [issued a report](http://www.maritimenz.govt.nz/adygil/) finding the crews of both vessels at fault, and noting that the immediate the cause of the collision was an error on the part of the helmsman of the *Ady Gil*.
Thankfully there appears to be some kind of bell-curve situation going on.. some of us are awesome, some of us are shit, and most of us are a mixture of the two. I guess it all balances out somehow. Use that magic tablet for something good if you can.
Did you know pork is ok to eaten by muslims if you dont know it was there?    It's not like kryptonite or anything that it will do some kind of magical harm to them. 
You are correct, but Just because he's Mario Andretti does not mean He can win the Indy 500 in a Hyundai. Obviously you near gear with the capability to perform at the same level as your skill.
But how does getting clip vs magazine affect that? Do you think people are more likely to be emotionally affected by magazine vs clip or something?
Also, Germany declared war on America (in accordance with the Tripartite Treaty), not the other way round.  Morsi's aide needs some serious remedial history lessons.
When all we do is slap people on the wrist for the shit they do of course dumb stuff like this happens. Start killing people for the crimes they commit and it would stop, three strikes and your out literally. If you cant behave yourself after three arrests you don't deserve to be alive. Life isn't a right its a privilege. 
Based on the above comment, your handle should be retarded_reduction, son.   The point is that they are in jail and they do not get to choose what the fuck they eat, let alone demand. This is not a vacation, but punishment.
What? Your posts seem all over the place, have a cup of coffee or something.  You asked how the previous poster knew they did not obey their religion. I explained how you can know.
&gt; Could it be the slaughtering practice, rather than the religion behind it?   Could be, probably isn't. It's just another excuse. Your posts don't exactly speak to a calm, measured approach. If you don't want to eat Halal, don't buy anything with "Halal" written on it.
&gt; We are not handing shit over  Then you're just being totally ignorant here. You're explicitly talking about handing it over.
That's one of those instances where I wouldn't be whining about security cameras, or whining about a lack of respect for Islam.
&gt; Well you should know.   FUCKING GOT EM!  I'm sure they can 'reed'. Whatever that means.
[deleted]
All around the world Muslim prisoners are finding pork delicious and gay sex awesome, news at 11!
A perfect storm of outside interference, breaking the backs of people, corrupt politicians who gives no shit about what's happening on the street, and a decline in everything around them usually forces the nationalists out. Greece brought this upon themselves by revoting the same shitheads into the seat of powers over and over again. Nothing changes, if nothing changed. 
But where's the video?
If youre a non-greek living in Greece, I would get the fuck out of there immediately. Especially Albanian, they do not take kindly to Albanians. 
The weird thing is that you've pasted this exact crazy rant in reply to one of my comments before. 
Why not use "flabbergasted" or "astonished?" ?
lol seriously! how crazy is that? but he is definitely on their shit list now. 
What's so horrible about the way Tibetans are treated? Honest question, I'd really like to know.  Edit: By the way, just so you know, Mao didn't murder millions upon millions. He locked a bunch of people up, but there was no Pol Pot style mass exterminations. What was killing people during that time was poor economic policy and worse implementation which resulted in mass famine. The Hundred Flowers and Cultural Revolution caused imprisonment, psychological and physical abuse, and forced relocation... but not that much outright execution.
In that society, it's merely a property crime.  Women have value, but only as property.  Until they are married, they are the property of their father.  And how can you vandalize your *own* property?    
The judge going easy on him because "he lost his daughter and that is punishment enough" is exactly the same defense the Menendez brothers used when they asked for leniency after murdering their parents "because they were orphans."
Thanks for the info, but please don't use the word "colored people."
Iranians do not dislike Israeli people just like Americans don't dislike Iranian people... however, Iranians despise the government of Israel.  As long as you keep spreading lies and fearmongering, you deserve not only insults but hopefully some one should beat your ass in real life.  People like you are responsible for these wars and perpetual destruction.
What a well-thought out and poignant criticism.
the trouble with having two thoughts going at once but writing only one sentence.
Space balls.
[deleted]
So does it suck to be so stupid that you think there is a god?  I couldn't imagine being that idiotic.
Oh yeah, I'll agree with that. I've thought the whole legalization movement has distracted from some more pressing issues, too.
About fucking time. Too-lenient immigration laws are one of Sweden's biggest problems.
Then here's the question re-phrased: How do big businesses profit from a No vote?
You can believe in an afterlife and still be an atheist. You can even believe in karma and still be an atheist. Atheism is just the lack of belief in a deity.   Atheists do not usually associate with other atheists and therefore one atheist does not make the other look bad because there is no binding scripture or tenets that allow for the raping of 9 year olds.   
0/10
[deleted]
except Egypt doesn't have a two party system. there were four main presidential candidates. the two with the most votes had a runoff. the third and fourth place candidates, both of whom were comparatively liberal, had more votes between the two of them than either of the finalists.
anyway, I'm done. Totally ranted out haha.  w/e  I weep for the species. GG 
Colonialists often justified their actions as being "better for them" or as an act of imposing civilisation on them. That's not what the locals thought. 
Uhhh, you are the one driving people off of their land. The settlements are illegal in every possible legal interpretation. They are even illegal under Israeli law. Or don't you realize that? Even though this point works in my favor, I forfeit it. Laws do not separate right from wrong. The forced displacement of a people to make room for another people has been the harbinger of all of the world's worst human right atrocities. Nazi Germany, Apartheid South Africa, and now, Apartheid Israel. You're the poor relation that the civilized world is embarrassed of just about everywhere outside of the US and, for some strange reason, Nigeria.  Israel, the new Nazi Germany. How's that sound? Because THAT is how the world sees you. This is how it will see your children. Remember that. 
results  the moderate muslim world has a lot of work ahead of them  let's see some results!  talk is cheap!  
No it was not. Don't distort the truth. I saw the title first which outraged me and then the comments which added on to the level of outrage and now I see your comments which really just makes me shake my head.   
People love fascism (government control of economies with a fictitious veneer of private property) they just don't like the word fascism. 
China has lots of local elections.
during that time the population doubled due to refugees, saying that it had "financing of the sucessful jewish diaspora" while they had been on the verge of famine is not accurate. 
Too extreme; do not believe.
[deleted]
Fucking retards
He got a short jail sentence and has to pay "blood money" to the girls mother.  &gt; the judge had ruled the prosecution could only seek "blood money (compensation for the next of kin under Islamic law) and the time the defendant had served in prison since Lama's death suffices as punishment."  So basically, no real punishment.
&gt;Where?  The world. Rape culture.  &gt;We?  Oh reddit, when someone says 'we' that isn't an indication that you are part of the problem or you are the one doing it. I didn't address you directly, flamuchz, so there is no need to get defensive about it. I am attacking thoughts, ideas, and prevailing thoughts. Not individuals. The fact that the greatest thing you took from my comment was that I was somehow addressing you directly says a lot. We, meaning globally, meaning the human race.   We could have a discussion or we can go back and forth, one leads us to better understanding, the other leads us nowhere.
How is it even possible to denigrate islam?
This makes sense to me, have you seen the way Saudi babies dress? Totally asking for it.
As a muslim and dad to baby girl I should add some perspective. These people are fucking crazy!
Who the hell do you sell the eggs to?
&gt;don't go out with potential rapists  simplification: don't go out
What an excellent post. My guess is that many of your countrymen think they same way, hence the superiority in the execution of your system.
*taking notes*
At that point, they might as well veil baby boys too.
As a muslim, I agree
You'd be surprised to know that Baghdad used to be the heart of the technological world.  The world would be a much different place if it weren't for the Mongols.
Librarians are the last bulwark against authoritarian tyranny and the destruction of information.  That's why the government created the internet, so we could get rid of these troublesome people.
The Taliban were not in power in Mali. As I understand it, it was Al Qaeda.
Reminds me of the ol' Saudi mashed potatoes recipe.
In a certain way it makes sense to advise adult women to dress modestly.  We can assume that most adult males are attracted to them and drawing less attention to their physical features could lessen sexual attraction by males upon viewing.  This is the basic premise of any culture or religion advising women to dress modestly.  However, the logic completely fails when applied to babies.  Adult men should not be sexually attracted to them in the first place.  It would be redundant to say that sexual abuse is a problem originating with the perpatrator, but in this case, we can certainly say that covering the infant will have no effect on the sick men committing these crimes.  There is something inherently wrong in their brain, not a visual cue from a scantily dressed infant inciting them to rape.
Pe...people..*sigh*  people rape babies?
It's a really unfortunate choice of terminology in this regard. It sounds like they're not so much "considering" or "planning" it, as much as drawing up a contingency plan in case Syria goes so far to shit it spills over and threatens Israeli citizens. I'm pretty sure Canada has contingency plans for invading the US, and the US has a plan lying around somewhere to conquer Mexico.
"Oh eh, it wasn't me! The errr, ~~Buddhists~~ Jews did it! Yes, e Jews did everything!"
It was one person saying this, and the society he lives in rejected it nearly unanimously.
http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/law-and-order/9298578/Prisoners-under-pressure-to-convert-to-Muslim-gang.html  Stop mentioning my !arse!.   I'll link to the documentary if I can find it, it's pretty big though.... now, where's the poppers!.  Generali'S'ed! this is UK reddit.   Right lad!, Considering your first comment: your veiled 'disappointment' stinks of punity. And 'pulling out of ass'.... you wish to punish and humiliate! I could read into this. 
:(  I know, I just feel compelled to get the word out there, it's my duty as a Muslim. Some people will take it, some won't, it's just the way it is I guess.   
And this is the problem I have when talking about this sort of stuff with you people.  You skip over parts that you find inconvenient.   &gt; they have been pretty strict **lately**  If you actually bothered looking in those articles, you'd see the top common is almost always about how it does not belong.   A recent change of policy is **NOT** hypocrisy.
It's ironic because your liftstyle in developed countries is not sustainable. If everyone in China lived like you, the world would've imploded already.   Sometimes a little self awareness goes a long way towards not looking like an idiot. 
[deleted]
Yeah, like the 50s,  60s and 70s when we had tariffs on chinese crap and the jobs were here in North America... You obviously don't have a grasp on history.
Hooray
Um Turkey, what is it you do in Iraq then?
I doubt it. They might be on the plans but it is expensive and corrupt bureaucrats don't care. This is the same reason they had 2 high speed trains collide a while back, also why several bridges have collapsed/fallen apart to reveal they are stuffed with rubbish.  It may not be an everyday occurrence but it happens far more frequently than in countries with much tighter controls.  A part of me is fascinated to see what happens when they attempt to build the worlds tallest building, but at the same time I am concerned about what could happen if it is not safe.  
It's not a theocracy, though. It looks like one, because the church as a political institution in Western countries has had the shit kicked out of it for centuries, but a religious organization that has a hand in policy is a few legal powers short of a theocracy. Don't get me wrong, the royal family of Saudi Arabia can't just go tell the ulema to go fuck itself and survive, but there is a history of Saudi monarchs strong-arming, working around, or ignoring religious leaders to push policies that the religious leaders disagreed with.
you don't even know what has happened.  all you know is what the fascist media has written.  and that your job is to down vote people who disagree with it.  you aren't worth a toss.  go back to your boss and tell him to fire you. 
Read up on history. Babylonianism is a long dead polytheistic religion where the only remaining sect is Judaism, they went back and rewrote they'll own texts at multiple points before 600 BCE. Thats how you got modern day Judaism. Jesus, the "founder" of christianity was Jewish, so was Muhammad. they altered the origonal religion but both are still based on Judaism. 
Please stop doing this, It adds nothing to the thread.
...that are down or upvoted usually based on whether people agree with them or not.  (Even thought that's now how Reddit is supposed to work, you know it is)  Yes, Reddit is made of individuals who have different opinions, but the voting system usually allows you to see what the majority of people on here think.
Great now I'm manually blinking.
So because it's not *homo sapiens* it's ok to create a child and treat it like a lab or zoo animal just because we're curious? Just a dumb animal, nothing to worry about. Maybe we could breed them to be housekeepers and chauffers and gardeners. I think we've been here before. 
Damn, an F313? We're stuck on the F-35 at best. I ran some calculations, I think this plane should be at least 8.94x better than what the USAF is working with.
Didn't read the article, did you? I'd be okay with that if that was what he was doing. Islam is a pretty lousy ideology and it's totally okay to talk about what makes it lousy.  But it turns out he's trying to obstruct Muslims from using rights that are granted to Christians and other faith groups - and that's not okay. So long as religions are granted certain rights, *all* religions should have those rights - you don't get to discriminate based on personal preference.
Of course people oppose it.   This is a developing part of European politics.  It can go several different ways, ranging from slow progress and assimilation to full-scale pogroms.  All we can do is wait and try to be on the right side of history.
I actually thought that the scrolls in the old University of Timbuktu had been destroyed, just like the mausoleums in Djenne. This is actually something that makes a huge difference. Wonderful!
R2D2 with a hardon has a fun day with exocets.
Finally you make a valid point; I am not qualified to recommend the KSG from any position of authority. What I can do is list facts, which so far puts me ahead of you. I have fired the KSG, and liked it quite a bit. The one area I can see the KSG having issues in a home defense scenario is switching between tubes, but again this is a training issue rather than a product defect.   From the style of your post you seem quite obviously biased against Kel-tec's liberal use of polymer in their guns. Assuming you aren't being facetious when saying that the KSG is made of polyethylene, all I can do is provide the facts (lifted [directly](http://www.keltecweapons.com/our-guns/shotguns/ksg/) from Kel-tec's website): the receiver and magazine tubes are made of hardened steel, and the grip/stock is made of glass-reinforced nylon.   Again, I am no expert. I would barely qualify as a novice shooter. However, I do have access to more qualified shooters and the information they provide. If you have any *facts* you'd like to back up your claims with, I'm all ears. I'm not trying to win some petty internet squabble, I want to know the truth.
I read detected as attacked. I lol'ed hard! Have an up vote anyway.
Well the US would be violating a contract. Egypt wouldn't go to war with the US, and I doubt there would be any kind of fatwa or jihad declared. It's really a legal matter entirely.  However, Egypt has agreements with the US to allow them to use the Suez Canal. Since the US didn't honor it's contract it opens the door for Egypt to stop honoring it's agreements with the US. So Egypt could say "we won't allow the US to use the Suez any more". And pretty much any other agreement the US has with Egypt (I'm not sure what agreements are in place, but the Suez is the obvious one) Egypt can just ignore it's obligations.  Although the situation within Egypt is worrisome, they haven't made any moves internationally against the US or it's allies. They've talked some shit about Israel, but that's not enough to justify breaking a contract.   Of course if Egypt goes the way of Syria, the US will obviously regret selling weapons to them. But given the information we have now, continuing the deal is the best choice. 
hmm, this could lead to interesting things if it happens
I seem to recall that humans traded strength for precision in our muscles.
Maybe you should throw him in jail for 5 years.
[deleted]
&gt;New York review is of books is the BIBLE of grammar.  Yes. And they use Joyce's. 
I have never seen any love for Castro anywhere on reddit..
Just a bunch of moldy old bones, bones smones.
So, I guess that ruins the surprise of the TV show later tonight!
Just give them some food already.
See above :)
If Ifan had actually done that sure... They did not!  It's clearly a plastic RC toy that in no way reflects the big unworkable hunk!
It probably looks a lot like West Virginia.
Still waiting for someone to explain the significance of this find.   I'm not trying to be obtuse but, other than possibly help determine the cause of death, I fail to see what great benefit this discovery can yield.   Please, enlighten me. 
&gt;if you ask me  Hah!
Remains have been found*  lrn2grammar
&gt; If they're not harming anyone else and being safe about it, why does it matter?      It's painting all women as sluts always hungry for sex. I kind of see that as counter productive.    Not all women appreciate that sentiment.   Slut is still a derogatory word with many implications. Not just "likes sex".
I definitely get where you're coming from. It does seem a bit perverse, doesn't it? Mind you, being buried in the centre of Leicester isn't really a dream proposition. If you ever come to the UK, please don't put it on a 'places to stop' list? It's not the prettiest place in the world.
Indeed. However, they are not building Nuclear power plants. 
Richard III was the last English king to fight in a battle. He is the only English king to die in battle between 1066 and the present. He single handedly killed both the jousting champion of England and one of Henry Tudor's personal body guards before being overwhelmed himsel.  Every eye witness account of his death, both enemy and friend, speaks of his strength and courage. 
Could be the whole of the European championships and clubs of soccer. That's how I understand it.
7 asses
With global climate change it will start changing wind patterns. I wonder if in the past China's smog just blew up and away and now it's staying around more. 
Did you think they were paid such hefty sums for merely playing with a ball?
Since your point wasn't about the morality of the actual murders, and instead about the comparative morality of what Cleopatra did vs. what Richard did, let us just move on from that, and get a little lesson into Roman history.  Cleopatra did not murder her eldest brother. She may have been responsible for his death, but only after he knowingly tried to have her killed. After the death of Cleopatra's father, she normally would have become a less co-ruler with her 10 year old brother. She mitigated his position(Which is perfectly reasonable, given that she was perhaps the most intelligent woman of the ancient world, and he was a ten year old kid), but the court powers that planned on using him as a pawn weren't having it(The most notable of those powers was his regent, an eunuch named Pothinus).   Cleo's brother was used as a pawn in an attempt to depose(and almost certainly kill), her, allowing Pothinus to become regent of all of Egypt, instead of having to share power with Cleo, and cementing his own power over Cleo's brother. This, by the way, was all happening in Alexandria.   But Cleopatra managed to flee Alexandria, went to Syria, raised an army and started a civil war. Another claimant also sprang up during this whole thing. (There was also a famine and a plague. Fun times.)   Then Pompey the great, having been defeated by Julius Caeser in the Roman civil war, fled to Egypt. Cleo's brother, hoping to please the new virtually uncontested ruler of the Roman Empire, killed Pompey. This was a mistake, as Pompey was both Caeser's greatest opponent, but also his closest friend.   Rather pissed off and plotting to annex Egypt, Caeser was in Alexandria, not yet acting openly. And then Cleopatra smuggled herself into his palace in a carpet, they started doing the vertical tango, Caeser then backed her claim to the Egyptian throne. Cleo's brother drowned at the battle of the Nile, in which his forces were crushed.   I would say that what she did to her brother is at least somewhat more morally permissible than the intentional killing to two children just because they *might* pose a threat to your power?   Since you addressed it anyway, let us talk about the moral question. First off, it bloody didn't matter that he killed those children. England was still thrown into a civil war, and he was still killed. Perhaps it would have been wiser to consider that maybe not trying to kill every single claimant might make the rest of them slightly less likely to try and kill you?   Not trying to kill people can go a long way to goodwill.  In addition, if we look at how Richard rose to power, I think it becomes very difficult to make the case that he was at all acting in moral altruism or out of many other thoughts than his own power. Why? Because the man bloody well led a coup against Edward V. He was made lord protector, had several people arrested and killed on tenuous charges, declared Edward V and his brother illegitimate, seized the throne, and then murdered both of them.   If he was thinking of keeping England out of turmoil, maybe he shouldn't have launched a coup.   Richard the third was power-mad, and probably a psychopath or a narcissistic. Well-meaning people don't usurp the thrones of the people they swore to protect, and then have them murdered.   TD;LR: LET THE HISTORY-ING BEGIN. 
This kills the King.
That is complete nonsense. The corporations will use the presses to make whatever will make them the most money. They are already used by private companies to make whatever parts they need.
To be fair, the first American rockets where more of a failure than the first Korean rockets.
They should apply sharia on their penis.
All but two countries in this survey have an A. So there are 15 different countries that could be "my country".
[Yes. Sometimes he speaks in fists.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lXyCbbulHPA)
They're trying to lure us into a false sense of security so that when they actually have something big no one will believe them.
So brave.
Numbers hurt, shrug
This is kind of the situation with telecom in the US. Everyon rants about how great the internet is elsewhere without realizing just how much legacy infrastructure we have here stateside. Nations with fast internet have it because of R&amp;D we did here. They didn't have to reinvent the wheel, they got to go straight from dial-up to fiber.
Perhaps you should.
Its perfectly sustainable if you figure the elite neither care about nor want people people around .   It doesn't have to be an automated drone army (something BTW that private parties are also working on, c.f  The Internet of Drones  http://globalguerrillas.typepad.com/globalguerrillas/2013/01/how-an-internet-of-drones-will-be-built-think-2400-baud-1.html ) but simple attrition.  What will happen, nay is happening is reproduction rates among virtually everyone everywhere save the ultra poor (and its starting even there)  are in free-fall.   Sooner or later there simply won't be that many people for the elite to worry about and the 1% and change (about 100 million or so including a few comely servants and some techs and medical people to keep them alive) can enjoy the planet. Or not since the very rich don't have many kids and its not much fun to rule over no one.   Of course given the free fall in the number of millionaires (MSM http://money.msn.com/investing/latest.aspx?post=f31fa04b-e88f-4b44-8bf3-f6e2baa464ec) its entirely possible the entirety of the economic edifice of value transfer that sustains the rich will fall part and the policy choices will end up ending the social structure they  depend on. 
I hope she can wins, It'll be a big fuck you to Obama.
Only one (1) school tried to ban urinating standing.  lol.  The Nordic countries are a joke.  What are the fastest growing demographics in Sweden?  Hint: they're not Catholic.    Please show me the data on the growth of the Catholic population in Norway.  The effect of the birth rate of immigrants on Nordic countries is compounded by the number of immigrants admitted into the country, of course. 
[deleted]
Yeah, I was going to say this was being done at least as early as the 70s.
Don't get me wrong here - I don't like Jagland (chairman of the Nobel peace prize committee) at all and think some of the winners have been awful choices.   But the problem with the Peace Prize is that it's intricately tied to politics as opposed to the rest of the categories. There's very little chance for controversial choices there (except, perhaps, for literature but even then that's not prone to angering an entire state).   There will *always* be controversies and anger of certain winners, at least today. Giving Liu Xiaobo the peace prize in 2010 resulted with a Chinese embargo against Norwegian goods and a diplomatic crisis.   What I'm afraid of is that *some* elements of the committee (who are mainly politicians) are trying their best to avoid potential diplomatic breaches with certain countries and garnering favours from others.   I think the best solution would be to remove the politician connection altogether and just have professors and / or relevant professions to the world peace effort, but even then there's always a chance for corruption.  Keep in mind that Norway has the peace prize as per the will of Alfred Nobel, and unless the Swedes plan to drastically reform the committee structure if they were to have the prize, they'd be just as viable to get the flak and the chance of corruption that the Norwegian counterpart. 
How is this World News?
&gt;most sustainable energies we have  Oh you get no argument from me it is 'sustainable' - the radioactivity sustains for millions of years.
I don't understand why you aren't enjoying all the "diversity" !? You need to understand your "white privilege" is making me feel unsafe. So shut up! We decide who is racist and who is not. Afterwards we call all watch John Stewart while us atheists pray to science the Republican 1% doesn't melt the world with global warming!
&gt; Unlike Israel, we have [morals](https://www.google.co.il/search?um=1&amp;hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;rlz=1C1CHKZ_enIL440IL440&amp;q=egypt%20rape&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_gc.r_pw.r_cp.r_qf.&amp;bvm=bv.41934586,d.Yms&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=909&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=iw&amp;ei=57oQUfvmK8jvsgajqYCgAg) and [values](https://www.google.co.il/search?um=1&amp;hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;rlz=1C1CHKZ_enIL440IL440&amp;q=egypt%20rape&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_gc.r_pw.r_cp.r_qf.&amp;bvm=bv.41934586,d.Yms&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=909&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=iw&amp;ei=57oQUfvmK8jvsgajqYCgAg#hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;tbo=d&amp;rlz=1C1CHKZ_enIL440IL440&amp;sclient=psy-ab&amp;q=egypt+mobs&amp;oq=egypt+mobs&amp;gs_l=serp.3..0j0i8i30l2j0i5i30.98701.99381.0.100187.4.4.0.0.0.1.632.1752.2-1j1j0j2.4.0.les%3B..0.0...1c.1.2.serp.WUYfEnFX3-U&amp;pbx=1&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_gc.r_pw.r_cp.r_qf.&amp;bvm=bv.41934586,d.Yms&amp;fp=a2654a1d08129404&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=909) that stop us from being anything like you bunch of monkeys.  FTFY
Yeah, because guns managed to prevent 9/11... right?  So, so stupid.
Let's say it was 500,000, for argument's sake.  As a percentage of 1.57 billion, that still works out at a mere **0.032%**. Hardly a significant percentage.
Don't forget about all the asbestos we put in our houses in the 70ies... those don't even have to burn down to be a danger.  Also, PET bottles = no dioxin anyway.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Well, finally someone deserving will win it and it will mean something.
I'm pretty sure North Koreans dream of food. 
[I want this to be our response so bad](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qxLw0uas9Rc)
Well I'm sure the North Koreans didn't exactly have a big budget to make this shitty video. I'm surprised they are even aware of MW3 though.
So they *DID* like Homefront!
So the article is misleading in multiple ways.
The US is pretty restrained for being the most powerful nation that has ever existed.  While the US has been the preeminent power the world system has been pretty stable, most countries have flourished, life expectancy, technology, lower child mortality, peace in Europe for first time in 1000 years, etc, etc, etc.    North Korea is a pissant country where you can be executed for criticizing the leader, and if you don't criticize him there is a good chance you'll starve to death. Read "Nothing to Envy." If North Korea had any power, the entire world would be a mess.    It's not worth writing a longer response.  I'm not responsible for educating every idiot in the world.
ROFL... North Korea with a space program. *snort* 
dude, again, when war is declared on us, its declared back dude.   Thats the one time legally we shouldnt need 2/3rds congressional approval.    it makes them the aggressor.     one quick article with some info.    Im not going to search high and low, just type it into google and you can read all about it.   we are legally at war with NK.  http://www.globalresearch.ca/the-us-and-north-korea-are-legally-still-at-war-another-un-security-council-resolution-against-north-korea/5321564
Did you think of that joke all by yourself?
I swear to god. If North Korea tries any shit like this and fucks up any progress that we've made towards legalizing marijuana, I'll go over there myself, [John Rambo style.](http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_lzq5blmbBO1r93jyvo1_1280.jpg) 
What would you have us do exactly? War isn't cheap you know.
I see you pointing out effects of the reunification, but nothing of this goes against my initial statement.   Yeah, it costs a lot and it takes time to have everything 100% evened out, nothing surprising here. 
Many do. In fact, the DPRK has it's own linux distribution. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Red_Star_OS
Who are you talking to?
 *If they fired a nuclear weapon at the US,*  you make it sound like they are planning to do this  *And it would be considered to have been the right thing to do*  yeah, they  considered killing half a million children "the right thing to do" so why not.
*Wong Korea. 
Isnt the soundtrack Michael Jackson's: "we are the world"
The North Korean Screen Actor's Guild has already nominated the video for  the coveted Best Movie Award
Ok is no one else entirely frightened by North Korea? 
I don't know, have you seen how polluted China is? 
It did, because it got the western media's attention. I'm assuming it wouldn't have gained so much interest on NK television.
[deleted]
Seriously, he's a racist propagandist. Look at his posting history. Full of copypastas. He sees an opportune moment and bombards everyone with a wall of citations in the hope of spreading more hate.
Why do I feel like I've just watched the video equivalent of a caveman's painting?  I hope their achievements in rocket science match their achievements in videography...
What concern? That the North somehow magically miniaturizes nukes with 10-kiloton yields at best and wipes out a couple city blocks in Tokyo or Seoul? This isn't a nightmare scenario here. Seoul would not be wiped off the map by any weapon North Korea possesses. They think fission is hard, with their two dud detonations? Hydrogen bombs are hard.   The North would, in the very best case scenario, obliterate a neighborhood in some major city. And that would be the end of the North.
Nobody wants Iran to have nuclear weapons. Doesn't mean they are willing to go to war for it.
Cause green obviously the color of water!
I replied to the person that needs to know how close they are to going along with it because of the popular vote.
Gee, Argentina's economy must be in the shitter again.   
If studying the contexts from which the exterminations arose has such a profound impact on one's moral character as to make one think that murder on such a grand scale could ever be permissible, perhaps it is best that I remain (if indeed I am) "uninformed and uneducated."
*"Campaigners hail vote as 'historic' step"*  Don't you mean **an** historic step?
Civil partnerships are not the same as marriages. Civil partnerships are a registry office only affair. This law allows marriages in church.
**There's an inherent problem with this study. The authors are merely looking at whether or not school textbooks are making *explicitly* hate-filled comments, but they don't touch on the falsification of history, which is used for incitement and demonization.**  For example, a Palestinian school textbook might say *"Israel has no right to exist and it was built on land stolen by the Jews"*. That is a lie and a complete rewriting of history that is intentionally used to demonize Israel and to incite hatred, however, the authors of this study don't label it as such. They only consider something to be demonization/incitement if the statement amounts to something along the lines of the classic *"Jews are the descendants of apes and pigs"* line. Rewriting history is a far more dangerous form of incitement than some silly 'apes and pigs' type statement, and yet it's not covered in this study. Or to put it another way, this study is more concerned with whether or not a textbook is politically correct than it is with whether or not a textbook is committing genuine demonization and incitement.   **[By comparison, in 2011, a comprehensive study of 118 Palestinian textbooks currently being used in Palestinian schools found that:](http://www.jpost.com/DiplomacyAndPolitics/Article.aspx?id=216374)**  * textbooks blame Israel for all environmental problems  * there is generally a total denial of the existence of Israel  * In geography textbooks, Israel usually does not appear in maps of the Middle East, instead “Palestine” is shown to encompass Israel, the West Bank and the Gaza Strip.  * the Old City of Jerusalem did not contain the Jewish Quarter  * a textbook printed a British Mandate postage stamp, but erased the Hebrew inscription “Palestine: The Land of Israel” that appeared on the original  * some textbooks falsely described the Canaanites as an Arabic-speaking people whose land was stolen by Jews  * stated that Jews came from Europe to steal Palestine after the British conquered it in 1917  * Palestinian textbooks have been erasing Jewish claims to holy sites, such as the Western Wall and Rachel’s Tomb  * textbooks told students that “the rank of shahid (martyr) stands above all ranks,”   * textbooks included a Muslim hadith about the destruction of Jews by Muslims on the day of the resurrection, which also appears in the Hamas charter  * no Israeli is depicted as a friend or partner  * the Oslo Accords are rarely mentioned  * political agreements in general are presented as resulting from Arab and Muslim weakness   Israeli children are taught peace, understanding, and co-existence with the Palestinians. I'm sure there are going to be certain biases here and there but those exist in *every school* and in *every country*, seeing as how pure objectivity is impossible. The key is that Israeli children are taught acceptance and the two-state solution is widely supported and widely promoted throughout the Israeli education system.  Contrast that with what Palestinian school children are taught. They're taught to reject peace, to reject the two-state solution, to deny Jewish history, and to promote martyrdom. The difference is night and day.
But that measure everyone rapes their own children then.
&gt;Fayhan al-Ghamdi admitted using a cane and cables to inflict the injuries after doubting his five-year-old daughter’s virginity.  what.  WHAT.
Proud... Or should I say ashamed that the MP of my backwards little town was one of only 14 to vote against gay marriage. A comment on our local papers website covering this article claimed that "Allowing gay marriage would lead to people wanting to marry their pets". I want to move out of this town as soon as possible :( 
This isn't an article, it's just a live feed of events as they happened, hence the present tense. Since when would a live feed be copy edited?  Also, please point out the bias to me.
jumpuptothesky's comment was prefixed with:  &gt;*I thought the US was supposed to be*  It was a comment about perception, not a statement of fact.
[deleted]
I have many times more love for this comment than makes sense.
Illiterate librarian.
So that is why Reddit hates the daily mail? Reddit always seems to blindly hate them with out giving a reason.
the damage of a nuclear weapon may be not compared to earthquake. I haven't experienced any things like that, but the 2005 Sumatran quake, and the 2011 Japan disaster I feel it really terrible 
That's a fucking mean thing to say about the moon.       
Well put reply. :-)
I would imagine that being a librarian he wants to know how to read...
From what I garnered from the websites, was that it all took place in international waters, granted I was using Google translate. 
It can't, you know why? IRANIANS AREN'T ARAB. 
1) Twice (three times?) as many US states have explicitly outlawed gay marriage  2) If you can afford it  3) not necessarily to the worst offenders, but to the poorest and the least white  4) but they're not classed as people in other countries  EDIT: typo
Just think of the science! 
Please, who says the Finnish know anything about guerrilla warfare? I mean, except [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Simo_H%C3%A4yh%C3%A4) guy.
whoa, we have a conspiratard specimen right here. 
And they got a rich oil-state that pours weapon, money and know-how over them.
~~For those of you who want to help out Nora financially there is a [fundraiser for her at GiveForward](http://www.giveforward.com/helpnorafightleukemia). So far they are at only $5k and twenty percent of that is from her own family.~~  Edit:   I'm going to amend my recommendation and suggest you do as schteph suggests and [make a direct donation to her or look on her official facebook page for more information.](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/17zopi/after_people_of_croatia_raise_600k_dollars_for/c8ab308)   I'm sorry to say that I did not do my due diligence and cannot guarantee that the money collected on GiveFoward is all going towards Nora's treatment. I'm pretty sure it's real but there is no way I can be 100% sure. Also, after some digging also found that GiveForward collects 7% of all donations. Please downvote this post and upvote bistri's comment by following the link. I'm leaving my previous comment (though it's strukthrough) for those of you who cannot wire money directly. But please be forewarned that I cannot guaranteeing the funds are going to Nora. I'm really sorry guys. Next time I'll make sure to research better regarding links to do with money. ^(Please don't hate me...)   More Edits - It appears some people have been talking to the girl who set up the [GiveForward](http://www.giveforward.com/helpnorafightleukemia) page and it sounds pretty legit. When there are more sources verifying GiveFoward I'll let you all know. Maybe it's from reading all those iamas, but dammit! I need proof!
yes?
now i'm curious as to what happened 2 days ago that set you off. is it superbowl related? i bet it's superbowl related.
schfifty faiv million dollars
But capitalism would be destroyed if we did that. 
Who's the owner of the hospital? M. Thenardier?
[deleted]
Let's ease up on the insults of CHOP. It's *the* best children's hospital in the US. It helped to train my mother, a nurse, and helped my brother who was sick as a child with an undiagnosable auto immune disease. 
[deleted]
So I see the real problem being how we make this awesome science work.  CHOP clearly saved my daughters life.  She has is missing half of her heart and they are one of the few people that could actually pull of a surgery and have been very very successful in followups.  We have done professional photo shoots with our cute daughter to help them raise money.  The people who do this work are on the cutting edge and everything has to be done one at a time.  It sucks that it costs this much and that they are having trouble coming up with a rationale bill but that is the problem with one at a time new work for people who have trained a really long time.  I don't have a good answer. edit: lost internet in the middle of post.
TSUNAMI!!!!!*  *1meter. Bad, bad tsunami, you shame us.
What a scumbag move.  Is is even legal to manipulate fees this obscenely when cost of supplies and human intervention were unchanged? Yeah I know, who wouldnt LOVE to charge extra just for the hell of it?
no, US hospitals should stick to their word on the cost of procedures.
Reminds me of an old 70's Mad magazine cartoon depicting the Lincoln penny addressing the other US coins, "Looks like one of us has to go.  Why are you all looking at me?" (paraphrasing).  Fun fact:  the presidents on all the other coins face the viewer's left, but Lincoln faces the viewer's right.
just being careful with people posting that kind of info on reddit there have been scams before - nothing personal
His point was that the cashier never enters the sale into the register, and has the change on himself.
The kind that wants to keep customers?
Most of the country isn't even involved, these militants are just heavily armed and decently trained. But their numbers aren't very large. Mali doesn't have a very good infrastructure, let alone the resources to field a decent military.
AIUI, only pennies from 1996 and earlier have that much copper, the more recent ones are mostly zinc. And even for the older pennies, it'd cost more to refine the copper out than you'd make from selling it.
Alright carry on
As a resident of Crystal river I can totally confirm that a lot of jobs are being dropped with this.
A penny costs an "extra" penny to make.  A nickel costs almost 8 cents to make, so an extra .03.    I get your point, though.
In other news: John Green and CPGGrey move to Canada....
Even still, I would imagine there is some way to standardize the pricing conventions regardless of tax rates. Then again, I will not claim to have more than a basic understanding of how these kinds of things work haha. 
or Jeff Goldblum
[It's actually already out.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=n7cSBTduz7M)
You can update it at some point if you find the cost to be meaningful.. But I bet it's not.
In fact, it says so on your receipt. At least, in the Netherlands it does.
[deleted]
http://www.bible.ca/islam/islam-questions.htm ask him all this questions.
The language problem is easily solved. Canada has two official languages and print advertisements are frequently in both. It's even given rise to curious terms like "pencil crayon" (coloured pencil) and "zesty mordant" (a Doritos flavour). Do European countries also have the issue of varying sales tax within different regions of the same country? If there's a solution to that, I'd love to hear it, because I'd gladly start a letter writing campaign to our members of parliament.
Of course they do. It wasn't a very important event that even Mr Ahmadinejad himself called a "minor issue". Why is the media making a big deal out of this? Hell the shoe didn't even hit him. 
Steel is magnetic.  Would have to retool hundreds of thousands of vending machines using that as one of the methods to reject fakes.
She's your head of state and you probably just violated 20 laws talking shit about her.  Off with your head!
Who at CHOP specifically do you think is excessive?  They are very successful and attract top talent.  This is very much worthy of compensation.
Danish here as well, but i support fellow Danes who dont like Islams spread into Denmark. Its sad that people like you would demonize your fellow Danes before you criticize a foreign hostile force. 
Canadian Cashier here, I'm sure in the fine print I'm not allowed to accept US coins, but we count pennies-quarters as equivalent to CAD, the bank worries about the small difference in converting them.
good question
Why the hell would someone downvote this? They need to remove the stick.
Twist. Kim Jong Un gets killed by a mortar strike.   10/10 nonetheless. 
[deleted]
It's definitely my favourite state.
touché   I'll counter by saying I'm Polish and only living in Australia, so my home country is 1047 years old. =)
No, it doesn't.  Canada is certainly not the first country to implement such a change and it hasn't caused any significant confusion where it has been done before.  For example, Australia did it with the 1¢ and 2¢ coins in 1992, New Zealand in 1990 and Norway did it with their 50 øre coins in 2012.  I worked in retail in Australia about a decade ago. Many of the prices were already changed over the preceding years to be labelled to the nearest 5¢, such that a lot of prices ended in .95, rather than .99. With fixed price items like that, the rounding is just not a problem at all.  With items that are priced per unit. e.g. $/kg or $/L (e.g. fruit and veg, or petrol), or with some discount that changes the price to a non-rounded figure, the POS just applies the rounding to the sale total.  The cashier's job is not any more difficult. They just enter the amount of cash tendered and the POS tells the cashier how much to give back in change.
Facetious, it's a troll. RES tagging is a great thing.
I'd say that it's a basic human right for a child to know who their biological father is. Besides the emotional argument there's the obvious medical one, having the true information about your medical background could make a life and death difference in the screening and early diagnosis of serious illness.
Sorry.  Source: Canadian.
Was this 6 year old yours? Or from a previous girlfriend of his?  I want to know before I up or downvote you.
Same here. I work at a duty free store at the bridge to Canada. Fortunately I don't work a cash register anymore. Woot for promotions. 
&gt; No details needed.  Yeah, why have details and facts when we can rely on the assertions of anonymous Internet strangers?
But doesn't the propaganda have value, as insight into what's going on in Korea in terms of propaganda warfare? Like, how would we know that the propaganda is ridiculous and oppressive if no one outside Korea is allowed to see it?
I wish this would happen in the US. I've always thrown all my pennies into the garbage since I was a child.
thats why I thought that was the most interesting part of the article. they said it so nonchalantly, like australia having this huge number of air rage incidents in relation to its population was just a thing
He was defrauded.  he thought they were his biological children,but they weren't.  His guardianship was obtained through deception.
She did something terrible 14 years ago.
How am I out of my mind?  From a biological perspective, those kids aren't just things, they're fucking parasites.  We have two instincts: survive and reproduce.  Literally, the only thing everything alive today has in common is that all our ancestors survived long enough to reproduce.  Every plant, fungus, bacteria, animal, human being - we come from those who successfully mated.  This man got robbed of not just his money and time and emotions, but of his kids.
Huh, that's all good stuff to know. Now I don't feel so jealous. :P But I had the opposite experience with the roads last summer. All the highways, even ones that were sort of back-road highways with barely any cars, just really nicely paved. Much nicer than the yellowhead in SK usually is. Maybe I just got really lucky with the timing.
You're talking nonsense.  First: what parental responsibilities?  What possible responsibility could I have to three people who I already invested so much into under the lie, the falsehood, the blatant and deliberate artificially constructed world that they were my children?  Second: it's not anger and vindictiveness.  It's the pursuit of justice.  It's the realization that your entire fucking life was a lie and on top of that, society fucked you over and made you pay for that lie, even though it was not of your doing.  Society didn't give a rat's fucking ass about your innocence in this, why should you?  How can anyone here tell me that they would tolerate this happening to them?  Three of your kids aren't yours?  Fine, shit, life goes on.  But to go fucking pay child support for them, after the hurt and humiliation and pain the ex gave you?  Where is society's care for YOUR innocence there?  Who gives a fuck about innocent?  People get punished for the sins of their fathers all the time.  If you believe otherwise, you've been watching too much Hollywood.  The poor kid in school, the insecure kid without a dad, the withdrawn kid with an alcoholic mother, the kid who acts out aggressively in class because his parents beat each other up every weekend when they get drunk.  Take your fantasy high morality and stuff it where the sun doesn't shine.  If my entire life had been destroyed by my ex, even if all four of those children hadn't been mine, fucking fine, let me go drink myself to death.  But don't you fucking tell me I owe three bastards and a whore of an ex child support.
My ex wife also objected to paying child support 'Moms don't have to pay child support'.  I was just happy to have my kids so I didn't press it.
Help. 
Yeah, this is lowest court.
You can blame homophobia for that.  Kansas doesn't recognize the lesbian couple as legitimate parents and insist that a man must be one of the parents. The guy is fighting this in court and the lesbians are on his side.
Meanwhile in Canuckistan.
The difference is...?
Or maybe it's because SRS is a *circlejerk.*
I am not going to judge some one who wants to maximize his resources by making sure the government funds illegitimate kids. He can still love them. Why do they even need to KNOW where the money is coming from? The government is screwing him, because he cares. 
fUCKING pATRIARCHY
It was an eye opener how one sided the court system was.  This was all in the late 80s, I hope that it has balanced out to a more equal footing for both parties. 
*I'm* "twisted"? **I'm** "twisted"?  Listen, you sick piece of shit, ***you're*** the person advocating *ruining the lives* of **children**.  Fuck. You.
No. Fucking an 8 year old child isn't love, it's rape.
Daaayuuuuuum
Rights to abandon kids who thought you cared about them. Those are awesome rights, you must be proud.
Invest? Maybe if America convinces Yemen for peace and allow McDonalds, KFC and Wal-Mart to move in then terrorism might stop as former terrorists get normal jobs as cashiers, delivery truck drivers, cleaners, etc. Also, Yemen has no real 'industry' other than selling unprocessed oil. It would be awesome for Yemen to be able to refine it's own oil to the detriment of US workers, though.
Thanks, this is how I feel. My dad was kind of distant to me as kid but I did feel a genuine love there. I couldn't imagine how heartbroken I'd feel if he pulled something like this on me after finding out he's not my biological dad. That being said, I really believe both parents should have joint custody most of the time.
They're just now figuring this out??
Anybody who had a family member killed by the US, whether in Al Qaeda or not, is perfectly within their natural rights to kill Americans.  The world and ethics don't work the way many Americans think it does, American exceptionalism's popularity drops off quite fast once you leave the US.  The US doesn't get to kill whomever they wish without others having the same privileges.  Actions have consequences, the whole "war on terror" is simply two groups of people with significant differences of opinion using violence to advance their agenda.  In the course of human history, that's a popular theme.
From a ltittle bit further down the list (age 8 section):  &gt;Mum-Zi was a member of Chief Akkiri's harem on the island of Calabar. Her daughter* also gave birth extremely early, making Mum-Zi a **grandmother at age 17**.  *she's actually also on the list (also age 8 section), directly underneath her mother
Shit 2k a month?  Your ex hardly has to work...
Correct me if my US history is a little off but didn't last time something this awful happened you guys had an influx of Italian Mafia and beer barons? Maybe you need some bootleggers in the airline business.
Today's word is transubstantiation! Brought to you by the number 3!
[deleted]
You are speaking about over a billion people, are you sure you want to make that generalization?
You find this shit hilarious? Are you 15? It's a joke that's gone beyond beating a dead horse, it's a dead horse that through the magic of Hindu reincarnation has been resurrected time and time again, been brutally assaulted with all manner of blunt objects countless times and cycles. 
Interesting. Does one know why it contains more K40? Chemical reaction rates might be significantly different for different isotopes...
maybe itll push us too a better space program/economic boom finally...   *add confession bear meme, so i dont look like a total a-hole for wanting another cold war.. 
Incredibly easy fix though, cap it at 5 years. Enough time to go to school, get a degree, and get a job to support yourself.  Exceptions for those say, over 50 who wouldn't have enough time to build any kind of long term stability of course.
Do you really think the US can and would "hold a gun" to Pakistan, another country with enough nukes to seriously fuck us up?
To be fair, fast jets can easily break controlled airspace before they know it, and back track quickly.  I would assume however, that military maneuvers should be flagged to bordering nations before hand, incase of accidental tresspassing.
That is not russia.
When a child starts gaining weight, you think that she's getting fat.  The possibility that she's pregnant is so crazy that it doesn't come into serious consideration.  Around seven months, the shape of the weight gain gets to the point where it's *clearly* a baby.  And at seven months, the chances are pretty decent that the baby could be born alive.
We've all seen what happens when they have alcohol and cameras.  YouTube gold.
Not deployed on foreign soil.
After all of these posts showing how paranoid countries are, I think it's appropriate to say we are still in a Cold War
Horseshit, rapes per 100,000 statistics in Sweden from 2003 to 2010:      2003    2004    2005    2006    2007    2008    2009    2010     25.0	25.2	41.9	46.3	51.8	59.0	63.8	63.5  Which can partly be explained by the widening definition of rape (that was previously other crimes) and the increase in immigrant population (who are more likely to rape fellow immigrants or the native women), but in 7 years the reported rapes has *more than doubled*.  That's not normal.  There is going to be several major correlating changes that happened in those 7 years, and I've listed several possibilities already, but it's not because rape is now "more visible."
A woman cannot sneak around and have 3 kids with 3 different guys without something being off.  Phone records, unexplained lateness ect. I know how to identify a cheater even if I don't know the pesrson.   This guy was either really dumb or she was the 007 of cheating.
[deleted]
&gt;Chunky and I haven't even been on a FIRST date yet  Nuh-uh, Chunky said he got to third base with you &amp; that you put out easy. 
Amazingly helpful?  What happened to "maybe a 10% increase of productivity"?
"SOME researchers have SUGGESTED..."   That's some hard evidence right there. You'd rather get punched in the face than have someone talking shit to you? Also, are you seriously suggesting that men don't socially isolate other men in the workplace and only women do such things? 
WHAT IF WE DRILLED A HOLE IN A ROCK AND THEN SENT IT TO MARS!?!
You dont know me, but if you are a devout muslim I know everything about you.
Indeed. The key point of the article are two subdecisions by the ECHR leading up to the main decision (which wasn't very interesting):  - Enforcing the copyright monopoly is/can be an interference with the European Convention on Human Rights point 10, the freedom of expression.  - Therefore, any judicial decision based on the copyright monopoly cannot be based on the copyright monopoly alone, but must take the ECHR rules into account as well, i.e. the decision must be necessary in a democratic society.  These two subdecisions have profound implications, but as stated in the article, it is definitely nowhere near a free-for-all in file sharing.  Specifically, what it means is that political speech - or expressions with a political motive - may hold a higher interest than the copyright monopoly, and so ECHR may trump normal laws for that kind of expressions. In this case before the ECHR, it was commercial photography, which was not considered interesting from a defense-of-democracy standpoint.  But this case opens up a wide gray area which was previously pitch black. For instance, if you consider seeding a documentary of human rights abuses with a motive of bringing about political change, it is likely that such an action will be considered legal after this verdict, which it wasn't before. On the other hand, if you're selling bootleg copies in the parking lot, you're just as SOL as before.  The real interesting cases arrive when you're seeding commercial works - say, movies - in a political context and with a political motive of changing the world. In that case, it's a coin toss for now. That's an example of the gray area that just opened up.  Cheers, Rick 
So they cost £25...
**WHO** Zero Tolerance Day: http://www.who.int/mediacentre/events/annual/female_genital_mutilation/en/index.html  **WHO** how to cicumcise boys:- http://www.who.int/hiv/pub/malecircumcision/qa_guide/en/  No hypocrisy here is there?
No no,  in the case this thread is Based on. Not your xasec
&gt;However, just because we want stronger ties and we want a stronger trade, doesn't mean we will like them as a culture.  I often hear that many Taiwanese like Japanese culture and often go to certain restaurants because Japanese like to go there.  Or they follow Japanese dramas, anime, music, actors, fashion etc.       
That emoticon does not fit the context.
A little ignorant on the subject, can you explain? 
Gotta love Islam. Women are beaten, abused, mutilated...no prosecution. Only praise from allah and his goon muhammed. Sick. These islamists are just f-ing sick. Stay in your country and the heck out of ours.
Still a tough nut to crack for people that can't tell the difference between an asian lady and a 6'6 270LB black man. Heh.
WTF is City 17 lol.  Plus Im probably more of an Agnostic.  If your ashamed of atheism you should join Islam.
Okay, so first you state: &gt; **I said nothing about 'supporting' him**, I said people shouldn't tear him down. I could care less whether or not you liked him, but to call him racist is just plain inaccurate.  Then you go on to bend over for him and praise him &gt;Pipes, as I have stated, is one of the sanest voices out there. He supports maintaining regional stability by not taking sides between extremists and, rather, supporting those moderate voices who want to focus on humanitarian needs and practice an unpoliticized form of Islam.  But you said nothing of supporting him... riiiiight.  Get your story straight.  You contradict yourself.  Pipes is a known bigot.  Nice job exposing yourself.
"Don't rape people" - Allah
Or you know, stop creating wars.
Yeah. As opposed to what?
Matthew Reibling has always had a belief that people should do what they can to protect the environment. Through his work, Matthew Reibling does all he can to find ways to support and protect the environment. An avid hiker, Matthew Reibling loves experiencing the wilderness and sharing it with others, and he hopes to encourage more people to get involved with preservation.  
Who better than you? Change has always proved most effective from within and either way the Islamic community shuns the outside. But more importantly, if you identify as a Muslim then it is on you to not be passive about these things. If you choose to be, then you're choosing to identify with a not so rosy image of Islam; for no fault of yours, except that of inaction.
North Korean state representatives insist all options for retaliation remain on the table, up to and including the use of nuclear hand grenades. 
I'm quite certain there are a large number of marines on standby during military exercises around the north korean border, aren't there?
Compared to what? Shoot back *later* if they come under attack?
So, a board seemingly openly hostile to men's liberation and bell hooks et al more generally; a board which promotes the slander and shaming of members of a group of which it purports to be a part, legitimized with self-proclaimed morally superior status above the whole; a board actively pursuing an agenda of largely gynocentric discourse rather than a promulgation of notions of equality based on elevating unseen (feminine) issues; a board whose members revel in the debasement of others by wielding what should be nuanced language of equality (e.g. privilege) as language of violence to demean and shame and to control conversation; a board which actively stifles contrary opinion or open debate in its space; a board which acts with the same kind of hate and casual patriarchal disgust while furthering its own agenda, co-opting the very attitude it professes to despise.   This is the place you want me to believe is "solidly fourth wave". SRS has progressive members, of that I have no doubt. But on the whole SRS acts as a group of myopically affected bigots.   All of which doesn't even touch the open condescension and arrogant dismissal of:  &gt;Do your research, honey.  Especially when followed up with, &gt;I love it when assholes think they know what they're talking about when it comes to Feminism...  Which is hilarious considering that after eight years of study in sociology and political science I can say its pretty likely I've forgotten more material by peer reviewed feminist writers than you've read ever.  I'm sure third/fourth wave is what you'd like SRS to be. It is not. And while I may have been overly simplistic for the purposes of brevity in my initial 'call to arms', the fact remains that SRS remains on the whole a cancerous disservice to the school. 
How do you explain the many sweeping changes that have taken place since 1979?
[deleted]
We are trying to eradicate the disease. You can't afford to leave pockets of infected/unprotected people anywhere with Polio otherwise it will come back.
I will never understand soccer hooliganism.  
Some of them probably would revel in that process and consider it a good death though.
only cure for that continent is infertility
It does if they don't understand what justice is. Justice is using the law to make sure they don't hurt anyone ever again. Vengeance is what these people want. Doesn't mean vengeance is bad, it just means there is a difference. 
not even. many people consider animals less than human, deserving of neither rights nor respect, and wouldn't do this to them. 
You've never heard of it?  Its when two guys who were fighting over who had the most killer abs finally decide to make friends, and acknowledge they are both totally sliced and high five like bros. An Ab-Truce.  Or it's a one letter missing typo of abstruse.  You can pick :)
If we were sending Tomahawks or F-16's, we wouldn't be hearing about this.  Journalists are fucking retarded!
[deleted]
1. Hamdi vs Rumsfeld  2. "This is why John Walker Lindh was captured and **prosecuted**" - which concedes the argument that there are constitutional rights that cannot - or, more properly, should not - be abrogated.
By what possible definition of the word "news" does this qualify? I'd say it should be in a reddit devoted to human interest stories, but frankly it's not even particularly interesting...
Couldn't it be just a piece of space junk?
[deleted]
Cybermen?
Maybe your family shouldn't have been hanging out with someone worth bombing.
Friends tend to be pretty tolerant, don't they? At least while you're around them. These people aren't your friends. 
I agree. I still think that if you are capable of disemboweling a girl after raping and beating her, you should be removed from society in the most brutal way possible.
&gt;It's a fact Econ 101 Global trade is good. If we were to stop all trade with China now the US economy would die. They buy so much of our shit. Other nations do not have the resources to buy off of us.  I think you're missing something. The US had current account balance of [-487 billion in 2012](https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/rankorder/2187rank.html)  In 2011, they bought [~100 billion of our stuff, and we bought 399 billion of their stuff](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_the_largest_trading_partners_of_the_United_States) Current account deficit with China alone is more than -295 billion  &gt;What would happen global corps would shed 1000's of jobs and the stock market would crash.   Not really. Only those with operations in China will be affected. Not all do.   &gt;Global trade helps us more than hurts. Yes China devalues there currency it's a know fact, but if you study Chinas GDP is growing at a rate the is bad it will soon drop and the trade deficit will be reduced.  Missing the big picture. Peak oil is here. global trades will HAVE to slow. We're enteringn permanently  higher oil prices with decreasing supplies and increasing demand due to population increase.   China's GDP growth doesn't matter, and soon, their slave labor and currency pegging won't matter either. 
Tomorrows headline : Mars Rover Missing, have you seen this robot!?
any austerity is too much in this situation... all it does is make the economy worse, lead to more layoffs, lowered gdp, less tax revenue, and a new deficit the next year, which leads to more cuts - a downward cycle of austerity:  http://thinkprogress.org/yglesias/2011/10/29/356626/the-cycle-of-euroausterity/?mobile=nc
Fight it with a Bass-O-Matic
You even checked Pluto. But no, Mars never crossed your mind. Get your shit together, man.
We could maybe get more on ebay
[deleted]
Well, it ranks amongst the top ten in any case.  It really let the completely wrong people in leading positions.  On the other hand, toppling elected goverments, annexing foreign lands, starting undeclared wars, torturing, abducting, supporting oppressive dictatures and that shit get their places on the list aswell, I guess ...
I'm EXTREMELY Apathetic.
well, according to my google dictionary extension it is indeed a term for female ancestor.
Except the Inquisition. But *nobody expects the Inquisition*!
Most of the Chinese budget goes to keeping large army fed and functioning. Japan is much smaller country and it has been spending it's  it's money to AEGIS equipped  destroyers and frigates and fighter jets. Unlike China, Japanese also continuously train and spend time in the sea. It's only way to really learn to operate.   China don't have significant advantage over Japan in maritime conflict close to Japanese waters. 
99% chance of being space garbage 
Probably still should be and we would have all the inflation problems we have now
[deleted]
[deleted]
"I just realized afterward that I could be anywhere else but on the train tracks and I would not get hit by a train"
That's correct. Only a handful of prime numbers for n meet the criterion for the quantity 2^n -1 to be prime.  EDIT: What's really cool is the fact that the quantity 2^(n-1) *(2^n -1) is a perfect number (it's been proven). A perfect number is a number whose divisors sum to the number itself, e.g. 6 is a prime number, since 1+2+3=6 
No this prime number is 100% useless.
Ok in the history of mankind there has not been one extended period of time that war has not raged. That is because conflict is in human nature. 
[Capricorn One](http://youtu.be/zoZ2AySW2bY)
Who wants your SPIT. I can go to the Doctor instead. 
[deleted]
got to love that zionist racism.  
Dude, what the fuck is your problem?
[here](http://www.isthe.com/chongo/tech/math/digit/m57885161/prime-c.html)
Yeah, that's the same conclusion I reached. I did bookmark your comment though, actuallu. You know, just in case.
This needs more upvotes, you're dead on mate. I think the first country to formally abolish slavery was Iceland; slavery was and still is extremely common and legal in many parts of Africa. Hell, you can go to Eritrea right now and buy a slave, if you like. It's not like the 'evil white man' invented slavery; he just industrialised it, like he industrialised more or less everything else.
Now theres a quark with *real* flavor.
Are these the same MPs that were spending millions of our money on ducks and toilet seats?  Pot (to kettle): "You're black!"
More like a religionist. Not much better, in my opinion.
I agree entirely, which is why my brother and I have been using Folding@Home for about 8 years now :)
Would be most entertaining if it was a full on Leveson-style inquiry, for which nothing came of it.
They did. They ended up with someone even worse. 
Interesting idea! The question is whether calculating the number of primes is less computationally intensive than using other algorithms to check whether a number is prime.  My guess is that checking the number of primes less than a given number, *for each number*, then taking the difference is not as efficient as the probabilistic tests used today.
Are most people in Pakistan that go on YouTube, supportive of the ban in lieu of this video? Or no one really gives a shit, and you want to get back to the YouTube advertisements?
Totally joking but I'm not British and have never been there and I'm fairly ignorant on what England has to offer!
[deleted]
Well, it's a learning experience.   There are very good reasons for secularism (separation of state and church). 
You could say the exact same thing about the US.
[deleted]
You know you're a racist right? She's not Indian 
*Robin
[deleted]
[deleted]
If they try to dismantle the pyramids I think shit will go down.   Hell if it worst came to worst I'd like to imagine someone would intervene.   Imagine the global outrage. I'd be calling for blood. 
Hamas won free and fair elections, there should have been no battles needed but a US backed coup was concocted instead.   Israel is against Hamas and Fatah making peace with each other and forming a unity government. These are the same players who say they support democracy and negotiations as a way to resolve the conflict.
The case in question is [suryanelli](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Suryanelli_rape_case) case, where the girl was 16 years old. She is still a minor in the eyes of [Indian Law](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Minor_(law)) (18 years is the boundary). However Indian law also considers 16 years as the boundary for consensual sex, below which it is statutory rape for sex with a minor.   
&gt;Did you even Google it? http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rape_statistics#UN_Rape_Statistics[1] the US reported rape rate is about 16 times that of India.  &gt;FTFY.
Try reading Swiss-German than hahaha. Pretty sure it can give you eye cancer. 
[deleted]
China needs to increase the effectiveness of the workforce with education and automation.  1 smart person with robots and do more than a line of 30 manual workers.
You didn't say where you are from got something to hide eh?
No worries. Dont tell anyone, but i do that sometimes to.
Horse meat is very popular in Belgium. And with good reason, it tastes awesome.  Horse meat farms are not that uncommon, there are a bunch in Canada too.
completely forgot about san francisco rush! 
The first round of voting used single mark ballots. 52% voted for somebody who never made it to the second round, meaning that they were essentially disenfranchised. The only choice most people got was between Morsi and Shafik.
My state has the highest number of human trafficking. :/ I don't understand why this is still occurring. I say legalize all drugs, prostitution, and everything else black market so that it's all out in the open. Transparency. 
it is illegal to eat horse meat in UK
[deleted]
That is surprising to me, since Brazilians are revolted by the very idea of horse meat, especially in the South.
So, your saying they have kidnapped and tortured 6 million innocent foreign nationals? You could argue the merits of or against torture all you want and you would have plenty of valid points. But that is not the disagreement I have with you. These people were in there for one  reason or another. There is no comparison between what when on there and what happened during the holocaust. You are a douchebag for comparing the two. Show some damn respect. You do not need an extreme comparison to make a point, and if you do, its probably not a solid point.
[deleted]
[deleted]
No muslims in my town or the next. In fact in my entire county one and a half times the size of London I know of only one Mosque.
[deleted]
The This American Life story had everyone saying they'd *heard* of it happening, just no proof.
Ya, their fingerprints will be different.
its never Israels fault they are soo innocent 
The truthiness is so depressing. 
They did not come here to escape anything, they came here as servants of Strategic Islamisation.
The best school systems are private ones, not ones that are funded by taxes. Healthcare was cheaper before it became tax funded and we pay way more into SS than we get out
&gt; One could actually argue that the one who confesses is of the stronger moral fiber, even if misguided, and thus less likely to be the rapist.  I'm sorry, but that's a terrible argument because it's based on the premise that the confession was simply, "I did it," and provided no intimate details about the crimes. If the guilty brother decides to make the ruse more authentic, he'd have to share all the gory details with his "innocent" brother. So if the confession holds, one gets convicted of the rapes. If it's expose that they both know details of the crimes, at the very least they would both get obstruction of justice and possibly both be charged as accomplices to those crimes.
&gt;The fact that you use the word bigoted says you me that you can't see their point of view on this one.  Since when can you not use the word "bigoted" to describe points of view you understand?  Amongst other groups I've studied imperial Britons, the Confederates, the Nazis... I have some appreciation of how all those groups viewed the world and would describe all of them as bigoted.   Also once again what's "civil" about bullying a student newspaper?
And? Proud ignorant Americans like JohnBoy act like it's purely American through and through, which it isn't is it, it's a mix of different nationalities with genius brains. 
Do you call cognitively challenged people retards, you ignorant fuck?
I never said it wasn't. The most powerful way to reinforce hatred is to make it seem like a good thing.  But for most people, the hatred or disgust or aversion or discrimination does not directly begin or end with religion.
As an aside, I think it's hilarious that a bald man is named Diosdado Cabello (Godgiven Hair).
As a Canadian, this disgusts me. I am not paying taxes to fund this.  EDIT: I should clarify that I'd gladly support the work that needs to be done, ie "dig wells, build latrines, and promote hygiene awareness," but a different group should have been chosen.
The Vietnamese gang that controls the garment district? Greedy. Too greedy.
you have too many 0's in there
But the point is, the big bad technologically advanced "murrican Military *IS* retreating.
Did anybody else think this was about reddit gold when reading the beginning part of the title for the first time?
I'm an idiot. True.  Sadly true.
This video is really nice.......
Does anyone else secretly hope it hits ? I can't be the only one 
Is he even allowed to do that?
...which wasn't very smart.
[deleted]
Pensions? These fuckers are devoted to poverty, chast--  Probably 4 altar boys per month directly delivered to his gilded apartment in the Vatican. 
No. He meant donuts. http://imgur.com/9ivAFwH
Ze pope
IT'S TRAP!
John Paul supported evolution, though. That's a huge step for them.
Popetime, popery, and popage are all acceptable in modern usage.
You kidding me? He can now finish the side quests in Skyrim
The pope is supposed to be the successor to saint peter and is therefore made at least semi divine, how does the new pope get this when the old one is still alive? Do they have to de-popify the old one? 
From the team that brought you Black Samson, Black Caesar, and Black Samurai comes a new boss of the Roman Catholic Church. And he ain't takin' no shit off some old, wrinkly, jive ass, funny robe wearing crackas.  Black Pope   March 2013
*C for Catechism*
Hell no.
No, this is Patrick.
I think Terms of Service agreements need a TL;DR. 
Also, I can't check it because it is blocked at work, but check out Intrade, I wouldn't be surprised.
There's gotta be some *wicked* wines in the Vatican's cellars ;)^^^punveryintended
You only poop once?
Clarify blood-thirsty and ritual murderers.  Feeding off the energy? Think you may be confusing Catholicism with Scientology there. If it's a book of fables how can it also be the ranting of an angry god?
The problem is they should have been defrocked 20 years prior...They should not have been just sitting around getting paid to do nothing until there was nothing else that you could do...  And it isnt that these people are any more difficult to find than when an employee of any other company is fired or paid to leave when they do something illegal.
Could you explain about the last statement you made regarding solutions to poverty? I've never heard of this and I'm interested. 
on to the next uberchildbuggerer! or is it commander in childbuggery.. or or.... safe to say he's raped kids. 
What's a pope?
Yes, I too fully accept the words of Bin Laden as if he was being honest and up front and not trying to sway people with propaganda. And clearly religion plays no part in that propaganda piece.
[Their Headquarters.](http://i.imgur.com/dCXO2.jpg)
I do not feel sorry for the north Koreans at all this is a blatant attempt at a vulgar display of power to grab political prestige. My hope is that if they do go through with this test that china will punish them severely and that the US government will back china up.  There needs to be a large stabilizing presence in the region.  I would like to see the USA help china in stabilizing the region. We do not need a war in Asia right now. China and the USA do not agree on everything but I think we can get together on no nuking the Asian subcontinent.
Quick send your daughters to China ... for the sake of the world... They must satisfy these little men before they become a big problem!
There's defiantly a difference, there are a few IAMAs that you can read on that sub subreddit which explains the contracting and voluntary involvement. And in most cases it's entirely possible to get a divorce if you are the bride and keep citizenship if you are the bride. 
Afghanistan is a territory conquered by the Pasthuns in thr 17th to 19th centuries.  Of course there won't be unity between the disparate peoples.  Nation-states are incompatible with Muslims anyway (except Iran)
Most likely the main issues are in rural rather than urban areas.
Sorry, I find that hard to believe that the company doesn't have a cleaning woman.   The company I work, the majority of the staff are women. And they would never be caught dead cleaning washrooms. Not even the receptionists will do more than tidying up our meeting rooms. 
No compulsion....
Feminists in countries where women are actually at a huge disadvantage are not.
I started to drink a lot less once there was any chance of me getting laid that night.
Evidence??
I don't get it, what's seems to be a problem? Most of us are single here and don't get laid, and we don't threat the world. Just get 'em that high-speed internet and don't block the porn sites and get 'em that MMORPGs. That should fix the problem. 
The people down-voting this person fit into two categories:  1) Can't read tables.  2) Willing to deny facts in order to stay in their comfortable world-view.   **Edit:** graphs -&gt; tables
According to CNN, its estimated to be a one kiloton bomb compared to the 15 kiloton bomb we dropped on Hiroshima in 1945. Still a long way to go but still pretty scary.
there's this great invention called the google. give it a few important words and it searches all the interwebs for you.  here's the first thing i found, that says innovation slowed even earlier http://www.newscientist.com/article/dn7616-entering-a-dark-age-of-innovation.html  I delivered; do i get some orange arrows? 
Sadly, despite the rhetoric and heated diplomatic exchanges that will likely occur over the following days and weeks, I see no reason to believe this or whatever follows will do anything to change the status quo. North Korea will simply use this as a bargaining chip for aid as they have following each provocative act in the past. And the west will oblige because the other options (mass refugee crisis or all out war on the Korean Peninsula) are far worse. 
Good. About time the chinese die out. They done more foul to this world than good. 
[deleted]
I wouldn't dismiss that so easily. A dirty bomb in Times Square? That would cripple the USA. We'd give up the rest of our liberties in an insane attempt to make us safer cuz, you know, it worked so well to stop the bomb.   The one good thing, though, is Kim Jong Un would get a heaping fresh pile of Freedom from us. 
They look like that because they are specifically made to carry and launch helicopters, much like the American Wasp class.  It's not a secret or anything, at all.  
Also , curiously (41.2, 129.2) is in an unpopulated region, with the only close thing being Myongchon, the town that hosts the Taepodong missile base
See you guys at basic!
&gt;Had it been me and my brother, (it would not!!!) we would have stuck together as long as possible.  Even if it meant that justice would never be served?  What about the victims?  Don't they matter?
[deleted]
Exactly. Watch out though, I've been getting down voted for this mentality for the past 30 minutes. It seems it's cool with some folks if you want to off yourself after having a bad day.
And this is the only school where they can teach and get paid?
There you go. Hopefully that's good enough compensation for stealing your idea haha.
This right here deserves to be the top comment!
It's just that women in urban areas who are successful have a hard time finding a man to marry who is either more successful than her or is ok with being less successful than her. 
said the old liberal
I have a feeling it's Alzheimer's/dementia, and probably rapidly advancing. Few other ailments could prevent a Pope from fulfilling his duties, but after seeing my grandmother suffer from advanced dementia, you'd be hard pressed to convince her of her *name* for more than 5 minutes. There's no way she could handle working, especially not as the leader of an *entire church*. At least with physical ailments, he could still perform a good amount of his duties, but a deteriorating mental state would be impossible to hide.
the north koreans are still mad at us about the korean war
Thanks author for your nice site to Plumbing
[Relevant](http://www.nbcnews.com/id/16614865/).
It's exactly was Russia did with the space race
[For the lazy](http://i.imgur.com/fopU94k.jpg)
By that logic I don't have to worry the least about robbers unless I have been robbed myself, regardless of how many of many people are getting robbed in my neighborhood.
what
Um, North Korea set off a nuclear bomb, on the day they said they would set off a nuclear bomb.
It's a deterrent against India and a deterrent against other western powers that would try to invade. Of course they wouldn't want to be like Iraq and Afghanistan. I'm thinking from Pakistan's side here. What would you think will happen?
Could NK become militarily strong enough to throw off US and other economic sanctions? While on that topic no one seems to know where they get the big money for such activity.
It checks out guys. Science.
Lake Michigan?
I'm no nautical commander, but the idea of retrofitting ships into makeshift, untested carriers with no Naval Tradition behind them, versus using a ground based but still able strike craft that can range into the apparent threat of China and the local region, is quite frankly, silly and it seems like a waste of time.  It would be more feasible to deploy fleets of ships escorted by ground based strike craft in the local region, then it would be to retrofit a destroyer into a reduced capability ship to field a smaller, untested ship-based craft.
While no one outside of intelligence agencies is probably capable of determining how far Iran has come with their weapons program, they are certainly trying to.  You don't have centrifuges like the ones that were attacked by the US and Israel with Stuxnet unless you are trying to enrich uranium.
Japan is protected by the USA's nuclear umbrella. They do not need nuclear weapons.  "Following the Atomic bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki, World War II and the deconstruction of the imperial military, Japan came under the US "nuclear umbrella" on the condition that it itself won't produce nuclear weapons. This was formalized in the Security Treaty Between the United States and Japan, which preceded the current security alliance, the Treaty of Mutual Cooperation and Security between the United States and Japan."  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_umbrella#Japan
You bet your sweet dick we are fellow patriot; this is motherfucking America!
You're thinking of Japan.
Exactly. Discretion is usually the better part of valor. 
&gt;This is not only about their nukes or their desire to get them - this is about removal of the theocracy from Tehran.  So you admit they don't have a weapons program? I'm not defending the Iranian government (seriously, wtf makes you think that), I'm just saying that you're full of shit.
I wonder if China will just eventually line up troops and march down to the DMZ and annex North Korea?  It would probably be the best solution to the problem.  Is /r/pyongyang dead?  They have one post (4 months ago) in the last year.  
Lose their force? They never had any force, and they never will.
Brazil had a nuclear program during the military dictatorship. We believe it's in the fridge for the last 30 years. We have some very damn good centrifuges and [we have issues letting the inspectors have full disclosure of them](http://www.armscontrol.org/act/2004_11/Brazil)
Maybe they should stop enriching uranium if they want others to disarm. 
The UK was still trying to be a world power after WWII, and they had contributed a lot to the original Manhattan Project. Japan officially became a pacifist nation after WWII. [It is written into their constitution](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Article_9_of_the_Japanese_Constitution). I don't actually know the specific history behind the Uk's nuclear program, but I imagine that these factors are a large cause for the difference.
Not the jet model, the picture.
"We don't do it to make people like us, we do it to keep the world safe. "  Technically the USA does it because it's in the interest of the US as a nation and its citizens. It just so happens it works out for most other nations too. 
We've got China, France, India, Russia, Pakistan, Israel, the UK, and us. We've got about 26,000 more nukes than anyone else. Hwhatever. 
I read an article a couple years ago which laid out the case for this pretty clearly (through opinions polls and what not).  Younger generations of South Koreans expressed a desire to strengthen cultural and economic ties with China. Interestingly enough, anti-China sentiment rose for a brief period when the Chinese government claimed the ancient Korean kingdom of Goguryeo as Chinese.  But I think the trend still stands.  Obviously, we can't make generalizations.  I'm sure most young South Koreans have more nuanced views that can't be labeled as simply "pro-China" or "pro-US," but I think the attitude of acceptance is pertinent to the current topic.
I'll upvote you, and recommend others to do the same for your facts provided.   I never meant to represent the US OPLAN 5027 in any fashion more then to strike home the seriousness of the North Korean threat.   Thank you for providing the summary and links!
Ment to be ironic/funny, but ok.
my thoughts exactly. I see this is a slap in the face to our Greek ancestors that started this tradition. If you asked them the one sport they would never want removed, I imagine this might be on the list. 
Sickening. 
It would also be better to reach those new civilizations first so that you can trade with them for new advances or gold.
Heirloom seed savers don't use modern agricultural practices; they use traditional seed saving practices. I'm a hobbyist; I don't have a research budget to lose. I save open pollinated seeds not hybrids, so the phrase "pure supplies of both parents" doesn't make sense in my situation.   There is an extinction of food crop varieties in progress now. Take a look at the Garden Seed Inventory by Seed Savers Exchange, copyright (yes, I blush) 2004. Even just nine years ago, in 2004, there were many more varieties generally available than there are now. Hobbyists, such as myself, are trying to preserve some of our favorites among these varieties. Many of us got started when one of our favorites got dropped from a seed catalog, and we couldn't find another source for it.  Although I don't have to worry about pure supplies of both parents since I'm not preserving hybrids, I do have to worry about minimum populations in order to avoid inbreeding depression and preserve genetic diversity. Also of concern are isolation techniques to preserve genetic purity. For some crops, isolation distances can be dauntingly high for the small hobbyist. For example, when preserving members of the Brassicaceae family, it is recommended in the standard reference, From Seed to Seed by Suzanne Ashworth, that I isolate my crop from relatives by at least half a mile, and for some species in this family, one mile. I hear from experienced seed savers that for Brassicaceae I should generally grow out a minimum population of 60 to prevent inbreeding depression. For you, this must sound like a laughably small requirement, but 60 turnips take up a substantial portion of my garden space. This year I grew 30 of my favorite variety, and I plan to grow 30 more next year, then mix the seeds from the two years. Since Brassicaceae seeds generally remain viable for a long time (I have kale seeds from 2003 that still are quite vigorous), I can take my time about saving them.  With a recommended minimum isolation distance of two miles, Zea mays is notoriously difficult to preserve. Bagging the tassels and ears is pretty much required to ensure purity. The minimum population of 200 adds to the difficulty. Even with that minimum population, inbreeding depression sometimes still strikes, and traditionally this has been dealt with by sacrificing a bit of the purity and allowing cross pollination from nearby fields. This is why Monsanto's claim to own the control of the right to grow any corn which has any of their patented genes in its genome, regardless of whether the person who grows it has ever signed a licensing contract, is especially upsetting to me.
Since forever. Not a surprise
North Korea, Iran, and the US can all be rivals and bring back the days of USSR Vs USA
As someone who lift's I can confirm this.
And any politician is slitting their own throat if they don't use them, sadly.  Money has become so pervasive in politics that you can't get anything done without tens of millions utilizing ugly financial and bureaucratic instruments.
[deleted]
if it is so obvious that Asia as a whole condems the US than why doesnt China support North Korea's attempt at making a nuclear weapon?
I think you mixed up the definitions of funny and tragic.
[deleted]
Money is intervention. Yes it is. What is your point?   You have argued that Israel could not defend itself without US support or intervention. You have helpfully established that money is support (I can't see anyone having claimed otherwise actually, but anyway). After someone posted a reply to you saying that, attempting to refute it, you then said this:  &gt;Considering that Israel is a relatively wealthy nation and can easily raise that money by raising taxes on its tax base, $3 billion in US aid is $3 billion too much.  I then said that that comment was a different point entirely. Which it is. You then tried to argue that it was entirely on point. I reproduced the entire discussion, and asked you to:  &gt;point me where anyone before you made any point whatsoever about whether aid to Israel is justified, as opposed to Israel's ability to defend itself and wage war without US support.  You then replied, not doing so, instead saying that money is intervention.   How about we go back a step. Please clarify what exactly it is you are saying. Are you saying that Israel should not get US aid? If so, please explain how that is germane to the discussion that was actually happening (which was about Israel's ability to defend itself with or without US aid).  Alternatively, are you still arguing that Israel could not defend itself and wage war without US support? If so, please stick to that point. If you are going to bother replying to people who attempt to refute your points, actually reply to the substance of the matter, not irrelevant matters such as whether Israel should or should not get US aid (because in this context, the simple fact is that they DO get it, and the question is whether, without it, could they still wage war effectively).  Please, stay on point. I don't think that is too much to ask.
Although Muslims don't believe Jesus was crucified. 
Right or happy?  I would like to be right and  happy.  Kind of a useless question, but I think I know what you are getting at.      If I didn't believe in God, I would still go to church.  I would still teach my children that God is and what means.  Many atheists go to church because of how beneficial it is.      When presented with two alternatives that only one of which can be true, the value of the truth is the difference between finding out you are wrong and how things would be different if you knew the truth the whole time.  But with God, we will not know the truth unless God reveals himself to us.  [Kind of like with intelligent aliens, we can never say they don't exist but we can know they do, when a UFO lands].      So what I'm saying is, the truth is unknowable; whence, there is no risk to believing.  So, we have to evaluate what we honestly believe and I honestly believe God is watching.
[deleted]
In this case, Monsanto marketed the pesticides in question as safe for people, and (this is important, IMO) the pesticide *is* safe for people in small amounts.  But a farmer could potentially inhale a lot more than Monsanto expected and cause himself considerable harm.  It's not crazy to think that being around the dust of something shown to be safe for humans wouldn't cause you much harm, especially when the salesperson emphasizes that point.
Take a look at his username...  Seriously though, you are correct. Let me add to that, how among Koreans like me, most of us have great national pride. If America decides to do what it wants and have North Korea be China's vassal state, you can bet South Korea will not just stand by. That guy doesn't know what he's talking about, we're not "child's nation" anymore, like it was in the early 20th century.
Intercontinental Ballistic Missiles fastest deliver the best kind of Aid I always say
I read the article... just not the date.
I wonder if there are any good interviews online about the creative process behind Alpha Centauri.  "So we were like... what if the monsters that hippies saw while on LSD were *real* and decided to help them **wreck** shit?"
This is the joke.jpg
TIL that "Saudi human rights activist" is *not* an oxymoron.  Encouraging!
Like we've given a fuck about the middle east before!
Even if Germany did capture Moscow, there were enough Siberian troops to kick them out again, even if it took twenty years. Since the Mongols, nobody has captured even a third of Russia. It's just too massive to beat.
[deleted]
Everybody has them don't worry. I just think there should be a bit more coverage and outrage on them in the US as the people people worth raging about are mostly people payed with their tax money.  Then again I'm not from the US myself so I shouldn't talk too much.
Niemals nicht!!
Pros: customers save money, businesses makes less per unit but sells more units so makes more money. More choice.  Cons: prices stay the same for the customers but businesses makes more per unit. A company from the US/EU suddenly swamps your market taking all your business.
Communism -is- a form of government, socialism is the term you are looking for and communist countries have a socialist economies. And guess what. European countries like the nordic ones, though centralist, are pretty capitalist.
Depends on the details, probably VAT will still apply but no import duty.
You don't bite a Kinder egg, you genly press with your thumbs right ont the thin line that separate both sides and eat each side starting with the tiniest end.  It's a delicacy that only kings and emperors can afford.
I understand that. I don't have any problem with it in itself. It's just that recently I've noticed that in every single thread involving North Korea's nuclear exploits forces me to wade through 30 or so useless Civilization references before I can get to the meat of the discussion. I get that it's all in good fun, but when people deem it the most important part of the discussion multiple times I think some priorities have been put out of line somewhere.
Not archaic or random. Effective and highly usable. Quit the self hating.
We don't need no stinking nukes to deliver a proportional response.   We still got the MOAB around somewhere.
......
[deleted]
I was hoping for something more along the lines of an alien invasion ala X-COM
Either way getting porn off the internet is going to be harder than going to the moon...
I don't think oil is anywhere near 22 percent of world GDP.
Pandemic had it going down, definitely. It's practically the basis for any disease-based game I can think of to this day. I didn't think me even mentioning Plague would get such hate, considering I was saying how Pandemic's habits were still awesome, and that I was merely expecting Plague to be more widely used as a joke.  That or the shit pun.
An obvious answer is, not eat meat. Meat uses a third of our globally produced grain. It uses ludicrous amounts of good land and water. We would be healthier, and the planet would be better off, without industrial animal farming.
[deleted]
I can't even imagine the mental state you have to be in to set yourself on fire. It's just such a painful and gruesome death. 
City of Death. I love that serial.
&gt; 48,000 Euros (more than double of the American price)   That is depressing. 
Uncovered? What was covering it?
Somebody is about to get high score in epidemic 2 
[deleted]
I think if you're going to measure the harm done to women by porn, you have to look at what type of porn is most popular and available. From what I've been lead to believe, a lot of porn portrays really negative views towards women. it's all 'you slut, you dirty whore bla bla bla' do most porn videos end with a cum shot to the face? I'm honestly not bothered finding out myself because I don't wanna see that shit, It'll just depress me knowing all men i know most likely watch it. I'd be well up for porn portraying sexy situations where the woman isn't being degraded, you know normal sex in real life.   So if it is the case that a lot of porn is degrading towards women then yes it is harmful because if men are watching this every day, chances are they'll be affected by it. It's kind of scary to think that guys start watching porn as young as 12 and that forms a substantial amount of their sexual knowledge. And there I was at 12 reading pre-teen magazines which talked about learning how to kiss and how to tell if your crush liked you. No wonder there seems to be a conflict over what men and women want from sex. 
[deleted]
YAAAAY Internet anonymity :D But you could probably say it in Nazi Germany too.  I blame human emotion. It often gets in the way of logic. Death = Always Bad, so Diseases = Always Bad, when really, without diseases like cancer, we would probably have a very bad population problem.   
so meta 
Your point being?
&gt;Not being able to drink  Isn't that bad enough? 
... and when traveling around the world to spread disease wasn't so easy.
I go to UBC, otherwise known as the University of a Billion Chinese. Trust me on this one.
Engineer here. Not total ly positive of what you're referring to.   Edit: no longer caring to contribute. 
"Just between us, your military is the laughing stock of the world."  Civ everybody
| for every porn that is done in a tasteful respectful manner there are thousands more that are not, and are indefensibly exploitive.^[citation ^needed]
I simply want to congratulate you on your excellent taste in comics.
so it's a 99.9% chance you are about to be killed and raped. Yeah, I'd shoot.
Heavy talk for "no offense".
So brave and edgy
In fact, I think it's really fair/protective for the woman.  Think of why imgur bans porn. It's not that they don't want porn, it's that in case of trouble they can take it away at sight.  In this case is not that you want to ban people from paying prostitutes, but if for some reason you cause trouble (like being denounced by the prostitute) you can be prosecuted easily. This forces you to have a trustfully relationship with the prostitute.   Not saying they made the law taking this in mind, but hell, it could be made reasonable.
 http://lmgtfy.com/?q=science+in+ancient+India . There were lots of things dude before the muslims came and burnt down all the 20 Universities, most prominent among them was http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nalanda
was leaving earlier ever an option?
&gt;It's called empathy. Personally, while I don't cry for every African child that starves or every depressed person who commits suicide, I do think it's a sad thing that situations like these are considered "normal" in many places.  Right, but when *the rest of us* think the event is unfortunate, but *also* dont cry about it, then its somehow problematic and to be ashamed of. Empathy =\= "omg so sad" posts.   For that matter in this case its debatable how much empathy he even deserves, considering he killed himself "merely" because he couldnt get a job and wasnt given money, even though a first world country like France still provides social protection for such people, i.e. his situation was still far better then a huge chunk of people in the world.    &gt;Maybe I'm an idealist but I don't think it has to be like this. We have the resources and technological means to provide a good standard of living for everyone. It's mostly our cultures (both wasteful consumerism in the West and outdated faith-based cultures in the East) as well as our monetary-economic system that lag behind in terms of progress.  Yes, you're definetly an idealistic and like a lot of people like you, apparently not very educated on the issue. In case you were not aware, various rich countries (and even large coorporations or billionaires like Bill Gates) provide *massive* funds and aid to poor countries to improve peoples standards of living. The simple and sad fact is that that's not enough and the issues to solve run far deeper, especially the dictatorships/corruption ones. My country isnt even on the level of, say, somalia, but i've seen first hand how much aid money is laundered and stolen and wasted.  I dont really see how western "monetary-economic system" or culture is "lagging behind progress", considering that they are by far  the most successful systems in the worlds history and cater specifically to what people consider happy life, barring the occasional once in century economic depression.   
Roses are red,  Violets are glorious,  But don't try to surprise,  Oscar Pistorius
Pretty sure SA would be full of the same amount of rape and murder regardless. If anything there would be more chaos as the one advantage the middle class have is trained firearm users.  Don't get me wrong. I want a happy, violence free world as well. I just think South Africa is fundamentally fucked far beyond anything having to do with guns. IMHO as I have never studied them in depth.
For some reason, every white South African I've ever met was an arrogant, self-righteous, entitled douche who thought they could be away with murder - now I'm thinking it's more than a coincidence.
[deleted]
This is why gun ownership is generally a bad idea. Statistics show that you or one of your loved ones is more likely to be injured or killed by your gun than an intruder so, by owning one, you are, in general, reducing, not increasing their safety. 
be great if south africa was this quick on all the other murders in the country
Newsflash - there's a lot of morons on the internet.
&gt; not a dictatorship  Alright, timoleon should probably have used descriptions like "totalitarian" or "authoritarian". He went for the (technically incorrect) shorthand "dictatorship".  Let's not derail this too far. He was contrasting them to liberal, democratic systems supporting individual freedom.
http://www.news24.com/SouthAfrica/News/Domestic-incidents-at-Pistoriuss-house-20130214  Not before the shooting but still interesting.
Silhouette?
Im surprised it happened this way, she usually had a leg up on him.
That title was a roller coaster of emotion.
1: Many people worship/admire this man and want any reason to believe he isn't a murderer.    2: Many people want to justify their anti-gun bias. ("See I told you guns are dangerous!" ect)
You mean killing his own girlfriend by mistake? yeah, fuck that dude!   right?   EDIT: Nvm, looks like there was domestic violence history and it was 4 point blank shots.
I hope not. My friend Dirk was shot in the face point blank by his girlfriend the day after Valentines. There were a few articles, if you look up Cara Cottle. She got off very lightly.
He's been arrested, so apparently police think there may be something up as well.
Just do it... he did, he did, he did..
Well, TB is responsible for an absolutely massive amount of suffering on the planet and drug resistance makes treating it much worse. But it will continue to primarily impact the poorest people on the planet, most of whom are not on reddit.   Most of you do not need to hide your children and hide your wife.   I suppose I'm of mixed feelings about this sensationalist headline:  it takes something everyone should care about but generally do not and gets people to pay attention to it by stoking fears that it will come to get you even though it probably won't.
I don't know why they do this, but the computer of a car with auto transmission treats manual changes as suggestions. It disregards them if it will be bad for the transmission. 
So this would be the equivalent of filling a gas tank halfway and then claiming the car's range did not meet expectations.  
-public charge stations are not 'supercharge' stations, which were the reason tesla offered this review. -temp set point chart clearly demonstrates that half the time he shut the climate control off. Driving around in a 64 degree car is cold.  just a few points. i applaud tesla's use of data, but the conclusions he draws from them are poor, and its not clear to me anyone on reddit has done anything but looked and seen charts and said "amagad data must be right."
&gt;It can't be transported by water.  Why not?
They did added weights to sides of Robin to make it easyer to capsize it.
&gt; in obvious violation of common sense.  Genius burn. 
I can imagine him saying to the rebels "We Win, All your base are belong to us!"
[link to article](http://wheels.blogs.nytimes.com/2013/02/12/the-charges-are-flying-over-a-test-of-teslas-charging-network/)
I accidently a few words.
Ah, I should have figured that, certainly makes more sense.  Does anyone know, is the wikileaks party one that is actually gaining some steam there, or is it basically put together for this specific Assange move?
I agree that he probably does not wear his running blades around the house, but would guess that he does wear a standard style of prosthetic and is quite good at moving around.  He was probably quite fast with the standard prostheses since he played rugby, tennis and water polo as a teenager.  The blades didn't come along until he was introduced to running in 2003
[deleted]
[deleted]
She was a Nexus 7 replicant.
Yeah dude. Appeasement worked *so good* in the 1930s.   I mean, it's not like the North has sunken Southern warships, shelled Southern islands, built invasion tunnels under the DMZ, kidnapped civilians, sent assassination squads into the south, attacked American/South Korean guards on the border or anything of that nature.   **You're a brainwashed hack.** The South has been shown to be one of the most tolerant countries out there, always avoiding escalation and responding to the North's aggression with calculated responses that are designed to prevent all-out war. Even with these missiles, the South has been keeping it's military on a leash for awhile and has probably saved millions of lives because of it.  
Such a detailed answer! Bravo, sir!  But can you explain compulsory voting a bit? 
My friend won a lawsuit agains't a city that wrongfully evicted his strip club. The city is appealing all the time and delaying as much as they can. He's at over 100k just in lawyer fees.  I'd rather focus on the positive things in my life, I've got a great business going :)
[deleted]
["He can't pull over any farther!"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=0PKtGnyGuKM#t=300s)
More endangered it is, rarer it is. Rarer it is, better it is for your penis. 
Hey, there are also fucked up Christian societies here too...
There's over a billion Muslims in the world.   Even an asshole like me (someone who enjoys munching the popcorn while watching the world fight over stupid shit) understands that the great majority of Muslims are perfectly cool, reasonable people. I've met plenty of you who are :)   Also, there's just a certain variety of people who will take any excuse to push other people around, they just get off on it.
So you think it's impossible for the US to try and pull something on the founder of wikileaks?
Actually, the high volume of sternly worded letters is exactly why they set the nuke off. No other way to dispose of so many letter than with a nuke.
Hmm. If you're not sure what I mean then I really doubt that a reddit comment is going to be enough to convince you or change your mind. Try reading the NYT and then comparing it to other papers, especially papers from other countries. Maybe you'll see what I mean.
you have no facts to back that up, period
No. It's not the Democrats/liberals. It's the business party. And it has been the business party for at least 30 years. [Whether the red faction or the blue faction currently "controls congress" or occupies the whitehouse is irrelevant.](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-2nzBwb5Cea4/T9KJYicYRFI/AAAAAAAARtU/ncNwyxEpAS0/s1600/march_of_tyranny.jpg)  You have to admire the cleverness of it. At any given point, half the country blames the other half, and at no point do they ever blame the people actually responsible.  The problem is the revolving door between government and industry and the wealth inequality.
Wow, that one is more active but way less disturbing than the darknet version on ReddiTor...
They spend it on everything, because petroleum production is 90% of the economy.
plus the tunguska one exploded at an altitude of 5–10 kilometres, so it should mean this one is even smaller
You're right. Dang rotation of the earth.
Those astroid names come straight out of an alien movie. 
This was N.Korea testing their missiles.
Another day. Another Russian dash cam video. I mean really... 
Yes, we should indeed encourage reporters and people who bring evidences that they gained on their own. But not those who steal the information unlawfully and expect to not be punished. 
Of course the sound travels slower than the light, so what you're hearing is the **sonic boom that occurred during the** entry event, **but it took several minutes longer to reach the ground**.
In Soviet Russia, idiots exist too! 
So more accurately it was a meteor procession. 
she's certainly going to enjoy that money
Not exactly −20°C (−4°F). I think it was −10°C (14°F) or most probably even −5°C (23°F) in the morning — look how this guy unzipped a little his jacket http://i.imgur.com/gKFiX1Kh.jpg. You get warm when you cycle, play soccer, run, etc. A few times in past I played outside when it was −15…−20°C, it was okay in good clothes.
?  That's irrelevant to the point, which is that it's remarkably stupid to hold drug companies responsible for this kind of thing.  Of course it's reasonable to expect them to list potential side effects but ALL medication has the possibility of being that one in a billion necrosis causing death machine for someone. It's absurd to expect a 60 million settlement from that. Saying 60 million is "far less" before interest isskirting the point you're replying to.  I am simply not up to the task of typing it all out but basically as "evil" as pharmaceuticals can often be and as much as the Reddit hive-mind hates them, in this case the verdict is absurd. It's not even their responsibility to pay the medical fees, although it would behoove them to show the grace to do so.  
I'm talking about a government insurer, like the sort of thing most Western European countries use to deliver healthcare. 
Russia doesn't have property insurance as industry (or it's grossly underdeveloped).      Instead - when meteor shower happens - Putin just cuts a check to everyone whose property got damaged.
[deleted]
wow thanks. I always wondered whether there was a term for that phenomenon.
When is he not?
Guess we should all be glad it's not the '70s anymore, ya?  Can you imagine the massive amount of asshat-ery that would've arisen from a GIANT FIREBALL exploding over cold war Russia?
It's that not everyone has access to Internet and if they do its very limited to email and things for work.   Source: I'm Cuban.
Of course, they want to force everyone to the table and extort them for aid.
don't believe me all you want - I know it first hand.
[deleted]
Here he is working on his credibility in a [presidential campaign ad](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oTyvTv4lsD4).
Well not *every* episode, and most of it was a middle aged Kim Cattrall boobs.
Along with your line of reasoning, I also have thought that the timing and catalyst that truly crippled the Union was also the worst for them. Gorbechav was still in the process of his reforms (and I don't know exactly how well they would have done, and the USSR wouldn't have been the same had he continued I know that much), and to my knowledge, today's "Russia" is essentially the RSFSR, just renamed...in the sense that there was no overturning of governance or "new" government, in American speak (not like parliament and forming new governments). This, along with corruption (like the rebranded KGB) may have been avoided, but who knows. Just some thoughts...
i neither said that i support this industy nor is it financed by a state. i just doubt that this is a useful investment.   i just think that there are much higher threats to our world/society with a far higher chance of havong serious effects on us. on top of that i just doubt that it makes sense to develop a anti-meteor system, while we not even know size / speed / shape / material of the possible threat. one parameter predicted incorrectly and the whole project is useless.
Won't somebody *please* think of the penguins?!
And in Latvia we still have experts talking about how harmful weed is for health :(
It's not stupid. Just because there were worse places doesn't mean McCarthyism, anti-civil rights, and other injustices didn't happen during the Cold War.  Most of the historic motive for immigration was economic, anyway. Political  refuge was a relatively minor cause, though political instability often lead to economic distress and fear for personal safety.
And we never heard from Gippeus again..
So youre saying "Where else do they have to fire from?" How about they dont fire any rockets at all?
In the comments : pretty soon Russia will be challanging France for the title of 'most culturally ireelevant and butt-hurt former global power'. good luck, Russia!  Lol
http://www.memritv.org/clip/en/3539.htm  Oh look, Hamas being happy about killing Israelis and kids. Just disproved you. Admit you are wrong now.  The Dahiya Doctrine is something that was done in Lebanon. When the entire south of Lebanon was a base for Hezbollah and rockets were being fired at Israeli cities, Israel simply retaliated at those same cities. It has nothing to do with anyone that died in Gaza.
I personally think it's the owners and how they raise their pets that determine the behavior and not that pit bulls are more aggressive or dangerous than other dogs.
With all due respect the US was well on its to to infringing freedoms long before the fall of the Soviet Union.
Ok, you've definitely seen hundreds of meteors in your life time, so have I, but you haven't seen more than a few like this if any. I would LOVE to see one like this.
you keep using "Europe" in your title, but don't imagine america is safe from this kind of trouble.  it's the whole food industry that is globally designed to harvest profit, not to make food.  and that's the core of the problem.
I want this guy to be bat shit crazy oh please let him be nuts….
What are the health risks of weed smoke and please provide some sources.
no, worded that poorly. it wasn't 1919, it was 1610
I know, but it still gives you a good feeling of being welcome. Much better than the looks some people give you here
[deleted]
Not every country pays it's teachers like shit.
As a resident of Guam this type of news always worries me. The military is deploying a lot more resources here. Making us a attractive military target. But I am not confident with how well defended the island is. There is no permanently stationed aircraft here. We only get planes rotated from other bases. I feel the military believes Guam's status as an American territory is enough to protect it.
No dash cams in Cuba... because no cars.
Someone call Bruce Willis.
Bruce Willis, we gonna need you
how can this be!!! islam is all about peace right?!? 
ok so south korea tactically cruise missiles some office windows. Game over.
most of the earth isn't countries
If they went off in the same direction then when the first one hit the other one would have passed us. We are in an orbit moving around a circle, we aren't where we were when that first meteor hit us. 
I'm in southern Ontario (Canada) and saw a shooting star coming down on a rather steep downward angle while driving around/approaching 12:30 AM (EST - Sat. February 16th to be clear.)  Not a common sight around here, especially in the city.  Nothing spectacular, but I thought I'd toss that out there.
As a European the collapse of the USSR is the best thing to ever happen to Europe. It is easy to desire an evil empire as a symbol when your continent doesn't have a giant wall through the middle of it.
'baseball/softball, squash, karate, sport climbing, wakeboarding, wushu and roller sports'  I literally have no idea what sport climbing or wushu are.
"This stuff is great! My mouth has never felt so clean."
But what point is it if the best players in the world can't get the gold?
Quiet, we're rehashing shitty tired 30 year old jokes in here.
Have you ever watched a wrestling match and paid attention? The rules are not complicated at all. There are points for take downs, escapes, etc.  If you watch more often, the rules will make perfect sense. It sounds like you are making an uninformed generalization of the entire sport.
Let me know when it's from an actual news source.
[deleted]
oh woe is me, the poor, poor pedophilic church suffering and embarrassed by their public perception, oh me oh my. 
[deleted]
They might have still had reason to be in the vehicle. Often the metal that's exposed when a door is open is considered the "outside" of the vehicle. Also, they may have needed to move the vehicle.
very thorough - up voted.
it was just a little joke
Here's the thing: apart from the pro's and con's of GM food, do yourself a favor. Stop using Monsanto in every comment.   You might not be a conspiracy nut who sees the hand of evil corporations behind everything but it sure makes you look like one.    
I think he forgot to write in sarcasm font
[deleted]
it is the guardian, we all know which side of the Gm/Frankenfoods debate they are on... edit: here in Europe, and probably most of the world we are allowed to debate the issue, and not believe gm is great because monsanto tells us so!
[deleted]
how are you even able to stand under the weight of your own bravery.
I learnt it from Neil de Grasse Tyson listening to Star Talk. Which is great by the way.  But it puts into perspective the amount of crap the earth hits.
/r/atheism is probably creaming itself without realizing most of them are being converted into mosques.
[deleted]
Don't forget the Franco-Prussian war
I have no idea why this is even being debated. It seems like common sense, and it pisses me off that it isn't already like this. 
Because Hezbollah "special forces" have been getting the shit kicked out of them in operations all across the country.  
Not always so: "On foreign soil, FBI special agents generally do not have authority to make arrests except in certain cases where, with the consent of the host country, Congress has granted the FBI extraterritorial jurisdiction."  Source: http://www.fbi.gov/about-us/faqs
Because GMOs are something we should embrace.  I'm going to trust the scientists. Sorry. Breeding and genetic modification have already made a huge difference in the world.
This is sad, i wanted to believe him.
[deleted]
You sure did you a lot of words to not answer my question again.
They're not synonymous questions.  If course people can change, I don't think you'll find many people that would dispute that.  The real question is that do you think that I, as a parent, have a right to know that you're a convicted child molester when picking babysitters.  My answer is 100% yes.
It's called "Labelling Theory." It's pretty well studied and documented phenomena. I personally don't agree do the idea of a criminal record. If you spend 6 years in prison for something, it should be over. You made a mistake and your debt paid. But with a criminal record, you will continue to have trouble finding work and getting assistance for the rest of your life.   If a criminal justice system doesn't provide for a way to fully pay for a deviance, then it often leads people to committing the same deviance again. It becomes a vicious cycle.  It's interesting, Australia's sex offender register is not public.  Very few people have access to it and you cannot discriminate based on it except for very specific jobs. 
Yeah that's what I assumed it was about. Stoner cops who wouldn't mind free bud and snowboarding a couple days a week!  Nah I haven't been, really want to go though. We don't get many pros in Verbier apart from [Swatch Xtreme Verbier](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hdghOGQZpXc) as part of the Freeride World Tour. It's pretty intense, they go down the face of the mountain that looks completely impossible and basically vertical, and they just straightline it doing 60ft cliff drops and shit. Met [Xavier de La Rue](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8xdl6HpLotE) last year, pretty inspirational guy. Fucking nutcase though [o_0](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_C_P2Nd0xwY)
welcome to reddit, where everyones an english teacher working in IT.
Classic SRS bullshit.   Get back to your echo chamber circlejerk.    
Nice story, however I'm finding difficulty on how to apply this idea to the Assange problem. 
Fine but you are in charge of going to Wal-Mart and buying the new Cat version.
For a second there, I thought we were talking about the US Congress.
Choudray is the UK's resident troll muslim extremist. He's a "rent-a-jihadi-media-figure" and nothing he says should be taken seriously  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p4mnUAWmROE
roid rage
Or you win, and then retire before you die.
It wasn't even super horrendous except for the romantic dialogue. That is the only reason I can't even try to rewatch the prequel trilogy.
[deleted]
I'd say he's right, actually.....  Certainly on the oil part; the other still requires proof that is lacking from the AGW crowd.
[deleted]
I've been a pope longer than that guy. I'll chalk that up as a win for me. 
You idiots are worse than the people you make fun of. You're like the newcomer kids on /b/.
[deleted]
I'd say a sport that is popular in Japan, New Zealand, Australia, South Africa, Argentina, is fairly worldy. Hell Kenya, Spain, and the US are developing incredible 7's sides.
I want to know what sort of damage this would have caused in a far more dense and populated city such as the middle of New York, just like all the movies show. 
While downvoting something with which you don't agree violates reddiquette, I'm not sure doing so demonstrates animosity towards free speech.  Free speech includes the right to disagree with things which you do not believe in.   And when people speak of the right to free speech, it is generally in reference to the extent to which the *government* may or may not infringe on it.   
Do you think atheism was a majority when these books were written?
&gt;beautiful arabic...  Ya, okay.
I remember this information was part of the wikileaks, the government has extensive information in regards to muslims for some reason...
This oil would go to South America, so it wouldn't have an effect on American gas prices.
&gt;*inciting violence*, which is not protected speech even in the west  It's still protected in the US until it reaches the level of "imminent lawless action". You could say rape is permissible all day long.
Did it stop crying?
Although this is true, and you haven't mentioned anything about it (for all I know you don't care either way or know about this), it's not really like their problems will all go away if they overthrew their government or something.  Let's look at the US and the Soviet Union during the cold war. One was a democracy (a republican democracy), and the other was a communist authoritarian regime. There was clearly a difference in standard of living and we liked to compare the two.  Now back to China. Which country is most similar to them in the entire world? Their next door neighbour India. India also happens to be a democracy. See where I'm going here? Although Chinese people are pissed off about alot of things their gov't does (like anyone from any country is with their own government), I don't think any Chinese folks are deluding themeslves into thinking that their government has been holding them back or something like that.  South Korea and Taiwan saw unprecedented turnarounds in their economies to world class ones before they had democracy. They didn't overthrow their dictatorships and see the magical transformation. That magical tranformation was independent.   I'd say if we want to see more freedoms there, then stability is perhaps the name of the game until they have a country where the majority of people are in the middle class rather than any kind of armed revolt.
Sorry but that's just not logical. There is no reason to assume that it's unsafe just because it was a different type of meat.  &gt;It absolutely would mean that it's a health hazard if the source and provenance of the meat (any kind of meat) is unknown. You can't possibly be arguing that improperly sourced meat is not a health hazard, can you?  No. You can't possibly be arguing that the source is unknown because you personally don't know it and that if you personally don't know it then it's automatically improperly sourced and automatically a health hazard.  For all we know the only thing wrong here was the fact they were mislabelling their meat. You can't assume that means anything else. If they were using illegitimately sourced horsed meat to save money, why not illegitimately sourced beef? Shouldn't that be cheaper than illegitimately sourced horse meat?
They're cults. Generally they isolate themselves completely, and use the welfare checks to subsidize polygamous families. Since polygamy is illegal, multiple wives live as if they're unwed mothers, and collect the cash.
[deleted]
[deleted]
There are biodegradable filters, unfortunately for mother earf, winstonsalem or phillip morris does not own the patent for them..... sooooooo fuck that.
I can sort out my own life just fine thanks. You. Don't. Know. Me. I made an effort to reach out to you to figure out why you feel the need to be disrespectful to people on an Internet forum, and you pushed me away. It's very immature of you, but I can't say I didn't try. You can lead a horse to water, yadda yadda  Growing up means realizing that you're a human being and other people are human beings too and learning to treat them as such. You've gotten this far, congratulations. Now take the next step and learn to be the person that you really want to be in your heart.  If you're not willing to talk about why you're so angry, please at least talk to a therapist. It's not healthy to let your irrational hatred of women consume you. Did something happen in your past that made you bitter? Was it a past lover? Maybe an important female figure in your life?
If a green party in China develops we can expect to see $2.99 stores. 
http://www.guardian.co.uk/lifeandstyle/wordofmouth/2012/jul/30/lizzie-armitstead-vegetarian-athletes-olympics-2012  You don't have to.
Dammit Russia, it's "We'll give him a fair trail and *then* execute him.".     I know the grammar can get muddy from English to Russian, but this should have been easy to figure out.
Unable to get it, in the macro-nutrient split you need, in an amount of food capable of being consumed realistically.  Again, soy has 3 times the fat of lean beef.  3 times.  The idea is low fat, high protein, high calories.  You can argue all you want.  Give me a diet that gets me 5,000 calories, 400+g proteins, only 750-100 of those calories from fat, and is all vegan.  Make that math work.  Then tell me how long per day I have to spend cooking it.
[deleted]
I weigh 250 pounds.  That's about 1.5g per pound of mass, which is about the standard for max-muscle growth.  Please do.  I'm getting the body I wanted to have, lifting the weight I wanted to lift, and eating the diet that helped me do it.  The same diet you can find on basically every body building forum on the internet.  The same diet that's gotten every body builder (that actually gets big) to where they wanted to be.   Show it to the whole world mr "meatard_hunter"  Every big guy in every gym in America will happily laugh at your vego-nonsense.  I think it's clear where your dumbfuck biases lay.  You can lick my carnivorous balls while you're at it too, make sure to put that in your museum. 
the kid was being anti Semitic
It's like climbing Mt. Everest. They knew it was a risk and were willing to take that risk knowing full well what the outcome could be. Even if you don't make it you get to die doing what you loved, enjoying the greatest gifts this planet has to offer. It was a good death, while too soon, in a way I envy them both. A Bard's tale should be written. 
I wish the Native Americans would have won and pushed Europe out of North America, the bad guys won in our case.
Sad thing is... that's the era of "wholesome values" so many people wats the US to return to..
[deleted]
Why can't you just be average girl with average hair color.  F all drugs.  Join a sport 
My SO works in a store that sells this shit, one guy came back after failing a drug test. It had showed up as Meth on the test.   I tried it a year or so ago and almost blacked out. I'm a seasoned smoker, but my heart started skipping and things started spinning. Never again, avoid this shit like the plague.
As a poor college student, I have a hard time believing you when you try to tell me meat is cheap.   
You are correct, all soldiers are conditioned to kill on command.
[deleted]
&gt;I've never run into a more sanctimonious group than the North American "progressive."  Yes, you have.  
the difference is, our industrial revolution occurred when the entire *world's* population was 2 billion people. China's *alone* is pushing 1.5 billion.
it was growing until collapse. Population was dropping real fast in the 90-s dues to economy being destroyed. now whn country is strong(er) again - it's actually beginning  to grow again.
Huh, I've never heard that one before. 
with a gun.
I think a lot of people are mildly lactose intolerant and blame their shits on something they ate; "must have been some bad meat" or "shouldn't have had that taco bell." I am lactose intolerant and taco bell doesn't bother me when I take lactase pills.
I read that as Border Chefs. Lol
The fuck?   How do they live on those salaries? Not that its not a lot of money, but for people with those credentials...
Actually, the guy in that video isn't gay. He is a boxer whose (homosexual) brother was beaten in that same centre, so he dressed up and went to the same place and then beat the crap out of that guy.
I think I saw this on Reddit like months ago
Could you give me an example of one of these groups? I'm still unclear on whether you mean "funded - giving resources to" or "founded - established'' Also, the quotation marks were used to express freedom fighter as a euphemism. Yes, the US govt funded Al-Qaeda and the Contra, but at a time when they were the lesser of two evils in foreign diplomacy, making them "freedom fighters" in the eyes of the government at that point, not terrorists.
Because you know ignoring it won't make it go away.
Gay people have the right to freely assemble and peacefully demonstrate, even if us having that right offends people like you.  &gt;You're hurting yourselves.  How do you know this is true? What is this opinion based on?
What. Pedophiles don't need parades, neither do gays. Neither do straights, neither does anybody. Parades are stupid.
I don't think you needed to write such a long post to say that this is scapegoating so they can force CISPA or at least make it seem less hostile to the citizens.
[deleted]
Yeah, cause every time you see a Target ad in the Sunday newspaper with some eight year old modeling pajamas, that kid has obviously been illegally employed or kidnapped. /s  Are you even attempting to be factually accurate?
You're all acting as if homosexuality has always been accepted in the US. Gays still can't marry in most states.
It's been more than ten years that we have been delivering freedom to them.  You'd think by now they would be overflowing with freedom and happiness.   All that money on the military invasion and occupation. All those dead bodies. All those orphans. All those wounded and suffering. All those left homeless.  For what exactly?  Just to get Bin Laden?
It looks like they did learn from the Schiphol diamond heist in 2005. Same kind of tactics. Also one of the biggest diamond heists ever. [Schiphol diamond heist](http://people.howstuffworks.com/five-largest-diamond-heists.htm#page=6)
You can't compare pedophilia to any other sexual orientation because it is a crime. And you can't be discriminated against for being one unless you have committed the act which makes you a criminal. And fantasizing doesn't mean you should speak out about it like it makes it okay. Fantasizing about murdering someone doesn't make it okay does it? Find Jesus you freak!
Whoops, I saw the 62kg not the 53kg.  Well... the upside is that gaining weight is fun... And muscle adds more mass then volume... and gives some force behind the bithslaps you can give out to people that tries to tell you how you should look.
Fun fact: The ancient Greeks used to think sleeping with a woman was feminine. It was manly to sleep with another dude. It was not uncommon for men to have male partners, along with their wives, because they thought it made them more macho.  edit: I changed certain words that made some statements absolute. I used a bit of hyperbole before editing. I didn't think this would get upvotes.
[deleted]
Same think in Brazil... Third word problems.
[deleted]
That's the problem with the democratic process, I guess. Pity.
Wasn't it just a month or so ago that they were talking about making peace with South Korea?  North Korea is silly Korea.
[deleted]
Fuck you stupid ass motherfuckers that think for one minute that the democratic party is behind legalization.  http://www.examiner.com/article/obama-drug-czar-we-will-go-after-marijuana-distributors-wash-and-colo-1
Is it possible that NK could mount an attack against the SK border without anyone else knowing?  I'm wondering if NK starts organizing for an invasion, what kind of preparation would SK and its allies have?  
What they should is create an artificial natural disaster in SK that gives the premise of an evacuation.  Then just nuke the shit out of NK.   
It's a good thing your imagination doesn't determine reality isn't it?
at the stores yes, not always at the restaurants.
South Korea might not want a "wat" with North Korea, but the Korean War is still ongoing.  There has never been peace.
But in this era, the idea that one nation state can be free from their neighbors is an outdated model.  The 'nation-state' may only exist on paper, but is wholly reliant on the world market. 
They must still construct additional pylons, though.
[deleted]
So why not a law against public lewdness instead of being against "gay propaganda"?
Islam is, as every other religion, allows for occasional upfuckery of your fellow man, but the main spiritual goal is nonviolence. Just like the rest of the abrahamic religions
If ever.  "Laws" in China are more like Powerpoint presentations than legally binding contracts. They denote the beginning of a process, not a final product. There are hundred of "laws" on the books against inefficient coal burning that go entirely unenforced, like fossils of unfinished policy and meetings that went no where.  In China, when policy makers meet, they are expected to produce a document or unified vision for the sake of face and looking productive. It does not mean there are any details, it does not mean there is agreement, it doesn't even mean it will be followed through. It's simply because every civil servant in China is graded, and releases like you see in the article are requirements for a satisfactory grade.  Here's to hoping that this leads to something real, but it's too early to tell. 
Also the bathroom door was open just the door to the toilette was locked.  Guess he doesn't like intruders taking dumps on his throne.
Yeah, still looking for them spice trails to India.
&gt; ~~ASCII~~ UTF-8  ftfy
The entire gene pool has been malnourished for generations. You're not going to change that with a protein shake and a sandwich.
&gt; Which might sound like a lot until you hear that the standard starting salary for a first-year associate out of law school (with decent grades) is $160k  That's only true of the biggest law firms in the biggest cities, and even then it's not actually true. It's closer to $145k--and only for firms with 700+ lawyers.  And only ~8% of new graduates even go to firms with at least 250+ lawyers. Salaries are considerably lower at smaller firms--pitifully low, in some cases.
I thought we had some bad ass teens that battle and defeated  50 navy SEALS, then turns out it is the other seals. 
Born in South Korea, This is not correct  "It is still technically at war with South Korea after a 1950-53 civil war ended in a mere truce."  This is correct. South Korea can NOT end this war. :(  "It is still technically at war with **USA** after a 1950-53 civil war ended in a mere truce."
&gt;but people seem unable to comprehend that someone can champion noble ideals while still being flawed. Case in point: ~~Gandhi.~~ Every human who ever lived.  Everyone is fucked up in one way or another. If you think this is untrue about someone, you've not discovered what is wrong with them yet.  Abraham Lincoln gave speeches about how non-whites could never be equal to whites. By our standards, he was a racist dick. Etcetc.    
is what lolitsaj said really true? Thats the only feasible reason I can see why China would continue to back NK and put up with their shit.  What other interests do they have in them?
if this was a movie, this is part where the crew have been replaced .....
Killed for what crime? 
I don't live in Canada nor am I a lawyer but I doubt he can track you down; even if he did I don't think he would successfully pursue legal action against you. Moreover, his aggressive emails suggest something else happened to the laptop while in his possession and because of that he's looking to get rid of it. I would not respond, because you definitely don't want to take it back if it is now damaged, and there's very little chance he will sue you.
&gt;You have to apply for legal aid, and they can deny people who are deemed capable of paying for their own lawyer.  Reminds me of my friend who applied for a school loan but was denied because her parents are middle class.  Although they refuse to pay for her tuition.
It's pretty trivial to figure out the cell phone company that issued a number based on the area code. That's why he was able to correctly figure out your original cell phone company, but not your current one.  Just yesterday, a Bell rep was here trying to sell us a new promotion. He left his cell phone number in case he changed his mind. As he's writing it down, I recognized the first 3 numbers as a Rogers cell phone because I had the same one. He was surprised that I spotted it. I found it hilarious because it wasn't a bell number :D  I know it's not the "area code", but the 3 digits that come right after the area code. Don't know what those are called.
Internet lawyer reporting for duty
[deleted]
Here's the video... http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MarPB8OS6U4  Pretty messed up.
&gt; It is a solid core multi panel door. The affidavit says so  Not the affidavit I'm reading. The word panel appears twice in the affidavit: "A panel or panels broke off". Please quote your source.  &gt; I have seen the diagrams of the bathroom, bedroom, and toilet room  Can you provide a source?   &gt; Wait, his prosthetics don't have any type of foot on them?  I wouldn't call that 'his foot', I would call it the foot on his prosthetic. Whatever terminology you use, he implies quite clearly that his prosthetic was inadequate to break the door down: "I put on my prosthetic legs, ran back to the bathroom and tried to kick the toilet door open. I think I must then have turned on the lights. I went back into the bedroom and grabbed my cricket bat to bash open the toilet door."   &gt; So, a bat won't work on a rich person's door.  So I'm confused - what is your theory for how the panels on the door got broken off? He mentions them in his affidavit, so I'm pretty confident the police will have found the broken panels. Your explanation is..?   I've also never seen a bathroom stall door that has lock on the *outside*. What is it for? Locking someone in the toilet? 
&gt; could have done a lot more damage but only poked around and basically did recon  I think the Chinese stealing intellectual property (as in designs, formulas, production procedures, etc - not movies and music) from companies smart enough not to outsource to them is _far more_ damaging than screwing up the flow of some natural gas or plumbing lines in a small locality.  Modern warfare is rarely about killing people, but rather indenturing them - it's always been about economics but recently governments have realized there is more profit in corporate warfare than there is in simply stealing land and whatever physical goods you can make off with - the long-term production capabilities are much better to control.
Before I continue my post, I'd like to make sure that everyone knows I'm the side of the rational minded, and am not emphasizing with the crazies. But. It's simple to see where the viewpoint stemmed from. North Korea is in simplest terms, a dictatorship. The US (as mentioned) in the article, is a legitimate offensive measure against a perceived utopia. They realize our hand is placed in that of the South Koreans, so the threat of immanent destruction on that population is basically a power play (which North Korea is prone to put forth). When push comes to shove, they will likely back down... but, they very well may not. Perhaps these threats are not empty vessels, but rather plays from a mad nation that is willing to wage its destruction in the pursuit of ideals. We unfortunately live in a time where political statements can amount to genocide.
What's your source on seals being pests? I can't find anything about it on the internet.
Well, this is worldnews, not "Today I Assumed something".  I'll admit talibans may have come from some mujahideen groups.  It seems the term mujahideen is very loose and one can argue that talibans were former mujahideens.  However, one thing is certain: Talibans didn't exist when the Soviet Union invaded Afghanistan, in 1979. Talibans only took power in 1996.  And not all mujahideens turned Taliban. For instance, Massoud, the famous mujahideen, fought the soviets and the talibans, and died doing so just before 9/11.  I don't know that much about all of that, so I might be wrong, you are welcome to correct me.  But I also know saying the talibans fought the soviet is wrong. And it was worth correcting as yes, this is totally different.   
Unless we annihilate their artillery first. We do have these things called ICBM's and stealth bombers. They'd never even see it coming.
What's that flare? See it? A green flare, coming from Mars, kind of a green mist behind it. It's getting closer. You see it, ISS? Come in, ISS! 
Because most people are unintelligent morons.  Once you realize that the world makes sense.   Think about it, most people in the world until recently were religious (aka superstitious to the max).  Thinking that you should get your morals from a guy who casts demons into pigs means human beings aren't all that bright generally speaking.  See here:  http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=matt.%208:30-35&amp;version=NIV
As [this French article from a jurist](http://lesactualitesdudroit.20minutes-blogs.fr/archive/2013/02/18/les-papas-maltraites-par-la-justice-c-est-du-n-importe-quoi.html) explains it, this cause is bullshit.    1. **The "activists" shouldn't have child custody anyway**: The first guy had shared custody, then abducted *twice* his kid (which lead to him loosing custody, obviously), threatened his wife, was violent against his step-father, refused to go to the tribunal or to meetings... After this "crane" event, a judge proposed to reopen the case but he REFUSED! This guy wants to force everybody to obey him! The second lost custody because his wife accused him of abuse and violences, I don't know more about the case, though.   2. **The law they want to pass wouldn't solve the problem, they'd give them more power over their families**: the problem is as follow 75+% of custody are decided by the parents, and in the end 80% of the kids stay primarily with their mother (they most often still see their fathers regularly). The law they want to pass would *force* impractical custody solutions, force people victim of violence through mediation (hello, manipulation) and in general not change anything about these stats.   It is normal that a parent abducting children and/or being violent loses custody, justice is there to best serve the kids, not the parents.   Note: yes, custody is heavily twisted but there's certainly three reasons for this: first, the woman is assumed to have to take the kids so she'll likely ask them, similarly men often don't ask for custody - in which case they don't get it - and finally the prime caregiver is most of the time the woman (women do 80% of house chores, including raising kids). Another problem, which isn't mentioned there is that a big part of allocation are never paid or never fully paid, which means that the custodian parent has to deal with less money (money is most often the reason for custodian battles) and difficulties to get it. 
No one cares about Britain. Feeble barbaric colonial relic of the 18th and 19th century can slowly drift away to obscurity and oblivion once again please.
This is fucked. Seriously just send some group to assassinate dear leader and end this shit. Say it was some african country too far away and not affiliated with the US or South Korea. What are they gonna do? nuke them? There would be people in high power there that actually want thier country to not be a complete shithole and will actually allow progression.
Anger and fear is the best way to get people to give away their freedoms.
Angry young men will always be angry young men. I don't like everything Obama has done (or not done) but if you don't think there was real change when he took office, you have an incredibly short memory.  E: It is needed to hold his feet to the fire. So go about your business.
They will never win, however by voting for them other parties see that people care about such things and might incorporate some of their policies to win voters over
I wonder, is there something you would like to see the executive advocate for?  Breaking up the banks?  Ending US sanctioned torture and closing black sites?  Taxing CO2 or blocking Keystone XL?  Coming out for a global CO2 treaty with teeth?  Perhaps a national jobs program?  Free college?  Talk is cheap, my only demands are that the president advocate for good policy in an attempt to win popular support and sign popular legislation.  Not only has Obama not championed any of these issues, he has obstructed climate talks, stocked his cabinet with wall street blue bloods, continued the Bush tax cuts into his second term, continued operating black sites while presided over this so-called "war on terror", continued to prosecute the drug war and use federal resources to interfere with the wishes of states regarding weed, and failed to advocate for any meaningful stimulus outside of tax cuts for the wealthy and temporary unemployment extension.  You are correct that he has never staked out very bold territory in his speeches, always falling well short of advocating for the sort of policies this country and world desperately need.  But it is also the case that he has fallen short of even his milquetoast promises in the campaign.  But shit, you are saying cut the dude some slack, I'm saying why the fuck would you cut the dude any slack on reddit, advocate for good policy.
[deleted]
I concur.
Down votes aren't important. But it is interesting to see people get staggered by a shot in the face form the truth punch. Even in ancient days, Afghanistan was splintered through and through.
Still though, 80% of the population? Why doesn't the club scene look like a herd of cows then? Because only the 20% are the ones going to the clubs? For some reason I doubt that, it's not exactly a sustainable business model if that were the case.
This is not world news, this is an old man delivering a joke slightly awkwardly.
YES THEY DESERVE TO DIE AND I HOPE THEY BURN IN HELL!
Lol yeah America totally counts as civilized country.
[deleted]
Yes, he pretty much is. Definitely amazing that he is mayor and says a lot about the political intelligence of Torontonians. IE: they don't have any and that's why they keep bending over and politicians keep sticking it to Toronto. Even I got fed up an fled. Fuck Toronto. Canada's biggest city and it really is a piece of shit on so many levels that frequently outweigh whatever good stuff it has...which is a noticeable smaller an smaller portion of it with every passing year.  Toronto is like Canada's New York. Most of the people there aren't from there and aren't really invested in it. So, that shows after decades of use and abuse.
Newspapers are always mentioning relevant facts.  The kids were all male, so it's a possibly relevant fact.  Of course they were human, they said this too (they called them "kids", right?  It's obvious they're talking about young humans and not goats).  Besides, when was the last time you heard of girls doing stuff like this?  It pretty much never happens.
Dumb remarks deserve dumb responses.
Wow, thats not an editorialized title. I don't care that you didn't change the title from its original one, please dont post stupid editorialized things
i find that hard to believe. I know for a fact China has its own homophobic tradition completely free from abrahamism 
[deleted]
http://youtu.be/aCHzCFIlKrQ
Even if you get a missile in front of a massive object moving 10+km/s the chances of doing much to it with conventional explosives are very small.  The estimates I've seen lately put the Russian event at 10,000 tons moving at around 20 m/s. This was small for a destructive event.  SDI systems are designed to intercept fragile vehicles moving up to 7 or 8 m/s with only a few tons of mass. The differences between intercepting a missile and a threatening meteor are kind of like the differences between stopping a thrown ping pong ball vs a bowling ball fired out of a cannon. One is pretty strait forward and easy, the other not so much.   Even if you break the bowling ball up you've just sent shrapnel flying all over. If the bowling ball were a nuclear bomb, sure, that's great. It's not going to detonate now but if all of it's damage was going to be coming as a product of mass and speed you really haven't done much about that. You've just scattered lower levels of damage over a larger area. Still the same amount of mass with about the same speed, just scattered.  The reality is that if you want to do something about an object that poses a real threat to humans on the ground you need to know about it well in advance, on the scale of years.  They can talk all they want but it doesn't mean the things they say are meaningful or much more than wishful thinking. You might be able to intercept a destructive object in the atmosphere but you're really not going to have the capacity to do much to it once you do. There's too much energy that has to be dealt with.
Public =/= Government. 
In other news, insurance fraudster rammed by bus. 
So you accept my point?
Very good.  If you roll people, animals, and robots into the same group, someone is getting marginalized.  The forms are too extensive to be governed by a single definition.
Funny that they talk more about the adoptive mother's lesbianism rather than the problems with her divorce.  Because divorce and conflict in a relationship could never harm a child, right?
[deleted]
Don't worry, the tax is on every medium you can buy in germany. Hdd flashdrives, dvds, cds everything. Germans are known to be thorough.
So people who live in Germany can't see a video of a meteor that fell in their very own earth until some people see some cash? What the fuck man...
Aaaand probably only once. 
That doesn't mean we should slaughter everyone in the Vatican, as the OP of that comment was implying.
[deleted]
&gt; Modeling moral recognition on proximity to humanity is an absurd position that can have grave consequences.  We already do this, if you eat any kind of meat you're already a hypocrite.
actually RCMP said they don't give a fuck if you download shit off the internet
[deleted]
Huh, today I learned.
Fuck-goof is another.
The government should just declare that day as a Public Holiday.
[deleted]
Remember... *she's the smart one* &gt;.&gt;
Pre op or post op? 
[deleted]
Follow the rules and nothing will happen to you. 
This is true and very important. GEMA likes to act as if they're helping small relatively unknown artists to retain a little income, while they actually don't do shit for them. Direct distribution over things like bandcamp or even giving away an album digitally for free to raise interest has been proven so much more effective.
I wondered why my phone hadn't rang today.
I see it as an invitation to do what they assume I'll do.
Dubai, the desert's golden shit-hole!
What a hero 
I dunno about you, but running water is pretty nice too.
Nigerians are hated all over africa, part of it is age old ethnic bias and part is a clear confirmation bias that makes them easy to hate.      This is an [interesting piece](http://saharareporters.com/article/why-does-black-world-hate-nigerians)      &gt;Most Africans I have come to know or communicated with are suspicious of, and love to hate Nigerians. I don’t mean this at the individual level. I am speaking in the collective or general terms. In most places I go, I hear the Congolese, Togolese, Sierra Leoneans, Liberians and South Africans and others speak ill of Nigerians. Nigerians are “too aggressive,” “too dishonest,” “love to show off their wealth,” “they take our girls,” and are “always loud.”      more info; http://www.beyondintractability.org/casestudy/irobi-ethnic
Nope. He disliked Islam and all other religions. Also being an Islamophobe doesn't mean that you are a zionist
Me not buying something fixes nothing because there will always be a person like you.  You have no idea what I do with my money.  Laws are made for the lowest common denominator?  Okay there Mr. Ubermensch.  Go rape and kill then.  No one has the right to tell you what you can and can't do.  Pardon me if us lower common denominator types resort to a law to try and stop you.
[deleted]
Yes, that's the solution China. Well done. Any more clever ideas?
I like his frank and hard stand, I can't support walking out of a debate.  If you don't talk to people how are you going to change their mind? If you're not going to talk to people, you're going to have to do something else. And what will that 'something else' be?  You should be free to vehemently disagree with a position, there's not a single problem with that, but when you stop talking, what are you going to do next?
[deleted]
I like the way think,  i am curious, how would a company fare in the States if it setout to operate all in spanish?   edit: This is my most ansewred question, all interesting.  
India has put a lot of budget into the ISRO since 2010. Not just that but a lot of funding into research projects, national and overseas as well. 
You haven't shown any facts yet?
There's a massive difference between you and the banks. You just collect rent. Banks pay the cost of the home, then collect a ton of interest with very little principal for years, then evict you if you fall behind, then auction off the home for a massive discount so they can take advantage of the the tax benefits of their "loss", then will come after you to pay off the balance of the principal while preventing you from finding a place to live.  Never feel sorry for a bank.
That's not the point. The point is that all of a sudden we have a slight chance of actually halting climate change. Before this there seemed to be no chance at all.
But remember folks, the EPA infringes our constitutional rights and violates our precious bodily fluids and should be disbanded.
Except anglophones are not a minority...  Also if you truly believe that   &gt;its the most obvious and worst form of oppression that is felt in a open, free and democratic society.   You're fucking ignorant.
Where does it say they have to submit to Islam? That verse is just a fancy way of saying non-Muslims in an Islamic state must pay the state tax or face punishment. If you don't want to, GTFO. If you live in any country in the world today and don't pay state taxes, you will be punished, you will go to jail. "Jail" thousands of years ago was a bit different, but the concept is the same. That verse only required non-Muslims to pay the tax in an Islamic state. In many countries today everyone is required to pay the tax regardless of your religion.   Your second verse is not even from the Quran.  I'm not going to waste my time trying to educate an idiot. Research for yourself and have a good day. 
They won't be eating burgers furlong now because this scandal will really stirrup mistrust in ground meat products. Dinners will be lame, but chefs can harness creativity with other dishes and creative horse d'oeuvres.
Those darn Amish Tea Partiers are at it again!
Model of co-existence, except if they say something you don't like?  I obviously don't like bigots, but I have issues with limiting their right to speech unless it crosses into harassment.  
Yes, it will [ from a Bulgarian ] !  
I thought NK said the same thing.
I never referred to all Muslims, only the ones fighting the 'clash of civilizations'.  Are you insinuating that all Muslims are fighting the west?  Don't be so daft.  It should go without saying that not all Muslims go around blowing people up - I shouldn't need to remind you of that.
Thank you for that.  Left me smiling for the rest of the day.
And even then there will be some liberal bleeding heart pussy arguing *but he's a human being too, he deserves some basic level of respect blah blah blah* Sickening. I say if you're guilty beyond reasonable doubt, the state should go all out in your execution. I have no idea how some people of Reddit can defend scum like this. 
Actually, everyone that does start to eat less meat makes a big difference. At least in the U.S. meat consumption has been declining since 2004, which means each year less and less animals are subjected to miserable conditions, which is a good thing.
They are at war with a stateless organization.  That's why drone's are pretty much the only way to fight this war. 
You're talking about Israel's maronite allies. You're right, it was pretty disgusting that they helped them, but no side in Lebanon's civil war (including the PLO, who Israel was fighting) can claim to be any better. 
if you wish to know a person look at their enemies 
Though this prank was in bad taste, I can't help but feel the same thing I always feel about Windsor. Its filled with whiners. 
It comes from the fact that the french population, while being the majority, was mostly put in a subordinate position to the english.  With the help of the catholic church that found it in their interest as well.  All the while anglo canadian government tried to assimilate the french and disapear it.  So a few centuries later the french woke the fuck up, left the church and said we are french and there is no shame in it.  So in order to stop the assimilation we voted for strong language laws, making sure that immigrants would learn to speak the majority's language; French.   Why in the private establishment?  because for a long time all worthwile establishements were owned by the english, you could not buy in french department stores or be in any good paying job unless you spoke english.  Today we make sure that we can be served, and work in english.  I m pretty sure there are US places where people are getting nervous about how much space spanish is taking.
Rage quit?
[deleted]
If no system is perfect, you HAVE accept that innocents will be murdered eventually, and you're okay with that?  That innocent person could be you one day.
It looks like we largely agree.   I was a total dick while arguing too. That first guy just rubbed me the wrong way with the racism. My bad.
It shows that the Bible is a vile and disgusting book and anybody who demands we follow it is a vile and disgusting person.
You always control what you're paying for - don't be naive. Of course they gonna tell ya: "we're nice fluffy guys - we're paying for it - but we don't control the content":) By the same logic - RT is also autonomous - and Russia also doesn't control the content.
From what I've seen, they can just switch back-and-forth and do so regularly. That may be mostly Apache footage, but I assume the same applies here. But I could be wrong.
When it comes down to one man like that it means the person who gave the order has assessed the situation and decided today is a good day to kill themselves, their families, and the rest of humanity. If they had been standing in the same room with the button we wouldn't be having this conversation. They would have just hit it.  It reportedly happened a few times on both sides that the grunt manning the big button decided to disobey orders. There are clearly people willing to do it so we lucked out. 
[deleted]
I only know about Tromso and soccer because the first time I played Football Manager it was the only place that would offer me job.
My 8 year old cousin went to school with purple hair and nobody gave a shit.
So someone filed a police report against Sherry Rehman for something she said in 2010....... aaaand the craftsman of a reporter turns it into a blockbuster.  Bingo.
My Mom did that to me. I needed a new TV, and I told my mom about it. She said with a straight face that Christmas would be extra lame and I wouldn't get much of anything that year.    Then she wrapped up the remote in a small box and brought the TV out after I opened it.
Oh it's you, can't believe I missed that. Never mind then, you don't know squat about whaling or the IWC.
[deleted]
-1 Stability 
Too bad they called off the dog.
the temperatures generally don't seem that cold, sub zero C isn't as cold as sub zero F. 
Why is this a big deal? How is this world news? Figures pussy candians. 
Real-life trolls!
Look how many expensive failures it took to get there!
it is like explaining the color blue to a blind person. come to china, and you will laugh at yourself. i am not being insulting this time. I don't care to argue or waste time with googling a billion sources. I just know from living here, meeting govt officials your view is ignorant(honestly no offense anymore, because my views were even more silly before i visited this place).  if you are really interested. go to r/china and ask them for their opinion. that is where expats, and chinese chat often. see your response there.   good luck, and honestly your view would change if you ever visited this country. 
Lol, I think you're the one who's committing the fallacy here. Let's turn this around: A single cell is a human being, therefore I commit genocide whenever I scratch myself.
Well doesn't that sound sinister.
You should. If we don't be careful it is so easy to destroy the nature at this point, but there is no reason to become pessimistic about the population growth yet. If we can decrease mortality rate in African countries, it is likely that the population growth will be stabilized there. 
read my edit. It saddens me to see your expectations for discourse being so low as to misinterpret my post as a counterargument.
[deleted]
&gt;tchens mops the floor with him. My favourite part is when Galloway claims that Americans are responsible for 9/11  This is also commonly seen on reddit. 
Sounds like a declaration disguised as speculation. It's a pretty safe bet that some of them *are*. These are the "Money Changers in the Temple" aren't they?
I don't know why these idiots even still have a voice.  I've watched the show a few times and everything, EVERYTHING, they do is dangerous.  It's dangerous to crews on both parties and let's not forget to mention that their efforts while minimally effective are more dangerous ecologically.   They're burning thousands upon thousands gallons of fuel to throw a nylon rope at a propeller or to throw stinkbombs at a boat.  They are barely seaworthy as passengers let alone as seamen.
[deleted]
Is there actually any fact to that? Are Canadian teachers paid less than Canadian janitors?  http://taxpayer.com/ontario/ontario%E2%80%99s-teacher-pay-freeze-doesn%E2%80%99t-go-nearly-far-enough  http://www.fin.gov.on.ca/en/reformcommission/chapters/report.pdf  From that report, half of them earn $95k+, and I kind of doubt that janitors earn more than that.  Go back to /r/politics with your worthless jargon, please.
As usual, it's a matter of degree.   Chinese would be overjoyed to need to worry about environmental impact of their road surfaces, they have far more pressing environmental threats to consider. 
As much as this is a horrible thing, I'm glad to see it actually coming out in an official way. It appears that China is taking the way that the world looks at them a bit more seriously.  Also, I watched Rush Hour 3 last night (the one where they're in France).
They are razing people's houses anyways. They are trying to expand everything and getting everyone to live in condos. They are having a huge housing issue so they raze small houses and build giant skyscrapers in their place. I was back there in august heard the housing prices in Beijing was something like 500usd per square foot. It was given in rmb and per square meter but converts to that 500 dollar number. 
A) It's not piracy B) Noone on the planet (excluding the Sea Shepherds or Greenpeace, but that's a seperate argument) is willing to enforce these laws. Which is better, having noone stopping violent poachers or having people who are a bit overzealous?   Even If I thought the Sea Shepherd Folks WERE overzealous, I know for sure I'd still pick the second option.
Things die, that's the way of life. One day even we will die despite all our best efforts.
Road Traffic Accident.
Al Jazeera or RussiaToday preferably! Nothing says credible like state run media!
&gt; I don't believe that there is some guy  By definition you're an atheist, you just ignore that agnosticism and atheism deal with completely different things.
[deleted]
Can you recommend some good naval blogs? I've always been fascinated with that stuff. Hopefully some that try and stay a little neutral, but if you can offer some from both sides that'd be great.
[deleted]
I've seen photos of protesters showing spent cans to the camera with the "Made in USA" visible.  Just "winning the hearts and minds"?  Or we have our foreign policy heads up our butts?
It's not that mixed use zoning doesn't exist or isn't growing as a market share. It's that many (most?) people don't want it. It doesn't suit their needs well. Sure, it's currently viewed as more efficient than how we most commonly do things now, but that's exactly what the modernists argued when they advocated for what we have now.  Living in mixed used apartments and condos works well for young professionals, as a first residence, and people who don't require space to put their stuff. Families don't fit anywhere near as well, especially large families.  I've also seen a great many mixed use developments fail. Mostly because they require an ecology to function, one that doesn't exist in most regions of the United States. The benefit of mixed use is the closeness of commercial and residential, no? The problem is if the commercial use doesn't cater to the needs of the resident then there is no gain relative to having separate zones of commercial and residential, since everyone STILL has to travel to a distant location to do their food shopping, attend to their medical needs, and do all those various things that convenience stores do. The problem is that the owners of this space need to turn a profit, and those residents don't fit into the pattern of development that the people building these developments need to get the funding required to build the things in the first place.  In the end, most of this comes down to transit. It's not that we need to get rid of cars, it's that we need to have something in addition to cars. Cars were promoted as a way to free an individual from the tyranny of public transit where you can't control where you go or when, but rather hitch a ride. But the failure of other options to keep up with the car now leads to a situation where the choices are to take a car or not go. That's not any better.  I would hate to see America make that transition. It would mean that we have failed to design a solution that really works and instead forced our people into a pattern of development that they really don't like because it is marginally better than what they had previously. We don't need to be like Europe. We don't need to force folks into cities. We need a solution that builds off what already exists, instead of abandoning seventy years of work to start all over again.
I brought up the numbers because the person I was responding to claimed that the Whaling was leading to extinction. That is not the case.   It is important to be honest and data driven in policy discussions, or we will devolve into some sort of tea party-esque echo chamber.   Like I said, I think Whaling is pointless and cruel, but at low levels it is not much of an environmental hazard. 
It sure looks like they're throwing a lot of charges at him in hopes that at least some of them will stick.
Yeah, I'm not too sure about the legitimacy of this press release until something more reputable than a press release site that would probably release just about anything submitted to them covers this.
I'm glad that China is finally reaping what they've sown. They let their people multiply like bacteria so they can fill manufacturing plants full of cheap labor. The corporations that set up the plants make huge amounts of money off the slave labor while dumping all the waste back into China's ecology. The country of China makes huge amounts of money off this process so they have no incentive to put an end to it.  Hopefully this will drop their population to a manageable number and they will stop killing themselves to make the rich richer.
Like occupy Wall Street, the tea party, many other meaningless groups? Buhahaha
No, the son was targeted 2 weeks after father was blown up. The son was targeted specifically and separately.   http://www.huffingtonpost.com/mobileweb/2012/10/24/robert-gibbs-anwar-al-awlaki_n_2012438.html
oh please oh please oh please
What recent war has been beneficial to anyone other than Congress?
Because Muslim clerics and rabbis are not disproportionally closeted gay men who need an excuse for declining to 'go forth and multiplying' while telling everyone else its their duty to do it.
Then why do you think an exiled ex-CCP member Wei Jing Sheng believes such dumb concept?
Well economically, socially they are 40-50 year behind due to colonialism, wars etc. 50-60 years ago most developed countries were on World wars killing hundreds of millions of people. 
[deleted]
It really is though, because its a group of people selected to be as unbias as possible, not a group of people with shady connections with groups of people   who benefit in some way from the direction of our foreign policy.   Not that it really matters, because having evidence provided from both parties is a really big piece of it also.  Well, you're not concerned because you trust in them regardless of the amount of innocent people they kill, probably because you don't have the responsibility of telling the families of those people why they were killed for no reason. 
Well actually the reformation was started by Martin Luther in Germany.
It's like a blast from past.
Pope nope's on grope dope.
Source?
I recall seeing dozens of replies from UK residents when the USA lost their AAA rating. I seem to recall there being plenty of trash talking. Where are those douche bags now? Show yourselves.
when exactly did he reduce taxes for the rich? they're obscenely high already (which is why no one bothers paying them)
I'd be more worried about a nuke then a mortar.
Is this even news anymore?
Ha! 
The fuck does that have to do with NK?  Nothing. 
Between that shit, this shit, and the people acting like NK has weaponized nuclear technology *and getting upvoted for it*...holy shit this place is overrun with fools.
I obviously don't get to decide which countries join the war...  But I would guess the war would start (unfortunately) with NK brazenly killing many residents of Seoul, and the international reaction would be instantly mobilizing for war.  I doubt the UN would ever officially approve the war, but I wouldn't be surprised if nearly all of the big names were represented (except China)  'Course thats just the opinion of some dude who spends too much time on the internet
You talk about accidents like an abstract thing that *should* be rare, but the BP oil spill wasn't supposed to happen, Exxon Valdez wasn't supposed to happen.  They want to start fracking in my area.  I am on a well and nowhere near a town water source.  I have a family with 2 small kids.  We have a large garden which provides a lot of food for us that I can for the entire year.  This isn't just groundwater contamination that *might* happen.  This is our lives.  These companies don't give a shit about whether or not they poison my family or my property.  It's easier for them to fuck up and pay a settlement which my family might not see for decades while we have zero usable water.  It's not so abstract when it's in your backyard.
Why do people continue to treat this as a joke? Sure it's likely NK is making these threats to get more aid or sanctions dropped, but, they are on the cusp of a long range nuclear missle. You don't fuck with that especially with a country and leadership as crazy as NK.
[deleted]
I've heard both ways, Ireland is pretty deep in the shit at the moment.
China has already invested tens of billions into the Canadian oilsands. They've already secured their oil sources.
bully the *UN, and it works because the UN is run by pussies who avoid conflict at all costs which mean's they wont do shit to North Korea, or Syria, or any one else doing horrible things
In your last sentence are you implying insane people aren't capable of intelligence. You can be socially insane but still capable of engineering nuclear weapons. Sociopaths become CEOs and politicians all the time.
End of North Korea, son.
Oh, in that case the blame is also mine. Apologises also.
I'm sure we all hope they're as dumb as their promotional propaganda videos, but in reality they probably understand that US could just bomb the supply lines. To avoid such a pathetic defeat, they probably have lots and lots of hidden underground warehouses and bunkers, so taking them out won't be a quick job.
Well I stand corrected. Also by the way, you can get a one way for $1.50,  not $18. But these buses are small, have no wi-fi, no electricity, 
Arab refers to people who speak an Arabic language. Arab halogroup J1 can be found in massive numbers in Balkans, Anatolia, Caucasus and Iranian plateau. Yet they aren't considered Arabic, because they don't speak the language. However J1 is to be scarcely found in North Africa, yet they are considered as Arabs (ethnically Arabs, as they introduced themselves before Osama fucked up their reputation for typical westerners).  
Look up Nevio Cristante. The guy has a whole book on the subject.   Dude never really shuts up about it. 
So... given that A) an asshole foreign country planned and launched attacks in your country killing thousands of innocents B) your govt couldn't do anything about it and C) you were probably uneducated and lied to that it was a conspiracy theory/inside job and believe the evil empire was using it as an excuse for imperialism  you would   1) want another country to help 2) fight back also  I'm failing to see how C) relates to 1) or 2).  Wouldn't the belief in C) shift your attention? Or isn't it negligible? Sorry, curious.
It may be hard for you to believe, but bankers have their uses too. 
I think you're overestimating the complexity of fission bombs. AFAIK, every nuclear power has gotten it right on the first try, and as the Manhattan project itself proved, even a device that is crude by modern standards is a viable weapon. On top of this, if North Korea was insane enough to use a bomb, they'd probably go for an unconventional delivery system (read as: drive a truck into Seoul).  With a simple fission device, the only real problem to overcome is pre-ignition. If you don't smash the plutonium together fast enough, the device will blow itself apart before enough fission takes place to generate the full yield.  The best solution is a sphere of shaped charges. While in 1940 that was somewhat novel, in today's world it's a common technology (even insurgent groups with limited resources are able to use shaped charges to create precise explosively formed projectiles).  From what I understand, the big jumps in complexity are getting to a thermonuclear device and optimizing the design for different shapes (egg shapes are good for missiles).  As far as thermonuclear devices go, that's really where the open sources of information end. But the basic mechanism at this point is well known: photons from the primary are used to vaporize a heavy casing around the secondary. As the outer layers of the casing blast away, the reaction force crushes the casing inward with tremendous speed and force, creating enough pressure to cause fusion of the secondary fuel.  The complexity comes in precisely controlling the timing of the different physical processes going on, ensuring that the casing is heated evenly and at the same instant. Since the photons are moving at the speed of light this is a much more difficult problem than shaped charge implosion. Apparently it requires some novel material science tricks to accomplish.  You can test explosive implosion devices by smashing lead spheres all day if you want. So it's cheap and easy to refine a fission bomb design. But there's really nothing else that produces the same intense blast of photons the primary in an h bomb generates. You could use a supercomputer to simulate the physics, but to write the software you'd likely need such a precise understanding of how the primary behaves *after* it reaches criticality and how the materials and construction of the secondary react that you're forced back into blowing something up somewhere.  This, aside from the political aspects, is why nations do nuclear tests. It gets them data.  Unless this is pure political theater, the North Korean testing suggests they've already mastered basic fission devices and are now working on thermonuclear designs. It seems entirely plausible that Iran is part of the collaboration since they'd like the same data without doing tests locally that would provoke an Israeli strike.  Sources: reading fas.org a ton years ago.
Its funny how 10 years ago the  U.S. was so concerned about evil dictators in Iraq and their possible weapons of mass destruction. In N. Korea there is absolute proof of nuclear weapons and absolute oppressive and violent regime mistreating its people, yet we don't invade we use trade sanctions. Which is smart and we are doing much more than any other country but still it just seems a little hypocritical.  
&gt;was financed by private companies.  So, fuck the Army Core of Engineers right? You really need to brush up on your history before opening your mouth. 
Having a preference for a certain language makes a person stupid?   I would have no issues with english becoming the official EU language, but I can definitely see why people would. 
Oh, okay. You don't have to sell me on it. It looks nice, but it's not even close to being a deployable system at the moment.
this is heartbreaking because this is not new news...
Speak for yourself.  I wouldn't support that war at all.  It's not the job for the US to "liberate" a nuclear-armed country that is essentially holding south korea as a hostage.    Does it feel bad to learn about the prison camps and torture?  Yes absolutely, but it doesn't justify starting a war.  I felt bad after 9/11 and got all riled up about war/invasion/liberation like everyone else at the time, and I'll never do it again.  The US has been in a perpetual state of war for the past 100 years, it has to stop.  Human beings can be cruel, selfish, disgusting vicious animals.  No amount of liberation is going to stop that.
Holy shit you're right
I'd rat him out. Think of the cool shit I'd buy with that money... In that country! I'd fund an entire education through to pHD on that money, or learn cs. Totally worth it. Fuck that guy. 
I hate the US's foreign policy, but I'd say this was the one just war they could fight right now. (If it were feasible from a military standpoint, without all that nuke and China shit.)
how do they know about the holocaust???? 
Augustus Caesar 16
That is correct, if you capture in a closed system, but this requires energy which reduces the efficiency of the process and you are still left with a pollutant in some form. Either as a liquid or compressed gas.
Given Afghanistan was barely a functioning country before, the fact this is a scandal is quite promising. That's already better than a lot of other governments. Unless this is a guilt trip for the west
The religion of peace is at it again
Did you read the article? They have been out of the camps for years. They have had plenty of time to learn about the outside world.
good
I agree on the stupid part, but if you start forcing people not to do it things are going to get a bit uncomfortable.
...orrrrrrrrrrr they just have a zero tolerance policy for jackasses dancing in underwear using national historical landmarks / burial grounds as backdrops for their ass-hattery, and want to make an example of them...
So you're all for people having fun, just as long as it's *your* kind of fun.    You must be such a charming person.
Fun police 
Hi there, I'm the photographer of this story. Can you give a source for that? Moldova is the poorest country in Europe but most of Moldova's heavy industry is in Transnistria, and (as of 2004) it supplied Moldova with 90% of its electricity supply (source: Tony Judt, Postwar).  
A states right to do whatever it wants. The issue isn't important, the same war would have been fought if the issue was different. All that mattered was not letting the nation split in half.
Whelp that's one cafe I can't visit often :(  *Being allergic to cats sucks*
They should ban children with sticky fingers 
He is what is wrong with lots of countries
outlaw this http://i.imgur.com/poBT88j.jpg
It's going to smell horrible 
[deleted]
Can someone explain what these images portray since im to much of a chicken to press the link
I guess it tells you that they support scientific findings which are backed by plenty of evidence.
Faithists killing faithists because some atheists committed blasphemy?   Not dealing with geniuses here are we? 
what about those words were violent?
Where I live in the US, Coke from a grocery store is about the same price as gas, if not slightly cheaper. At a gas station, Coke is significantly more expensive.
Why can't North Korea issue threats without sounding ridiculous? 
Goddammit Imgur, work!
How did Coke's lawsuit against Michigan go back in '76?
[deleted]
How progressive of them...
[deleted]
Turns out they wanted to find the source of a leak on a member of the chinese leadership's corruption trial. They were targeting the author of the story's email accounts.
Buy phentermine Adipex online and give yourself the unique experience of the genuine drug. If you are cautious about selecting your Phentermine Adipex dealer you will experience long term benefits through your medicinal orders. 
the fact is ability doesn't matter at all because presidents are basically a a face, they don't have any real power they are all puppets of the old rich white men that run the world
[deleted]
Good plan...  'A' for effort!
Iceland: Where no one asks why was the child unsupervised such that they had the time and the means to search for porn in the first place. 
Mail is no longer on my property either.
"Would you rather fight 100 duck-sized horses or 1 horse-sized duck?"   "I already fought 100 man-sized pigs and won, so..." 
Nope, if you see the edit above and the link to a Separate article this still fits nicely within plate tectonics.
It's sad that you can't trust police to do the right thing, so we have to **force** them to do the right thing - by having a password.  Nothing has changed - it's still my phone and you're not going search it - except now I have to have the inconvenience of a password.  Do I really have to have a password to force you to do the right thing? Can't you just do the right thing on your own?
[deleted]
Yeah, I saw "microcontinent" and thought the same thing.  "No, that's not a rock jutting out of the ocean, it's a nanocontinent!  And that stick poking up?  Picocontinent!  That shit running down my leg?  Well, I'm incontinent!"
[Pew pew pew](http://i.imgur.com/rfqtqnm.jpg)
We could, but I can't see any politician, especally in the current climate, actually anouncing that they're going to give rapists and paedophiles a more pleasant experience in jail and focus on reintegrating them into the community.  Can you even begin to imagine the Dail Mail headlines if they [suggested a prison system similar to this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C4beUC3-ckw)? 
what qualifies as really needs to stay in jail? Multiple murders or extremely violent murders? Serial rapists and pedophiles? I'm curious. 
Norway had one highly influencial crimilogogist, that is responsible for a lot of the reforms. This man: http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nils_Christie
Dont forget all of the precious, and toxic metals that go into your Iphone and all of your electronics, and the poor soul that had to mine said metal, and the other poor soul that had to piece together you electonics for pennies, and dont forget the landfill that your electronics go to that usually contain high levels of mercury and other heavy metals.  Lets add to that your daily expenditure of energy from all sources, and your daily waste, and your daily contamination of water with your fecal matter and blah blah blah  Basically what I am saying is, if your not a smoker, your still killing everyone and everything, so stfu and enjoy your short shitty existence on planet derp. xD
TIL redditors are even bigger idiots than I thought
???  I'm agreeing with you. Social sciences and philosophy help us see beyond retribution which has historically been seen as the adequate answer to crime. 
&gt;Because they hate Jews  FTFY
Compassion trumps punishment
another amazing reply lol.
Convince voters/politicians that it's the right thing to do.  ninja edit: 'Sell the concept.'
Oh look another idiot who thinks if you give a stern talking-to to murderers and rapists they will all start playing nice and become productive members of society.
[deleted]
This is basically the third year in a row that a movie that offers a simplifying inward look for Hollywood as a whole has won the best picture award.  The King's Speech was a movie that followed an Oscar blueprint, ticking off as many checkboxes for awards as possible. The normal won out big. The Status Quo got celebrated as something special. Even insiders were a bit stunned not just by the fact that it won itself but by how it was lauded.  The Artist, while definitely a really good film, showed with the way it was hailed by critics and insiders Hollywood's growing insecurity with the transition they are going through at the moment, culminating in the wonderfully easy message that they can survive it if they power through. The awards for The Artist were a sign of Hollywood revelling in the past, a time when movies were the center of entertainment, stars were clean cut and even the problems seemed miniscule compared to now.  And then this year Argo, presenting a vision of political change movies can create that is wonderfully simplified to the point where the magic of film can circumvent any hardships. Falling into the wonderful "based on a true story" category of popular historical revisionism/adaptation, it transforms real human drama into a three act film with a perfect happy end, building up and on a strong sense of patriotism that isn't warranted by the real story. A movie such as this wouldn't have received awards ten years ago when Bush was in office. But now is a good time to celebrate making consumable mainstream movies that deal with serious topics. Because once again, it's the safe bet and a feel good movie, especially for the Academy because it celebrates film as a force for peace or at least non-violent problem solving.
Because they have refused to accept repeated chances to get independence, from 1947 through Olmert's offer to Abas, all of which they rejected.  They rejected these offers because they don't really want independence in Gaza and the West Bank, they want to destroy and replace Israel itself.
That may be so, but as an audience I want to care about the character.  Ryan just seemed like a cardboard character.  I think the film would have been much more interesting if they find him and he's freaking out, begging them to take him away at once, causing more tension between him and Miller's men.  Instead he's just some do-gooder, boring character.    That the thing about SPR.  Individual scenes are brilliant.  But as a whole film, it isnt very interesting.  Take away the intense battle scenes and you're left with nothing.  The movie grabs you by the throat in the first 20 minutes, and then just kind of fades away for the next 2 and a half hours.
Yeah. But back when it happened Canada got all the credit and CIA none.
Let PETA spend their time coming to NYC and capturing all the rats in the subways with humane traps.
The virgins are gonna hit the streets haha. 
There's confusing Argo with Zero Dark Thirty.
America should just go ahead an incorporate the rest of the world.
&gt; AnonymousIRC **clams** that bank of America is taking down all the **paste** created on the leak.  - two in one sentence  &gt; It was to be expected that these efforts continue and it was also expected that their security remains - at best - lousy.  - commas  &gt; We were **geniously** amused by the fact that there are actually paid analysts sitting somewhere  - not even a word  There are many, *many* more minor issues with punctuation and grammar to dissect.
*Durka durka CIA durka?*
If a covert operation goes right, you're not supposed to hear about it.
Eh.. most government positions have misleading titles that actually perform the opposite  "department of justice"... nope... department of injustice...  "president'.. nope... more like CEO
I reserve my most intense hatred for Hollywood tripe about a heroic American father coming home to his cute-as-buttons kids. Usually with no audible dialogue, just string music.  Seriously, who falls for this shit?
[deleted]
I would guess that the vast majority of the moviegoing world would disagree with you. Take away everything and you still have a fascinating story of dedication, intrigue, espionage and military tactics.  These themes generally perform well in the box office, and when executed well, they perform even better.  And considering the stark and unblinking look at the American military the director and screenwriter pride themselves on (both also worked on *The Hurt Locker*) as well as the strong and immediate response from Washington, it's a definitely stretching the boundaries of the word propaganda to label it as such. 
So a bunch of goons hacked the BOA, and rather than do anything useful or interesting, they decide to brag about it, giving the BOA chance to make their security tighter for the next people who come along with an actual plan.   That's like immunising a bacterial infection against antibiotics just so you can prove that it can be done. 
I can't get the image of the Iranian Clerics watching the Oscars out of my head.
It shows our government torturing people. We, as citizens, don't do shit about it and we keep voting in "status-quo" politicians who were involved in this torturing and/or support it.  It is all about getting our people to just be okay with our government doing illegal things and getting the bad guy as long as we stay safe.
In the film, they openly acknowledge that the CIA propped up a regime that perpetrated horrible human rights violations onto its people and that the revolution was, essentially, justified.   Zero Dark Thirty was more propaganda than Argo, IMO
Wikileaks should have grown beyond the personality of Assange.  Assange is now exploiting leaked documents for personal gain.
Send them along as well.
The worst offender wasn't the first scene with Renner's character, a character who allegedly survived one tour already engaging in "oh fuck it, I'm going in without any care for safety" behavior that in the real world would have ensured that he never survived to do a second tour?
Anyone get a mirror or screenshot?
WWI and II are not comparable to if the US and USSR had had a nuclear war. Especially with nuclear winter   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_winter#Recent_modeling   &gt; "A nuclear war between the United States and Russia today could produce nuclear winter, with temperatures plunging below freezing in the summer in major agricultural regions, threatening the food supply for most of the planet."            &gt; "They did not discuss the implications for agriculture in depth, but noted that a 1986 study which assumed no food production for a year projected that "most of the people on the planet would run out of food and starve to death by then" and commented that their own results show that "this period of no food production needs to be extended by many years, making the impacts of nuclear winter even worse than previously thought."
English do you speak it.
To preface my post, I'd like to ask you to read the relevant parts of the links, since you asked for them. With the prevalence of things like tl;dr in Reddit, calling for a citation in most subs feels like a cheap way to undercut otherwise sensible statements. For those that don't collect scholarly papers (like myself, particularly when I'm not studying the subject), it takes some time to dig up good sources, and to read them to find the relevant passages. It is entirely reasonable, however, to request those articles if you do read them, and further education or argumentation is your intent. As I cannot gauge intent from "[citation needed]," I'll give you the benefit of the doubt. Keep in mind that I am responding to a call for citations for the assertion that torture does not work, a broad topic, but I'll do my best:  In *Behind this Mortal Bone* ([free PDF](http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=1171369)), the author cites an occurrence of false testimony given as a result of torture and spends some time with this criticism of torture's utility. See the end of page nine or search for "Tarek Dergoul". It is a frequent criticism of torture techniques that the information derived from torture is suspect at best.  In the same paper, on page fourteen, the efficacy of torture is discussed through an examination of the ticking time bomb argument for torture. The author goes on to call into question an example of "successful" torture at the end of that page and continues discussing the issue on the next few pages.  In *Answering Torture's Apologists*, ([free PDF](http://www.academia.edu/1338028/_Answering_Tortures_Apologists_Recent_Work_on_Torture_Democracy_and_French_History_French_Politics_Vol._6_No._4_December_2008_pp._375-387)), Cole reviews Darius Rejali's [book](http://academic.reed.edu/poli_sci/faculty/rejali/td/) *Torture and Democracy* (I'd provide a link to the full text, or bypass the review and reference this, but I can only access it illegally, and I'm not inclined to do so) and points out that Rejali examines modern medical knowledge to refute claims that torture practitioners are capable of knowing what amount of pain a human can withstand, or that torture is a science of any form (meaning that it is inexact). I'd love to provide page links here, but I'm reading a better quality, but non-free version of the article. The author also notes a general criticism of torture (one that I reject, though historical precedent is given) in that it is a slippery slope, and that if used, it will work its way into the repertoire of the common policeman; take this as you will, but I feel that it's a comparatively weak claim. There are further claims of strong arguments in Rejali's book, but as I cannot access his book freely, I'll leave it at that.  In the same review, Cole goes on to discuss Marnia Lazreg's *Torture and the Twilight of Empire*, which appears to be another [book](http://press.princeton.edu/titles/8524.html) that I cannot legally access freely, but discusses the topic. This book examines the ineffectuality of torture through an anthropological lens. Cole speaks well of it, but I'm getting tired of reading about hurting people. Feel free to track down a copy as it appears to be relevant to the assertion you wish cited.  If you have any specific arguments for claiming that torture works, I might be talked into addressing them as opposed to tackling such a broad subject as torture in general.
im 50/50 either tom c. was there or sydneys in need of some hjs
If anything, it's a conspiracy to make a shit-ton of money. Because the spiced up Hollywood version of the CIA is ***always*** more interesting than the reality. I don't think anyone is making these movies to actively rewrite history, even if that is the end result.
La forma de hacer negocios en cada país es diferente. De igual manera el camino que cada empresa quiere y puede seguir. Lo que a una le ha ido bien puede no funcionarle a otra de características similares.
WTF is there to do in Iceland except porn?
RESPONDING TO WHAT YOU HATE WITH THE SAME SHIT MAKES YOU LOOK LIKE AN UNINSPIRED BUTTHURT WIDOW
In the link, it says that he "took her, and lay with her, and defiled her."  Does that necessarily mean rape?  It doesn't sound like the author is making much of a distinction between rape and consensual sex there, but I know that this is a translation and I wouldn't know if "defiled" is short-hand for rape or is just expressing the general view that women are less valuable if they aren't virgins.
I think you have.
Here you go, [ABC News](http://abcnews.go.com/Health/baby-dies-herpes-virus-ritual-circumcision-nyc-orthodox/story?id=15888618).  Of course you should probably ignore anything coming from myself and/or ABC News from now on, because as I'm sure someone will point out shortly you have to be literally Hitler to ever be in anyway critical of a jewish persons actions, even if those actions are killing a baby by slicing part of his penis off, sucking on the wound and thus giving the baby a fatal infection.
Read my other comments, I went over it. Society becoming more open minded about it, less covert dealings needed, less explosive snapping, legal alternatives. Letting people feel comfortable saying they are and trying something to get their tensions out rather than it manifesting as rape or something else inappropriate. Again, anything is better than sitting on our hands, threatening death to pedos, and hoping for the best.
Yeah, tell those girls to turn the other ~~cheek~~ hole.
I have read this sentence so much that it is starting to look normal
The sad thing is that this is no longer amazing.  I mean Hell, even the Prime Minister and the King's daughter stand accused of corruption.  The bath water has become so polluted that it's no longer viable or even desirable to try to save the baby.  Edit: removed extra extra word
There is no may or may not that he existed. He existed.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Historicity_of_Jesus#Greco-Roman_Pagan_sources  http://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/npdil/what_historical_facts_do_we_know_about_jesus/  http://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/vr0qu/what_is_the_historical_proof_for_jesus_christ/  Now if you believe he is the son of God is something completely different, but evidence exists that he did infact live and die.
Multiculturalism is alive and well.  I don't blame the whites in the UK if they want to have a mass exodus. Paying taxes only to feed people that are threatening to make a shithole out of the UK is depressing enough.
Because nobody likes living in tents, damn.  China is trying to AVOID slums, not encourage them.
Yes they are covered on the news, but they aren't spoken about as  a way to denigrate people who share their ethnicity or religion or to push a political agenda, as is the case here.
sure thing
Partially true, certain religions are actively persecuted and imprisoned in north Korea. Christians in specific are often subject to concentration camp sentences. 
80% of the time,  it works every time! 
No it won't. As someone else pointed out, Germany was in the middle of Europe. North Korea is simply too far away and too foreign for people to empathize the same way. Also, we're completely desensitized to violence due to the media and the Internet. As Jane Austen put it, "how horrible it is to have so many people killed! And what a blessing that one cares for none of them!"
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1953_Iranian_coup_d'%C3%A9tat  you are mistaken. http://vi.uh.edu/pages/buzzmat/htdtisirancoup.html
The biggest reason the holocaust was a such a big deal to people compared to all the other genocide was that Germany was a civilized nation attacking and committing genocide against the people of other civilized countries. This had never happened before as far any could remember and the fact that a first world country could still act so barbaric was extremely shocking.
Damn I bet they just wish they could punish apostasy with death.  They really really seem like they want to, but just can't get away with it.
1) it should at least be amusing   2) this isn't satirical. It's just people on the internet behaving like people on the internet, i.e. constantly disappointing. 
SP policy is separate from the rescinded Fair Game policy.  They ARE two separate things.  SP policy basically states that if someone comes up to you and is an asshole and is trying to disrupt the place and so on, that   * you don't have to like them and  * you can throw them out,  * you can tell them to go away, and  * you can tell them don't come back.  * You can tell people to avoid them. * You can say "if you are going to be friends with that sort of person, you can't be my friend".   *"Fair Game" was a policy that said "we don't care if folks fuck with them either"*  That detail was banned and the policy rescinded, and emphasis was placed on the rule of law.  People do all this stuff all of the time, IRL and on the Intertubes. Businesses routinely tell jerks not to come back to the store or restaurant any more. Women routinely tell abusive partners to stay away, and get court orders to back it up.  Anonymous fucks with people all of the time, and gets praised for it. But you *like* these people  People do it all the time of Reddit, too See /r/SubredditDrama for more of this. Never mind the old banned subreddits like /r/gameoftrolls.   But people freak when someone they do not like does this, and yet they do it all the time themselves
Look at what it resorted to. My work is done here. [Tis a good day in the kingdom of Reddit.](http://farm6.staticflickr.com/5248/5228096473_377a977b64.jpg)
:s)
Also band-aid is a brand
But it stems from more than extremism. These kinds of views are commonplace in tribalistic muslim cultures. The religion serves as a vehicle to spread their social dogma. Islam to them is all encompassing through their lives, even down to sexuality and how unbelievers, kaffirs can be treated.
Yeah I personally love hearing all the stories about angry gun owners and how they clean up the mean streets. 
&gt;http://www.judiciary.senate.gov/hearings/testimony.cfm?id=4f1e0899533f7680e78d03281fe18baf&amp;wit_id=4f1e0899533f7680e78d03281fe18baf-2-1  How long before the link above accurately describes the living conditions in America? They're destroying our Constitutional Rights, taking away our guns, it won't be long before someone in Washington D.C. decides a "re-education camp" is the best way to stop people from complaining about all the corruption in their government.  I honestly would not put it past them.  It will happen ever so slowly that we won't realize it until we're all locked in the Gulag for not being able to recite the President's New Years Day Patriotic American Speech by heart.  Let me ask you a question:  With all the corruption you have seen in our government, with all the tyranny and incompetence you have seen (via your own two eyes or read about in the news), do you honestly think America will never become like North Korea if we continue down the same path that we have been for the past 50 years?
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Basically they believe no woman or man would ever lie about being raped. They probably think the girl in the news story is innocent and a hero for standing up.
And a significant percentage of those aren't even real words.
[deleted]
thank you.
Ah dammit. I knew I forgot something.
You can release a song about it like Bam Margera.
[deleted]
[deleted]
r/shitredditsays is a circlejerk, but it's not the entirety of all srs subs. There are many.
"falsely"  
Have your friend sue her for emotional damage, libel, and a host of other goodies.  Slam that cunt hard!
That's not what I'm saying at all, please tell me where I say that.  I said that the worst thing was that she lied. Because of people like her who lie about rape, every girl who is raped is afraid to report it. Every girl who does report it is treated like a liar. Her lies caused suffering.  Her lies caused suffering for the men too. That is also terrible. She should be punished because of her lies. It is good that she got caught. No one should ever, ever lie about rape. Lies about rape cause suffering for everyone.  Understand?
One thing you've got to pay attention to is that each storm is different.  Sandy wasn't just a run of the mill hurricane...  That said, if you take a 115mph storm and put it on the Gulf Coast where building codes are stricter, you'll have less damage on average... but the likes of Katrina and Camille can still come in a fuck up your day.  Even though Camille had winds of something like 200mph (300kph), it caused less damage overall than Katrina which landed as a category 3.  Camille basically erased a relatively small portion of the coastal bits of Mississippi, but Katrina spanned several states.  So yeah.  When you say "As a comparison", there's no comparison.  That statement is almost meaningless.
Upvoting because Redwall is a great book series.
It's only rape if it's a man raping a women. If it's a women raping a man, it's not rape (legally).
[deleted]
Granted, those 100 lashes have a pretty fair chance of killing her through slow, painful whipping. I'm sure that's much better.
I wish I were a superhero.. I would just rescue her :(
Pat Fitzgibbon's Mitsubishi has a Lancer in South Holland, IL, for you. Visit our dealership to purchase a Lancer in South Holland, IL, with great service, for more info visit LancerSouthHollandIL.com. 
While not all are child rapists they are ALL gay. 
ooooh looks like we got an angry woman here
Most western christian society are secular and make their laws according to reason, not tradition. 
this is a tragedy but that doesn't mean white privilege doesn't exist. We should be working to stop all bullying regardless
In most of those incidents, it is one community trying to gain resources, land, political power, etc. from another community. They are divided along religious lines because, by and large, the religion you have is determined by the community you are born in to. It doesn't mean they are doing those things *because of* their religion.   It is simply two (or more) communities fighting each other, and they happen to be divided along religious lines because, sociologically, religion is one of the key indicators of which group you belong to.  &gt;  Playing dumb can be a viable strategy, but in that case you're overdoing it and no one will fall for your bullshit.  If you can try to keep your replies civil, it will help the discussion. 
That really didn't translate well! :D
Here you go   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=h6QKgXq1hng  http://www.fridae.asia/newsfeatures/2009/09/15/8945.indonesia-s-aceh-province-to-allow-100-lashings-and-jail-for-gays   And here's something from Malaysia http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PQeNJ71mOwE
[deleted]
Only half?  Gee, in the Anglican Church, I get the impression it's more like 80%. (And it has nothing to do with clerical celibacy. Anglican priests can marry.)  Edit: I mean 80% of the men. I don't know about female priests (who are about a third of the priests here).
If she was being lashed for being raped, then she's being lashed for something the court recognised to be beyond her control. Very important distinction.  Doesn't make it anything close to alright, of course, but you'd have to wonder what thought process the court must be going through to punish someone for something they agreed they weren't responsible for.
Please, I showed him the part of where it is hard to prove adultery in Islam unless you are really stupid or admit it yourself.  All he has been doing after that is avoid a discussion and ranting about how things should be.
You're an idiot.  
Why doesn't anyone realise that if everyone fucks off and leaves the Japanese alone about this they will more than likely stop.. the harder everyone else push the more likely they are to dig in there heals.
This wont help the war on guns.
What was he trying to do get the official sick? He should have been beaten. 
i have been there too and can second this. the water looked.. toxic. 
Check out his profile, he doesn't seem to act within any reason or sense of moral other than "Obama bad" 
Scientific data? Please. Don't insult actual science by comparing it to this.  Should I copy and paste this? If you wish.  ""Dr Arnett’s article is full of holes and is based on a combination of a dodgy understanding of how epidemiology works, some hopelessly outdated claims made by the tobacco industry in the 1990s which he has dusted off, and some highly selective cherry picking of evidence. It is nothing more than the same tainted, jaundiced attempt to twist reality which the tobacco industry and a small number of pro-smoking conspiracy theorists have tried to argue.  1. The EPA report. Why does Arnett give so much attention to a report which is now 17 years old? There have been numerous more recent studies, which take account of latest evidence (e.g. Taylor et al (OUP, 2007), US Surgeon General (2006), IARC (2004), UK SCOTH (1998 &amp; 2004), Law et al (BMJ, 1997), Hackshaw et al (BMJ, 1997)). If Arnett’s criticisms of the EPA report were valid, then either these other reports should have concluded that secondhand smoke is harmless, or Arnett should be able to criticise these too. But the conclusions of all of these reports support those of the EPA. And remarkably, other than passing reference to the USSG, Arnett has nothing to say about these other reports.  2. Relative risk: Arnett’s claims about Relative Risk betray huge ignorance of epidemiology. He claims something will not be considered harmful unless results show a Relative Risk of 300% or more. That is utter nonsense. There are thresholds of that scale which epidemiologists apply – but only in circumstances where they draw firm conclusions from the results of a SINGLE study. The threshold does not apply to risks (such as links between passive smoking and lung cancer and heart disease) which have been tested by scores of studies.  3. Osteen: Why does Arnett devote such time to this judgement, which was overturned on appeal because Judge Osteen did not have the authority to rule on the case? Every time a regulatory decision is made, opponents can challenge the proposed new laws if there case is strong enough. Since Osteen there have been many regulatory decisions, as restrictions on smoking in public have been introduced. Courts are allowed to overturn these. Had the views of Osteen and the tobacco industry been as strong as Arnett claims, we would expect these laws to be overturned following Judicial Review. So why haven’t they? Where are all these supposedly convincing judicial challenges now?  4. Enstrom &amp; Kabat: Arnett doesn’t bother providing an assessment of the evidence as a whole. He simply cherry picks one study which he hopes will make its case. In doing so, he glosses over the fact that its methodology has been heavily criticised. He makes a nonsensical claim that “it the largest and most detailed study ever reported”, when in fact there are several studies which assess more lung cancer victims. And he bypasses the fact that that not even Enstrom and Kabat’s report repeats Arnett’s claim that “secondhand smoke Is no danger”. ""   
Poe's Law.
Honestly I'm Hispanic and I when I see this I don't understand why isn't not OK to draw attention to the blatant real racism. Sometimes white people can be overly sensitive to racism. I'm not talking about that fake petty a black guy guy got a job over me racism. This really racism against you and you need to fight against it.   I see people try to compare the multicultural society of america and europe, but it's not the same because american society have built a understanding. Minorities can be racist they just typically aren't in the US because we know the repercussions for being so in a mostly white country. It seems that Europe doesn't have that understanding.
So do you.  If you followed everything, you'd be in jail.  
i was raised christian i became gnostic when i ran the program in lightwave using opengl.  hahaha as long as you are a human being living on planet earth, you live in jesus' kingdom.  you cannot undo his death and only display your ignorance and disrespectful nature trying. 
&gt; Most European protestants accept sodomy and premarital sex.  Really?
that's just racism, it has nothing to do with territorial disputes (what the OP article is about)
Replying to save.  Sometimes I really feel like this place is a racist, sexist, homophobic cesspool. It is absolutely wonderful to see this sentiment expressed without massive amounts of downvotes.  
This comment is really relevant and if people haven't seen those G.I. Joe spoofs, then here's the link because they're very funny!  [PORKCHOP SANDWICHES...GET THE FUCK OUT...WE'RE ALL DEAD!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L1BDM1oBRJ8)
There's less of a religious angle and more shame on not providing an heir for your family.  In China, it's the duty of a guy to marry and produce offspring to further the family name.  Anecdotally, as long as that's taken care of, you can do whatever you want.  I know there's a lot of arrangements in China where a gay man will marry a lesbian woman to please the parents on both sides, then they just go on their merry way.  I think Chinese people are pretty tolerant of gay people so long as 1) they aren't your gay kids and 2) it's not in your face with PDA. 
They're saying that someone like this women casts doubt on every every other genuine rape victim, not that they will falsely accuse tens of thousands of people
Just like every drunk obnoxious racist aussie represents Australia. 
Heh, and I associate it with redditors :P And you nailed it, that it is very clinical sounding.
Being a douchebag isn't a right. What the fuck is wrong with so many people in this world
Isn't promoting diversity in the workplace "showing the world how it ought to be"?
This, I can see your point and I agree with. I've been emailing back so many people from this thread, I don't even remember your original post very well. But this, I agree with. Unlike the U.S., where American culture is like an acidic solution to a great extent, and immigrants are for the most part immersed in many ways into the culture, perhaps it is different in Europe. The unemployment issue is huge, I agree, and leads to fundamentalism. 
I think the better irony would be that the weed would *directly* kill someone, and only because weed is illegal. If it were legal, we probably wouldn't be firing it out of a cannon. Probably.
**That shit was on fire**.  Most of you fuckers wouldn't even have had the wherewithal to save your own mothers in this situation. It's ridiculous anyone thinks he should be punished. 
I have to say, that's clean enough to eat out of.
Quit it with your insults, your making yourself look like a fool. And how arrogant of you, you have no idea what country I'm from anyway. 
I'll take my money elsewhere.
That's the biggest bong i've ever seen
Its not Canada, its the SPVM (Police service of Montreal) theire is plenty of video like that.
Can you imagine a beowulf cluster of these?
Okay, you're absolutely correct. I was thinking it would only increase the lift by (Person mass)*(gravity) but I'm wrong and had to do the mathematics to be sure.  F = m*g = (n*p + b) * g L = Lift (constant, which I'm calling L instead of G do avoid confusion with gravity, g).  where p is the mass of a person, b is mass of empty balloon, and n is the number of people in the balloon.  Let [b = 3000kg](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hot_air_balloon#Combined_mass) and p = 70 kg.  Then, vertical acceleration, V = (L - F)/m. Let V*=(L-F*)/(20p+b) represent the initial vertical acceleration before the pilot bailed, thus F*=(20p+b)g. Let V'=(L-F')/(19p+b) equal the vertical acceleration after the pilot jumped. F'=(19p+b)g.  V'-V*=(L-F')/(19p+b) - (L-F*)/(20p+b) is the additional acceleration gained from the pilot jumping. Simplify: V'-V* = (1.016L + p*g)/(20p+b).  So, if the balloon is initially not accelerating (L=F*), then [V'-V*= 10.12m/s/s.](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=%281.016*%28%2820*70%2B3000%29kg+*+9.81m%2Fs%2Fs%29%2B%2870kg+*+9.81m%2Fs%2Fs%29%29%2F%2820*70kg%2B3000kg%29)  So I was completely wrong.
You were the one commenting on the subject of my posts. Read the links I post. It's pretty obvious as to why they are incompatible with Western society.
Some people take fast decisions when in panic, others tend to be paralysed by fear. There's also denial of the gravity of the situation, cognitive dissonance etc. 
You are talking so much shit and are contradicting yourself!  &gt;The Palestinians certainly do not claim the land based on a historical connection to the land, as they had much less historical attachment than the Jews.  How is that so? Palestinians claim the land due to presiding there for over a thousand years far far longer than Israelis ever have. Is that not enough of a historical connection in your eyes?  &gt;They claim it based on it being Muslim land to them, and they cannot stand the idea of infidels having control over the land.  Im not sure if you decided not to read what I said previously but I guess not. I will try again to make you understand.  Palestinians do not belong to one religion. They are made up of many different sects other than Islam. I and my family are Palestinian Christians for example. We and other Palestinians whether Muslim christian or druze do not claim Palestinian land cause we believe it to be Muslim land we claim it because our ancestors have lived in historic Palestine for generations and it is our right for self-determination and to return to our lands.  &gt;The Israelis, at least during the creation of the state of Israel, did not see it as a religious right, but as a historical right. One only needs to look at the names of all the ancient cities that are Biblical. The Old City in Jerusalem, also known as the city of King David. Bethlehem. Hebron. Tiberias.  Now this is where you contradict yourself. You claim that Palestinians see Palestine as muslim land but that Jews do not see Palestine as jewish land.   Tell me then why did hundreds of thousands of jews from Europe with no national or geographical connection to Palestine immigrate to Palestine before(and after) the birth of Israel in 1948?   The answer is that Jews believe that Palestine belongs to them because it once used to be Jewish land before the arrival of Christianity and Islam and holds importance in their Jewish scripture. How is their claim to the land not based on religion please answer if you can?  Jewish claim to Palestine based on historical connection is as ridiculous as Italy claiming all of England due to the Roman rule of Britain over a thousand years ago.
I really don't feel sorry for people who convert to scientology. I do feel sorry for any family and friends they drag down with them though.
&gt; (Yes, this is true of Christianity as well, though the New Testament is slightly more tolerable than the Quran)  The fact you have to bring up Christianity is absurd, though it's not necessarily your fault. It's Reddit's. The cretinous line of thinking goes as follows:  * Ignorance, bigotry, and violence caused by Islam  * Better point out Christianity.   For once, just once, I'd like to see a discussion about the horrible ramifications of Islamic teaching without the regurgitated, prosaic "BUT...BUT...THE CHRISTIANS TOO!" argument. 
[deleted]
They also tend to recover, Mr Eisenhower.
Is it "considered" corruption? No, probably not. But I still would say that it is corruption. It is just that corruption has become the rule rather than the exception.
Well, first off, Quebec is not a state, and it's not nationalist, it wants independence, not the same thing.  The OQLF who called out the word «pasta» in an italian restaurant (which is a ridiculous law and has been revoked by the way) is an institution that greatly helped the francophone community to get equality with the anglophone community throughout the 60's, 70's, 80's and 90's.  It's one of the reason, the situation of the francophone community has changed from being oppressed by a minority of anglophones who controlled banks and corporations to being on the same level.   Nowadays the institution is more of a way to insure that the culture is preserved. If you think that maybe it's not in danger, is in part due to the OQLF's job throughout the years.  As for the importance of culture, there is a [comment](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/18yahb/the_french_language_police_in_quebec_canada/c8jb203) in a past post on this subject that sums up my thoughts very well.  Sorry for the brief and kind of mean comment, I was in class and didn't have to time to elaborate on the subject but yet, didn't want such an false remark to just slip by.
Your second point is one of my favorite things about wrestling in the Olympics and as a sport in general. A great example is [Artur Taymazov](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Artur_Taymazov) from Uzbekistan.
I'm guessing Athens.
The Iron Sheikh is not impressed.  "IOC I fuck you up you disrespect the legend and my only sport Wrestling. They have no dick they make new sport of go fuck yourself"  https://twitter.com/the_ironsheik/status/301417448450711553
It's like Popeye and Brutus. All that animosity boils down to an outlet for repressed homosexual attraction.
Well yeah, sure, but I still want to see proof. Mandiant provided extensive documentation of Chinese military hacking. Meanwhile this article doesn't provide proof of shit, just some vague statements from Chinese military spokesmen.
And here we were all getting the impression it was such a nice place to live.
Do you seriously believe that the penance top level politicians are paid via their jobs means all that much to them? The wealth they accumulate doesn't come from what we pay them as tax payers but from what they are paid on the side by the 1% to further their personal interests.
you ain't kidding  http://voices.yahoo.com/iran-condemns-blockbuster-movie-300-as-american-psychological-249323.html  http://www.nytimes.com/2013/01/11/world/middleeast/as-academy-snubs-affleck-for-argo-iran-plans-own-movie.html 
Not my place to tell him how to live his life, or criticise him for doing what he wants to. Not like he's harming anyone.
You might be thinking of the hedge fund loophole that American bankers use.  They are given their salary/bonuses in the form of stock options, which they hold for a period of time until it can be sold and taxed at the capital gains rate, which is probably at least 30% less than what they would pay in taxes on regular salary.
Good sentiment, but it aint ever going to work. Consumers will pretty much never make that choice consistently for just altruistic reasons. Do all you can individually, for sure, but this is a problem that needs to be tackled by governments, not farmers markets. 
[deleted]
Fuck that, send me on this suicide mission.  Just give me like 50 terabytes of archived internet I haven't browsed yet and I'll make it there if radiation doesn't kill me.
Yeah right, next you're gonna tell me the DailyMail is a tabloid.
**BASE**ball not **BASKET**ball  
[deleted]
So, what, leave the oppressed masses to fend for themselves?
[Nope, this is]( https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=azEvfD4C6ow&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player)
Manning had no higher interest.  He was a screwup in the unit he was in and never should have been sent overseas.
[deleted]
Actually if anybody bother to read what was so called exposed it really revield how sick the rest of world was and the role other nations played in the stage of global missery. Really those documents actually made the US not that bad.  It is hillarious to see all those bashin the US on what the DID NOT read.   Scary is the role of the media who focussed on US bashing and not had the intelligence to pick up on what actually was beeing discussed in the wires.   People should really start questioning what who is telling you. The US isn't the only one with an agenda and as much as I hate the rightwing media, the so called left wing or liberal media is lying to you just as hard. 
Death penalty?  Life imprisonment bud.
Do you honestly believe they couldn't have gotten any intel from thousands of classified documents?  Even with redactions?
Yes, they blindly hate the military. Which is why many redditors constantly make wildly inaccurate claims against the military about war crimes and propoganda. Many also (wrongly) assume that "we don't need a military anymore" completely ignoring why it seems that way.
Do you really think the US government gives half a shit what people say on reddit? I really don't get where this idea that large numbers of paid commenters are out there comes from. Unemployment is over 7%. There are millions of folks out of work who would be happy to accept any job. If there were some massive conspiracy to post astroturf comments on reddit you'd have plenty of examples to point to.  The most plausible explanation just happens to be the truth: people don't necessarily agree with you. They feel compelled to explain their disagreement. That doesn't mean they've been paid to do so. The US government is not going to waste resources trying to deal with the "problem" of folks saying nasty things on a website, no matter how popular it is.  I have no problem with Bradley Manning's political views. I have a great deal of sympathy for them; however, I do have a problem with his actions. He violated agreements he made to his employer and disclosed data he was told not to. I work as a government contractor. I have access to a great deal of private information. What Bradley Manning did makes my life more difficult because it makes it more necessary to institute controls over that information and increases the scrutiny of my work.  Working in IT requires building trust. Manning knowingly violated that trust. I have nothing but contempt for people who do that. I don't care what their motives are. It's fine to have opinions. It is not fine to swear you'll do one thing and then do the opposite.
That statement couldn't be more true. There shouldn't be secrets from the citizens. This war is full of bullshit and will be for who knows how much longer. What Manning did was herioc, even if it was random file dumping he did have a reason behind it.
Error. what ever I'm told can't be a valid variable in any language I know, and I like to think I'm pretty good at this.
As far as I can tell, the US media has been trying to sweep all this under the rug - more conspicuous silence than anything else.
This is retarded.  A lot of it was classified at the time because it contained a small piece of information that was secret, and as such, the entire document gets the classification. After the small piece of information is no longer relevant, they don't just magically make it unclassified, there is a procedure that must be followed. Many documents don't make it through this procedure because it's not all that important, and takes a lot of man-power.   Stuff that makes the documents secret is usually incredibly boring and trivial, like movement times, or amounts of people stationed at a post.  In the future, I would recommend having an understanding of what you are talking about before you open your mouth. Just an idea.
It's impossible to possess without participating in distribution. If you received it, you trafficked a site that provides it, or participated in a board or a ring or some network that provides the material.  You participated in the criminal act.     The victim knows they were violated, they know the violation was recorded, they know the recording was distributed.  You can punish the participants in that process or not.  For something different but similar, libel and slander are still against the law if the person you're defaming didn't know you did it.  It's hard to pursue action until you know about it, but it's still wrong to participate in the degradation of this person through false statements.  You harm the person by spreading false information, and they can end up facing the judgment and actions of strangers who falsely believe they know a terrible secret.  Distributing child pornography spreads even more deeply violating information around.  On a site that seems so concerned with online privacy that they consider publishing a man's real name to go with the things he puts online a horrible violation, it's amazing that the right to privacy of victims doesn't figure into your analysis at all.
[deleted]
To everyone who is saying he released thousands of documents indiscriminately, please remember that he turned them over to Wikileaks, he did not publish them. Wikileaks did not exactly publish them either, instead choosing to release them piecemeal, specifically citing the possible danger of releasing them indiscriminately . . . But the encrypted collection was published as a way of ensuring that Assange could not simply be arrested and have his personal possessions seized as a way of silencing the reporting. A few reporters at the guardian and nyt were entrusted with the password, by Assange. One of the guys at the guardian had no idea how encryption works, and idiotically published the password in his book. He assumed that Assange would have changed the password by the time of publication - it doesn't work that way. Oops.
1. What's wrong with foreigners? 2. Much of what the US has done in these wars has also affected other nations. Like Geneva and human rights violations and lying about the WMD's to get others involved. 3. He tried US media first. 4. Luckily that failed, because most of the big US media are lapdogs of the government and also aren't very journalistic. 5. US media would've easily given up their source if the government demanded that, Wikileaks has still not acknowledged that Manning was the source. Also is Wikileaks one of the top organisations that worries about his condition and raises awareness of his situation. Whilst the US media wouldn't care less about him and some have even openly attacked Manning. 6. Wikileaks has got a high standard on filtering through the information they receive and make sure not to bring out anything that endangers people's life or endangers running operations.
to the point then,   1. I should make it known to you that shriah which is both Quran and Sunnah were left open for legislation and law making for future generations but unfortunately that didnt happen due to political instability after the death of Hazrat Mohammad(pbuh)  read here http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ijtihad  2. The laws given in the three verses are for the soverign and enforcing body/government and not a person.   3. The laws given in these verses had a background. what that background is. Let me explain, think of it as this, a barbaric people of arab who were violent and ferocious. the only thing they understood was fear and punishment and thats what they required. That does not mean it was the same for all people for all generations to come. that might not be what all muslims believe but Quran had an immediate audience to address.   Any legislation done anywhere has to be directed and tailored to a society. When you read these verses dont forget the year and area where they were revealed.   Further, The prophet and his followers were in constant battle against warring tribes who resorted to all types of brutalities to get what they want. These verses were bestowed to establish a policy of dealing with ferocious beasts of the sand as they should be dealt. There was no other way. Hope you grab my perspective.   still, the laws were for an authority in the lawless land of arab, not for individuals to practice.
Irony... I think not.
I had to comment just to say that you put my thoughts into words better than I could have. I agree wholeheartedly. 
Look, the Chinese transition of power is over and so are the protests. Everything seems fine and dandy again. And if the Chinese economy doesn't collapse, I don't think we will see another flareup of tensions until the next transition, which isn't slated to happen for another five years.   If you want to discuss Chinese encroachment, I think we should focus on the "South Chinese Sea" instead of Japan. If China decides to use their naval force to apply pressure and gain land, I am certain that they will go against Vietnam, Indonesia or the Phillipines. Actually I am so certain, that I am willing to bet you that the next issue within the next two years would arise there instead of the "East China Sea".
But 40+ were? Let us just go ahead and say oh I dunno... 1 is an unacceptable number rather than trying to strengthen your argument on something that pathetic. Rape, never ok. Ever. Pretending it is not a major issue in the military is just naive. 
look. they israel wants them assimilated.  they resist assimilation.  society discriminates them for resisting assimilation.   that's pretty much what happens everywhere. the major population usually discriminate the ghetto mindset.
People found out what his platform actually was.
The dude's a Nazi so it's not surprising he's in favour of one party states executing foreigners on live TV.  E.g.   http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/19gek9/gypsy_community_sealed_off_with_a_18m_wall_mayor/c8nsyt5?context=3  &gt; There will be a new genocide in Europe. Many people need to die.  http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/19bdj2/australian_muslim_activists_lose_free_speech_case/c8mj60z  &gt; I am German. Schmiert die Guillotine mit Muslimenfett! :D &gt; &gt;I can sing the whole Sieg Heil Viktoria song. My Uropa (great-grandfather?) taught me it. He was SS-Hauptsturmführer in Bergen-Belsen. &gt; &gt; I don't think I would get along with muslims. First they would have to accept my belief that Mohammed was born of a pig.  Then again he's probably just a bored American teenager trolling, like the rest of reddit.  Sieg Heil Viktoria is an SS song with these lyrics  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nazi_songs#Sieg_Heil_Viktoria  &gt; Sharpen the long knives on the pavement, let the knives slip into the Jew's body. &gt; &gt; Blood must flow, a whole lot of it, and we shit on the freedom of this Jew Republic. &gt; &gt; Tug the concubine out of the ruler's bed, grease the guillotine with the Jews' fat. &gt; &gt; Blood must flow, a whole lot of it, and we shit on the freedom of this Jew Republic. &gt; &gt; Hang a black pig in the synagogue, throw grenades into the parliaments. &gt; &gt; Blood must flow, a whole lot of it, and we shit on the freedom of this Jew Republic.  Charming stuff, isn't it? The strange thing about is that he's very anti Islamist. And yet the Islamists would probably agree on that "Blood must flow, a whole lot of it, and we shit on the freedom of this Jew Republic".  Honestly there's not really a lot of difference between the Islamists and their neo Nazi opponents. They're the same thing with different labels. 
Serves them right. Karma will get you eventually!
Or punch it to deflect the missile away.
 . . . Because the original and only post in here when I first commented was talking about the armed forces aspect and I was trying to counter that?
care to show a study contradicting it?
What is going on in greenland?
US murder rate is 4.8 per 100,000  US Suicide rate is 12 per 100,000  
Don't do this to me. 
Exactly.  A government can accomplish the same things with an F-16 or a ground strike that they do with a drone. The difference is that a drone costs less, and the "human risk" that you would have by sending in troops or a pilot is non-existent.  Lower the cost and the political risk, and at the same time completely remove the person doing the killing from their target; it becomes REALLY easy to kill people indiscriminately.  It's basically a video game: Oops, drone shot down? Respawn and go kill some more brown people.
[deleted]
Ermahgerd, that guy *stole* and claimed *credit* for somebody else's artwork and got *karma* for it! Burn him! But it's okay when Dotcom makes millions of dollars off of it because free stuff!  Fuck Redditors' sense of entitlement and twisted moral code. 
Well... I guess that is an ok start.
[deleted]
As sad as it is, that blue one is a dude (I use the word dude loosely on that one)
Thats like claiming American pot smoking kid is responsible for Mexican drug mafia murders, or someone buying a product made in Israel is responsible for murder of Palestinian children. Vague and indirect casual responsibility =/= moral responsibility.
If a video is produced illegally or is illegally distributed or illegally consumed, then yes, it is wrong and you should be held responsible for distributing or watching things that you don't have permission to. You do have an inalienable right to information that is publicly available, but only when people make it available voluntarily. It's wrong, and it's a crime, to steal media and information, like videos and images. 
Used to live in the UK. It was shocking to go away for a year and comeback to discover entire streets and neighborhoods were now all Pakistani.   In the course of a YEAR, that's just ridiculous.  The UK has destroyed itself. 
Do you know how many nuclear power plant accidents happened so far?
Its not just one article.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Liquid_fluoride_thorium_reactor  /r/thoriumreactor 
good decision right there... people like these made it real hard for a normal Muslim to live in Europe.... 
It is because she disobeyed the law. This is a Islamic country and there are laws that women have to obey. What right is it of the west to interpret the laws of Islam? Do not tell us the things of you r culture where women are asked to unclothe to be raped. Where women are used to make the men want sex. She invited this upon herself by not following Islam.   
Even Soviets blow up only one reactor, so we can assume that Chinese will be safe.
&gt; Look at your friends! They're all successful  Your mom's friend's son isn't perfect, and he's probably a human being. But your mom's friend won't tell that to your mom. Your mom's friend tells only good sides of him to your mom. So your mom ends up believing that your mom's friend's son is always good with math, good with piano, good with Tae Kwon Do, good social skills, obedient, and he's made of awesome. Thus the meme of "Your mom's friend's son" in Korea.  Doesn't even have to involve moms. "unsuccessfull" friends don't even come to the reunion or they come and don't talk about bad parts of their current life, creating the illusion that only your life is shit.
From France and Bulgaria, it's widely accepted to eat horse in France, as a Brit I honestly don't mind eating horse, but it's what the horses may have been fed that worries me.  I work a Saturday job at my uncles butcher shop, and the regulations that he has to work to are very tight. In the UK when a calf is born, it is given it's own passport, if it has a health problem then it is noted down, if it has to be given medication then it is noted down what medication and how much, the passport follows the cow all the way to slaughter, and if it does not meet regulations, then it is deemed not fit for human consumption. If it is slaughtered, then it has it's own number stamped onto it's carcass, which identifies exactly where and when it was slaughtered.   You see, absolutely none of this has been undertaken for the slaughter of those horses, they could have been slaughtered with an unholy amount of steroids pulsing through their bodies, or a form of horse medication that is toxic or has adverse effects on humans. Even if there were regulations, if they do not match the British standard then they should not be sold in Britain.  Anyways I can't complain, my uncle's business is absolutely booming at the moment because of all of this, we'll see how long it lasts.
the reactors being an old design isn't really a good excuse, every reactor that dies will be an old design
who gives a fuck?  just eat your taco.  i am pretty sure horse meat is not going to kill you.  
And America's boob job rate is probably 7 times theirs per capita.  Priorities
Thanks to the way the media presented this crisis and nuclear occurs in general, "meltdown" is only when everything explodes and we get a mushroom cloud.
Some people have to dig the ditches. We all have a purpose, but we can't all be the captain of the team
And I supposed his lying about his law breaking until he was caught red-handed has no bearing on any of this.
Or maybe you need to read up on your history.  I'm not a conspiracy theorist. Conspiracies are secret. I base my opinions on public information.
[deleted]
only when it is suicidal yo  otherwise I can't think of a single example
[deleted]
You guys never got FFT!? 
Ahh, he is class. Pity he is pretty powerless. 
Yeah, I saw that. :/ I remember hearing about how he was forced to stand at the position of attention in the nude when he was on suicide watch. I don't agree with that or any similar kind of treatment. Though I think he should do time for the crimes he admitted guilty to, and whatever else the court can prove he's guilty of. "Do the crime. Pay the time."
While I don't buy the cannabis gateway drug argument (if anything that's alcohol or cigarettes) I do wonder if smoking heroin (opium?) might become a gateway to injecting heroin.
And the World Trade Center survived the impact from the airliners.  It was the hot burning fuel that brought them down.
The East Side gallery *was* the piece of the wall that was left up. The bank of the Spree and the grassy fields behind it *was* the park...
The worst nuclear accident in the United States was the one at Three Mile Island in which a tiny amount of radioactive gas entered the atmosphere.  At Fukushima, a plant from the 1960s, both an earthquake and a tsunami hit the plant.  Multiple back up measures failed.  This was a freak accident.  Had it been just an earthquake or just a tsunami things would have likely been just fine.  We know a hell of a lot more about nuclear power plant design and how to keep things even safer now than we did 50+ years ago.  Also, American nuclear power plants are among the safest in the world.  Take a look at this chart of nuclear accidents throughout the world:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_accidents  44% of nuclear accidents happened in the United States on this chart.  Notice that the only deaths occurred from US nuclear accidents because of a failed nuclear bomb test.  No one has died due to nuclear accidents in the United States with that exception.  The only person that died from Fukushima was not even caused by a direct nuclear accident ("One man died suddenly while carrying equipment during the clean-up.")  TL;DR Nuclear power is very safe in the US, death ratio of US to other countries in terms of nuclear plants **1:4058**.
You must be really far behind on your diarhea quota.
Try Gardein. They have these 'chick-n filets' that are amazing. Also, their thanksgiving meal thing is incredible. Not cheap, but worth it IMHO.
Copy on write?  Seriously can't wait for Btrfs to be fast and stable enough for Debian-based systems not to slow to a crawl on dpkg activities.
24hrs ago: @CGShanghaiAir 02-28-2013 12:00 to 03-01-2013 11:59; PM2.5 24hr avg; 70.3; 154; Unhealthy  stop saying that the pollution in shanghai ain't that bad... it really is...
CIA cry baby. Just because China is better at spying..... 
[deleted]
For **fucks sake**, its like we want to fuck up the world as quickly and completely as possible. God dammit, humanity.
&gt;I dont understand why people cant figure out that Obama had almost double the budget in the first four years he was in office.  Maybe, because that is not true?  From [MarketWatch in the WSJ](http://articles.marketwatch.com/2012-05-22/commentary/31802270_1_spending-federal-budget-drunken-sailor):  • In the 2009 fiscal year — the last of George W. Bush’s presidency — federal spending rose by 17.9% from $2.98 trillion to $3.52 trillion. Check the official numbers at the Office of Management and Budget.   • In fiscal 2010 — the first budget under Obama — spending fell 1.8% to $3.46 trillion.  • In fiscal 2011, spending rose 4.3% to $3.60 trillion.  • In fiscal 2012, spending is set to rise 0.7% to $3.63 trillion, according to the Congressional Budget Office’s estimate of the budget that was agreed to last August.  • Finally in fiscal 2013 — the final budget of Obama’s term — spending is scheduled to fall 1.3% to $3.58 trillion. Read the CBO’s latest budget outlook. 
If you fear people having an allergic reaction then say that. Don't say that soy is bad for you. 
"Do not make the mistake of the ignorant who think that an individualist is a man who says: “I’ll do as I please at everybody else’s expense.” An individualist is a man who recognizes the inalienable individual rights of man—his own and those of others." -Ayn Rand
Yes so lets just give all that extra unpaid money to the owners who don't even have to do anything to be worth billions.
*"The Japanese passengers promptly got out of the train and placed the train back onto the track. The bullet train ended up arriving five seconds late to its station, and the train conductor was heavily reprimanded."*
This. 10,000 times :)
Or if ivory is trade is legalized, people might start farming and breeding elephants and the population explodes. 
Confirmed for being an edgy kid who just hit puberty.
I prefer rock throwing to beheading, personally.
I commented on this elsewhere but banking labour isn't geographically "sticky" as you call it. I've worked on a trading floor in London and I would say that maybe 10-20% of the people working alongside me were British and maybe 20-30% were European. Almost to a person I can bet they would pack up and leave for greener pastures if regulations were passed that dealt severe blows to their pay-cheques. 
Bu..bu..bu...but their faces. Visible faces.
No there isn't. It was their own fucking fault they built a nuclear power plant that wasn't designed for maximum safety in coastal regions, in a coastal region that occasionally experiences horrible weather, up to and including tsunamis.  They are deflecting blame for their own mistake onto nuclear power when nuclear power itself had nothing to do with the accident. It was poor design of the plant itself.  Nuclear power has been working great in the US (and other countries) and will continue to do so because we haven't been fucking stupid with our plant designs and where we put them.
That's worse than before. What it means is that a bunch of well connected talentless hacks will make even more money, and won't be punished for being bad. 
No, we harvested them for pelts and/or to fuck over an entire native population.  Luckily, we didn't quite finish the job with the American Bison.  Edit: Specified the animal I'm referring to.
Psh and I bet after this STILL no one was late for work.
Can you imagine the headlines when women are placed into frontline combat? OMG.
Even if they were 'free range' or 'organic' it is still a scam anyways. 
[deleted]
You said it for me.
&gt;It's a shame how Polish today argue over who is "more Polish in Polish" instead of promoting the tolerant Poland back at the Golden Ages of 16th century with large immigrant and multi-religious minorities  That ended with Poland being invaded and wiped off the map, and the hundreds of years of suffering for the Poles.  Also, research the "Arenda system".
Wtf? I am an Afghan Atheist. This isn't about religion, it is about racism. You are racist and scare of the word. If you want to enact any change, at least be courageous enough to take on the term that correctly applies to you. 
[deleted]
I have to rant for a second about free range and free run eggs. A lot of people won't buy free run or range or organic eggs because of the cost. Supply and demand dictates that if everyone bought these eggs the price would be a much less. The actual cost of running a factory farm vs not is very similar and the main reason the big guys do this is because it's easier to control and run a factory farm - it is actually more expensive. The problem is that trends create the higher priced free range etc eggs, they are just a byproduct of the go green boom that was carried over from the late 90s (I believe I read all this in Fast Food Nation but I could be wrong) . I buy free range Canadian because of the ethics of it, and because I want to be a part of the solution to the cost. Since I started buying these in about 2003 the price has come down significantly and there are now 2-3 brands in the grocery stores offering free range.  TLDR; if you want better treatment of chickens then buy free range and hopefully the trend will become the norm and prices will go down to non free range egg prices. 
[deleted]
I really don't see China going along with this.
Oh please. Provide us with hourly updates. And, pray tell, how does one discern his "pondering?" Or was there a press release to communicate these vital observations? The man turned out to be worse than insignificant, and his church is in total disarray. But do keep us up to date. I'm sure we're all riveted.
Traders will go to hedge funds, bankers will go to PE firms. The already massive post-analyst brain drain at banks will get even worse. Not really sure how any European banks are going to retain talent.
I live in lower saxony and i always bought the ,,organic´´ eggs wich are like 1€ more expensive. I'm really pissed off and you cant even find out wich companys did it so you know wich eggs to buy next time
At the end of the day, the only way to be certain is to keep your own chickens and source your eggs from them, which, after the initial expense, is quite a bit cheaper in the long run. You could even rescue former battery hens if you want the moral satisfaction of doing something right.
Economic viability.
Because I live in a place where the biggest industry is agriculture locally grown food isn't any more expensive than other food and is often much cheaper because I'm buying directly from the grower. Buying and cooking in-season makes sense as well since you're not paying for shipping strawberries from South America in January.  And it's Appalachian, not Appalatian.
Could you link a source indicating that you can put "organic" on food products without any sort of certification or testing?  (because I fear you've mixed "organic" up with "natural")
&gt; Moscow has long since been targeted by Muslim Chechen terrorists who are killing innocent Russian civilians all around Russia  You either have no idea what you're talking about, have totally lapped up all the Russian government propaganda about Chechnya… or both.
But don't worry! On reddit that sort of logic doesn't matter.
http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/deal
I'm glad to hear from someone who actually lived there. Quite interesting.  I guess the parallel doesn't work as one was expansionist and the other just wants to stick with that single piece of land with religious entitlement. I'm sure we could find some crazed extreme of the extreme who would want to take over a chunk of neighbouring land but that would be reaching too far into the loony bag to be considered seriously.  
And that might have something to do with Israelis blowing Palestinians up, taking their land and treating them horribly.
actually the hatred people have for the right-wing practices of the israeli government is the same reasons for hatred in germany that led to the rise of the nazi party. it was wrong then, but unfortunately the israeli government believes it is their god given right to do this sort of thing. 
Obviously no one will ever be able to print working guns at home. Asking questions about what will/should happen down the line with an emerging technology is completely useless.
Mon Dieu!
you sound more like a Fenqing with every post.
Alexander the Great for one.
Fair enough.
Because Anti-semitism of course.
something can be done about it! check out the new white house petition asking Obama to take a picture near the Wall over there  https://petitions.whitehouse.gov/petition/visit-wall-forms-barrier-between-israelis-and-palestinians-take-pictures-world-see/Nds6wNNm
Well do *you* want to have your **cake** and eat it too? So let's say that Israel is being racist from its perspective. Ok fuck Israel.  If YOU call it racism, then you're denying the existence of Palestine and you don't acknowledge the Palestineans as a sovereign people. Which one is it?  Also, your rhetoric and your comment history reeks of bias and extremism. 
One simple way to stop this nonsense:  Flood the market with a bunch of ivory powder that's laced with a drug to cause erectile dysfunction.  Even the rumor would probably cause the demand to drop significantly, rendering ivory trade uneconomic.  Simple solution, but pretty much impossible to implement due to "moral" reasons.
yeah really. standard lib response 101: cry racism or discrimination. disgusting tactic really
It is now time that the US cut Israel loose in the same way that it cut South Africa loose for apartheid.  Israel is run by their own 'Tea Party'.
What a misleading title.
It seems the residents know full well that it will cost them far more in money and inconvenience than they will ever see in return,which is ever the case
Yes.  "No change in the operation of the **rest of the buses**, nor is there any intention to remove Palestinians from **other bus lines**."  He is responding to complaints of the on-going practice of kicking Palestinians of of public transportation, saying that they are allowed on the **rest of the buses**and such actions are not legal.
Too bad some "Palestinians" used violent and extreme means, kinda ruining it for everyone.
[deleted]
[deleted]
United States accepts far more refugees than the EU.  http://www.migrationinformation.org/feature/display.cfm?id=585  &gt;the United States accepts more than double the number of refugees accepted by the other nine countries combined,    Refugees have also integrated far from smoothly in the US than EU countries. For example Somalis do exceedingly well in the US and Canada in comparison to Sweden.  http://www.thelocal.se/44236/20121105/#.UTQLMdkbDTw 
&gt;Throwing out Estonians  Why
Also occupation 101 is very good as well, a little old now but still very powerful. Has Noam Chomsky in it as well.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Do you know anything about the real world in the US?  Doesn't sound like it. 
Don't understand how this can be down voted and simple comments like "Israel is racist" get up voted. This commentator brings a valid viewpoint. Should the private bus company pretend Israelis and Palestinians don't hate each other and want to bomb each other?
This is the worst thing I've heard all week
And what are you moderates doing about these extremists?   They're using the label of "Muslims", they're slandering your religion and you do not defend it. **Note: defending a religion doesn't imply violence, but it can certainly be interpreted as such** 
Medicaid and CHIP would cover every cost for a poor infant with HIV.
[deleted]
No. The price would be lower, removing the incentive to poach. 
SynapticSight gave an excellent breakdown of how HIV infection works, so work your way through that if you aren't comfortable with immunology. But heres the breakdown of what they did; the baby was 30 hours old and had contracted HIV from the mother. So the doctors gave the infant a very large dose of anti-retrovirals, which is the conventional prophylactic therapy for HIV infection. In this case, the baby showed no signs of HIV infection after the dose. Unfortunately, (and this is just me extrapolating what I know to this case) the baby might not be immune forever because we use our mother's immune system until we're 6 months old; then we lose the immunity to diseases our mother was immune to. So I would guess that the infant could get reinfected if exposed to HIV later in life as an adult. Only people who are CCR5- will always be immune because their bone marrow constantly produces immature T cells that do not exhibit the CCR5 receptor, which HIV needs to infect helper T cells. Then again, HIV is one of the fastest mutating viruses, since reverse transcriptase does not have a proof-reading function. Any mistakes in the reverse-transcribed viral genome do not get fixed, which leads to high mutation rates among HIV. It could mutate and evolve around that.
[Given that this cure appears to have been achieved by antiretroviral therapy alone," said Dr. Johnston, "it is also imperative that we learn more about a newborn's immune system, how it differs from an adult's, and what factors made it possible for the child to be cured] (http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2013/03/130303172640.htm) How is giving a child the same drugs as everyone else a cure?It may lead to an actual cure if they can find out how and why the child's body reacted differently to the standard treatment but for now they're clueless as to the how and why.
True
[deleted]
[deleted]
Vice knew how to play their card. They've been wanting a chance to shoot the Kims personally on camera since their first trip into North Korea. Of course their main guy couldn't go this time, due to his past trips being little more than a comedy routine, but getting some basketball players in there was genius. The kid's a huge fan of basketball and he played right into Vice's hands. Rodman and the Globetrotters were the key to getting him to appear on camera. 
**BRADFORD, TAKE CONTROL!**  **TAKE CONTROL OF YOUR CITY!**  **THIS, THIS IS THE INSTRUMENT OF YOUR LIBERATION!**
It only useless as a mall. You must remember this is an investment, and the prices increase incredibly fast in China. People make money out of empty malls all over China. And they are building more empty malls all the time. The Japanese are building empty conference centres and bridges to nowhere. The Asian economies are not sound and healthy in any way.
what miserable bastards. i mean honestly, it just a laugh.
[deleted]
&gt; we vote for pro settler politicians  who are the pro settlements parties ? 
Anyone else reminded of Bruce's conversation with Alfred on the plane in Batman Begins?  "People need dramatic examples to shake them out of apathy and I can't do that as Bruce Wayne, as a man I'm flesh and blood I can be ignored I can be destroyed but as a symbol, as a symbol I can be incorruptible, I can be everlasting."
Did you even watch the video? Some dude on the ground got a worse beating. She got a slap and a shove.
Forgot to mention the part where they do it *after* they've been beheaded. Bravo Fox.
Your making the assumption that the systems could transmit to the satalites in a potentially heavily clouded atmosphere. The dust and particles kicked up by a comet impact could be extreme.  
They are still in control of other stuff...
Thanks.  Sorry for the confusion/lack of clarity.  I edited my post above to hopefully clear that up.
&gt;Nazi Germany  My country's dark history has become the poster child for anti-statists who want to argue that big government is evil. This is ironic because, as far as I can see, Nazi Germany demonstrates the exact opposite. Hitler and his henchmen haven't acted in accordance to a social system of governance. Rather, they completely abolished it and turned it into a system of arbitrary decision making. Who ruled the Führer? What laws did he have to observe? None! Nazi Germany's legal system acted unlawful, even according to its very own laws. This isn't statism! This is anarchic chaos. No law ruled the country. Violence and fear did.   Similarly, Kim Jong-un acts like he is some kind of deity rather than a part of system much larger than his fleshy mass.  When you create a proper government, you don't just throw a random bunch of humans in charge of everyone else. You create a system where there are checks and balances on the power that others utilize, and you make sure that every person in that system realizes how important it is to clean up that system if the need arises from corruption or other undue influence. Government is one form of balance against other corruption, and one that allows for public participation.   Granting power, and then checking that power against other groups of individuals is better than simply allowing someone individually to accumulate power. That's one of the lessons we learn from dictatorships! That we need state institutions that promote the common good. Otherwise, there will be segments of the population unfairly indifferent or even hostile to the interests and wellbeing of other segments. Those segments that somehow gained more power or influence than others are then able to exploit or oppress the rest.   At the end of the day, any system can only be as good as the people it consists of. That's why proper public education for all is so damn important. A libertarian society, where people are neither required nor guaranteed to get a basic education, could easily turn into a scientology-esque cult, where gullible idiots "voluntarily" sign a contract to serve their masters for the rest of their lives.  &gt;Hell, I am a citizen of a country that still practices military imperialism under the guise of "anti-terrorism."  I agree with the late Christopher Hitchens who thought that many of the U.S.'s foreign policy objectives are admirable, but despised the way it tried to accomplish them. I'm glad that Saddam is no longer around, but the Iraq war was nevertheless a disaster.   The following is a little rant which you can skip if you want.   **Start:**  With regard to terrorism, though, I simply cannot help but think that the objective itself is incredibly silly. What exactly are you afraid of? You're more likely to have six numbers in the lottery than to die pursuant to a terrorist attack. So if you're frightened of terrorism, maybe you should start playing the lottery. Your chance to die in a hospital due to a lack of hygiene or appropriate care if far, far greater than dying in a terrorist attack. So if you want to decrease your risk of dying, you should rather invest into improving hospitals rather than a war on terror. Not to mention that the war on terror is utterly counter-productive. Terrorists *want* you to be frightened. They *want* you to waste a lot of resources and thus weaken the country. And the more you destroy terrorist-prone countries, the easier it will be for extremists to recruit more terrorists. A more stoic predisposition would be the greatest remedy against terrorism.  **/rant**  &gt; An intelligent and responsible person can take a drug with the necessary precautions to avoid dangerous situations.  What is the benchmark by which we decide whether or not a person is intelligent and responsible? How can somebody be considered a responsible agent when he takes illegal drugs?   To start smoking has been one of the dumbest things I've ever done. Isn't my behavior indicative of foolishness? Wasn't it wrong that I sometimes exposed others to the toxic fumes of my cigarettes? Wouldn't it have been better if I was never allowed to smoke in the first place? And isn't it obvious that those who do not smoke are, at least in this regard, more reasonable than I am?
Doesn't matter. A few redditors let me dream and i realized it was impossible on every level. 
Damn it.  You know, I *thought* I was wrong but everything kept giving me the radius.  I'll fix it. Thanks.
Edit: Nevermind.
Exhibit A
Spirit :(
As Haxford said, the composition is not as important as the total mass and the velocity involved. But there's another aspect as well: since asteroids have orbits that are much closer to being circular, they have more frequent opportunity to collide with a planet. Over billions of years, most asteroids whose paths could intersect that of a planet actually did collide, a very long time ago. The planets have mostly cleared their own 'neighborhoods' of threatening asteroids, leaving those whose orbits never intersect or intersect only rarely. Comets though have highly elliptical orbits, and can take thousands of years to make each pass--there hasn't been enough time for them to be cleared out in a similar way. Also, with such extreme orbits, they build up *a lot* of velocity in the long fall toward the Sun.
It's not actually in NK.
    Traceroute to thepiratebay.se (194.71.107.15), 30 hops max, 60 byte packets     1 gw.customer.shef3.opal.lan (10.122.192.1) 0.299 ms 0.290 ms 0.303 ms     2 gw-ring1-1.shef-mlx.w1.ask4.net (81.23.53.67) 8.215 ms 8.231 ms 8.274 ms     3 lon-xmr-10ge.w1-the.core.ask4.net (81.23.51.250) 14.271 ms 14.494 ms 15.007 ms     4 v212.core1.lon1.he.net (216.66.80.197) 4.990 ms 5.011 ms 4.992 ms     5 10gigabitethernet1-1.core1.ams1.he.net (72.52.92.82) 12.499 ms 12.532 ms 21.403 ms     6 ams-ix.as39138.net (195.69.147.245) 17.252 ms rrbone.dus.ecix.net (194.146.118.105) 18.800 ms 16.175   ms     7      8 xe-0-1-0-3.r02.frnkge03.de.bb.gin.ntt.net (129.250.5.62) 93.863 ms 89.692 ms 89.665 ms     9 xe-0.level3.frnkge03.de.bb.gin.ntt.net (129.250.8.202) 94.740 ms 91.622 ms 89.644 ms     10 vlan90.csw4.Frankfurt1.Level3.net (4.69.154.254) 172.343 ms 158.773 ms 158.729 ms     11 ae-82-82.ebr2.Frankfurt1.Level3.net (4.69.140.25) 112.654 ms 112.652 ms 117.545 ms     12 ae-61-61.csw1.NewYork1.Level3.net (4.69.134.66) 134.057 ms * 126.351 ms     13 ae-21-70.car1.N     11. saroxxx - Y-day 19:44     13 ae-21-70.car1.NewYork1.Level3.net (4.69.155.67) 133.792 ms 126.158 ms 126.167 ms     14 INTELSAT-IN.car1.NewYork1.Level3.net (64.156.82.14) 128.301 ms * 125.334 ms     15 209.159.170.215 (209.159.170.215) 197.128 ms 189.507 ms 189.498 ms     16 202.72.96.6 (202.72.96.6) 801.225 ms 790.610 ms 789.841 ms     17 175.45.177.217 (175.45.177.217) 792.452 ms 792.284 ms 790.311 ms     18       175.45.76.0-175.45.179.255     Registered to:     STAR-KP     Ryugyong-dong     Potong-gang District     KP
What I said has nothing to do with socialism. A moron born from a uber-rich family *might not make a single contribution* to society in his entire life, yet, capitalism rewards him, and all his offsprings (who might become equally useless), more than any hard-working middle class. What is even worse, using the work of someone else to sustain his frivolous lifestyle. How is this any better?
I know it's a Tick quote, but I keep reading this in Charlie Kelly's voice.
&gt;Natives were killing each other and warring over territory long before white people arrived. We just represented a more powerful, foreign tribe and accomplished what you were trying to do to each other.  You could apply that argument for slavery or even the holocaust? How can you make a case for almost wiping out an indigenous race of people? You have hit rock bottom with that comment.
In other words, Iran is crazy enough that it might nuke everyone (including itself) just for the hell of it.
I remember the reverse in some article I read.  It had to do with some kind of Soviet foreign exchange program in the 80s. They shipped kids to the US to see "what it was like."  Anyways the host family showed them a grocery store. The children assumed it was staged propaganda. "No way they could have that much real food, all just sitting there." At first they were convinced it was fake food, or not for sale. After repeated visits to multiple grocery stores in the area the exchange students decided there was no way they were simply moving the display food around to fool them and that the US did indeed have plenty of food for all.
[deleted]
Ambassador Buzz Killington.
Bradford is an average place so whats the hate for? Too many muslims?
Enough to give power to them, so yeah
I've finally managed to see the picture before it was deleted.
Tell that to gun owners in California and New York. Also look at bills proposed in Oregon.
Seceding.  If they were succeeding they probably wouldn't be seceding.  
[deleted]
Hypothetically, say this wasn't an empty threat.  Would China be on N. Korea's side for the continuation of combat?
You there, UP AGAINST THE WALL!!
Because religion has the moral high ground? Oh, no, wait, they are responsible for almost every major atrocity in the whole of human history!  
[deleted]
From TFA   &gt; Paramedics rushed to his house but were **told** in turn by all 25 hospitals in the area that they could not accept the man because they did not have enough doctors or any free beds, a local city official said, adding some institutions were contacted more than once.  Told, probably, over a CB radio.
&gt; The UK had problems like this for a while which were only fixed by throwing massive additional money into the system.   What, there were insufficient facilities so they spent money on more? That seems like a problem of any healthcare system, not just a government run one.  It's worth noting that [the US spends well over twice as much per capita on healthcare as the UK](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_total_health_expenditure_%28PPP%29_per_capita) - I'm sure if you slashed the budget by more than 60% you'd find 'shortages of providers'.  This is an issue of budget, not of public vs private healthcare, and it's disingenuous to conflate the two.
I may be wrong, but I think that's the definition of fascist.  The government sets ordered prices and refuses to allow hospitals to profit.      Edit: Thank you for the clarafication, I now see the difference and how this is not really fascism.
cmon guys, just "let go and let god."
&gt;Staff are overworked and understaffed because there aren't enough qualified people wanting to enter the industry  The US can take note of this statement right here and refer back to it whenever they say that Obamacare was a good idea.    This is not a political statement.  This isn't an anti-Obama statement.  This isn't a racist statement. This isn't a Republican vs Democrat thing.  This is simply what's going to happen.  Obamacare will increase the workload on the healthcare professionals while at the same time restricting their pay.  This is going to cause exactly the situation quoted above.    Before you all burn me at the stake, let me state that I'm not saying that American healthcare doesn't need reform.  It needs reform.  In a big way.  But Obamacare is not the reform it needs.  Obamacare will make the situation even worse, not better.
And you don't pay close enough attention to who you're replying.
why don't we take all the Indian doctors that are coming to USA and send them to Japan?
This comes up in conversation a lot right? 
Except for the issues couldn't be more different.  Here are two age distribution graphs, one for the [USA](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/d/d9/2010_age_distribution_graph-Windom.PNG), one for [Japan](http://tfw.cachefly.net/snm/images/nm/pyramids/ja-2003.png) (unfortunately I couldn't find a unified source for these two, but these are roughly the correct distributions)  The issue with Japan is, if you look at the bottom of the graph, the sharp decrease in younger populations.  This is the indicated 'population that is living longer and with fewer young people entering the workforce', where tax revenue is no longer being supplied by the elderly, and the burden largely falls to the younger (and fewer).  It's in no way indicative of public health care, and not really a problem that is facing the USA.  (that's not to say that there might not be other problems, but the issue in Japan is entirely different than anything occurring in the United States)
well not really, but sometimes it feels like it. 
unfortunately thats not how it works here. its more "we have the technology to save your wife but it costs way more money than you have. Would you like a pamphlet about funeral homes that you can't afford?"
As I read a lot of misconceptions, both here and on this site, I'd like to clarify, as a French, some important points about the whole situation.  * First of all, it's a local decision, schools are handled locally, so such a decision is the town's mayor responsability, and only affect one school, not the whole country, so don't react as it's a country wise decision from the government * In the vast majority of school, there's accomodation for special cases (during Ramadan for exemple) * A kid during school time is on school full responsability, so if a kid stays for lunch, it's supposed to be the school that provide him, like everyone else * Meals are usually paid in advance on a monthly basis, so it's hard to consider different paying options only for just a few days a month  In that particular case, alternative meal were provided, but wasted, so they decided to cut them.  The "sous-préfet" (a more local authority representing the governement and the state) already asked the mayor to revert its decision.
Lick my balls.  Sincerely,   -Washington and Colorado
Loercase is wrong. It's not Americanzation they fear...it's British invasion. You see, the Earl of Sandwich (father of the the modern day sandwich) is a Brit and to bring his culinary invention into French schools is essentially to give in to their arch nemesis.
&gt;Japanese healthcare &gt; American healthcare.  Go to top of thread to hear my assertions.  
i sadly have to agree. what if they didnt research the drug. what happen then they should be rewarded for thier work:people dying means nothing. dying people dont pay workers. money pay workers
[deleted]
r/wtf
I hope they realize we won't get into another landwar in asia, we'll just bomb the shit out of them.
Source: average APM on battle.net decreased. 
&gt;if North Korea fucking destroys Kpop with a nuke I'll be furious  I would go over there, and personally end Kim Jong-un.
Besides the point, but how did this guy manage to get to 25 hospitals, one from the next, get inside and try to be admitted all in 120 mere minutes?
BBC News clipping of his last hours:  http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-latin-america-21674950
[cnn confirms](http://www.cnn.com/2013/03/05/world/americas/venezuela-chavez-main/index.html?hpt=hp_t1)
[deleted]
Once I wasn't eating pork. Worst five minutes of my life.
I think the situation will stabilize quickly except if Maduro wants to take control. The current government isn't immediately threatened by anything, and the opposition has confidence that they could win the next election due to Chavez having been such a significant political figure that his successors will have a hard time evoking the same messianic atmosphere.
IMO what's really sketch are the doctors who get sponsored by pharma companies in exchange for prescribing their drugs. Man when I see a doc wearing big pharma patches on his lab jacket it freaks me out. As for politics I know what you mean. I live in SF and work in South San Francisco, this city was designed by and for big pharma. Regulations, even environmental ones pertaining to dumping change city to city where they exchange the local environment for all that tax money and jobs they generate.
[deleted]
Did you read the article I linked?  Why does no one do their research anymore?
Interesting days ahead.  Everyone, buy gas now.  Prices are about to skyrocket.
Technically correct. But interestingly enough, note that the person quoted in that part of the headline first used "Arab" (a racial term) as if it were a synonym for "Muslim." That particular fan, then, is conflating the religion and the race.
[deleted]
What happens next: Even though Chavez named a succesor(Nicolas Maduro), there is another person who has the military power and is president of the national assembly (Diosdado Cabello). Cuba has been living off Venezuela for 14 years, and Nicolas Maduro is the cuban's guy. The battle for the succesion between Maduro and Cabello is going to be nasty and horrible. This means internal Chavez party war. Elections should be held in 30/60 days, if a state of emergency is not declared. Violence is likely. The opposition has a leader (Henrique Radonsky), and if we manage to fight off all the traps set up at the Electoral Council, we are bound to win the elections. May Chavez rest in peace, and let's hope for a better future.
[deleted]
Despite what he did or what he did not do, I do not wish what he went through with this disease to anyone. I hope that his family can grief him properly and then move on.
You are distorting the truth. He shut down TV stations that aided the coup d'etat against him and only after many years and a lengthy judicial process. Venezuelan elections have been monitored by many international watchdogs and were proven to be fair.   And btw most Venezuelan on the internet and ex-pats are the disgruntled rich Chavez didn't agree to serve like most politicians do. The people who can't afford internet in Venezuela are the silent majority that voted for Chavez. 
A great socialist leader and a revolutionary. I know the common Venezuelan response on Reddit is anti-Chavez as it is coming from those opposed to him (usually from The rich right), but I find it hard to criticise a man who improved literacy rates, reduced poverty and removed key American neo-colonialism from his country and inspired a leftist Latin American revolution which increased the quality of life for millions more across the continent. In my opinion he is a great man who, albeit a bit flawed, was a good thing for Venezuela 
Ok. And your point is?
[deleted]
Is it possible that someone in a thread about latin america speaks english as a second language?  That's rhetorical. The answer is "Yes." Don't be a dick.
You capture it perfectly. In terms of Chavez, there are only absolutes: you either extremely hated the guy with a passion (i.e. you're a journalist and he cuts the cord on your news channel or radio) or you love him with a passion (he gives to the poor, etc). Both sides are bitter enemies of each other, and only one is going to win.
Those countries made *record* returns, becoming richer and more peaceful than ever.   You made a circlejerky comment that isn't totally true. Pax Americana has given the world a period of greater peace than we've known before. 
Because making money is more important than saving lives.
How can you forget about Panama...both in 1904 and in 1989?
Did you read? 47-hp two cylinder turbo-diesel engine paired with a 27 hp electric motor. 
Good Night Sweet Prince. 
Wow, this is amazing.
[deleted]
Knowing the world I've lived in for 19 years, immigrants.   But does it really matter?
So what SA cities are rapey?
Right, but the volume that Sony sells at is orders of magnitude higher than what most targeted drugs sell at.    Nexavar targets renal cell carcinoma, of which there are around 166,800 cases per year (RCC occurs in 80% of [kidney cancer cases](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kidney_cancer#Epidemiology)), and advanced cases of hepatocellular carcinoma as a last ditch effort (I couldn't find an exact number for this, there's about 500k hepatocellular carcinoma cases per year, but only a small fraction of those (metastatic and unresectable hepatocellular carcinoma) are treated with Nexavar). Assuming a volume of 200k/year from those stats, [4 billion for the cost of developing a new drug based on this article](http://www.forbes.com/fdc/welcome_mjx.shtml), a use case of the drug in 33% of the cases worldwide (a very generous estimate), and 3 month regimens of the drug, you're looking at four years of sales worldwide before they begin making a profit.    At that $175 cost? 114 years.    I agree that $5600 is a gouging cost for a life saving drug, but if we want to keep making these kinds of drugs we're going to have to keep paying that cost either out of pocket or through government subsidies. Letting generic versions of it into the market uncontrolled will mean it's no longer viable to develop these kinds of drugs in the first place. 
[deleted]
The poor live in slums and the rich live in villas because of geography?  Dafuq?
"not allowing to bring your own school lunch is communism" ha, America, keeping the red hydra off one lunch box at the time :-)
You seem to be taking it all pretty personally.  I'm circumcised and am happy I am and that it happened when I have zero recollection of it. 
For now.
Nichevo is not a saying, it is simply the word nothing I have no idea where you got the rest of your bullshit from. It is never used as a flat response to a tragic even or a statement of inability to rectify the current situation. It can be used in the following form, what do you have in your right hand, Nichevo. So please don't make up random shit or repeat crap you might have heard from someone at some point.
LOL terrorists who refuse to integrate into Israeli society because they think Israel should be a muslims only country get given their own mode of transport out of this refusal, then go about destroying them. Just shows where being a religious retard gets you.
That's because it's plastic
Access to the best practitioner range multivitamins for women is available to all users who create a free account at Hygiology.com.au. Multivitamins for women are available to females interested in optimising their health and wellbeing. The Hygiology range of health supplements are scientifically proven and provide maximum efficacy.
ever hear of FARC?  http://www.aljazeera.com/news/americas/2011/05/20115115856153893.html 
what did he do? he tried to fix venezuela but he couldnt.
It is in Europe however, and I think this is a bad case of dey terk our jerbs but Anti-American style.
Semen and Beans are complementary proteins
[deleted]
Yeah. I also wonder that an internal civil war would be also a great way to solve the issue without an international war.   However this is hard because as i read the other day on the web at http://www.nknews.org/ . The north korean find it hard to organize and rebel due to lack of the basic need of food! They have no food or anything basic to rebel.   And also.. who says when they rebel that the NK government wont use bloody violence such as small nuclear bombs against the rebels to stop the revolution.. in which case the un would get involved and start a war.  No matter where i look this from i always end up in the conclusion that a war will happen no matter what :( sad but true.
[deleted]
[This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=9LQj0ufQRdY#t=286s)
I want to believe.
I'll be honest, China's condemnation of the N.Korean nuke test was the best news I've read in a while. Their lack of interference with sanctions is good to see as well. 
Is saying better late than never just too predictable?  Probably.  But there it is anyhow.
There is legitimate competition, you just have to install something else. Downloading and installing software is all part of the computing experience. 
Why not both?!  http://www.barryboys.co.uk/photos22/56be1a5dfb34.jpg
I quite agree but Iran is actually more progressive towards trans females than some US states. 
[deleted]
China posts on Reddit-- where the ignorant posts (everything from 'China Spring' to WoW) are upvoted like crazy and the knowledgeable posts are downvoted into oblivion. Nice one Reddit. 
NICS is only applicable to federally licensed sellers, and only applies to criminals in the FBI's database (has nothing to do with the mentally unstable, for instance).
*Viva La Mexico* (sic)  happy now?
isnt the aljazera wahabi propaganda now arent you in ties with Israel guy's.... must have slipped 
That's how I read it too. You are not alone.
Most sane people would agree that needless suffering (as in, not the kind of suffering you put yourself through to benefit from later, and not the kind where a tiny amount of suffering causes a major source of benefit) is bad.  It's only through a combination of the need to reduce cognitive dissonance and the failure to empathize with the animals (partly because they are distanced from them) that people commonly disregard their suffering.  As a side note, this can even be seen with the way people fail to empathize with their fellow humans in distant lands.  So I would put your strawman of "all suffering bad" away.  I'd say the responsibility is on you to say why that seemingly needless suffering is justified.
That is no excuse.
I'm pretty sure the vietnamese don't want any more napalm.
I never heard him say that anyone should be poaching...  Just that people shouldn't be dying.
&gt;Buchannan is in my view the worst Carter second.  LOL, you didn't make this up. It's a real thing. They rate Presidents and Carter comes in at second worst.  Stop giving yourself all the credit. 
Yeah promoting death in response to death...Ahh...the self righteousness of reddit at its best. 
karma
&gt;Genetic diversity  What value does genetic diversity provide to sentient beings on our plant?
guess it's whoever is on watch at the time?
[deleted]
&gt;It creates a buffer zone so that two armies at war aren't in constant contact and when there are incidents it slows down the response time so that tensions are diffused.  I can see how that's works in the golan with the shelling of israel.  you are preaching about how DMZ work and I say that in the Golan it doesn't work because of the incompetent of the UN.  talking about how tasty a cake is then the UN bake you one that taste like crap.
[deleted]
got it!
Gelding is a pretty solid deterrent.
a half truth is a whole lie. 
oh look you actually dont know shit and are giving me unrelated retard media instead of study's or scientific research, nice day redditard 
Yea bro, all this money and prosperity... its really getting tiresome at this point... why cant we just be poor and decedent like your country? Can you teach us!?
[deleted]
It happened 3.5 times, right?
Its not in anger.  It's to stop even more innocent people from getting killed.  
Nah the person you're replying to there is a fucking asshole. Who said this person wants to be named breanna. clearly meant to be an insulting comment, so feel free to belittle them right back.
Infotamement != news. 
Oh come on, I'm in the US for business and now they're threatening with this shit? Wait for me to leave please.
[deleted]
As someone of a similar political/social mindset, I agree.  This kind of idiocy on NK's part can not be tolerated. 
"The touch, the feel, of cotton - the fabric of *their* lives!"
It's like watching a crazy guy on tv trying to commit suicide by flashing his gun at the police
What the public is fed doesn't necessarily represent the truth.  China's influence in NK may extend much further than anyone expects.
problematic for the people taking their own lives instead of catapulting their country into the new era of awesomness.
&gt; with China's help  FTFY
They don't actually own as much debt as people like to think.  http://globalpublicsquare.blogs.cnn.com/2011/07/21/who-owns-america-hint-its-not-china/
[deleted]
US ACTUALLY preemptively striked against "aggressors"
It's possible that he's not really calling all the shots &amp; internal conflict is getting him mixed up in this mess. 
Though his real strengths lie in rebounds and not assists.  
[deleted]
I think the issue is whether Goldman had information that they had a duty to disclose to both sides of the deal.  If there was information that was relevant to the deal that Goldman did not disclose to the other fund (because they were benefitting from repeat fees from Paulson), this is potentially a problematic conflict of interest.
My simple point is that ignoring threats does not justify the end. We have been keeping the DPRK a float this way for a few simple reasons.   Alleviation of famine for the population.  Strengthening diplomatic ties in order to help citizens (see Clinton era diplomacy)  Avoidance of economic turmoil by mass exodus of immigration.  Avoidance of last ditch effort by DPRK where the instant release of artillery and chemical weapons kills god knows how many.  I'm sure you stood by Bush when he turned them into the axis of evil and put those children in their place. Look what it did. It undid decades of carefully done diplomacy, isolated them more and forced us to deal with these bull shit tantrums on a more regular basis.
[deleted]
[deleted]
The rules of humor are such that the amount of fun allowed to be made is directly proportional to the size of the sin of the target.  In this case, it's an 8M big sin.
Thanks you two, very interesting. I learned something today! 
I was thinking of "The Thing" also. Classic flick!
North Korean leaders, rope, lamp posts.  Some assembly required by North Korean people.
Also Carlie Rae is Canadian. Theyre keeping the Canadaness contained.
Wikki is valid and has citations for all it's bullshit. 
If you can void a ceasefire then were they every truly "obliged to not attack" South Korea?
I thought all Iowa-class were in US ports or half-converted to museums.  I know they can set sail, I just figured it took longer to recommission them.  I know Reagan did it to counter Soviet destroyer groups.  In 1991, the Navy hoped that Iraqis would hit a battleship with an Exocet cruise missile, or Silkworm (French and Chinese Tomahawk equivilants, respectively.).  Those missiles can take out a light armored frigate without detonating, but on an Iowa-class, it might scratch off the paint.
[deleted]
That's correct. It depends on whether the receiving country accredits the diplomat or not. If accredited, the DI stands and you're pretty much left with the persona non grata options if things turn bad. BUT if the person is not accredited or his DI has been revoked before he reenters the country, he's like everyone else. That's why arrest warrants can be issued for people like Milosevic or African dictators and such.
No need for US involvement.  South Korea can handle themselves just fine.
Woooooooo,baby, this is what I live for!
One step closer to receiving some freedom!
It's reverse *reverse* psychology. The North Korean military/political mind is fiendishly clever. 
I've been to LAX. No big loss there.
Sinking a South Korean Navy vessel in 2010 and killing the sailors on board was a fairly clear indication of the respect NK grants "non-aggression" treaties. Today's news should elicit only a yawn from senior strategists.  And we're running out of yawns.
[deleted]
&gt;*Yes. Theyve pretty much cancelled the only thing stopping them from open conflict now.*  You really think a piece of paper is the only thing stopping them from open conflict?
Please never cite the Daily Mail when discussing well... anything really, but especially medicine/science.
Two cents? You mean 2 Jeon? 
First of all this isn't '"my fear", I was merely stating the controversy. The possible pros and cons that people believe in and offering alternative ways of dispelling the myths about gm foods.   "It isn't a "OH GEE I WONDER IF CAN GET EYEBALLS ON A PEACH""  I wasn't stating this. There are a minority of people who have sensitivity to even trace amounts of certain substances even things which aren't commonly "allergens". They have stated their voice on this subject and I am merely making it known. A hardier gm apple being sold next to a common apple that a sensitive person is capable of reacting to is probable. Actually this happens now, there are some people that who can even get sick consuming hybrid apples. Obviously, this is not such a concern to the wider community but to groups of people who have issues. Perhaps I made my statement too broad, if this is the worst issue it certainly isn't a large one, however it is one.  BTW. People have crossed different species of produce with what I think are fantastic results ,and I do look forward to a day when I can consume them. 
[deleted]
I'll drink to that. And in the end, I think it'll somehow just blow over again. 
One of the best comments I've ever seen in my two years of Reddit.
He could, you know, STOP BEING A FUCKING COMMUNIST DICTATOR. That might help. 
This. The Chinese supported North Korea during the Korean War and the North Vietnamese during the Vietnam war not because they were fans of communism, but because they wanted a buffer between them and the US. The Vietnamese, Chinese, and Soviets actually all hated each other, but offered support during these wars because of common interests. One of the biggest misconceptions of the Cold War is that all of these communist states were in cahoots. This is simply not true. Hell, the Vietnamese were the ones that toppled Pol Pot
:(
[deleted]
Well I can say this, if you have ever watched any North Korean documentaries they are brainwashed hard. It is literally religion to them that the Kims are gods.  I don't think they would just join South Korea in a snap, we'll just have to see.
No, I mean even if you "fix" the leadership and say "huzzah, you're free!" there is still a large amount of thinking, hard working humans who probably bought into all of it.  
The issue isn't whether the North Korean government deserves to be stripped of power. The real issue, as anyone involved in East Asian diplomacy will tell you, is that there's no good answer to the question, "Are you willing sacrifice the population of Seoul in order to do it?"  Estimates and predictions vary wildly of North Korea's capacity and willingness to attack Seoul in the event of a conflict, and there will be a terrible human cost if we get it wrong. That's North Korea's primary leverage, and they're not going to give it up.
I should print a nuke
or maybe just intra-country. 
Guys, this is starting to get a little bit real now, well its their own funeral...
Why on earth is South Korea's rating so low? 
Sorry, but please do your research before going around saying things like "You really have no understanding on the evolution and development of agriculture do you? Seeds aren't "genetically altered" to only last one planting season"  I makes you look like a dumb-ass.   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monsanto#Terminator_seeds  http://www.triplepundit.com/2011/04/monsanto-pays-reparations-developing-world-terminator-seeds/  Also, firephoxx is basically correct. It's not the GM per say.. it's *using GM to engage in monopolistic practices* that is the problem. We developed monopoly law for a reason... and we need to be using it. 
[deleted]
South Korea is already a powerful country, and currently its held back by constant fear of war with the north (Seoul is well within artillery range of the northern border), and with the north generally messing them about.  now imagine north north out of the picture (so no fucking them about), then reduce the military expenditure, and give them over twice the land mass, an extra 20 million people and a land border with Russia and China.  obviously there would likely be complications, but they would probably be resolved within a decade or so.
The headline is sensationalized. They didn't say NK will vanish, they said that the NK *regime* will. There's a difference, the first one requires a bunch of nukes, the second only a couple of bunker busters.
http://openchannel.nbcnews.com/_news/2013/03/07/17227424-exclusive-iran-was-holding-bin-laden-son-in-law-abu-ghaith-us-officials-say?lite  &gt; One Iranian official, former U.N. ambassador Javad Zarif, told NBC News in the mid-2000s that "no nation has captured as many al-Qaida members as Iran." US officials admit that other than some mundane communications, they were unaware of any significant roles played by the group while in captivity.  This doesn't sound like Iran "allowed him to hide in Iran" or how it's spun in the media ATM. But I'm not sure why Iran let him go in 2010.
SK will democracy the shit outta them
Dood, have you heard of teh obamacare trackin' chips? Thank god for infowars.
Slander isn't banned, it's just actionable in civil courts.  Breaching a contract is not a violation of any criminal law, and in some circumstances one doesn't even have to pay damages.  
You probably have to envision this like wikipedia.  In the beginning it was pretty limited and you really couldn't get as much information out of it as you wanted, making you do more work for yourself.  Now you can get a ton of information without trying.  Right now, this database has few situations that will help only a few robots, requiring the robot to have the hardware to do complex calculations.  In the future if it is constantly updated, tasks can be quickly learned and that processing power can go towards other tasks.  Eventually, robots may not even need complicated equipment and just access this database for all their needs.
I'd actually read that book/see that movie. It would have to be a comedy though, or directed by Micheal Bay.
&gt;nuclear facilities  &gt;power infrastructure  &gt;missile guidance  one of these things is not like the others
So you're taking back what you said about them not understanding the force?  You're too hard to follow, I'm done.  Besides, we're literally just arguing over our completely unsubstantiated opinions.  Neither of us has any idea what NK knows or what they believe about their own military.
My theory about this whole situation is that North Korea is completely out of money and is falling apart with the loss of Kim Jong Ill. So the only thing they can do is invade the south, loose and hopefully unify Korea under the south while still maintaining their honor. The problem is that the north has everything to gain while the south would just essentially be subsidizing the entire reconstruction effort 
If there is anything I have learned from the comments section of Reddit, it's that there is ALWAYS a relevant XKCD.
[deleted]
pffffh,  If only we could reason.  We'll feel a little shitty when the country is completely obliterated. 
Yeah, I agree, but when we're talking about the Short amount of time in question, before the target is hit with CB fire(which sounds like a totally sweet name for a Rapping truck driver, but I digress) is short as in under two minutes at most, including travel times for shells both ways. They'd get one to three shots off at most, per battery, with most batteries not being able to reach very much of any importance.  Plus, they don't have the range to hit any really dense civilian populations. They'll be able to tag the outer part of Seoul for the most part, if that, but I'd hardly call that section of the city densely populated.  I'm not saying there won't be casualties, naturally - but not nearly in the numbers I think you're expecting.
they wouldnt hurt dennis rodman
Freedom is Slavery
Yes, using a nuke on Pyongyang would be an attack on millions of civilians, which would be a humanitarian catastrophe regardless the regime. Not to mention the lingering shame from having your radioactivity remain for decades as a reminder of the devastation that took place that day.  I really only see dictatorships or violently overthrown, volatile governments using nukes these days. And even then under extreme circumstances. _Maybe_ North Korea, but it'd have to be on "North Korea level" of crazy.
If the US *really* wants to "respond", then the "Korea first attack" *will* happen.
[deleted]
thank you
Thought this was interesting given the recent UN peacekeeper hostage taking by Syrian rebels.
Color me shocked that people who couldn't get hired as actual security guards suck at security.
North Korea doesn't' have lunch money...
An invasion on South Korea or the USA?
And they are right, if Saddam had nukes he would have been vaporized. 
I noticed that too. They must not have oil.
What?  Calm the NKs down and then commit an act of war against them?  Your Special Forces aren't magic men.  They are skilled soldiers, but they can (and are) killed by other people.  There is no reason to believe that their equivalents on the NK side are not equally dangerous either. Why would they feel restrained about doing commando raids on Seoul - or Toronto - if that is how we going to treat diplomatic negotiations.
The US aren't stupid enough to try and fuck with China like that. Drones in Pakistan are a lot different than drones over the NK-Chinese border.
&gt; EVERYONE MUST KNOW THAT I DON'T CARE
[deleted]
[deleted]
I don't think a professor would take this big a risk, just to get laid.
They don't have to.
Historically you probably don't want to compare body counts.
It's pretty fucking clear he knew exactly what  he was doing and this story is the lie. 
Is it? Care to explain why? Defend your position.  Oh, that's right. You can't. And neither can the rest of you idiots who downvoted me to -12 and counting without a single rebuke. Because I'm right.  It's so simple. Radioactivity kills life. We're working really hard to make our environment radioactive. When our environment is sufficiently radioactive it will KILL US.  If you can't rightly comprehend this then I hope you enjoy the painful, cancerous death that awaits humanity. This is far worse than any bits of satellite floating around in space.
I don't think he was referring to this guy..
Well USA its a country of freedom and they have been fucking with governments less powerfull than theirs for more than half a century now... And when shit happens its always the lack of freedom that people have "over there", not because they arrange elections or coup d' etat this and that country, that generate hate between locals.
Of course this was a hate crime. When did I say it wasn't.. I was just elaborating on mob mentality. It is the same worldwide in essence that an angry mob always does terrible things. Angry mobs in Pakistan are no exception. 
A real nigga.
Ahhh, there's nothing quite like American freedom and democracy... Why does my nation financially support these human rights violators again? Oh that's right, for corporate profits, I forgot...
Holy shit, his name shall be remembered.
I think 4 years later and after his death it's kind of pointless to discuss now.
**I'll Just Leave These Right Here . . .**  1. http://chamorrobible.org/images/chamorrobibleproject/map-west-pacific-islands-1998.jpg      Via: http://chamorrobible.org/chamorrobibleproject/map-west-pacific-islands-1998.htm via http://chamorrobible.org  2. http://chamorrobible.org/images/photos/gpw-20050304-UnitedStates-DefenseVisualInformationCenter-DN-SC-86-06115-BGM-109-Tomahawk-cruise-missile-detonation-over-target-San-Clemente-Island-California-19860401-large.jpg      Via [#6 at http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-20050304.htm](http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-20050304.htm)      Watch "[Tomahawk Missile Variants](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=19XXTArAGaM#t=1m13s)" starting at 1 minute and 13 seconds ("TLAM I C Programmed Warhead Detonation"): [http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=19XXTArAGaM#t=1m13s](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=19XXTArAGaM#t=1m13s)  3. http://chamorrobible.org/images/photos/gpw-20060917-UnitedStatesNavy-070814-N-6009S-001-fighter-jets-B-52-Stratofortress-aircraft-carrier-strike-groups-Pacific-Ocean-Guam-20070814-large.jpg      http://chamorrobible.org/images/photos/gpw-20060917-UnitedStatesNavy-060618-N-8492C-212-fighter-jets-B-2-Spirit-aircraft-carrier-strike-groups-Philippine-Sea-Guam-20060618-large.jpg      Via: [#32 and #24 at http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-20060917.htm](http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-20060917.htm)  4. http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-200905.htm   5. http://chamorrobible.org/images/photos/gpw-20060917-UnitedStatesAirForce-050705-F-MJ260-001-B-2-Spirit-F-15E-Strike-Eagles-Andersen-AFB-Guam-20050705-huge.jpg      Via: [#30 at http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-20060917.htm](http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-20060917.htm)  6. Federated States of Micronesia: http://chamorrobible.org/images/chamorrobibleproject/map-federated-states-of-micronesia-1999.jpg via http://chamorrobible.org/chamorrobibleproject/map-federated-states-of-micronesia-1999.htm via http://chamorrobible.org      [The defense of the Federated States of Micronesia](https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/fm.html) is the responsibility of the United States of America. Source: https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/fm.html  7. "[Ferocious, Weak and Crazy: The North Korean Strategy](http://www.stratfor.com/weekly/ferocious-weak-and-crazy-north-korean-strategy)" by George Friedman, published on 29 January 2013: http://www.stratfor.com/weekly/ferocious-weak-and-crazy-north-korean-strategy      "[The United States in Korea: A Strategy of Inertia](http://www.stratfor.com/weekly/united-states-korea-strategy-inertia)' by George Friedman, published on 27 March 2012: http://www.stratfor.com/weekly/united-states-korea-strategy-inertia  
Now this is when we use the word hero. 
Yeah, well having a child isn't exactly what most men consider a "gift"...
Riiiiight. Totally our fault for the constant stream of mob attacks incensed by mere allegations of blasphemy.  This makes no fucking sense.  No one stands to gain much by hating on Islam. But there is just cause for outrage when people are being lynched and their possessions and livelihoods destroyed because they dissed Islam - causing no literal harm to any other party.
This is why the EU blows, why the fuck is a trading bloc telling trying to shape our thought processes?
I understand what they want to do in the short term but the risk for this to be abused, and legally, is what concerns me.
My guess is that you don't end up with *"cool"* slow motion videos of the bullet traveling through a transparent gel.
I said this same exact thing earlier this week and got downvoted to hell.
Well, that graphic isn't taking the coriolis effect into consideration, so I seriously doubt how accurate it's range estimations are in general.
Lots of silly assumptions about NK not being a rational state.
http://i.imgur.com/CFVSleN.jpg
Japan was experimenting with plague bio-weapons in WW2 in Manchuria. Unit 731 narrowly escaped war crimes for it. 
As a chemist who wiki'd mustard gas I can confirm this.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sulfur_mustard
Forbes is a joke
north korea will never fire any missles at anyone
Credible threat to the US?  No. Credible threat to US allies? Yes. NK is allies with China, Iran, Russia as well, but we don't know how those allies will react.  US doesn't have the money to wage additional wars, even more so when the other side can actually fight back and has a high state of patriotism.  NK wouldn't launch missiles towards the US, but SK is an option or military bases surrounding Iran?  NK would be heavily damaged with return fire from SK, but in saying that I don't know how the US would respond either.  If the US responds, we might see China, Iran and even Russia respond as well.  The US can't fight all of those fronts, the US is broke.  I see this being really complicated, but at the end of the day I believe nothing is going to come of it.
Until it's time to get fucked.
Here's another quote from he article  &gt;The report is widely cited in the international press as well as cited in peer reviewed academic journals  I can understand the philosophical objections, but all forms of government are a compromise, and this is a system that demonstrably works better than most. Separating the head of state from any real power is definitely more effective than a presidential system, which isn't used by any of the top sixteen countries in the list.
I agree with your orginal statment btw, just never understood that saying, now i do :-)
At least you'll have a nice buzz going during your fiery thermonuclear doom.
[deleted]
&gt; In this case, there is expert opinion AND expert consensus...  Yes, there is. That makes it a valid appeal to authority. It does not, however, make any appeal to authority a good argument - including this one, which was what I criticized in the first place.
So you support Argentina colonising the Falklands against the will of the population because you are against colonialism? 
Juno was FAR from uncontested  
you don't believe that yourself, do you?
In fact it was a hyper reactor that worked through nuclear fusion.  Unfortunately, as the exact specifications were classified we don't know much more about them.
Not all prostitution.  Legal, regulated and relatively safe prostitution is possible and would be better than the types in place where there is prohibition against the sex trade.  It's definitely not for everyone and nobody should be forced into it, but imo people are going to engage in prostitution, legal or not, and it might as well be made safer and be given a legal approach.
&gt;This is like the US, Britain, Canada, **AND Mexico, Poland, Belgium, Czechoslovakia, the Dutch, the Australians and the New Zealanders**  I find it hilarious that Canada is always sad that people forget they helped in D-day, but then they ALWAYS forget the other dozen countries that also sent troops to Normandy.  That's like someone complaining to the teacher because the bully stole their lunch money, and then after they complain about it they go out into the hallway and start beating up other kids and taking their lunch money.
I believe it happened in Spain during the 30s. Churches were burnt by atheists. 
[deleted]
Yes.
Sweden has an "Equality Minster"?
To learn about ghosts? 
So what's your explanation for husband beaters and Aileen Wuornos? 
Not necessarily. Targeted air strikes would be extremely effective; we have at least one carrier in the area, and their technology is so outdated we could just turn their artillery and military installations into dust. Yeah, they'd get shots off, and Seoul would probably get shelled quite a bit, but if we wanted to take out their military infrastructure it would work just fine. Their soldiers are barely fed, and so horribly equipped that when a few hundred tanks roll across their border you know they're not putting up a real good fight.
No, that was just the context of my original statement: That the american justice system is vulnerable to exploitation by these groups.
  The NRA thinks it works.
so lame
ahh, i can definitely see how you got that. poor wording on my part, sorry folks :p
Yea but when you have a country run by completely unqualified forces, you can't always expect that kind of logic.
Then they perhaps they'll all breed each other out of existence eventually while educated and progressive Jews get the hell out and leave them to it?
Geez, I don't support the University, they should help their students as much as possible, but if you are traveling to a foreign country, you need to learn the culture.  He should never have gone back to the police after he ran away.  Are there any highly religious authoritarian countries that have honest and fair police and justice system?  Especially towards foreigners, even more so towards foreign journalists.  I really hope he gets out of this situation safely, but he just learned a valuable lesson, get out while your ahead.
Poor Alaska.
Stop wishing for an armchair general's take on mass media's take on this. It might make for a good read but there is too much speculation here. All you are going to get here is, like below, memes and parroting.  The internet does not afford the luxury of predicting the future based on up and downvotes. 
Nuclear war is imminent and you guys are making bad puns? Now that's just Seoulless.
Actually, according to Slavoj Zizek (the philosopher who most often points out the missing category), unknown knowns are the subconscious ideas that we repress in order to believe our own BS.  In other words, Rumsfeld knew that there were no WMDs in Iraq, but he intentionally lied to himself that he didn't know it so that he could accept the views of his ideology.
Every living thing has the force.   It is also the excuse used by Lucas to explain how the Ewoks beat the most elite squad of Stormtroopers using stone age technology. 
There is probably a fancy word for it. My way of explaining it is life is boring as shit right now. There is no drama in our lives everything is easier than it ever has been. So our countries getting nuked would probably make us feel more alive than we have ever felt so far.
I've been looking for other sources with this information, but so far nothing. Then again this was the first source I saw that reported the severed communication line. This is crazy
Hooray! Our problems are solving each other!
The US wouldn't drop a nuke because it had to, it would do it because if you let one country use a nuke without getting nuked back then it makes it less scary for the next country that wants to nuke somebody.
This is delightfully disturbing.
what a terrible shame.
No, the armistice has not been voided regularly. The other formal peace pacts have been voided before and the hotline has been cut repeatedly, but the armistice being voided is why everyone is caught up in this instead of ignoring it like normal.   edit: Clarification, it has not formally been voided before although NK has sunk a South Korean fishing vessel and fired a few missiles in 2010. 
It's time the international community did what it should of done decades ago and ended the North Korean regime. You can argue places like Syria and Iran are legitimate governments just demonized by the west. But there is no denying the fact that North Korea is doing things on par with the holocaust within their borders and the international community has ignored it for far too long just to maintain peace and stability.
They just probably forgot to pay the phone bill.
or Chosun, even
Well, this was fun to read before I head to bed. Hopefully I won't wake up to war being broadcast on TV.  They are so unpredictable, who knows what they are planning right now.
Where's the dragon mmo?
Can't tell if troll account, or just a dipshit...
I think you're overstating the *internal* importance of Juche... see http://www.amazon.com/Cleanest-Race-Themselves-Melville-Publishing/dp/1935554344 .  If you haven't read it, the thesis of the book is that Juche is bullshit brought out for foreign consumption, and the ideology presented to North Korean citizens is an offshoot of Japanese nationalist propaganda presented in Korea during the occupation.
Downvoted for condescension.  Son.
I agree. Basically private companies can hire anyone in university to work for them on contracts. That's why in China, PhDs call their superviser "boss". Government officials also have their own companies, and so on.
I would say that there is an 80% chance they do something like they did in 2010 when they sunk a ship and shelled a SK island with artillery.
The presence of US and allied soldiers in Afghanistan is inexcusable.   I have no pity for them. They paid the price.  If two Australian soldiers died, I would say the same thing.
[deleted]
Studies have shown time and time again that homeschool kids turn out not only fine, but better in many ways. The concept of sending your kid off for hours a day is fairly new in human history. 
Shit.
[deleted]
Has this ever happened before? 
Even though it's highly unlikely, I honestly hope that the country erupts into civil war for some reason. Let itself do the work, then move in and give them some freedom.
[deleted]
werewolf assholes??
Children.
As has been pointed out by numerous analysts, the North Korean Army is in shitty shape and, despite its size, will fold quickly.  Plus, they have literally zero air support.
[deleted]
Okay, and I choose to think lowly of your aspirations and achievements.
"That is not dead which can eternal lie, And with strange aeons even death may die."
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is the [crazy dude](http://freethoughtblogs.com/pharyngula/2013/01/18/chandra-wickramasinghe-repliesand-fails-hard/) that runs http://journalofcosmology.com/  I thought all his theories have failed to prove his view that life came from space.
Cause W Bush had an agenda. This type of saber rattling isn't the first for NKorea.  What does the new sanctions have to do with the people starving? North Korea can't sustain itself.   http://www.cnn.com/2013/03/07/world/asia/un-north-korea-sanctions/index.html  &gt;The goal of the new sanctions is to stymie the activities of North Korean banks and cash couriers who might be funneling money to the secretive regime's nuclear and missile programs. It will be tougher for the regime to move large sums of cash stuffed into suitcases, Rice said. The U.N. resolution also outlines measures to step up scrutiny of suspicious sea shipments and air cargo. And it expands restrictions to encompass several institutions and senior officials in the North's weapons industry, as well as a range of materials and technology known to be used in uranium enrichment.
I think that nuking someone would have to come as an act of desperation. Kim Jong Un would basically have to pray that after nuking part of the US, the rest of us would say "Give him whatever he wants. We don't want to be nuked again." He surely knows that his only prayer would be a quick war with huge casualties. We'd win a conventional war without a doubt. 
I don´t think so. They could just build a big wall. They are experienced in those things.
I believe there are two kinds of people: Those who live to work, and those who work to live.  I think that while people who let their work define and drive them generally achieve more, they are usually less happy.  Asian cultures seem to stongly stress productivity and status over happiness. Sometimes it's alright just to be happy with where you are in life.
The UN is only a credible source when the conclusions they reach fit in nicely with my preconceived views of what the truth is!
&gt; Then what will the alternatives be?  From my previous post:  &gt; There are many good alternatives.  &gt; I work for the company that provides alternatives to animal testing. We use human cell cultures as test models. It is much cheaper and often more relevant than using animals. We can predict most of the possible toxicities. The only real challenge is [ADME](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/ADME), but it will be sorted out soon enough.  &gt; Edit: Well, another "real" challenge is to get through bureaucracy to make new technologies official way of testing.  To elaborate:   Our approach is to to create "human" testing in the tube, so to say.   Currently, our company use already the following human cells as test "subjects":  - liver cells,  - skin cells,  - lung cells,  - intestinal cells  - neural cells  The plans are to expand our cell panel to represent all major organs and tissues.   New technologies (like ours) are maturing pretty fast. I just wish that regulatory institutions would be just as fast to adopt them.   
Its better that those children die and go to heaven than be raised by the government.
or a bakery that constantly bakes fresh bread, and a giant fan to send the smell northwards. 
*facepalm*
I am well aware of it, but I am also aware of the fact that throwing around secondary-school terms like 'strawman', 'red herring' or 'ad hominem' does not constitute as a refutation of a multi-faceted argument -- and nor does it make you smart at all, the manner in which you utilise these hackneyed cliches. It's like the trite and insouciant 'correlation =/= causation' or 'sample size n-1' on /r/science. None of these things are *wrong*, but neither are they a substitute for a real argument. Hence why /r/science now often frowns on such comments.    I also made the point of explaining that cosmetics do matter, they matter more than the male-dominated, woman-scoffing Reddit thinks. It is easy for a male redditor to dismiss cosmetics. I will do so too if I do not catch myself. However, when it's pointless bullshit that Reddit cares about, it's the end of the world of course... In all, I would say my post is less of a formal argument and more of a reaction and the things that I find less than likeable on Reddit. Bitching, whining, whatever you wish to call it. 
It should be noted that prayer is banned in the SAA. Also, the Fatwa declared that it's the duty of every Syrian to join the SAA and urged Muslims from all over the world to come and join Assad in his fight against the Zionist universal conspiracy.  The motive behind this move is unclear, maybe is Assad planning to officially invite Iran and other Shiite militia to defend him.
I prefer animal testing over human testing. I hope you realize this isn't just make-up though? All skin care products fall under cosmetics as well.  I'd really like this field to progress so that we don't need to suffer from fucked up skin.
Why would i eat other humans?
[Why] (http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1a21yz/delhi_gangrape_case_prime_suspect_ram_singh/c8tuhcd)
[deleted]
Too bad Lions can't kill people for "Acquiring a taste for Lion hides" 
&gt;Why is none of that rewarded by the market?  Because life is not about money. The market is meaningless in the grand scheme of things. As long as you are capable of living comfortably, the market does not matter. Money means nothing, it is just a tool to obtain goods with.  &gt;selective breeding  Why should we do something that will take millions of years to have actual benefits, when the benefits will still be limited?  &gt;We have to cut ourselves free of the deadweight  They are not dead weight. They are people. They have emotions. They have families. They have lives, they have **NAMES**. They are human beings just as much as you are.  You're an engineer, who gives a shit? You're still not capable of any sort of compassion for other people, you can work a glamorous job, that's fucking great, but you are a terrible person because you can't treat other people as human beings. You are valuable just by virtue of being a person, but everybody is valuable, that doesn't mean you're more valuable than anyone else.  As cruel as you are, I still recognize that you deserve happiness. I still recognize that you are a person, I still recognize that you have a right to not suffer.
It's probably for domestic consumption.  He started out nowhere near as powerful as his father or grandfather was and he needs some credibility.  Or he's doing all of this as a political move to keep the hard-line generals and leaders of the army off of him.  My money is on internal politics.
You think they make tests to make sure they save lives? They do it to make sure it doesn't kill you off.
You are overstating the autonomy of individual parishes.
In that regard, sunscreen is no different than any other cosmetic product (what happens when shampoo gets in your eyes?). New ingredients will have to pass in vitro toxicity tests (which the EU has been investing in for the past several years). 
In the US, sunscreen is classified as a drug by the FDA, however cosmetics with sunscreen are still under cosmetics.  The EU is behind on this as usual.
[deleted]
Good, more jobs for humans. I was sick of sexy pigs taking jobs away from us.
A single wing from an aircraft carrier to kill a 1.1m standing army and 8.2m reservists? 
&gt; if anything has to suffer or die  And how many of these situations involve a dichotomy where we are choosing life or death, particularly when it comes to cosmetics?  &gt;Animals don't pay taxes, they don't contribute to human society  This is a really creepy and dangerous way to decide who or what deserves rights, in my opinion.  &gt;they're neither sentient nor capable of grasping their own existence.  While I'm not a biologist and I can't say for sure, I have to ask how you can know this as a fact. Furthermore, why should this be criteria for who deserves to live or die and why wouldn't this apply to humans who lack this ability?
[deleted]
Psshh already built 3 in minecraft
Ugh no nuclear reactors on in Japan=Cool biz...
Or their water supply. North Korea already has no food a d destroying their infrastructure would cripple them.
or like Punchout, only Tyson fighting the little people instead of the other way around.
I never knew that communism - which includes the abolition of social hierarchy - allowed for slavery. Juche is not communism. They paid communism lip service to get the big bucks from China, who identifies as communist as a means of maintaining order (the elites can claim that they support the working class that way). 
I agree with you here. Collateral damage is a part of war anyways, but minimizing it is best. I just don't want us to carpet bomb them. We can secure important assets (i.e., all the things we'd bomb) with drones, small ground strike aircraft, and even infantry assault.  I'm basically saying "We don't even need to mar their country to remove the regime."
From what I understand, and thus could be completely off base, they like the help initially, but it's the rebuilding they don't like because we tend to fuck that up.
Apparently if you care about the electronics market, you don't care about human suffering.
In no way am I going to pretend oil was not a compelling factor in that war. To be fair though, Saddam also had no business invading Kuwait to begin with.
As long as you are sitting on your computer browsing Reddit, right?
Yeah just lik Iraq did with those WMD. Yeah just like that
When was this?
Basically the Islands where first discovered during the 1600's and Britain, Spain and France all had a variety of treaties over the various islands in the entire region which went back and forth a bunch of times.  1764: France builds a small naval base on the Eastern Island  1765: British Vice Admiral John Byron claims [Saunders Island](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saunders_Island,_Falkland_Islands) and the other parts of the Falklands for Britain, not knowing about the French naval base.  1766: France and Spain negotiate a deal in which France hands over the naval base to Spain.  1767: The Base is handed over.  1769: British and Spanish ships encounter each other while both are mapping the Islands and both claim the other side has no right to settle the islands.  1770: 5 Spanish ships with 1400 troops show up and Britain abandons the Islands while threatening war.  1771: Britain and Spain come to an arrangement in which the British get their territory back and Spain pays restitution. Spain later claims that the agreement contained a promise from Britain to give up the Falklands but there is no proof to support this.  1774: Britain decides to give up many of its smaller territories due to the economic pressure of the American war for independence.  1776: Britain leaves the Islands after creating and installing a plaque asserting their right to the territory.  1806: Spain recall their Governor from the Islands after creating and installing a plaque asserting their right to the islands.  1807: Britain blockades the islands and the settlers still on it face starvation.  1811: The settlers leave and the Islands effectively become the domain of Whalers and Sealers.  1816: Argentina is formed after The United Provinces of the Río de la Plata claim independence from Spain.  1820: Argentinian ship arrives at the Islands and claims them for Argentina.  1823: Argentina appoint a Commandant of the islands who never sets foot on them.  1825: The UK recognizes Argentina's independence from Spain.  1828: Luis Varnet establishes a settlement on the Islands after seeking permission from both Britain and Argentina.  1831: Vernet captures 3 American ships and imprisons their crew, America sends the USS Lexington who capture Vernets men and then offer to transport the settlers away from the Islands. All but 24 agree and they are left behind under Vernet's command.  1832: Argentina send a garrison to the Islands, the Captain of which is killed shortly after in a mutiny.  1833: Britain reestablishes control of the Islands, sends a representative and another to take over from Vernet. Charles Darwin shows up to look at the animals.   1840: Britain approves the formation of a colony on the Islands.  1841: Argentina offer to give up all claims on the islands if Britain forgives their debts to the city of london, Britain refuses.  1845: Britain builds Port Stanley which becomes the capital of the Islands.  1849: Islands population hits 200 when retired British soldiers and their families move to the Island.  1850: Britain and Argentina sign  “Convention between Great Britain and the Argentine Confederation, for the Settlement of existing Differences and the re-establishment of Friendship” which modern historians cite as negatively impacting Argentina's claims on the islands (British, Argentine and latin American historians).  1854: Britain creates a defence force on the islands in response to the Crimean war.  1859 - 1875 the Island is settled more and more by Britain with Darwin, Port Howard and Goose Green being created.  1881: The islands become financially independent from Britain.  1884: Argentina requests that a 3rd party resolves the dispute over the islands, Britain refuses. Argentina's first mention of the Islands in 34 years.  1888: Argentina lodges diplomatic protests with the UK.  1941: Argentina raises issue of sovereignty over the islands in a message to Congress, for the first time since signing the convention of settlement with Britain in 1850.  1945: Argentina states its claims on the Islands in its opening address at the newly formed United Nations.  1946: Britain includes the Islands under its administration under chapter XI of the UN charter.  1947: Britain offers to take the sovereignty of the islands to the International Court of Justice, Argentina refuses.  1948: Britain again offers to take the issue to the ICJ, Argentina again refuses.  1955: Britain unilaterally refers the sovereignty of the islands to the ICJ, Argentina insists it will not accept any judgement.  1960: The UN urges an end to colonization, Britain lists the Islands as a colony, Argentina objects.  1961: Antarctic treaty comes into effect, all sovereignty claims in the Antarctic region are suspended.  1964: Miguel Fitzgerlard lands on Stanley race course in a Cesna 172, plants an Argentinian flag and hands over a letter claiming sovereignty of the Islands to bemused locals.  1965: The UN calls for Britain and Argentina to reach a diplomatic solution.  1966: A DC4 is hijacked by 20 terrorists and lands on Stanley racecourse, islanders thinking the plane is in trouble rush to aid them only to be taken hostage. The terrorists are subjected to 24 hours of country and western music before surrendering and being repatriated to Argentina by the British. Argentinian divers are deployed by Submarine to scout for potential landing sites.  1967: Britain opens negotiations with Argentina stating its willingness to hand over sovereignty.  1968: The "Falkland Islands Emergency Committee" is formed by the Islanders and lobbies the UK over their wish to remain British.  1971: Britain agrees a deal which sees air links agreed with Argentina, the Argentinians agree to cease sovereignty claims while trying to win over the Islanders.  1973: New Argentinian president renews claims on the Islands to the UN, Britain refuses.  1976: RRS Shackleton is fired upon by an Argentinian destroyer, Britain protests and seeks a diplomatic resolution.  1977: Britain sends a Naval task force to the Islands while still trying to reach a diplomatic solution.  1978: The islanders open a London office to lobby UK Parliament over their wishes to remain British directly.  1981: British nationality act comes into force which strips many of the Islanders of their citizenship with Britain. Argentinian scrap dealer Constantino Davidoff visits the islands without permission and sets off a series of events that leads to the Argentinian invasion and occupation of the Islands.  1982: Argentina invades and occupies the Islands to distract their populace from economic ills, the UK sends a task force which successfully retakes the Islands in November. The UN calls for a diplomatic solution to the Islands future which the UK states will never happen so long as the Islanders wish to remain British.  1983: British citizenship restored to the Islanders.  1984 - 2013 Argentina keeps whining about the Islands, the UN keeps whining about a diplomatic solution, Britain keeps insisting that the Islanders get first say, the Islanders continually side with Britain.      
[deleted]
Lee to park, park passes it to park,park sets up for lee, AND LEE BLOCKS THE SHOT, OH MY GOD THAT WAS SPECTACULAR!!!
Still 10x the knowledge of /r/politics
It's Kim, Lee, Park, Chung, and Choi. As one of the five, I wish I had a rare last name. Shit's boring.
Oh man I forgot about that.  That's fantastic.  Hahahaha.
During the cuban missile crisis america set up basically a wall of ships against cuba and told Russia if they crossed it we would blow them the fuck up. Time came and they didn't cross it and the war was evaded. Sometimes you HAVE to muscle your way through fights.
[deleted]
wtf? carriers can be found on google maps? this was a big secret when i was in the navy, even when we had port calls, and where they would be.. mind slightly blown
You need more than a 12 room apartment to party in gods name !
I'm ashamed to say it, but I'm guilty of this.  I'm Australian and I live in South Korea. The US military here have garnered a somewhat bad reputation for causing trouble at night (bar fights, rape etc). So I've grown to be somewhat 'unfond' of them.  But right now? I feel regret for every doubting them. Knowing that there is a group of highly trained, attentive soldiers, working expensive, powerful weaponry, watching over the peninsula is relieving.  So I'm sorry for doubting you guys. I'm immensely happy with what you do for South Korea, and other countries in strife.  It's also worth noting that right now South Korea loves you (and rightly so). The news is constantly showing footage of your massive air craft carriers, tanks and aircraft. It's like a promo for 'MURICA.
I simply think that there ought to be laws which prohibit inflicting unnecessary suffering on animals, and that these laws should be especially strict in cases where the purpose of the testing is not to produce products which address medical needs. That's not an unrealistic aspiration. 
He detonated a test nuke a few weeks back and the UN said they were fed up with their saber rattling crap and imposed a shit ton of sanctions on them. Namely, no more food. Before the sanctions they were pretty close to starvation level, with the sanctions his Army will starve and be non-effective. Plus, they'll probably turn on him and the government right before resorting to canibalism. So, in a nutshell, the Dear New Leader has put himself in quite a pickle and could end up with a far worse fate than Momar Kadafi who slowly [died](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QJ64QQGBcG0) with a large knife shoved up his rectum after being pulled from a sewer pipe.   Tldr; don't test nukes and be a violent dictator- who could die bad.
 Once you go in and see all of these animals abandoned with no one to care for them, it would be difficult to turn your back on them and walk away.   One way or another, man is responsible for the animals we domesticate and since nobody else is willing to do it, Mr. Matsumura has stepped up.   男に関して
Shaq is a genie man. Have you ever seen Kazaam? Best horror movie ever.
Do you think so? You can't just let Americans and South Koreans have been murdered by the North, because then they'll do it again and again.  If they attack we should and I think will, completely destroy all of North Korea's high value targets and leadership and begin invading their country from the south, preferably with some agreement with China that they can attack from the North to maintain a buffer zone if they think they need one. 
Calling doctor bullshit. Calling doctor bullshit. 
"Disconcerting, to be sure, but I don't think that means they should be stateless either." Again, agreed. I'm not sure why you bringing up this argument. I'm not disagreeing with you.   The Palestinians have been fighting to destroy Israel since day 1 of Israel's existence. The conflict isn't causing their bigotry, their bigotry is causing the conflict.
&gt; Not really. It's common among many societies to refuse to accept medical treatment. When those people get sick, they consider it "God's will", and accept the outcome. An example are the Russian Old Believers. Rather, what people in those societies generally desire is a sense of autonomy. The ability to take care of themselves, and provide for their own necessities without being dependent upon government science or technology to survive.  These people are present in developed countries as well (people with "do not resusicate" orders, certain survivalists, etc), but in most countries and cultures, these people are a small minority. Even the Russian Old Believers you mentioned are near-extinct. The fringe societies that choose to stay away from medical conveniences will always have that choice - no one is forcing it on them. But the majority of humanity is quite interested in medical advances.  &gt; That's temporary however. We're living on borrowed time. Genetic defects that normally would have led to death now don't lead to death in us because of modern medicine, but we nonetheless pass those genes on to our children. Hence, when modern medicine falls away for whatever possible reason, those genetic defects will lead to massive death for a few generations until all defects are eliminated from our gene pool again.  You can't advocate against medical progress on the premise that if, for whatever implausible reason, ALL of modern medicine falls away, we would be stuck with potential resurgence of old medical issues. If you assume that all of the world's medical advances are temporary and not worth improving upon, then you extrapolate the same thing to every other facet of modern human culture. As a society, you can't shun human achievements because they might be taken away in some highly unlikely scenario.
I thought it was me talking about Brazil (but with no claims over an island). 
No, we didn't in Afghanistan.  There was no standing army.  In Iraq, we wiped Iraq's army out.  The North Korean military cannot stage an insurgency, because they lack food supplies.
Yes, they really whooped us.
The eastern european experiment failed because they tried to plan an economy. Get rid of capitalism and you lose the ability to efficiently set prices which means resources cannot be allocated properly. Eventually your system will be on deaths door. Its just a matter of time before North Korea collapses for the same reason that the soviet union did- centrally planned economies can never work.   Looking forward to hearing why this is untrue from the legions of communist redditors! 
If you live down here (American who moved to Uruguay several years ago) you know how god damn stupid Argentines typically are.  How the hell the Kirchners get elected is more or less a worldwide running joke.  Peronism has led to massive poverty and increases in crime that you'd only see in Venezuela... or Sao Paulo.  Presently, even compared to the height of their government's national debt default, Argentines are probably worse off than ever.  You're seeing inflation on the order of 2002 *every single year* now... and Kirchners are doing insane things like banning the use of USD bank accounts, creating a 20% (or 15%?) "tax" on exchanges from Argentine pesos to USD, etc.  Anyone with the least bit of understanding in economics knows the result of such behavior.  I wish Uruguay would have signed the free trade agreement Bush offered them to get out of Mercosur, but they didn't want to remove their anonymous business ownerships (which is typically required by the US to feed into the giant IRS life sucking machine)
Perhaps I failed to properly impart my point. I picked the wrong words so let me rephrase it. Its disheartening to see a story that is intertwined in a people's identity be so skewed for the benefit of a completely other undeserved group. Of course some level of alteration is necessary to create the level of suspense expected for a thriller, but this is so far beyond the true heart of the story. The Iranian hostage crisis is a shining beacon of international cooperation and selflessness amongst like-minded allies. The ambassadors from Canada, New Zealand, and Britain all risked far more than was asked of them, and when considering the Canadian contribution, did far more than would ever be expected. Rather than portray that, Argo decided to devise an alternate history representation that made the American CIA the heroes. Its one thing to alter a story for an audience, but its a whole other evil to take these heroic contributors and make them look like villains.  
[deleted]
You know it's mostly bullshit, when the first paragraph fails the test of logic: " The 18th century British scholar Thomas Malthus predicted that when population growth exceeded agriculture's capacity to support new population numbers, it would lead to starvation and misery. His prediction was wrong"  We know his prediction was right, because it happened many, many times in many places. It is not happening globally, because we have not reached that point, and maybe we never will.
Wait, was Bryan Johnson elected governor, and they didn't mention it on TESD?
&gt; Bitches deserved at least 2 years of jail  For what? They've done nothing wrong. Blasphemy? This is the 21st century. I don't see why the church (or anybody else) should be exempt from criticism.
Release some freaking sharks with freaking laser beams on their heads.
[deleted]
Oil company workers probably.  And there's two main islands.
Successfully is very different from economically. They can depressurize the reservoir, but commercial production through this method is not possible.   Can any reservoir engineer/petrophysicist explain whether this is actually a smart move on their part?
You want us to try and get more people to slaughter manatees and dolphins with shovels?    You sick bastard.
[deleted]
Surely this will just encourage the idiocracy?
Unless of course several guards at once defected.  In any case I actually read the article (crazy, I know) and it seems that the desertions are internal i.e. these soldiers are just not showing up to their units without necessarily fleeing NK.
Whooooosh. That's the sound of a NK ICBM flying overhead! Na na na na, leader!
&gt; The remaining much smaller human population develop a religion around ecology and stewardship.  That sounds retarded.  This book will sell millions.
Lol you act like I should know that. 
An Argentinian airline agreed to give the winning group free tickets I think. 
Two friends of mine are starting the process of editing a video of their trip to Rome. They promise it'll be hilarious and I'll post it up once it's finished, just for you
[deleted]
Fuckin Dr. Evil at it again.
[Actually men do](http://abcnews.go.com/Technology/story?id=97662&amp;page=1)
Standard conservative behavior.  Fuck the poor whenever you can, give the money to your rich buddies.
Nobody is going to give the position of a nuclear armed submarine but you can pretty much guarantee there is always one in striking distance of the main aggressors, and the range they have is amazing.   Now the intelligence belief is that  NK can not launch a nuke on a missile as they do not have the technology to make one small enough to tip a missile. 
If that's the law, that's the law. If it's such a shit law it'll change in time but until it does, there's not much you can do about it other than protest and keep your voices loud.
Withdrawing some support is a long way from declaring that making war decisions is "outside of his powers".  
...not for long.
what monster would make a dolphin kill?  they're intelligent, playful creatures.  
Not Safe For Ears
Raises x for charity.... loses 2x to get back home.
Oh my god.   Do you know what this means?  I can go back to my horrible diet again!!
&gt;There are plenty of pharmaceuticals that are of equal danger as cocaine, heroin, meth etc.  Yes, there are. That's why we only let people who know what they are doing prescribe them.
In our defense, we're right about the meat and Messi.
HAHA god damn you're worse than a white supremacist. You're just better than everyone right?  Also you posted an ARTICLE not a study, on one police department. Good job fuckstick. Maybe that police department is ass backwards, the ones around here only take the higher test scores and interviews. You could be smart as fuck but you could be a shithead and they hope to weed you out. Average intelligence but a good person? They might keep you. Just because you're intelligent doesn't mean you're golden. 
That's dangerous as fuck. I'm surprised none of the cute girls were drugged, raped and sold into prostitution for the rest of their lives...
Are all of these college students females? Because I think that might have something to do with how willingly people helped them.
I'm not sure serving in the DPRK armed forces counts as "fun and games".
Where the hell are they going? Into the wild? I thought it was hard as shit to get out of North Korea .  
I did actually.
He is the 14th... not the 2nd.
Freedom is an even more amazing thing.
Really now? Really.... "the malls are filled with people buying food and survival kits?" I have seen absolutely no paranoia. None. More concern for kpop scandals than this.
BRB Heading to the dark ages. 
[deleted]
The envronmental effects eould be huge. And tge radiation would spread to other areas as well. The people don't deserve to suffer for something a dictator has done
[deleted]
No-no-no. He chopped his hands off *after* beating himself to death.  So that nobody would suspect suicide and everyone would blame the Americans.  
Countries also grow their own food, doesn't stop the US from being the world's largest producer and exporter of food.  Now why do you think that is?
Thanks for edumacating me. :)
He wasn't on holiday for 8 months.
If you are stressed from apparent over-working, 8 months off work for you and your wife is certainly taking the piss.
There isn't going to be a war. Deal with it. 
Which is what he did.
If you are on leave for being overworked or "burnt out" I do believe you are OK to go on a vacation. What else would he have been doing, laying in bed drinking chicken noodle soup?
How insane! Reddit, let's get a fund going for him! 
It's all in the marketing.
There's plenty of holiday destinations in England. Seriously, going halfway around the world is stressful by itself for ANYONE.
What I love is how the US nuke Japan then seem to feel they have the right of telling smaller countries they can't own their own.
You would have preferred Germany beat them to it? That situation existed for only a few years, and calling the axis powers law abiding is...interesting. 
Two words: "Energy Density"    Do you have any idea how much stored solar energy we are burning by using fossil fuels? Where do you think the fossils got their energy from to store up all of that carbon to begin with, you know, before they were fossils?
Actually there's evidence. We had two world wars before nukes existed.
In the UK, it's part of the social safety net that if you get sick, your employer pays your salary for up to 28 weeks. Whether your sickness is cancer, or whether you suffer from a burn out. It's 28 weeks with salary, and after 28 weeks you're eligible for government allowance.  What you're saying doesn't make much sense.
[deleted]
No, not at all.  They know exactly what fixes debt (hell anyone with a basic knowledge of economics knows how to fix it) but they don't because that is not what they were elected for.  They were elected to give our money to corporations.  
It's [got to be Father Dougal](http://imgur.com/vnHzvn7) ...
Indeed.  I'm all for a worldwide ban on nukes, but that ship has sailed...  You can't un-invent something, and bans just guarantee the guys that are unwilling to comply with the ban are the only ones with the advantage.    I'd rather not guarantee that any psychotic dictator can overpower the rest of the world just because he didn't want to follow a ban.  It's trivially easy to build a nuke - the plans have been online for decades. 
[deleted]
Then they would have told us the black guy was elected yesterday.
&gt;Can't I be alive 150 years from now when we have either gotten rid of the antiquated nation system and become a global society  A "global society" sounds horrific to me. With the present system I can leave my country if the laws in question don't suit me. If nationhood ceases to be a thing I'll have no choice but to live under laws 7 billion other assholes impose on me.
So playing it safe then, eh?
[deleted]
Its not, if I had a degree I would qualify for their fast track "blue card" program, but despite 10 years of experience with no degree I don't qualify sadly. A degree literally adds nothing of value to my career, and would just put me in massive debt.
For one reason because the largest growing populations of Catholics are in Africa, Asia, and South America, places where the skin color is normally not white.    Also picking a non-white pope would be a break with tradition.  The Pope has been European forever, so picking someone from another region would be a big deal to Catholics and those who care about pope-y things. 
Umm, definitely not. We're already taking initiatives in containing China, militarily. China is engaged in a cyber-warfare campaign against us, and they're our economic competition. They're the competition, not the friend. Chinese people like western culture, yeah, pretty much every nation on this earth is exposed to and enjoys western culture. North Korea is less relevant because they're more trouble than they worth, but on the other hand China is aiding the Iranians militarily, and is constantly attempting to undermine the U.S. economically and militarily. North Korea is still relevant to China, just because they supported sanctions, it does not mean they're dumping them.  
Black US President and Pope would really be the pinnacle of black power...
The top comments in this whole thread are puns.   You guys are pathetic. 
I thought that was an urban legend.
Why?... It's just an outdated tradition to appoint what is most likely going to be yet another closed minded old man, who will continue to preach to the catholic population that birth control is a sin, homosexuality is evil, and to continue with the cover up of years of molestation in the Catholic Church.  It's just more of the same thing they've had for the last however many centuries. Not important, just oppressive. 
Am I the only one around here who is waiting for the title: N Korea liberated by allied forces and another star is added to the US flag.
&gt;Global restriction of nuclear weapon information  Impossible, the information is already well know and easily obtained.  Anyone attending college on a physics major today could explain the operation of one.  Fission bombs are easy, but require difficult to obtain materials (specific isotopes of Uranium).  Fusion bombs are more technically difficult but require easier to acquire materials.  &gt;dismantling and destruction of current stockpiles  Would actually make the world *less* safe and increase the likelihood that a non-nation actor would acquire the materials necessary to build their own device.  One cannot simply make Uranium 235, or Plutonium, disappear.  Instead of having large, heavy, functional devices you would end up with huge stockpiles of the raw materials necessary to make those devices.  Something that would be exponentially more difficult to secure.  &gt;Israel and South Africa have undeclared nuclear weapons, and Pakistan has it's own nuclear program, not to mention North Korea. There are a lot of nuclear weapons in unstable parts of the world.  South Africa voluntarily dismantled it's nuclear program (under international observation) in the 1990's.  Israel is completely surrounded by hostile nations and wont be giving up it's best deterrent any time soon.  Pakistan has a long standing hot/cold dispute with it's neighbor, India, who also has nukes.  Somehow I doubt giving up their own nukes is really in Pakistan's best interest at this point.  North Korea really doesn't have a creditable nuclear threat at this time.  In short, you cannot prevent the creation of nuclear arms and there really is no rational argument for trying to do so.
Ikr  Without Indian tech support, america would be fucked in the ass
LOL At all the people trying to take pictures with their iPads
Big ass party in Buenos Aires.
[deleted]
....what the fuck?
He's not! First ever non-European pope, if I'm not mistaken.
**BUTTHOLE BELOW**
Everywhere there be buttholes!  
It is the leader of a religion, he was always going to be anti-abortion and condemn homosexuality, even if for some reason, they elected a liberal liberation theologist.
come on that was hilarious
*Italy/Spain* 2.0  FTFY.
Contraception, celibacy, and women's participation in the church are *[viscerally more important to more people] than gay rights, so hopefully a Jesuit's pragmatic sensibility might make some gains *[for women generally]. Not much hope on abortion or gay rights, though.
[IT'S NOT EVEN FUNNY - FUCK THIS CHURCH](http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/la-child-sex-abuse-case-involving-one-of-the-115-cardinals-currently-voting-to-elect-the-next-pope-is-settled-for-10-million-8531944.html)
[soruce needed]
The guy pops up like some reddit easter egg.
Yeah, he got along much better with the military junta who ran the country in the 70s.
Pope Ozamataz
Just like Obama 
NEW MA-RA-CAS! NEW MA-RA-CAS!
Franciscans are very traditionalist. Is that why you wished that?
This. 
How is restoring faith in Catholicism indicative of a "good streak" for the world?  If Catholicism is true (heh), God has a plan for the world so our best wishes don't matter anyway.
Isn't lupajarito saying he *does* care?
"Alright, everyone be honest. Who here has never molested a kid? Holy shit ... only Cardinal Bergoglio? Are you guys shitting me? Well I guess that's our man then."
It's true. If you watch that movie Bill Maher made, that Vatican Astronomer* was really the only guy he couldn't make fun of.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BVOonvm1qOg
I wish I could follow this up but seeing how the replies to this crashed and burned I'll let it be. 
I think it may be the democratic societies around the world or the media that makes people think this way, but those things (and I would add women as priests to the list and maybe, emphasis on maybe, remove the adoption issue from that list) will never be endorsed by a pope. In fact it is highly improbable that you would ever hear a lowly bishop endorsing those things. Church doctrine is not a political thing that is voted on or has anything to do with popular opinion.  [Here](http://www.buzzfeed.com/ellievhall/things-you-should-know-before-talking-about-the-papal-concla) is a surprisingly well done article on Buzzfeed that explains a lot of this.  Source: I've studied Catholic doctrine, social teaching, and history for over ten years.
Another white man, Italian, in Latin American disguise. If Latin America and Africa realized how much power they had, they would just leave. The church has zero respect for them.
I'll take it, social progress is pretty inevitable, regardless of what religious figures say, but inequality is persistent.
No that's polyrhythm. You're thinking of what parrots say. 
He is stealing their children. Yes. Clearly that's what he is doing. How does this shit get upvoted. 
Gah!  That's a polyrhythm. You're thinking of an old record company owned by Phillips before universal bought them out. 
maybe not, but she is still nice to look at,.  Dumb, but hot.
Like one of my favourite rappers said so well  &gt;thanks to Reaganomics/prisons turned to profits/Cause free labor is the cornerstone of US economics/Cause slavery was abolished, unless you are in prison/You think I am bullshitting, then read the 13th Amendment/Involuntary servitude and slavery it prohibits/That's why they giving drug offenders time in double digits  Making the prisons produce free slave labor gives incentive for the correctional law system to be setup so that more people are sent to prison for longer periods of time for minor offenses.
Pope Lefty
Ah, right. I knew they had a network i just thought citizens weren't allowed to use them. Party members only or something.
So, mistrial then?
[deleted]
Just be happy it's not a Dutch guy who chosen with that name. François Ier d'Holland would be even worse. (If you guys ever substitute Pays-Bas for Holland at all)
Oh so because Norway doesn't have any now no one can!!
First name Greatest.
If you run these companies, you risk being targeted since you're ruining *somebody's* paycheck.  They stopped targeting individuals because that proved to be really bad press.    Absurd punishments for a young person because they downloaded a lot of TV shows or music?  People don't like.  Absurd punishment for people that help a much larger group of people, young and old, in downloading said material?  Well, we collectively think, that's really not so bad.
And even with that being said, he's only one generation of not being european. 
Just because his home-country is in favor of gay marriage, it doesn't mean that he is. Don't forget that he's a member of the Catholic church, not a part of Argentina's politics.
At least, I think his name was Lars. . .
A man still lost his son. Both parties are guilty of the killing no matter who's weapon actually killed him.
&gt;Thank god this is over.   I giggled.
Still have the most per capita http://econfix.wordpress.com/2011/08/12/nz-still-has-the-most-sheep-per-head-of-population/
Filthy language...
well i mean i guess yea everyone knew a new pope would be elected but its just such an amazing event to see live and know that you're a part of history. 
Chucked a mobile over the DMZ. Nokia ofc.
Are you suggesting that Kim Jong Un is amassing his troops at the border, in hopes of them actually fleeing into Seoul, seeking asylum?  Is hoping he can form an insurrection after that?
Let's say hypothetically you are in court and charged with beastiality - You say to the judge in your defense "Yes I fucked that chicken, but so have other people" how much weight do you think that argument carries in court, chicken-fucker?
비누 베이컨 와플
Yeah let's put in a bunch of Japanese text for a Korean topic.. after all, it's all the same...
thats wrong actually
&gt;Most supports of gay marriage in the State Arena seem to be OK with religious institutions not allowing religious marriages for homosexuals if they do not want to.  That's entirely off-topic and not even typical of my experience. Most of the supporters of gay marriage gleefully attack the religious institutions which oppose it. Browse any current thread about the Papal election and witness the thousands of Redditors that are amazed that the new Pope isn't for gay marriage and abortion.  We're speaking of state recognition of gay marriage. I've not yet heard a supporter of the state recognition of gay marriage acknowledge that they could possibly be wrong and their arguments are typically made in the same moralistic language as their opponents.  When you take into consideration the fact that gay marriage supporters still condemn polygamous marriage, it becomes obvious that the issue is political, and not moral as they'd have you believe.
What got me was this part:  &gt;but in spite of this, the 1997 resolution remains referenced, and therefore the call to ban "all forms of pornography in the media" remains intact.
sure they were. They reported meeting with Deep Throat, which they did. They actually met him in a parking garage. They made it very clear in there reports that they had an anonymous source giving them the information. 
Malware      GET /dcssxc7tw10000ggrcqca1cbr_1v1i/dcs.gif?dcsredirect=126&amp;amp;dcstlh=0&amp;amp;dcstlv=0&amp;amp;dcsdat=1363254931076&amp;amp;dcssip=select.nytimes.com&amp;amp;dcsuri=http://www.nytimes.com/archive/1949.html&amp;amp;dcsqry=%3Fres=F20C15FA3E5E167B93CAAB178AD85F4D8485F9&amp;amp;WT.co_f=195.159.140.196-270654512.30285978&amp;amp;WT.vt_sid=195.159.140.196-270654512.30285978.1363254931078&amp;amp;WT.vt_f_tlv=0&amp;amp;WT.tz=1&amp;amp;WT.bh=10&amp;amp;WT.ul=en-US&amp;amp;WT.cd=24&amp;amp;WT.sr=1176x885&amp;amp;WT.jo=Yes&amp;amp;WT.ti=Archive%20Article%20from%201949&amp;amp;WT.js=Yes&amp;amp;WT.jv=1.7&amp;amp;WT.ct=unknown&amp;amp;WT.bs=1176x778&amp;amp;WT.fi=Yes&amp;amp;WT.fv=10.0&amp;amp;WT.tv=1.0.7&amp;amp;WT.dl=0&amp;amp;WT.es=select.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html&amp;amp;WT.z_fbc=0&amp;amp;WT.cg_n=Archive&amp;amp;WT.z_rcgn=Archive&amp;amp;WT.z_gpt=Article&amp;amp;WT.z_gpst=Article&amp;amp;WT.z_nyts=&amp;amp;WT.z_nytd=&amp;amp;WT.z_rmid=007f01002a8651419e8f0011&amp;amp;WT.rv=0&amp;amp;WT.z_hdl=SOUTH%20KOREA%20INVADED;%20Seoul%20Reports%20Attack%20From%20North%20on%20Border%20Village&amp;amp;WT.z_aid=nyta-85334331&amp;amp;WT.z_pud=19490128&amp;amp;WT.z_put=Archive&amp;amp;WT.z.gsg=Archive&amp;amp;WT.z_gat=1923-1980&amp;amp;WT.z_pua=free&amp;amp;WT.z_puv=Normal&amp;amp;WT.z_pudr=Pay%20Archive&amp;amp;WT.z_pyr=1949&amp;amp;WT.mc_ev=&amp;amp;WT.vt_f_tlh=0&amp;amp;WT.vt_f_d=1&amp;amp;WT.vt_f_s=1&amp;amp;WT.vt_f_a=1&amp;amp;WT.vt_f=1 HTTP/1.1  User-Agent: Mozilla/5.0 (Windows; U; Windows NT 6.1; en-US; rv:1.9.2.13) Gecko/20101203 Firefox/3.6.13 Accept: text/html,application/xhtml+xml,application/xml;q=0.9,*/*;q=0.8 Accept-Language: en-us,en;q=0.5 Accept-Encoding: gzip,deflate Accept-Charset: ISO-8859-1,utf-8;q=0.7,*;q=0.7 Keep-Alive: 115 Connection: keep-alive Referer: http://select.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res=F20C15FA3E5E167B93CAAB178AD85F4D8485F9 Cookie: RMID=007f01002a8651419e8f0011; nyt-m=8B0E0F1FA2550EEF1C6C2A5EA56111DC&amp;amp;e=i.1364788800&amp;amp;t=i.10&amp;amp;v=i.0&amp;amp;l=l.25.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1&amp;amp;n=i.2&amp;amp;g=i.0&amp;amp;er=i.1363254928&amp;amp;vr=l.4.0.0.0.0&amp;amp;pr=l.4.1.0.0.0&amp;amp;vp=i.0&amp;amp;gf=l.10.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1.-1&amp;amp;ft=i.0&amp;amp;fv=i.0&amp;amp;gl=l.2.-1.-1; nyt-nofb=0; nyt-a=c409083f8756a5cd1103a65b425383f5; WT_FPC=id=195.159.140.196-270654512.30285978:lv=1363233331078:ss=1363233331078; rsi_segs=H07707_11044|H07707_0; ACOOKIE=C8ctADE5NS4xNTkuMTQwLjE5Ni0yNzA2NTQ1MTIuMzAyODU5NzgAAAAAAAABAAAA7b8AAJOeQVGTnkFRAQAAAHhHAACTnkFRk55BUQAAAAA-
Guess the amount of fucks I give about this news?
[deleted]
Haha concedido
These people kill me! Their own god says "thou shalt not idolize false profits." Lmao! idiots can't even follow their own religion properly.   
Rothschild. Yikes.
[deleted]
Yeah go at it, last time they managed to take down three whole websites for a couple of hours, I bet that showed the zionists.
Can he just retire already, so Humanity as a species can move forward?  Just have a look at all the scientific breakthroughs we made while the last one took a break from sexually abusing little boys.
[deleted]
Software is a must and support for it supports things like vaccines. Computing makes it in a communist system as well. Vaccines don't in most. Look at it like this, one is progression where the other is a pocket warmer.
Capitalism puts individual freedom first.  It's human nature that uses that freedom to buy hair loss medicine rather than help poor people.
Feed them a whole lot of fast food and you'll have great human jelly beans!
&gt;every government in Africa is a dismal failure  I don't know if I would call South Africa's government a "dismal failure". It isn't without it's problems, but it's mostly a normal functioning government...
Right, but presumably with private property rights you own those trees that you cut down.  And you do so because other people in society want them and will pay you for them.  Natives didn't have that type of society so we just came in an conquered them instead of trading with them.
Lost respect for him today. The very system that has allowed him to become successful and help so many struggling individuals is exactly what he is attacking by insulting capitalism. His kindness and selflessness in his philanthropy is something that everyone should look up to, respect and try to duplicate. I didn't realize how arrogant he was.   Bill Gates has now joined the ranks as one of the many enemies of liberty.
I'd feel a lot more comfortable in a capaitist hospital. As this would attract the best doctors. 
Makes a lot of sense.... everybody else does it. So now I want to know what is going on in Argentina =oP
Nope only birds
The real problem is lack of capitalism in third world countries. Lack of functioning government and institutions needed to grow free markets. Is investment at the end what creates opportunities and incentives to get better education and develop the technology needed to solve their problems. Dependance on philanthropic good will and agenda does not solve the fundamental, long run problems (the real "flaw in the pure capitalistic approach"). It would be great if some of that philanthropic funding goes to research on how to develop better institutions as well.
[deleted]
Is that age just an estimate based on the presence of King Yongle's name on the coin, or has it been confirmed with carbon dating or other methods? If it can't be dated for some reason, was it found with other artefacts or bone fragments that can be dated from around the same age?      Since I work in a scientific field, I try to trust the science being presented more than just the fact that scientists have made it (at least to a certain point where my understanding of the subject stops or falters). Keep in mind that other scientists are also claiming that they've found genetic proof of bigfoot (they likely haven't), proof that vaccines cause autism (they don't, although they aren't 100% safe, which they don't claim to be), and so on.
at 34 and the baldest baldy who ever balded, i'm quite content to stay so.  Not having to deal with hair maintenance is nice.
But selfishness is a virtue. It affects the world in solely positive ways.
He hates these cans!
well, how about this. How about that's how he USED to think, but later in life he realized that it was all for nothing and not helping out mankind, so he changed his ways and is now making up for his past.   Ever consider that? I mean, he's given away a shitload of his fortune to help the world out. If he had said all this back when he was 20 and THEN kept going amassing a fortune, then he'd be hypocritical.  
Thanks for pointing this out!   Its important to remind people that everyone can help and do something good in life. Bill gates happens to fight malaria, others combat corruption, some grow qualityfood for people. Amnesty International, Gates Foundation, Greenpeace, Democracy, pick your battles and dedicate your lives to something bigger than your own, people.  But don't forget to smile :)
Solar Energy to DC to AC
Stop this 'joke'.
Which is some what true and something states like Denmark suffers to some degree. However it still works out a lot better than the alternative of  not distributing.   You can still reap the benefits of free market capitalism and its "bigger pie" whlie still distributing wealth. It just depends on how you do it.   True that taxing too much will make people lose incentive. However giving too much money for "incetive" purposes quickly suffers from diminishing returns where the money given for works doesn't produce any extra value back to society. Giving a billionaire 10 mil extra from less tax simply won't produce anything in return, thus you might aswell tax him. The billionaire will even benefit from being taxed since he probably needs employment which wealth distribution helps by educating, securing and increasing lifespan of the working man.
Yes just not to many nets or it gets to complicated and fails again. 
Flirting. A common method of expressing and testing interest in someone. 
That would just change the world...
Or they need to work on the canal, or on the panels themselves, or a hundred other things, all of which are reasons this is a bad idea.   If you need to cover something, cover it. If you need solar panels, use them.  Don't use solar panels just to cover something. Put those panels in a farm or atop houses where they belong.
That'd only affect a minority of people, as cold as it sounds. Millions live under tyranny, as will millions more.
In my University I see many foreign cleaning personnel, and its always giving me a sting ... They probably get paid like shit. But they are nice :3
&gt;But being God's chosen and all  You're thinking jews
Ahhh I see.  I don't think anyone disputes Assad's forces fired on the Syrian people while they were demonstrating do they? I mean there's ample video evidence of the fact. The point of contention was whether Syrian troops were fired on first by agent-provocateurs in the crowd, and by mysterious snipers.
Id rather have neither. The burden of proof lies with you that we would even have warlords in western countries in this day and age. The whole situation is conjecture, while the destructiveness of the state is a reality today.  You do realize that most third world warlords are created through western policy, right?
Look at it this way. It only took 400 years for the church to admit that Galileo was right. Adjust your expectations accordingly. 
Land acquisition is the biggest possible pain in the butt for any infrastructure proposal in India these days. There is simply no solution that appeals to all who are concerned in these sorts of cases. I'll bet you good money the prime driver for this project is the fact that the canals are already government property. 
Well, you take moderately salty water and make some not-so salty water. But on the flipside, you've also got lots of very salty water as well that needs to be dumped somewhere or disposed off in some other way. That's just one of the first few problems. 
That is awesome! Well they certainly are getting a bit smarter using a handle other than that of the founder of Monsanto (JF Queeny) Excellent spotting. Sometimes its really hard to tell, but when literally 100% of their commenting is focused on defending a multibillion dollar corporation you've got to believe it isn't just some guy that thinks Monsanto has an unwarranted bad reputation.
For some reason I don't think that dropping cluster bombs all over Tehran will end their hatred of the U.S, nor will it stabilize the region.  And war doesn't really clean things up.
Because PADD III refineries have the most coking capacity (they can process tar sand oils), so i guess they want to diversify their oil sources.
Sun helps to disinfect water. I hope it doesnt affect the water's ability to purify itself.
[deleted]
Sounds like someone cant tell the difference between a liar and reality.   I can call myself whatever I want to gain power, it's what I do once i actually have it that defines what I really am. 
Can confirm its dry as shit here.My cows don't enjoy eating dust.
Oh.   That makes me sad.   I do not like being wrong. 
Are you kidding me? I get about 4 emails a week from recruiters trying to meet with me to see if I'm interested in a job. Getting a job in accounting is as simple as returning a call to a recruiter. Get your CPA and recruiters will be all over you.
Ecuadorian Embassy inside the Chinese Embassy in England.
What an odd thing to say.... economic condiions got better after genocide was going on? You mean from '42 to '45 those Germans were benefitting from improved economic conditions and therefore approved of Hitler?
But there's lots of poor people, so it's all good.     Right?
*realise, stop trying to inject Z into everything. Damn yanks. 
[deleted]
I welcome you to speak for yourself as I do for myself.
[deleted]
Well, christianity per se has the same potential for violence as Islam. Christianity was just sparked by a peace loving Jesus, it was forged by traditionally warmongering Romans who used it to (successfully) stabilize Europe. Islam was sparked by a warmongering conqueror and forged by people who wanted to hold the empire he created. Where the fuck is the difference?  The face of Islam changed just as much as Christianity over the years of it's existence, it has little to do with its age. Back in the medieval the Muslim Empires were among the only sane places in the known world, with a barbaric feudal system in place in most of Europe. The way muslims conquered was not "let's slay all unbelievers", it was "destroy their army, occupy the region and let the people live their lives"  The occurance of fundamentalist muslims we see now is just as recent as fundamentalist christians that don't give a shit about sanity, and it's directly linked to what happened in the middle east and africa during the last 200 years. With the fall of the Ottoman empire there was *NO* major independent muslim country left. All the predominantly muslim nations that existed at that time were artificial countries created or occupied by Europeans, ruled by mostly brutal dictators.   Especially if you look at the middle east you'll see that almost all those countries the European colonial powers created after WWI and II were more or less on purpose created in a way that promotes religious struggle. Poverty, conflict and frustrations were some of the factors that led to the extremism we see now:  - the Palestine people were treated like pieces of shit by the Israelis (I know it was mutual, but that's doesn't really matter here)  - the Afghan extremists rose to power in the war against the Russians, with US aid  - the Iran is a little bit more complicated, there were many factors that led to the revolution. The country was ripe for rebellion though, again ideal breeding ground  - Iraq was always haunted by religious conflicts, with kurds, sunni and shiites living in the same country governed by a minority  - same situation in Syria  The list could be much longer. The point is that most of these conflicts are not very old, most of the countries were ruled by the Ottomans who were rather worldly leaders. They always had their differences, but with a third party ruling them they did not kill each other as much and focused on their overlords.
Interesting that the Daily Mail story seems to differ from the BBC one.
Dealers yes , user not so much.
Hmmm. How hard is it to start a party, and do I have to be an american citizen?
They won't listen.
Come on guys! Get your shit together! I'll give you a penny to stop (please forgive my moment of racism)
&gt;It happens every day and frankly, most people are tired of hearing about it.  That's not the impression I got from people's stance on that, given the flood of rape stories in India a couple of months ago.
I heard of similar things happening in Zimbabwe when I lived there. Well done Mugabe, you turned the breadbasket of Africa into a famine zone.
Let me guess; as somebody who reads pappe, you're probably in favor of the removal of the settlers from the west bank?  Guess what? That's ethnic cleansing. Maybe that's why we shouldn't deal in absolutes.   Morris doesn't "refuse to use arab source materials"; he does, he just doesn't rely completely on unreliable accounts (from one side).   It's not a matter of history being "fair and balanced". Pappe was writing completely from one point of view, designed to mark one side as right and one side as wrong. That's not how the world works and more importantly, that's not how this conflict works. It's ahistorical fantasy, written to support a political point of view. That's great for intellectual masturbation for anti-zionists, but that's about it. 
Health care, religion, sustainability, internet rights, it's all a waiting game. But that doesn't mean we can go a long way in pushing the status quo further and change what we consider acceptable or not.
Well that's... shitty. 
[deleted]
&gt; This is the Middle East. Massacre or be massacred is the way things have been there for a long time  That's a dark age mentality. But maybe i should say "we burn witches on a lot of wood because it's how it has always been". Using tradition as an excuse for shitty attitude makes me want to punch people in the face.  Change you attitude people, or don't wonder why people consider you like a dark age barbarian/highwayman nobody wants to ever deal with in any way.  &gt; Just ask the Syrians.  Syria got out of hand and is a sad, sad situation.   The worst about it is we can't intervene because 1°) if the rebels win too easily the fundamentalists would take over and makes things worse; and 2°) on the other side hassad is just a trigger happy bloody butcher erasing entire neighborhoods a-la-genghis-khan will all civilians living inside just to try beating back the uprising.  And there's no easy humanly acceptable solution in sight.
[deleted]
Again, more broad statements. Know what you're talking about before you speak. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Economy
Rare Earth Metals [[Sources](https://www.google.com/webhp?sourceid=chrome-instant&amp;ion=1&amp;ie=UTF-8#hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;sclient=psy-ab&amp;q=north%20korea%20rare%20earth%20metals&amp;oq=&amp;gs_l=&amp;pbx=1&amp;fp=3af02b34a5033e69&amp;ion=1&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_cp.r_qf.&amp;bvm=bv.43828540,d.aWc&amp;biw=1920&amp;bih=965)]
Yes, it is. 
Being proud of something you've had no control over is retarded anyway.
I always found that the hardest part of playing chicken was getting the feathers unglued.
Just cant reap the karma without a joke... unfortunately.  Hell, one guy got gifted reddit gold for a joke.  Which I don't mind... but I subscribe to worldnews to get NEWS, and sorting by "best" seems to work opposite.  Edit:  When I posted this Crimzenators comment was about 30 net upvotes... which was almost irrelevant compared to the top posts.  It appears this opinion is shared by others!
[deleted]
stupid google lady
Is there a way Reddit is "supposed" to work?  I think the content of this thread speaks to the attitude that a large contingent of the world holds toward NK. It looks like crude jokes, but it altogether speaks volumes.
Good, our department of defense is actually giving us... DEFENSE!  I don't care how much aircraft or whatever we have, we should just spend all of our money on missile defense and other things that protect us instead of things that kill others.
No. Fuck you, you warmongering shit. No war. We're still embroiled in the consequences of two financially ruinous and morally repugnant conflicts, and you want us to get involved in another one? FUCK. THAT.
I unserstand that the 40 g's are for the truck, i mean for getting shot at and having their lives endangered by incompetent police officers. 
So let me get this straight. You are a Muslim and according to you the 5 pillars are the only thing that counts? So what about the Quran? And what exactly make Islam Islam if all that it is based on are 5 pretty generic precepts that are pretty common in many other religions? (Except for the 5th)
[deleted]
Any more complaints after turning them on?
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
TIL
follow the rules of the country. what's the news here?
I never said that.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
Absolutely. I've been in that sort of tight situation as well. I was in the middle of quite an important conversation with someone on facebook and all of a sudden I had the police leering over my shoulder telling me to get my shoes and coat because it was off to the station for me.   Usually I'm quite patient but I found myself snapping at the officers as I had to quickly tie off what I was doing. I didn't know when I'd be able to resume the task I was in the middle of, so I had to think and act fast to make sure that all would be relatively in order.   It is very, very surreal, and I can only imagine how much more surreal it must have been for this reporter!
No problem, sport. In fact, I'll avoid petty mudslinging by taking a bow and letting the experts speak for themselves:  - [Drone Strikes Keep Pressure on al-Qaida](http://www.rand.org/commentary/2012/08/18/PJ.html).  - [New light on drone war's death toll](http://www.boston.com/news/world/asia/articles/2012/02/25/ap_impact_new_light_on_drone_wars_death_toll/?page=1).  - [How to Deter Terrorism](http://csis.org/files/publication/TWQ_12Spring_Kroenig_Pavel.pdf).  - [The Alternatives to Drone Strikes Are Worse](http://www.usnews.com/debate-club/has-obama-gone-too-far-with-his-drone-policies/the-alternatives-to-drone-strikes-are-worse).  - [Pakistan not pushing for end to US drone strikes](http://tribune.com.pk/story/404368/pakistan-not-pushing-for-end-to-us-drone-strikes/).  - [The Al Qa'ida Threat in Pakistan](http://www.rand.org/pubs/testimonies/CT359.html).  - [Beating Back the Taliban](http://www.rand.org/commentary/2011/03/14/FP.html).  - [U.S. missile strikes said to take heavy toll on Al Qaeda](http://articles.latimes.com/2009/mar/22/world/fg-pakistan-predator22).  - [Civilian Deaths Due to Drones Are Not Many, Obama Says](http://www.nytimes.com/2012/01/31/world/middleeast/civilian-deaths-due-to-drones-are-few-obama-says.html).  - [US offers legal argument for drone strikes](http://www.thedailystar.net/newDesign/news-details.php?nid=131893).  - [U.S. takes fight to Taliban leader](http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2009/mar/04/us-takes-fight-to-taliban-leader/).  - [Drones Save Lives, American and Other](http://www.nytimes.com/roomfordebate/2012/09/25/do-drone-attacks-do-more-harm-than-good/drone-strikes-save-lives-american-and-other).  - [Taliban Haven in Pakistani City Raises Fears](http://www.nytimes.com/2009/02/10/world/asia/10quetta.html).  - [Pakistani Taliban leader targeted by U.S. has long, ruthless record](http://www.cnn.com/2011/WORLD/asiapcf/01/20/pakistan.taliban.leader.targeted/).  - [Taliban Leader in Pakistan Is Reportedly Killed](http://www.nytimes.com/2009/08/08/world/asia/08pstan.html?ref=baitullahmehsud).  - [Top U.S. Security Official Says ‘Rigorous Standards’ Are Used for Drone Strikes](http://www.nytimes.com/2012/05/01/world/obamas-counterterrorism-aide-defends-drone-strikes.html).  - [Obama Administration Official Publicly Defends Drone Attacks](http://www.thedailybeast.com/newsweek/blogs/declassified/2010/03/26/obama-administration-official-publicly-defends-drone-attacks.html).  - [Drones Batter Al Qaeda and Its Allies Within Pakistan](http://www.nytimes.com/2010/04/05/world/asia/05drones.html?ref=unmannedaerialvehicles).  - [Congress zooms in on drone killings](http://www.latimes.com/news/nationworld/world/middleeast/la-na-drone-oversight-20120625,0,7967691,full.story).  - [Obama defends US drone strikes in Pakistan](http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-us-canada-16804247).  - [Targeted killing is a necessary option](http://www.sfgate.com/opinion/openforum/article/Responses-to-Terrorism-Targeted-killing-is-a-2775845.php).  - [The Impact of US Drone Strikes on Terrorism in Pakistan and Afghanistan](http://patrickjohnston.info/materials/drones.pdf).  - [Hellfire, Morality and Strategy](http://www.stratfor.com/weekly/hellfire-morality-and-strategy).  - [U.S. missile strike kills al Qaeda chief](http://articles.cnn.com/2002-11-05/world/yemen.blast_1_successful-tactical-operation-international-killers-marib?_s=PM:WORLD).  - [Senior Taliban leader among those killed in Afghanistan air strike](http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2012/aug/25/taliban-leader-kill-afghanistan-air-strike).  - [Counterinsurgency in Pakistan](http://www.rand.org/pubs/monographs/MG982.html).  - [Take the War to Pakistan](http://www.rand.org/commentary/2009/12/04/NYT.html).  - [Is the War on Terror Over? Not Yet](http://www.rand.org/commentary/2012/04/30/NJ.html).  - [Terror plot against Britain thwarted by drone strike](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/terrorism-in-the-uk/8031570/Terror-plot-against-Britain-thwarted-by-drone-strike.html).   - [Hunting in the Shadows: The Pursuit of Al Qa'ida Since 9/11](http://www.rand.org/pubs/commercial_books/CB526.html).  - [Understanding the Role of Deterrence in Counterterrorism Security](http://www.rand.org/pubs/occasional_papers/OP281.html).    And now, let's all pour one out in remembrance of our homies who've moved on to the sky-high iced out paradise in the sky:  - [Abu Hamza Rabia](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/south_asia/4494428.stm).  - [ Abu Laith al-Libi &amp; Abu Obeida Tawari al-Obeidi](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/south_asia/7220823.stm).  - [Abu Suleiman al-Jazairi](http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2008/jun/01/alqaida.pakistan).  - [Mursi al-Sayid Umar](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/south_asia/7529419.stm).  - [Abdul Rehman](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2008/08/crossborder_strike_t.php).  - [Abu Kasha](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2008/10/us_strikes_kills_al.php).  - [Abu Jihad al-Masri ](http://afp.google.com/article/ALeqM5hFRj05wy4-L2HckvAXmlqSQKJ-yQ).  - [Seleh al-Turki &amp; Abu Akash al-Iraqi](http://www.nytimes.com/2012/09/26/world/asia/qaeda-operatives-killed-in-drone-strike-official-says.html?_r=0).  - [Rashid Rauf](http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2008/nov/22/transatlantic-airline-rashid-rauf).  - [Usama al-Kini, Fahid Mohammed Ally Msalam, &amp; Sheik Ahmed Salim Swedan](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2009/01/08/AR2009010803110.html).  - [Baitullah Mehsud](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/south_asia/8220762.stm).  - [Tahir Yuldashev](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2009/10/tahir_yuldashev_conf.php).  - [Ilyas Kashmiri &amp; Mustafa al Jaziri](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2009/09/senior_al_qaeda_lead_6.php).  - [Saleh al-Somali](http://abcnews.go.com/International/Terrorism/al-qaeda-operations-planner-saleh-al-somali-believed/story?id=9314585).  - [Abdullah Said al Libi &amp; Zuhaib al Zahibi](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2011/05/us_predators_kill_13.php).  - [27 homies in Bajaur](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2009/10/us_strikes_in_bajaur.php).  - [Jamal Saeed Abdul Rahim](http://www.nytimes.com/2010/01/16/world/asia/16pstan.html).  - [Sheikh Mansoor](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2010/02/senior_al_qaeda_mili.php).  - [Abdul Haq al-Turkistani](http://in.reuters.com/article/2010/03/01/pakistan-china-militant-idINLDE62027Y20100301).  - [Haji Omar Khan](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2010/01/senior_taliban_leade_1.php).  - [Mohammad Haqqani](http://www.nytimes.com/2010/02/20/world/asia/20pstan.html).  - [Hussein al-Yemeni](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/8573652.stm).  - [Qari Zafar &amp; Rana Afzal](http://zeenews.india.com/news/south-asia/3-top-taliban-militants-among-nine-killed-in-drone-attack_607089.html).  - [Mustafa Abu al-Yazid](http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/01/world/asia/01qaeda.html).  - [Mahmud Mahdi Zeidan](http://dailytimes.com.pk/default.asp?page=2010%5C01%5C12%5Cstory_12-1-2010_pg7_47).  - [Hamza al-Jufi](http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/30/world/asia/30pstan.html).  - [Amir Moaviya](http://articles.timesofindia.indiatimes.com/2010-08-15/pakistan/28281140_1_drone-strike-taliban-militants-north-waziristan-tribal-region).  - [Qureshi](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2010/09/islamic_jihad_group.php).  - [Saifullah Haqqani](http://www.hindustantimes.com/News-Feed/pakistan/US-drone-strike-kills-Haqqani-s-cousin/Article1-600520.aspx).  - [Mullah Shamsullah, Hamza Tojikhel, &amp; Qari Haleemullah](http://www.longwarjournal.org/threat-matrix/archives/2012/03/taliban_confirm_deaths_of_3_of.php).  - [Abu Zaid Al-Iraqi](http://www.dnaindia.com/world/report_iraqi-al-qaeda-operative-among-seven-militants-killed-in-pakistan_1511127).  - [Hafiz Gul Bahadur &amp; 50+ of his closest pals](http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-south-asia-12015959).  - [Saif Ullah](http://news.xinhuanet.com/english2010/world/2011-07/06/c_13969683.htm).  - [Sheikh Mohammed Fateh al Masri](http://www.channel6newsonline.com/2010/09/drone-strike-kills-top-al-qaeda-commander-likely-led-terror-groups-operations-in-afghanistan/).  - [Atiyah Abd al-Rahman](http://abcnews.go.com/International/al-qaeda-atiyah-abd-al-rahman-killed-pakistan/story?id=14394690).  - [Abu Hafs al Shahri](http://www.reuters.com/article/2011/09/15/us-usa-dronestrike-idUSTRE78E4E820110915).  - [Hafeezullah](http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-south-asia-14877645).  - [Abu Miqdad al Masri, Al Miqdad Rafie Mustafa, &amp; Khalid Rafie Mustaf](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2012/04/death_of_al_qaeda_sh.php).  - [Taj Gul Mehsud](http://www.reuters.com/article/2011/10/28/us-pakistan-drone-idUSTRE79R2AU20111028).  - [Badr Mansoor](http://www.longwarjournal.org/archives/2012/03/al_qaeda_eulogizes_s.php).  - [Aslam Awan](http://dawn.com/2012/01/20/senior-al-qaeda-figure-killed-in-pakistan-drone-strike/).     
Your comparison is flawed, video games are just video games religion is actually relevant to culture and upbringing. IE, Muslim extremists brought up by a terrorist father. 
Do you have a source for a poll that asked Christians or any religious person the same questions?  I ask because you seem to be afraid of Islam and Islamic terror. In 2009 Islamic terror accounted for just 1 out of about 300 terrorist attacks in Europe with the vast majority being committed by indigenous European groups.   As native Europeans are more likely to commit terrorist attacks against other Europeans do you think that people living in Europe should fear other Europeans more than they fear Muslims? You seem to be a man of numbers, who should Europeans worry about more, immigrant or native Muslims or other Europeans?
has there ever really been a 'new pope'? it seems like they have been recycling the same bloke for hundreds of years.
???   Hinduism is the most tolerant religion you will ever find. The Indian subcontinent is the birthplace of 4 of the worlds major religions - [Hinduism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hinduism),  and three that are offshoots of Hinduism - [Buddhism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Buddhism), [Sikhism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sikhism) and [Jainism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jainism).   Hinduism even has a place for atheists. Hinduism does not have ANY conversion mechanic as well.   Yes hindu's have been discredited and their culture almost destroyed, centuries of invasions and looting has corrupted the most tolerant faith in the world. but if there is something they are not, that's barbaric.
[deleted]
I am wondering how the reverse attitude would be. If a progressive, Western lesbian was raped in Saudi Arabia while working/living there. If she were to decide it was better for her and her kid to give it up for adoption, would she be not rather want to put the kid up for adoption in a Western country where it would have a chance to learn about the values she shares rather than in SA where the kid will grow up maybe as a wahabist fundamentalist?
My god, I'm not expressing an opinion, I'm stating the factual rationale of policymakers.  And communism doesn't work, at least not yet, if you haven't been paying attention to the 20th Century.  And yes, ideas can be very contagious - just like the Arab Spring was, and the spread of Communism, and Fascism, then Democracy and capitalism, colonialism, religion, were and are.  It's called the diffusion of culture and ideas, initially along trading routes like the Silk Road, and then everywhere at rapid speeds with modern communication technology.  YAY FUCKING ANTHROPOLOGY AND BASIC HIGH SCHOOL LEVEL HUMANITIES.  The Marshall Plan was to, as I said, prevent the rise of extremism that happened post ww1.  People like to emulate other ideas that sound good to them, you know.  Get your head out of your pompous ass!    
[deleted]
http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_me86z1yndd1qzru67o1_500.jpg
I really want some gay guy to become a priest, then work his way up til he becomes cardinal and hopefully become pope...THEN I want him to come out of the closet.
Of course he doesn't want gays adopting, less kids for him and his posse to molest, it's easier to molest orphans...them damn parents make too much noise.
[deleted]
If you're saying this to be contrarian, let's leave the conversation here. If you want me to provide evidence that there are white supremacists attempting to use reddit to spread their message, of which there is plenty directly from the source, let me know and I will.
Followers of the ideals of Juan and Eva Perón (former president of Argentina and first lady, respectively). It's not ideal, but here's a [wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peronism) article on the movement.
Not even close, Indonesia is by a very large margin the most populous majority muslim country and is also practices the most moderate form of Islam. It also wins the tolerance card as it recognizes 6 religions officially as being state religions.
So what? As far as i know, president droney and and W. were committing treason all the time.
They're called quotation marks.
So as long as the war is 'levied' against another nation, it's ok to make sure it goes on and US kids get killed?  I find that a very restrictive way of reasoning. I think perpetuating a war  that could be ended is the same thing as perpetuating a war against the own nation.
Completely agree with you. Also, forgot to mention that real estate is the favourite place for parking black money. 
Thanks for not answering the question and telling me something extra I already know! :)
you dont need to give a trial to enemy combatants before you kill them
It's actually a reference to Arrested Development, and is used to show how clueless his attorney is.
&gt;Apparently, they do not have websites.    Because no one can code them     Hiyooo
Just saw it on the news Cyprus has frozen the assets of those eligible for the 10% bank rate 
So you think he's evil because he believes in traditional marriage/family and patriarchy? You may disagree with how family structures should be formatted but that doesn't make him evil or yourself right. You realize it's been like that since human civilization began? Why don't you shoot all the lions for being lazy scumbags for making the females do all the hunting but eating their fill first?  All accusations against him supporting the dictatorship have all been cleared. Actually, evidence shows that he helped people ESCAPE EXECUTION during those terrible times. That picture means nothing. There are pictures of Presidents posing with the Taleban in the White House. 
Some pedophiles who are not pederasts self identify because they're worried that just having such an attraction dooms them to hurting someone.
&gt; Who cares if their are religious nutters.  I think people will care when another suicide bomb goes off.
[deleted]
Shh don't ruin their fantasies. 
Very helpful thank you.
what about Ha'aretz (had been found providing false information) ?  
I am so sick of seeing this. It's fake.
I didn't get that from this title at all.  I interpreted this title to mean space junk was cluttering up and if we do not address it, it will be a nuisance.
This is exactly why India has so many problems, this mentality of "not personally involved, who cares?"
Oddly enough I haven't mentioned religion at all, you have, repeatedly. I haven't made personal attacks, you have, repeatedly.  Yet you accuse me of obfuscation.   The sad thing is, I doubt you even know my position at all.  It is quite simple, if a group of women at a lecture hall decide to segregate themselves, I don't have a problem with that.  If a group of men insist the women have no right to do that and want to sit among them, I will question the merits of that. Apparently to some, that makes me the woman hater and the bigot.  
Rule #1 for war is there aren't any rules for war.
I survived two atomic bombs too.  I was watching TV in my family room in RI at the time they went off.
US Marine Corps, hm?
I went to a mass with my girlfriend and they never mentioned earmarking the collections to specific programs. 
[deleted]
How is it genetic engineering if they just pick the embryo with the best genes?   It's not engineering, it's selection. 
Man, I am sooo old.
r/bitcoin is the answer
Sorry but I haven't met any smart people who can't make money (perspective limited to the US).
It's worthwhile noting that the police presumably had savings in these banks. Are they going to follow the orders of a small bunch of politicians that have lost the public trust, or the mob that will want blood?
I know what you mean.   Sometimes, people from other religions visit here too, and they are what I call, parachuting missionaries.   - They visit. - Give the token gifts for the poor. - Run through the motions - Leave. 
Um, are you denying Israel has made huge concessions in negotiations in the past and that the Palestinians denied all of them? The Palestinians weren't even willing to continue negotiating, they would rather kill all the Jews. Where can you show me the Palestinians actually trying hard to make peace with Israel? Where do you see them saying they will make hard concessions? The wool has been pullen over your eyes, but by the Palestinians, not Israel.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ehud_Olmert#Seeks_peace_at_Annapolis  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2000_Camp_David_Summit  
One less person in between the rebels bayonet and ass-ad's ass. Time to join your friend ghadfi... 
Not in the US.
Impressive. Maybe they'll even learn what an IQ is.
Yeah i love that time America droned Europe, Africa, South America, and Australia. You know, every other continent.
Good point! Where are they getting 2000 geniuses in China? Maybe we missed something in translation: China is creating a bank with 2000 genes. 
Wish this was true. Their top-dog has a degree from Harvard. And I think they disassociate themselves from the Slafis.
Chickenhawks wanted in on the european war.  It was nice of them to finally show up 2 years late.  
Reading this comment lowered my IQ.
If the church were truly for the poor, it would reverse its stance on contraception.  The ability of a couple to choose when, if at all, to have children would go a long way to reaching sustainable birthrates in Africa, Central America and South America.  
I submit as evidence, [Goldschläger](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Goldschl%C3%A4ger) and [Edible Gold Leaf](http://www.amazon.com/Edible-Gold-Flakes-Acrylic-Shaker/dp/B000YHI63M)
Figures?  They do have a lot of land and some investments. It does get reinvested. But then, that's true of all countries. The "upper echelon" only consists of a couple thousand people, and their lifestyle is not all that grand, to be truthful. Read up on Pope Francis when he was in Argentina, or our current Cardinal in Boston. 
[deleted]
Without poverty, there would be no religious base.
**Would this include gay people who are poor?**
Maybe don't shout about that too loud in /r/worldnews.
[deleted]
There is no head of the EU if you know anything. Yes some countries are more powerful when it comes to a military standpoint but the EU is not about war etc. The only way the EU as a whole gets involved in a war or conflict is training soldiers,peacekeeping or a member state gets attacked which the other nations are obligated to help.  It's a partner of NATO but not a member and they have defence agreements with the US. We have good relations doesn't = Allie.
The Geneva Convention was drafted in 1949.
My country is majority Roman Catholic (80%) but we're not required to give anything to the Church. Anything we give has to be voluntary, and it doesn't have to be 10%. I haven't given anything to them since I was eight where I dropped a coin into the basket once.
Where there is no government and overpriced union involvement? Yeah, our private schools are splendid, but most don't have the privilege. Everyone against the voucher program has their kids the fuck out of public school. It's a joke that people fall for it. We are for the unions and their money and votes, not the kids. That's why we spend the most and get the worst return. We also have shit parenting.  Edit: My source is common knowledge, but here's another for the brainwashed...   http://www.forbes.com/sites/michaelnoer/2012/11/02/one-man-one-computer-10-million-students-how-khan-academy-is-reinventing-education/  Suck it.  Edit 2: Still, no one argues. No one ever does. Why do you defend our failure of a public education system? 
[deleted]
So sell the shit that's worth a fortune and feed starving people, why call yourself a Christian if you don't want to follow christ's word. 
What's THIS ?  Pertinent theological commentary, in MY reddits !!?
And I suppose the Jihadists amongst the Palestinian population are reasonable folk.  Obama is such a political animal it is insane. 
The wind blows all directions lil
So much gold, even he is embarrassed by it. 
also, it's an empire where kid fuckers are protected. just shut it down.
“Speed up the film, Montag, quick… Uh! Bang! Smack! Wallop, Bing, Bong, Boom! Digest-digests, digest-digest-digests. Politics? One column, two sentences, a headline!... Whirl man’s mind around about so fast under the pumping hands of publishers, exploiters, broadcasters that the centrifuge flings off all unnecessary, time-wasting thought!” — Captain Beatty (Fahrenheit 451) 
I don't think he is necessarily pushing towards the unsaid 3rd option(helping the poor), but more pushing that we own up to the fact that we aren't qualified to be a Christian nation because we don't want to help the poor. It fits more into the confrontational humor that he and Jon Stewart make their living off of. 
[deleted]
Could it possibly be that the North is trying to win back china by threatening Japan? If so couldn't this be quite grave?
This is the answer I was looking for. I was having a discussion in previous NK threads about China, but I couldn't see their end game aside from economic benefits by having another country they can export good and manufacturing to.  Why though would China take over the north? Additionally why would the US, NK or SK be okay with that? What does the map look like when all is said and done?
Wait... So, if North Korea is threatening Japan and China is NK's ally and China and Japan are already at the brink of fighting... Anyone else see a possible shit storm?
Bit it gets messy with China involved, given the worsening relations with Japan.
As much as war is awful, it feels like we are all just waiting around for some sort of missile to kill our own citizens before doing anything. We all assume that these are just empty threats by NK but if they manage to bomb a city somewhere in the world (most likely SK based on proximity) then we will all look back on what a waste of life that was and we should have been proactive. It's a rock and a hard place but eventually NK will have no choice but to act on their threats, whether now or the next decade. 
Yes, sort of. The Democrats gained a majority in both the House and the Senate if you count both independents in the Senate as voting Democrat. However they didn't always do this and during 2008 there were [more Fillibusters](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Filibuster_in_the_United_States_Senate) (requirement to have 60 votes) than at any previous recorded time (scroll down to see the graph in the aforementioned link).  A lot of people blame Obama for not advocating the push of more legislation during this period since it was thought to be easier to pass liberal agendas, however I think looking back it was probably not all that easy.  The role of President has come to symbolize the general intent of the party. So while a lot of people will say "Bush wanted this in his presidency" or "Obama wanted that," what it really means is that we perhaps inappropriately view them as responsible for addressing the concerns of the party that they represent before the nation and the Legislative branch. Even if that's not exactly the main role of the Executive.
Yeah, this is a fantastic idea.  Why not just start taking as much money as we want, whenever we want from people's bank accounts?   Because then people won't leave their money in the bank anymore, genius.  I'm extremely curious to see how many bank runs we're going to see in Greece tomorrow.   It's a smash and grab for people's savings and there's nothing the EU can do to reassure people that their money will be safe after this.
I'm not saying extreme right wing people don't exist. I'm saying that specific section's of sporting events being set aside for them isn't anything I've ever heard of.
Ugh... I have a planned 3 week trip to Japan with my boyfriend this May. It better not be ruined by an attack. -_-
I don't think you're understanding that the people in the North Korean military do not want to be a part of a war with anyone.  They will desert.  All that will be left are a few high ranking generals and commanders.  They will be taken out one by one by the limited number of troops that move in to dispatch them.  It will not be a full army using guerilla tactics, it will be a small amount of individuals with no central leadership, no food and supplies, and limited weaponry.
Agreed. Can you imagine the kind of desperation attacks that the government would commit in the last days? Yeah, the DPRK Government would fall. Fact. But the amount of damage done would be astounding. They have Nukes, and are fucking batshit enough to use them.
That seemed alarming to me so I checked ... it's actually gone *down* from 21 seats to *18 seats*, not 18%.   edit: Your link is to a Golden Dawn NYC propaganda website ... I wouldn't consider their claims of having 18% a "reality" 
But but but....what about reddit's insatiable need to have their opinions reinforced?!
They actually got the name Aryan from a civilization in India
You realize that the 'heroes' in that movie are just as brutal, inhumane, and violent as any of the Nazis? And that by cheering for them, you are cheering the kind of violence and intolerance you revile the Nazis for?  The Nazi hunters are just as evil as the Nazis, and by rooting for them you root for evil.
Please, I know a neo-nazi who was dating a black person. They aren't the smartest bunch.
Agree with your point, but there was something called the "great political switch". Decades ago, Republicans and Democrats basically switched sides. In other words, Democrats used to have republican values, and vice versa. So basically Lincoln, although Republican, was a Democrat by today's standards. The switch happened some time around the late 50's or early 60's.
Diplomacy with China was useful...
Triple the posts, triple the karma. Ingenious really.
Dressing up as a Nazi at a costume party is a little different than publicly stating your support of fascist beliefs.
Anyone considering this punishment fair: how would you react if this was a Che Guevara tattoo on his chest?
There's a limit to free speech, as there should be. You can't yell "fire" in a crowded theatre for the public's safety, and in Europe you can't give Nazi salutes for the same reason. So what if the later's danger to the public is through possible resurrection of a party instead of a direct danger. Europeans have decided that Nazism is past the point of tolerance. History suggests it's for the better.
Just a note, Forbes didn't say that. I don't know how to word it since "New York Times: ..." would be fine and Forbes is also a publication, but i was confused when i clicked to an editorial instead of a quote from Forbes.
[deleted]
Free speech means that he can make any moronic gesture he wants, banning him for doing it is far closer to fascism than the gesture.  Have to be careful not to help his cause by fighting it.
The West Bank *is* Israel if you ask for people's opinions on this matter.
The Greek Communist party is the last Stalin-loving political formation on the planet. They're openly asking people to overthrow the elected government and install a communist government. To me, and many others, the distinction between right wing and left wing fascists isn't as clear as it is to you.
Since when is being 20 a teenager?
[deleted]
So does the Australian defence force, what's your point?
Did they at least leave an I O U? 
&gt;'Niko, move-a a-away from there...
Nah maple syrup grows in trees. It's a subtle but important distinction. 
This sadly is forgotten by almost everyone it seems :/ I bet we to could boost our scores if we kicked everyone who want scoring perfect As out of school. 
[deleted]
I'm well aware of the JSDF, but Article 9 very clearly states that Japan is not allowed to have a military - period. Their having a self-defensive force was a way to get around the ruling by not having a military capable of attacking outside their borders...though the reality is different given the history of JSDF operations.  I was merely stating that they want to word it to say that they have the *right* to a self-defense military, rather than none as the original constitution suggests.
Also, they could have a functioning nuclear arsenal in about two weeks if they wanted. 
[deleted]
Yes, undoubtedly the American government is democratic because "we, the people" have so much influence over what happened during the constitutional convention 250 years ago through our "elected" representatives today. Your insistence that the American government is anything but a plutocratic oligarchy defies even the most rudimentary understanding of its modern embodiment and even contradicts public statements recently made by the precious few legislators with the courage, integrity, and selflessness to admit to its current state.  &gt; You have slipped back into being a useless cunt.  You certainly have a way with words, and I will as certainly be eliciting such colorful descriptions from you until we actually do live in a democracy. Happily, you have stumbled upon someone who remains unperturbed by your rhetoric.
Like "Name and Shame" segment on the news. I like it. 
I wish North korea would sit down and have a steaming cup of shut the fuck up. The bellicose ranting is really tiresome.
I am talking from the mindset that we put this water back into the natural reservoirs that fresh water is running low in.  If we can get fresh water moved back into these areas and also create separate land based water containment systems then we might be able to lower the risk of ocean levels rising. 
Cheers. Here's another [example of a player being 'banned' from representing his country for breaching ethics](http://www1.skysports.com/football/news/11854/8540658/), for comparison.
[deleted]
I went to public schools here in the US up until 10th grade (home schooled after that) and I never once did a single chemistry or biology lab. 
There are warnings for foreigners driving down to Miami from the airport about not taking the wrong exit. These are also repeated at various national consulates after some tourists were robbed and killed.
This is great because as the polar ice caps melt, we'll just have the third world drink the rising ocean away.  The lower sea levels will allow Monsanto to open McDonald's everywhere.  The third world eating salty, fatty, nutrition poor food while drinking away the ocean will cause them to get hypervolemic hypertension.  Big Pharma will open direct to consumer medication stands next to every McDonalds and my stock portfolio will puff up like a tick on the back of fat, old golden retriever. I'm in!!!
* ["Our hand is outstretched for peace, but we can only do it if we are strong. If Abbas is willing to negotiate without preconditions he will find me at the table."](http://www.upi.com/Top_News/World-News/2013/01/15/Netanyahu-says-Israel-wants-peace/UPI-87671358251396/)  * ["Israel is not setting any preconditions ahead of the direct talks," Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu's office said Monday.](http://www.ynetnews.com/articles/0,7340,L-3942634,00.html)  * [Netanyahu Accepts Call for Peace Talks Without Preconditions](http://www.businessweek.com/news/2011-10-02/netanyahu-accepts-call-for-peace-talks-without-preconditions.html)  * ["Netanyahu said that U.S. President Barack Obama's speech to the United Nations General Assembly on Wednesday was "positive" because "he also said something we had been seeking for six months, that we have to meet and begin the diplomatic process without preconditions."](http://www.haaretz.com/print-edition/news/netanyahu-no-peace-until-palestinians-accept-israel-as-jewish-state-1.7350)  * [“I am willing to go to negotiations right away without any preconditions,” Netanyahu said.](http://www.jpost.com/DiplomacyAndPolitics/Article.aspx?id=290186)  And that's just from a three-minute Google search. So no, the preconditions only exist if the Palestinians insist on setting preconditions of their own. If they want to negotiate without any preconditions, they're more than welcome.
For the last time, Mars One is not going to happen. The guy was torn to shreds in an AMA a while back.
Is one of them Gus?
Hehe, literally.
As a man living between America and North Korea's very innacurrate missiles, I support these defense plans.
The mine is called Wieliczka (image search Wieliczka salt rooms), and the construction looks more like cathedral than living quarters.  They also used salt to make chandelier glass that looks impressive.  I found youtube videos where they mix it with gypsum to use as plaster.  There is a claimed therapeutic effect on breathing.  A simpler technique if we ever have so much salt that its a disposal problem, is to put it in burlap bags, and use it the same way you make strawbale/sandbag homes.  It would also probably be easy to work with as a 3D "printing" medium, but I am just guessing.
What is a block chain fork, anyway?
&gt;outbursts  Now you're just being hilarious.   Check [this](http://www.google.com/imgres?q=vatican+golden+throne&amp;hl=en&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=685&amp;tbm=isch&amp;tbnid=qKValhuaSwSjrM:&amp;imgrefurl=http://theratzingerforum.yuku.com/topic/510/Papal-clothing-and-liturgical-practices%3Fpage%3D28&amp;docid=llJH5m77ShL0XM&amp;imgurl=http://i30.photobucket.com/albums/c305/benodette/june%2525202006/Spring%2525202007/august%25252007/consist4.jpg&amp;w=496&amp;h=582&amp;ei=pi9HUZrjMKiPigL27IHQDQ&amp;zoom=1&amp;ved=1t:3588,r:3,s:0,i:91&amp;iact=rc&amp;dur=3606&amp;page=1&amp;tbnh=171&amp;tbnw=147&amp;start=0&amp;ndsp=19&amp;tx=96&amp;ty=95) and tell me again about the church's vows of poverty.  And while you're at it, check out how the church is handling a group of nuns who consider the church's main goal as being one of assisting the poor. [Interesting](http://www.cbsnews.com/8301-18560_162-57574762/american-nuns-struggle-with-vatican-for-change/) how this has upset the church, no?
The microwave from Batman Begins.
upvote for this being able to be sung to the tune of Roky Erickson's 'The Creature with the Atom Brain'  edit: Philistines! Listen to some Roky
Weren't aluminum rods used as evidence of Iraq's nuclear program as well?  It sounds oddly familiar...
And the Texas public school system shows it.  Your libertarian refusal to contribute to society bears significant fault for the quality of Texan education compared to that of other states.
Yeah, that entire Ryukyu chain used to be independent. So really, if Japan had given back all their territory, this island dispute would be between China and Ryukyu. 
You're being facetious, right?? 
To me, it's sort of ironic that in the picture the American soldiers look reminiscent of Erwin Rommel's Africa Korp.
Probably better for everyone in the long run. 
European laws tend to protect "the weak" more though, anything except a time limited contract gives the person renting a lot of rights dictating what qualifies as valid reasons for termination. There are even laws regarding which reasons you are allowed to include in a contract and a procedure you have to follow to evict the tenant should he break clauses in the contract.   Let's say you want to evict a tenant because you want to renovate the apartment and be able to charge more for it. In order to legally evict your tenant you have to provide documentation from the contractor doing the renovation stating  when the work is due to start. Plans to renovate privately will not suffice for legal eviction.
ITT: Britfags circlejerking about British superiority. GOD SAVE THE QUEEN
It was the vagina smelling wasnt it
It has been spilling over for quite a while.  Hezbollah has repeatedly fired from Lebanese soil onto rebel strongholds in Syria.    The rebels have recently [threatened to return fire](http://www.news24.com/World/News/Syria-rebels-threaten-to-fire-on-Hezbollah-20130221).   That Syrian government aircraft has been firing across the border now surprises me though. But it goes to show that Lebanon is just as divided as Syria and similarly prone to sectarian civil war.
&gt;"...which can be used to make nuclear centrifuges from a Singapore-flagged ship."  How does one turn a ship into a centrifuge?
If this vote passes, it will be epic in more than one way. This vote is wrong in so many ways, even aside from the moral aspect of it, the yard stick it stakes in the ground will ripple across EU and eventually all across the world. This is the economic equivalent of an city sized asteroid hitting remotely in the pacific.  Spain, Belgium, Italy will all experience a semi run on banks. High and mighty Germany and France who set this rules will also experience some of it and find out exactly how SOLVENT their banks are.  Perhaps the worst aspect of this is regular people are being penalized the most percentage wise for what is cause by a corrupt and failing political and banking system.  
who is hans blix and why does he matter?
I think this is fucking insanity and if you want to read my short rant on it, [check it out](http://sothisissomething.com/post/45681671703/savings-accounts-auto-taxed-6-75-by-european-union)
"Dismayed" is the best word they could come up with?  Also, people are "hanged," pictures are "hung."
I know, but I'm referring to the original post I was quoting...  &gt; They performed a survey of the soil down there and didn't come prepared to culture or sequence any of it?  I only listed Sanger and SMRT because they were the fastest per bp's if they were going to sequence down there, for some reason.  I'm sure they brought back samples, but they're not going to tell anyone or release the findings until it can get published. 
I was 15-16 at the time, and I believed the shit out of the government.  It was hard to think otherwise, with what we were being told.
"LETS LIBERATE NK!"  "OMG WHY DOES THE USA ALWAYS GO TO WAR!?"   "REMEMBER WHEN DOUCHEYBAG USA STARTED A WAR?"
It's only human to try to justify your crimes by making claims that they weren't crimes.  I'd love to see you trying to defend yourself in an international war crime tribunal. A number of your statements in your comment are inaccurate, and reflect wishful thinking on your part. The war wasn't sold as necessary to remove Saddam from power until months after the invasion; until the invasion the war was sold as necessary to prevent Saddam from *attacking the United States* with WMDs.  It was terribly, terribly wrong of you to attack the Iraqis and destroy their society, and I hope that by the time your kids, if you have any, are old enough to consider enlisting, that you will have recognized the horrors you wrought in your patriotic salad daze and convince them to dedicate their lives to working out nonviolent solutions to the problems they confront.
And communism benefits everyone in society
de·nounce    /diˈnouns/   Verb   Publicly declare to be wrong or evil.
[deleted]
Germany's cloud cover is almost identical to the UK's, yet it is by far Europe's top producer. 
We have no real conclusive proof of that either way. Radical feminists will claim it never ever happens, others have said up to 50% (us air force study). Many are homing in on 8-10%. Then classify those based on caIt's impossible, and quite disingenuous, to claim we know.  Additionally... False claims to authority are one thing, but it also happens socially (claim to the overly defensive male friend or family member), as well with consequences to the falsely accused: social ostracization or violence by proxy. It happens.  It's not a simple matter of saying "we need to believe all women". There are some really fucked up humans in the world. Due process is an extremely important civil right in any progressive, modern country. Please don't be an advocate against that.   It's always innocent until proven guilty. We should *never* believe the accuser until there is absolutely conclusive proof that that perpetrator is guilty. If that standard has been undermined in different crimes, that's an error of how we handle those other crimes.
No it's not. While the justice system is flawed, it is vastly superior than a mob of emotionally charged people submitting to groupthink.
where's your proof for these accusations about what you call the right wing media?
Right, so unless you can trade gold into one of those worthless paper currencies, its just as worthless as those other currenciesto the average person 
[deleted]
You'd do better looking into LED's as they use easily 1/5th the power of conventional lighting systems. They also reduce the costs of heat mitigation which may have it's own energy reductions in and of itself. 
Don't underestimate the power of asshole football gods
Kirchner was her husband's last name, I believe he was of German origin - lots of Germans emigrated to Argentina in the late 19th century/early 20th century.   Edit: Now that I am at work, just checked Wikipedia and it seems that Nestor Kirchner (her late husband) [was of Swiss-German descent on his father's side](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/N%C3%A9stor_Kirchner#Early_life).  Crazy Crissy herself is of [Spanish and German origin](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cristina_Fern%C3%A1ndez_de_Kirchner#Personal_life).
Fabio Jafet is a sought after editor in the genre of music videos. Fabio Jafet is well respected in the field of music video editing. Fabio Jafet was the editor for the smash hit recorded by Pitbull, "I Know You Want Me.” The song was declared the number one YouTube video in 2009. The video generated over 220 million views. The video remains popular and is one of the most watched YouTube videos of all time. Fabio Jafet has many editing credits to his name.
She didn't nail the landing. 
The top comment here is a comment saying that the fact that there is no hard evidence is reason enough not to react in the way that these people have done towards the alleged criminls. And you know what? He is right.  He does however miss a crucial point in all of this which is the fact that the body of the state that is supposed to protect them, the police, has seized to exist and hence, their only protection is gone. Without police, the whole chain of justice is broken and hence, legal justice with hard evidence cannot be formed which in turn has led to the chaos we have today.   These people have seen their family and friends being subjected to kidnappings, torture and murder and now they have decided, out of desperation, to take the law into their own hands. You cant really blame them for trying to protect themselves, considering that they do not have access to the advanced methods nor education of a proper police force and hence cannot carry out proper, unbiased, and righteous justice.   Why not hand them over to the crippled police then? Why lynch them in that brutal way? There are several reasons for why these people have not gone to the police. First of all, they barely exist at all and the few that are left are not powerful enough to do anything anyways. Even worse is the fact that these people are not seen as police but rather as the former dictators henchmen which by itself deters most of the Egyptian people from ever contacting them given their reputation as corrupt bullies.   These people are angry and desperate and will continue this until they feel safe. It doesn't make it right, but it does provide a valid reason for their brutal ways.
As if most of those being oppressed have the ability to get out.
It does not include cases of rape which are not reported. So, it isn't really fair to blame the US for maintaining great statistics.  The US also has crazy bitches who lie about rapes and lots of "statutory" rape cases. So, that doesn't help our situation. 
QI Ftw. 
[deleted]
That's just a horrible thought... 
*yawn*
Your sentence doesn't make any sense. Repeating it doesn't help. 
[deleted]
Sounds like you work for Tourism India or something. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Jesus, India, get your shit together.
If people mention it every day, you'd think by now you'd know how apostrophe rules work. 
Which hotel is it?  I want to write some trip avisor comments.  "nice, clean rooms, owner is pretty rapey in the AM so watch out for that."
Nah, you are still going to hear people saying "had she been smart, she would not have gone in the first place. If you don't want to get raped, don't go to a country known for its raping".  These victim blamers will just keep going back until they say "well if she did not want to be raped, she should not have been born a women".   Bah.  
Its like when cell companies charge you for using extra data. Its not like they aren't making any more or the data costs them anything. 
I went to India with my wife about 3 years ago, and we cut our trip short by about 10 days because we were extremely uncomfortable with the way we were looked at and treated.    We both felt sort of lame for leaving early, but we were constantly being given the rape stare (her) and the death stare (me) by every male over about 14, everywhere we went.  I get that there are cultural differences in the world, but much of the male culture of India just came across as pretty....base.  I would probably go back to India, but I would NEVER let my wife (or daughter if I had one) go there alone.  
I disagree completely. I'd rather have a maybe rapist maybe not go free than an innocent person killed. Mob justice is not mob justice, its just a bunch of random people looking for blood.
[deleted]
&gt;You should go to an Ivy League law school, raging blow habit optional.  Nowadays it's crushed up adderall. 
Japan is the best, never felt uncomfortable once...regarding safety.
That is a great analogy. So, the record company is a massive bloated over engineered and ridiculously expensive business card machine. More of a friction than anything else to all but Simon Cowell's few lucky chosen ones.
According to United States Department of Justice document Criminal Victimization in the United States, there were overall 191,670 victims of rape or sexual assault reported in 2005. That's not a low number by any measure. Before we go around pointing fingers we should have a solid look at ourselves
But truthfully, we can say objectively that a lot of rape comes from India.
We're way better at eating than you.
I'm dangerous because I want people preaching hate and murder thrown out? That's rich, go hug an Islamist you PC fool.
They own America. 
Pretty sure you cannot be arrested for sexual harassment in the USA.  Fired? Of course...
From what I've heard, the people who shot her didn't particularly care about the cause she stood for, rather they were angry because she or someone close to her spoke out about the Taliban/whatever other groups a bit too much. But that's not quite as gripping of a headline; "Backwards religious fanatics shoot girl in head for daring to go to school!" sounds a lot better.  But whatever the case, the people who shot her are still monsters, and either way, this girl is a brave, incredible human being.
I just bought gold...  To filter through all the new comments :)
One man shot her in the face you moron.  
What you're referring to is called ad hominem, and its not what I did.   I insulted you when it became evident you were a moron. This was AFTER I completely annihilated you with logic. Get it straight, wastrel. 
I love how they say "best" korea. Seriously?  You guys sound like you are 5 year olds saying you have the better toy. Is it really the super bestest? Stfu
[deleted]
The fact that they find Iran and N. Korea comparable with regards to nuclear weapons is difficult to fathom.
&gt;they would not see the B-2
How is Iran worse than North Korea for deserving sanctions? 
I feel like you may be missing the grey area between pissing a dictator off and hanging out with him, defending his policies, and helping perpetuate lies.
who said anything about armed officers on campus?  stupid ass, you just spit shit out of your head.  they have helicopters in the sky and fucking cops with walkie talkies and nitros and fucking shotguns.  wtf r u gonna huh?  shoot a kid?  ya put that gun away and go read book.  
aw... fuck it
&gt; Remember that rape and beating of a wife in the US was legal until the laws were repealed in the 70s and 80s.  Uh... source? You couldn't beat your wife up until the 70s. There certainly wasn't the same sensitivity towards domestic violence that there is now, but it wasn't legal.
But how many times do lawyers in the US arrange gang rapes?  This whole 'yeah there's more population' thing falls to shit when you look at the specific rape situations... it's not a numbers thing, it's a cultural thing.
TF India? Get your shit and dicks together yo!!
WHAT IS GOING ON IN INDIA?  Are there just swarms of rapists buzzing around the city? Are they infesting the walls? How the fuck? We need the Oprah macro here.
I dont know why but some gay dudes love to try and flip a straight dude.  Source: Propositioned many many times.
Government Issue actually  Source: I am one
Just........  Wow.... 
Japan is like the porn capital of Asia, and since porn is banned in China, it's pretty natural the top search would be Japanese.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Duke_lacrosse_case  They were never charged with anything, and reading through the case there was almost no evidence suggesting a rape occurred.
No.  Her husband's sister's husband is her husband's brother-in-law.  
Hyper-conservative sexual madness is definitely not unique to Islam and fundamentalist Christianity.
[deleted]
[deleted]
As a Canadian who has been to the US many many times I can tell you that the one in 10 border agent who is not a happy person makes it a real drag.  However, in the hundred or so times I've crossed there was only one time that made me question why I visit. That guy was not happy. 
Absolutely American.
next on reddit: Sith empire struck in Scotland. 10 people taken into slavery. the emperor orders exection of Jedi family members and decelerates new space empire in Edinburgh.
You should mention Canada taking a bigger role in Afghanistan to free up the USA forces for this little side project in Iraq. Sort of an indirect involvement to appease USA for refusing to endorse Iraq War.
"Welp"...?  Really?  I thought people like you were a myth.  
You know how those who mock others end up sounding like idiots themselves?
The IT admin's over there are probably shitting bricks by now. Physically I would say they are the ones being affected the most. Sleepless nights and lot's and lot's of stress. Not to mention the IT crew themselves that may have to patch every machine, server, etc   Edit: Also, if unrelated to the NK, almost can't help but wonder if this is a push by another group to heighten tension and trigger conflict between the US and NK.
I'm from India and I actually prefer this cherry-picking. Each and every rape should be reported and scrutinized. Doesn't matter if it happens all over the world. Although I don't know how much of a help it is to post it on reddit. 
Half the world has the same cards, and radiation spreads with the wind, it's not exactly a winnable game 
He's trying to get you alone!
9/11 was blowback for years of oppression, wars and support of Israel.
My guess is if they attacked we might not notice it. Some half starved kid with a stick comes over the dmz shouting "I am best Korea ! I am also a tank!!"
Hi!    I did notice that your experience might differ, in fact there's a very high probability of that since India is so diverse.  I think that /u/Grimpillmage was actually saying that most *arranged* marriages end up becoming loveless or tense, not that most marriages themselves are that way.   From what little I've observed, arranged marriages often end up as something like a business partnership but that's just anecdotal evidence.    As to selling daughters: not all arranged marriages involve selling off a daughter. That being said, I'm sure the movie Matrubhoomi was based off of real and prevalent issues in some parts of the country.   And of course, referring to dowry as a payment can lead to confusion: for some, it's a custom and for others they literally seek the person with the highest dowry for their daughter (worst source ever: the Devdas movie/story, but it must have a basis in reality!).  There sure are a lot of depressing search results for just "India dowry".   I hope that this reply qualifies my statement because it wasn't fun to research at all and I don't want to look at those results so soon again :-/  on arranged marriage:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Arranged_marriage_in_the_Indian_subcontinent#Developments_in_the_modern_period  http://postcolonialstudies.emory.edu/marriage-in-india/ (this one mentions dowries in particular)   just depressing from here on:  http://books.google.com/books?id=K_8OWbW8mnYC&amp;pg=PR14&amp;lpg=PR14&amp;dq=india+dowry+distribution&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=wSyt8dlOS5&amp;sig=7aNtvee3UqY35_urXLB8jqEUaHA&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=v8FJUeXjL8XmiwKT-oCgAw&amp;ved=0CEIQ6AEwAw#v=onepage&amp;q=india%20dowry%20distribution&amp;f=false  from 1994 http://www.indiatogether.org/wehost/nodowri/stats.htm  2012: http://www.dartmouth.edu/~neudc2012/docs/paper_50.pdf  2012: http://www.divorceindia.org/dowry-harassment-and-dowry-deaths-the-ugly-truth/     
As in taking them somewhere nice to eat and then having consensual sex?  
[deleted]
http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-20550864
I was invited to be here by the ROK government. Surely you don't mean all US citizens out of Korea? That would be unfortunate for Korea's education sector.
Wow, that is pretty close to what my water bill used to be before I was on a meter. In the UK there is a really strange arrangement. The water bill for households not on a meter is calculated on the council tax band. In my case, band A, which is the starter band, this equated to around £450 a year for water supply, pipes and wastewater (that which runs off your roof we pay for here as well).  However... If you live with your partner in a 4 bedroom house, your council tax band likely being D or E depending on the region, your water bill will be calculated on that, so these two people will end up paying a hell of a lot more for their water than a family of 5 in a 3 bedroom home. This is where the water meter comes in, and I have it for two reasons :  - I do not use that much water as I am sensible and live alone - Single person council tax discount (as you use less services as a single person) is 25% (and not 50....), but this does not translate in the water bill.   Getting a water meter has seen my bills drop from around £38 a month to under £20 a month, but here's the catch :   If you have a water meter installed in your property, it cannot be removed that easily, so it goes against you if you have lived in a 3 or 4 bed property for a while, with 2 people, on a meter, as a family of 5 may look to move in and they are better off with the forfeit linked to the council tax than the meter that was beneficial to you.  Sorry this turned out much longer than I thought!
or what?
Actually Itaewon is the best place to go for clubs and bars for foreigners.  I was denied access to a club around Ehwa and Hongik Univ.
This is why you get a lawyer, explain the case to them, and let them help you make your case without incriminating yourself. You don't have to talk to the police without a lawyer present.  If you're in a situation where withholding an alibi can be used against you in a court of law, it would be in the interest of the person being questioned to give that alibi instead of withholding it.
Idiots.. I said North,,, Not fkn south..
It's kinda funny how a group of people who were oppressed, now in almost the same generation, oppress another group of people.
This is what you get from a ratio like 1000 men per 914 girls. 
Are you implying Reddit isn't a giant single-minded pulsating ooze?
Chinese media often reports about rapes and murders.  They censor government related info, they do not censor crime statistics.
If you're from the US, This IS major news!!
&gt;it is inarguably better to be morally correct than to be safe.  Not inarguable. It depends on what you value, and the circumstances of the immorality vs. safety.  &gt;it is morally wrong to imprison people indefinitely with no due process  Unconstitutional, maybe. But not *necessarily* morally wrong. These prisoners are detained for a reason. They have sworn to kill people en masse. Just because they can't be convicted of a specific crime, doesn't mean they aren't a direct and unacceptable threat if released.
Actually it hasn't, news outlets are misreporting the data that NASA and other scientists evaluated in December.  NASA's statement on this news story found [here](http://www.universetoday.com/100894/scientists-say-voyager-1-has-left-the-solar-system-but-has-it-really/)   &gt; “The Voyager team is aware of reports today that NASA’s Voyager 1 has left the solar system,” said Edward Stone, Voyager project scientist based at the California Institute of Technology, Pasadena, Calif. “It is the consensus of the Voyager science team that Voyager 1 has not yet left the solar system or reached interstellar space. In December 2012, the Voyager science team reported that Voyager 1 is within a new region called ‘the magnetic highway’ where energetic particles changed dramatically. A change in the direction of the magnetic field is the last critical indicator of reaching interstellar space and that change of direction has not yet been observed.”   Currently Voyager 1 is in an [unknown region](http://voyager.jpl.nasa.gov/news/voyager_1_new_region.html) of space which is still in our solar system.
[deleted]
What are you going on about? I assume they were captured custody, what are talking about? I never said anything about how they were captured. You're the one doing the assuming here.
Because a large portion of the people it kills are innocent women and children, and it's also a physical representation of the evils of US Imperialism.
Not all people at Guantanamo are Al Qaeda or Taliban. Nowhere near.
I'm not sure he actually even could just put his foot down if he wanted.     Tis whole thing certainly isn't on Obama alone.    The whole government and CIA are in on it.
If it was up to us to accept or reject the partition then there would be no Israel now.  As to Ismail Haniyeh saying he would go for a two state solution he has said that in the past. Do you need me to find the source or are you ready to start taking my word for things now?  &gt;As we have already discussed, there is no such thing as Palestinian land. Therefore Israel is not founded on Palestinian land. Herzl still did not speak of "taking land."  So when people around the world speak of Palestinian land they are just speaking of a mythical fairy tale place? Come on man, you can do better than that.  About Herzl not speaking of taking land. Do you know what expropriate means?  &gt;We must expropriate gently the private property on the estates assigned to us  ex·pro·pri·ate   /eksˈprōprēˌāt/ Verb (esp. of the state) Take away (property) from its owner. Dispossess (someone) of property.  &gt;Great, and as long as you do that there won't be peace. I'm glad you admit the obstacle to peace are people like you, and not "Zionists." Nor does it matter what you think, you are not special. The question is what the Palestinian people will accept. And based on the statements of their real leadership, they won't accept anything less than the annihilation of Israel.  People like me? You mean the Palestinians who accept a two state solution? The Palestinians who have made concession after concession? Righto! LOL  This is too easy against you. Herzl didn't take land? That's just ignorance, brother.
yea I suppose with your reading comprehension everything reads as a porno, possibly a function of your age and mentality. carry on.   I knew I hit the nail on the head with the request for your information on the conflict or related world affairs. you are just another clueless kid.
Get the facts before you spout off with BS
So it's not even a hunger strike.
[deleted]
I think everyone has done a shit job and blaming it solely on Obama is silly. Maybe when he was campaigning he didn't realize the mess he was getting himself into with Congress, other countries, our own public safety...  Basically it's a shitty situation that **nobody has been able to fix for a reason**. There sure are a lot of people tossing blame when you could be writing letters to congress or raising awareness for the issue. I find this entire thread to be bafflingly hypocritical.   Sure, we elect the officials. But sometimes even the government is fighting against itself, plus all the citizens, and all the other countries of the world...and then nothing gets done. Nobody here has been able to come up with a solution. It's obviously not as cut-and-dried as "JUST CLOSE IT."
People will believe whatever makes them feel like their actions are legitimate. That's why stuff like this always makes the front page.
It is harder to fire people in Europe than the United States. 
Elephants are only useful for their ivory and succulent trunk meat.
If there was no torture, how do you explain the suspicious deaths? Reports of water boarding? 
Why would we ever want to do that?  I'd rather not keep my life savings under my mattress.  
Virtual Warfare is the future.
Wow, I can not honestly believe you're resorting to personal insults, not to mention insulting my children. Some morals you have bucko. Hope you're proud. I honestly can't believe what the reddit community has become. 
You won't be the financial center of Europe for long with policies like these. Soon NYC will simply be the financial center of not only North America and the world, but also of Europe. I'd expect many regional European banking and financial jobs to leave London and head to NYC with BS like this becoming the norm.
Or they wanted to show off the body like every Islamic extremist ever?
Yeah, that 'Lebanon Daily Star' article, reporting on an article in a Zagreb local paper about something that "unnamed sources" said seems legit.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rape_statistics   In the year 2010 as per the UN , there were 1.8 rapes reported to the police per 100,000 Indians[in Canada , this number was 1.7] . Granted the majority of rapes go unreported so assuming that only half the rapes are reported , we have 3.6 rapes per 100,000 Indians , that equates to 0.0036 % of the population raped annually . Also it is easy to forget that India has the second largest population in the world [1.21 billion according to wolfram alpha ] so even though the percentage of rapes is tiny , the actual number is pretty large [0.0036 * 1.2 billion = 4356000] .
The Italian Food Market powered by Todaro's Imported Foods is home of the highest quality imported Italian food and specialty products. We specialize in delivering the best Italian Food products online. Our inventory features 100 or so Italian Food Import, featuring Italian soups, sauces, and herbs. Cured Italian meats, olives, pasta, and of course flavored olive oils. Todaro’s Imported Foods online Italian Market is open 24/7 with some of the most competitive prices online. We bring gourmet foods from Italy to your front door. For more information call us at 800-929-6585 or visit our website https://italianfoodmarket.us 
Farcical.
Well, if you wanted me to define progress as social improvements, then it'd still be civil movements, most of which took place in the 20th century.    And yeah, defining older scientific advances as instrumental in progress doesn't make sense because I can take it all the way to the invention of writing and Zero and people learning to count with their fingers.  Most of those achievements were all accomplished by solitary figures who had no bearing on the technological progress of their respective countries as a whole.  Sure, Newton and Leibniz invented calculus and developed classical physics, and we had other scientists such as Lord Kelvin developing thermodynamics, or Darwin with evolution, but they mostly existed in theory and paper only up until the 20th century.  
Those dang freebees Panera keeps putting on my card keep bringing me back.  "A free pick 2? ok, I'll be back.  Free pastry next time? Ok!".  Plus I'm a regular now and the cashiers give me free stuff like papers or pastries if I come by in the evening. I'm a Panera Whale.  Go me.
The game has changed a bit this time around.
[deleted]
I guess you mean protect bases?!
Heatseeking Missile of Love
Washington Wang
Bark bark bark the little dog barks more and more....nothing will happen.
One of the funniest articles I've ever read.
[deleted]
cause people are starving to death...
Kurds arent that localized.
A third of your taxes goes towards your military spending to protect me from an enemy I don't believe in. Thousands of Americans die each year because they can't afford the prices you pay to fund medical research, but I never once stop to think about it when I'm getting cheap health care.   Enjoy your pride. 
that's just disgusting
Good Ol' statistics. They need to do something about the rapes just like they did with the cow. Say it is unholy to rape a woman or touch her without consent. 
Fair enough point, but since one party has no interest in fixing these kinds of problems and, indeed, is financed by the people who made trillions out of this kind of bad governance, I tend to think the root of the problem is the people with the money.
[deleted]
The other problem I see is that profits are being taken to where the corporations are natively from, not back into the local economy 
Why is it that you would never here a soldier complaining about what type of environment they work in but cops just whine all the time about the dangers of their job.
Nice try, Arturo.
*3 according to this gu http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1aq8r1/obama_palestinians_deserve_a_state_of_their_own/c8zrve9
that is his surname. get educated...
I would take the evidence placed in Somalia to mean that Anarchy can work. So even though Somalia has been improving postgovernment and all evidence shows that, you still deny it? Do you see why I can't take someone seriously that denies evidence?
Imagine how great a job there would be if you owned a tow truck company. 
lol
lolwut
Obama's administration has probably had the most strained relationship with Israel of any president since Eisenhower.  Now, you have to look at that in context, because the U.S.' relationship with Israel has grown so close since the 60s that "strained" basically means "we're not being *quite* as effusively supportive of their every move as usual" but it's still significant. Netanyahu isn't a fan of Obama, or else he wouldn't have campaigned for Romney during the election.
Oh well, I don't live in the United States, perhaps you should consider moving :P
Not really, you see by giving the mail page views we are supporting them and that is a much larger issue that the subject matter of this thread.
WHY they should have a representation in the region? Canada does not have representations there, why the US should have one?.Besides, aiding the main enemy to that region is the not the best way to spend money if FRIENDS what you are looking for.  The real reason I think, boils down to the voting power. Israel friendship can bring more american votes rather than being friends to many of the other countries in that region even if the dollar cost (3 or 5 billion a year) is the same
But didn't you hear? Acupuncture works just as well as fake acupuncture and placebo!  &gt;Acupuncture works! 
Most of the people on /r/athiesm remind me of angsty teens that only celebrate their lack of religion to rebel against their parents. [Case in point](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/1aiz59/my_mom_hates_me_now/)
Correction: I'm an American and consider it in our own self/best-interests to maintain a strong relationship with Israel. Therefore it is an expression of American self-interest. 
Sorry man, Netanyahu once stopped settlement expansion for 10 months for peace talks, and nothing happened from it. Abbas failed to follow up on his constant requests. The settlements seem to not have anything to do with making the arabs peaceful or not peaceful.
Downvoted for facts. Reddit....
I don't think the issue is whether or not the 3 billion the U.S. gives to Israel a year is good for the economy, it's the fact the U.S. gives Israel 3 billion a year to buy military equipment.
How will they get around?  Johnny Cabs?  
[deleted]
Completely out of context and misleading, he's not comparing the current Israeli-Palestenian conflict to US-Canadian relations at all. He's saying this type of a relation is a goal once peace is established with a 2 State solution.  While it's still far fetched, given enough time anything is possible I guess.
Mali 2.0
You are just as bad as the girl I'm talking about  Can people never learn...
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;While the term "Afghani" is typically used in reference to the unit of Afghan currency, the term may be used to refer to a person or thing of, from, or related to Afghanistan (e.g., a product made in Afghanistan). The term traces its origin to the Soviet war in Afghanistan when millions of Afghans took refuge in neighboring Pakistan and Iran. 
Lovely talk about respect you've got right here
As a son of a gazillion generation of Jews I say " feelings of insecurity" aren't just " feelings"...checkpoints, barriers, walls, etc are in place to stop Suicide bombings...a very real threat. Unless that period from 2000-2001 never happened of course. 
[deleted]
On occupied territories.   Nothing disputed about them. They belong to the Palestinians.
When people say "Americans" they are referring to residents of the Unites States of America.
BP is using the talk page to share this information, the talk pages are designed for bias conversation over the topic, hence the whole concept of talk pages.  So unfortunately not much here is condemnable 
99% of Middle Eastern countries are known as "Islamic." If you don't have a problem with that, then why single out Israel, the only "Jewish" country in the world.
So, you don't know much then. Hamas uses old useless rockets a lot of the time to yes. However those usually land in fields ruining crops, Hamas has caused 5 million in damages to Israel this year, 5 people dead, 200 injured, 2 million in damages to houses, 3 million in damages to crops.  Hamas also has advanced Iranian missiles such as the one that reached Jerusalem and wiped out a mosque, or the one that hit Tel Aviv destroying a garden.  Also just because one side has more arms does not make them the wrong people, do you think Israel should say you know what lets not use our advanced technologies to minimalize civilian injuries and stop this escalation as soon as possible lets use less advanced weapons and put as many people in harms way as possible dragging out this ridiculousness further.
[deleted]
Speaking as someone from a 100% protestant town, how is a Jesuit different from a normal Catholic?
I think that redditors acknowledge that both parties aren't without fault, but they still tend to side with Palistine a bit more.  I guess that the main reason for why this is the case, is because Palestine is the underdog in this conflict.  Concerning your other point, I agree. Criticism of Israel is criticism of Israel; antisemitism is antisemitism. The lines between those things aren't blurred. Unfortunately, parts of the Jewish community seem to be so very emotionally invested in their culture, that they are unable to have rational arguments about the shortcomings of certain groups of Jews.  That's why every time the German media mentions anything even remotely critical of some aspect of Judaism and its followers, there is a giant shitstorm coming from many parts and organizations of the Jewish community - usually alongside rather inappropriate accusations of antisemitism. 
Yes. 
The problem is both sides cant or wont compromise to make it happen.
I completely agree. Good job Obama.
I, too, can draw maps in MSPaint.  
Because rich drug lords never rob/murder anyone. They wouldn't sell their guns, because if they were illegal, just having it would give them immense power over any law abiding citizen that didn't own a gun. And because they already own guns, they would definitely have guns if they were made illegal. Like I said above, they would charge people in their area for "protection" from other gangs who also own illegal guns. This is where they would get their money to buy more illegal guns and increase their power over the populace.
Nothing.  Just inductively simulated pain.
This ought to bring rape under control...just execute the wanton sluts who entice men into immoral sexual behavior and then have the nerve to claim they were raped.  If they were truly raped, then Allah would have delivered the necessary four male witnesses to attest to the crime.
It's not really a settlement freeze if they kept building.
You know, if it'll stop them killing each other, then let's just go ahead and put in a giant fence.  We can worry about the symbolism later.
Arab countries are not interchangeable like that. They would not be "home" to a Palestinian child. 
[deleted]
Searching for Divorce Attorney in Nashua NH who care? Call today for a free consultation with a caring and experienced divorce lawyer! 
Well, the other thing is, this is *exactly* the sort of thing that the [ICC](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/International_criminal_court) is intended to handle: crimes against humanity on a global scale where the accused's home country is unwilling or unable to try them.  But no one in the western powers has any interest in being the first to show that the ICC isn't just for third world dictators.  Hell, the US has turned its back on it entirely - along with Israel, and the Sudan.  I just can't imagine the scale of the global clamor we'd need to convince the country-level governments that, no seriously guize, we NEED to start talking like adults about dealing with crimes on a global scale.  It's a growing problem, but no one who's getting rich off it wants anyone else spoiling their fun.
read the article
Reddit seems to ignore a lot of things about this conflict. -_-
So we'll all boned here... :X
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
(Great) Britain is an island. It's United Mexican States. America is a continent.  British refers to people from the island of Britain. Irish refers to the island of Ireland. Mexicans refers to people from Mexico. Americans can mean people from the continent of America (this includes for example people from Mexico) AND it can also mean people from the USA.
no wonder they got hacked with such indepth knowledge ..
Thanks Obama... Geez Louise. Can you believe this guy!?
They should have sent the soldiers to south korea lol
Personally, I'd rather kill myself on the Chinese side than be slowly tortured, worked, and starved to death in DPRK.
Yeah, you would be right that it is Catholic dogma. They choose to "marry" Christ, so remaining celibate just means that they are staying "faithful" I suppose.  But it takes discipline for them to remain celibate, just as it takes discipline not to steal, or murder... or what have you. 
someone chicken out
Maybe not, let's ask them http://www.reddit.com/r/AMARequest/comments/1asydh/ama_request_we_are_some_of_the_12_north_koreans/
Correct. Buddhists talk about rebirth and not reincarnation.
How about the fact that when you subsidize something you have responsibility for it? We don't subsidize Hamas. We subsidize the other side though.
I hadn't meant to come across as hostile; I'm sorry if I did, but:  &gt; Free Speech /= the right to force another organisation to publicise your advert on their buses.  This statement is wrong. Free speech (or rather, freedom of expression) in the UK *can* cover the right to force another organisation to publicise an advert on their buses.  &gt; These groups have every right to advertise personally, or to have groups that do wish to carry their ads publicise them.   This statement is also wrong. They have a qualified right to advertise personally, not every right. There are restrictions on what they can advertise. In this case, their advert would (probably) have been illegal if published by any public authority.  &gt; TFL, however, has the right to refuse to carry a specific advert if it goes against their policies.  This statement is wrong. TfL does not have the right to refuse to carry a specific advert if it goes against their policies. Their primary concern is to act in accordance with the law. Yes, their policies at this time were found to be justified and proportionate. But that doesn't mean their policies will automatically be so.  But yes, in the context I may have been overly pedantic.
Ok, sure. I still would argue that time and knowledge are expenses. I don't believe I referred to only monetary costs and if I did that was a mistake.
Great place for them to die.
The DMZ is the literally the largest mine field in the world.
It is probably an aggravating factor for an underlying problem though. 
I'd generally agree with that.  I guess I should say "Treat friendly nations that share our interests like friendly nations that share our interest and hostile nations that don't like hostile nations that don't."
He's fighting the fights with most media coverage. He's in the news in Norway all the time.
I'm from the US and have travelled extensively and lived in Latin America for a number of years. Very seldom did I have problems or face discrimination.  On the 'America' issue... the word 'America' in English and the word 'America' in Spanish and Portuguese have two very different meanings. The Spanish, Portuguese and Latin Americans consider America to be a single continent, whereas for the the rest of world (or most) there are two continents, North America and South America, divided at the border of Panama and Colombia. So, the concept of a continent called America does not exist for most of the world, and as such it would never occur to them to call a Brazilian or an Argentinian 'American'.  This simple little thing has created more confusion and misunderstandings than just about any other cross language meaning that I've come across.
My spelling aside, I don't see how refering to someone by his actual name is insulting.  I understand the intent, but by not embracing his middle name, Obama is encouraging anti-Muslim bigotry.
Wanna see more comments that provide insight? Better follow your own advice and start making insightful comments. So far all I'm seeing from you is whining.
Sounds like an influenza cesspool. For those of you that do not know, birds, especially farm varieties tend to be carriers of many strains of influenza, although they do not become sick themselves. Swine act as intermediates between human influenza and those which reside in birds. This allows for new varieties of highly virulent flu foreign to humans...I'm guessing these animals were euthanized for some reason. Very very suspicious.
'murica
Can't someone make the argument that even though Syria and Israel were capitalized Turkey wasn't, so it most likely *was* deliberate? (I'm not though, as a Turk I couldn't care less.)
Oh I agree. It's the fact it's a toxic heavy metal that does most of the damage.   It is more radio active than a banana though.   
Nope. Iraq was contentious from the start. We had protests before the troop build-up in early 2002.   Depends on if you watch Fox or a real news source. The selling point for many was based on testimony (a lot of it known to be false from people like cheney rumsfeld), colin powell etc   The liklehood is that it was a stitch-up as is being proved now in released documents.   The world AND american public opinion was swayed by people like Colin Powell addressing the UN and large grants/trade agreements to countries like Yemen/Poland/Italy etc if their politicians supported it.  Afghanistan got the blame as that was where al queda were based. The taliban offered to hand them over as they were allied with the us for a long time and the US said no and invaded. Al Queda then moved into Iraq/pakistan and became the ghost organisation we have today. Undefeated. While the allies bomb and butcher their way through the middle east spreading instability and civil war. 
do you think china reports accurate prison/crime stats?? i don't think they report all of the political prisons they also have......and by "all" i mean none.
[deleted]
Good call, though it sounds better in Russian due to conjugation of word endings.
Thanks Obama!
1984 references are doubleplusgood.
[Worse](http://www.judiciary.senate.gov/hearings/testimony.cfm?id=4f1e0899533f7680e78d03281fe18baf&amp;wit_id=4f1e0899533f7680e78d03281fe18baf-2-1)  Female Prisoners at a Rubber Factory    The prison rubber factory was one of the most dangerous and difficult places for women to work. They had to mix used rubber scraps with granular rubber, carry the resulting rubber substance, mix it with rubber glue that came from a big tank which produced poisonous fumes, and knead it in a big round tank. I remember one female prisoner whose head got covered by the rubber glue while she was cleaning the tall rubber glue tank. She suffocated. Because air creates foam in the rubber, the whole factory is tightly sealed all year round. In addition, the factory is always full of hot steam for molding shoe soles. Therefore, it's always stuffy and suffocating! The sticky mixture in the tank often overflows and women must push it back into the tank. This was very difficult work for hungry and weak women, and so the sticky mixtures often dragged women into the tank and killed them. So many female prisoners were killed and injured that the prison authorities finally ordered the factory to be operated only by male prisoners in 1989, two years after my arrival at the prison.
How dare you call Great Leader a pathetic human. He is a god!
Well, I was being facetious. I'm glad that we have the right and the duty to be cynical about government. The whole reason North Korean officials can make claims like this is that they know they'll never be expected to defend them. People on the inside won't dare, probably for good reason, and people on the outside can safely be ignored.
Fuck off and die cunt. (The world would be better without your continued input. I'm literally deadly serious.)
Translation to newspeak: "CRIMETHINK"
LOL
"Only one issue"? It will put everyone in a trial on equal, fair grounds. Fairness should be the name of the game. A factor of two on suing costs is a very small price to pay for better fairness - and it's not like there are too few suits in the US right now.  You could perhaps nuance the law to require the payment from those who can clearly afford it (large corps) while avoiding it when a "little guy" sues, but I am not sure a factor of 2 is really that much of a problem anyway.
You know on the day of 7/7 they were running drills of exactly the scenario that unfolded that day ? http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JKvkhe3rqtc
This has been going on for a long time, way before there were Nazis or a USSR. The following is a rather mild description of the atrocities we committed in the Philippine-American war, including waterboarding, killing every male over the age of 10 in a village, and more.   https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Philippine%E2%80%93American_War#Atrocities  Torture is as old as America. The American Natives, no slouches at torture themselves, suffered immensely.   
what the fuck? are you fucking 12? jesus christ get the fuck out of here scrub you are not worth anything.   You wish I was not sitting here getting paid more than your entire fucking family while I talk shit with you.   I have fucked more women than you have jerked off and won fist fights put together.   Bad grades? Unlike you, I am no longer in highschool punk.   I am not mad at all, I am also not shocked by your lack of logic reason and intelligence, you are the standard typical snot nosed kid with no information at all.   Feel free to talk more shit about countries you have no clue about moron.
I'm inspired by North Korea's optimism, truly a great nation to behold. 
rhott posted a link [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1asx5k/bbcguardian_expos%C3%A9_uses_wikileaks_to_link_iraq/c90mlil) to [a YouTube release of the BBC documentary](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_ca1HsC6MH0).
And lefts.
Is it necessary for me to say "in my opinion" when we are rating authors? I assumed we all know that any form of art is completely subjective so whether or not he is the greatest author ever or the worst ever is purely up to opinion.  That said, most literary critics do not hold him in such high esteem. His stories might be, and I think were, good. His ability as a writer however was less impressive. No one will confuse a novel of his with one by James Joyce or William Faulkner, that's for sure. 
The women part is doctrine, while the celibacy part is not.
Северная Корея является отличным местом для прав человека, и все мы знаем имя этого человека.  Courtesy of Google Translate.
You can't charter a helicopter for $200 an hour.    Plus you cannot land a helicopter anywhere you like.  Here are some prices for the Agusta 109 which seems to be a quite popular option for such purposes: http://www.abi.gr/en/content/126-agusta-109e-price-list  Athens to Aigina which is 20 minutes and roughly 30km:  	€1,330.00
And in our next story, ten things in your fridge that will kill your babies and rape your pets. Seriously, this is just another one of those stories to keep people in line.
Why are some people so against climate change they will go to such lengths to cover it up?  Is it really the automobile and oil/gas industry feeling threatened? Some people say it is religious reason, etc. but I really don't see why people would be against it.
It gets through armour better than anything else.
Can we just build a big dome around china and wait for it to poison itself to death without ~~effecting~~ *affecting* the rest of the world? I'll be gracious and we can build a one way door where anybody can leave provided they bring nothing with them.   
[deleted]
That's  the OP's blog Duh 
These weapons are not the reasons for the birth defects. They have always had them, but people like to blame the US. We used very few weapons that contained this material and we only used them in the begging of the war until we toppled Saddam.
Look out nuns.
I first learned about this issue in high school from a punk rock band. [Anti-Flag's "Depleted Uranium Is A War Crime"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R17APTpWMeY) I know one or two of you may dig the band. They were one of the most important influences in my life back in the day.
[...in their netherlands.] (http://i.imgur.com/rRwNtd9.jpg) 
[deleted]
Source?
Buddhism.                  Religion of peace.
No shit, they can ban what ever they want from their website. Doesn't mean I approve of them censoring stuff purely out of their own personal belief, despite an audience existing for these videos. That would be the entire reason I questioned the move. It isn't a civil or legal right issue and I never implied it was. And I don't even like matadors or the culture that goes with it. However I don't go to youtube to watch only the videos that youtube staff approve of. I go there to watch entertaining content submitted by other human beings across the world, and I would wager there are plenty of others who do so likewise.    Someone who doesn't want to watch it doesn't have to. I'm not sure why you felt the need to point this out, but if you wish to discuss it further I would appreciate you speaking with a bit more depth on the issue (the what and why of it, not just repeating the entire notion of the original post). 
Cause we have 50 million people sitting on their front porch at 12pm waiting for their paycheck to come in.
But I think the point is that it is exactly this reduction of a population to a "nameless mass without being humanized as individuals" that is problematic in descriptions of slavery--rather than revealing their actual subjective and personal experiences of their experiences.  The reduction in a sense replicates what enslavement did.  Of course, if the intention was to view it through the eyes of the Dutch, it could be justified as an artistic style--but if the goal was to critique slavery and colonialism, why would one take this approach?  
To me, it not about how large a country's economy is.  It is all about human rights and quality of life.   Would you rather live in Norway or China?  India or Italy?  We get so wrapped up in how rich China has become, but they lag far behind when it comes to the really important metrics.
And if you live in Vancouver, there's so much competition that the dealers will always deliver to your door. Dang I wish I actually enjoyed smoking weed.
These are a subset of them  There are a few million Arab citizen and their problems are laid out on the relevant Wikipedia page.  Israel defines itself as a Jewish state. There are obvious problens with that when you have a population with many non Jewish people and as has been pointes out by many if they persist in this religous definition for their identity they cannot also claim to be a free and equalitarian democracy.
Because they have a literal handful of politicians who are doing everything they can to turn good law-abiding citizens into felons overnight. 
It probably is. The conflict has been going for a while but surfaced only with Myanmar's opening last year.  The origin of this particular riot reads like a bad movie scrip thought, doesn't it?
Why does this article upset so many Americans? It doesn't affect anyone on an individual level.
Depends on how you're counting, PPP calculations are inherently based on a lot of assumptions, so with some assumptions it already happened (as Scott Sumner claims). "Sometime in 2010s" is probably the best we'll be able to do for history books.
[deleted]
&gt;and violation of U.N. charter  In other news, sky is blue.
I have a feeling kickbacks are involved in this somewhere.
I would assume that depends on who's sniffer is smelling it=)
No, he just can't get alot of things right. Not to mention that there had to be months of negotiation on both sides to achieve this. Also the concern between both these nations is the Syrian conflict.
I just started a new subreddit, /r/chinesepolitics, and would love to have you join/read the discussion! Come on over and help me create a good home for this sort of academic debate. It's just getting started, so your input is extra valuable!
They are not evil. They are human beings just like you. That's why no one will take you seriously. You see them as inhuman objects and the majority of the world doesn't like to see others as that.
Sounds like successful capitalism to me, what's wrong here?
It's also a possibility he said that he'll stop lending them 3bil a year if they don't stop the conflict.
Bug eye sunglasses while skiing? Oh haha my friend, you are not a skier are you? 
I think the argument is that Buddhism has no higher power therefore is not a religion.  Actually I contradict myself in my post because in this post I say it's not a religion but in another post I say what you said that Buddhism is a religion.  After thinking about it this is what I am going to say for now on.  Buddhism is not a religion it is a belief system and moral system.  My idea for now on it is not the religion that kills people(I am an anti-theist) it is the belief system and moral system that kills people.  Hence even though the Almish are fundamentalist they don't kill people.  What kills people is when people try to purify themselves and everyone around them to meet their given moral belief system.  Atheist can be just as guilty as anyone of this, it just happens a lot less with them.  It's a pretty big idea
I hear ya.... At first I was enraged that Canada was withholding public access to science until I read clause 3. Then I was enraged at the headline for distorting what actually happened.  Redditors are quick to denounce the media for pandering to sensationalism and bias, and then upvote to high heaven this sensationalist crap.
More or less, but there isn't an actual Chongqing model of development, that's just a propaganda thing Bo Xilai was starting.  Also the princelings aren't necessarily anti-progress.  They're not a monolithic group.  The current President is considered fairly progressive by Chinese standards, and he's a princeling.
The problem is that America has a pretty weird system. You are okay with people raising future extremists and potential terrorists, but you persecute brown people who have nothing to do with real terrorists.  Most of countries in Europe don't like having people like this. They're unpredictable and telling child to hate someone and mistreat them based on superficial differences is considered child abuse.  Then again, America isn't really a good example on how to run a country.
That's completely irrelevant.  We're not talking how your countries act in relation to your own populations, we're talking about how you act in relation to others.  Do you think your average Uzbeki gives a shit how life is for your average Mississippian?  In this regard you're no different from the Chinese.  You're an absolute idiot.
Racism is everywhere. Don't ever take anything to heart from someone on the internet. 
I want to see what they look like 
The US government put those laws in place. At least in Germany.  That was right after WW2. There was no way of knowing how that whole thing would work out (remember: WW1 didn't end well for Germany which is why Hitler even had a chance). There is no real reason for those laws (even though I think those laws prevent forgetting over a large period of time since everybody who's talking bullshit in TV will get problems) but if one party would try to get rid of them, nobody will vote for that party again because people are idiots.
The WBC is a small price to pay for the sort of speech protections that I enjoy in the US. Given the choice I'd take their bullshit over the speech restrictions of France, Britain, etc any day.
[deleted]
States have restricted free speech under the guise of making a safer/better society for hundreds of years.   When you start legislating what is ok to say and what isnt, you are inherently destroying democratic ideals. A strong democracy cannot exist in a state that limits freedom of speech, because it has a direct effect on the democracy itself. 
The only issues I've heard of for wind power are:  * Birds, *sometimes*, have a hard time with turbine blades. * Blighting the landscape, although that's a matter of taste.  Personally, I think they look incredible.  ... yeah, that's about it.  As far as I can tell, unless you're using carbon-fiber for the blades, they're practically 100% recyclable too.  My best guess:  Well, as for both wind and nuclear, they require energy to manufacture, which at present, is guaranteed to be anything but wind-driven electricity. Beyond that there's an envrionmental cost for mining the materials needed: the toxic metals needed for high-efficiency turbines themselves (copper, neodymium, etc), and exposing uranium salts and compounds to the environment to harvest and process nuclear fuel for reactors.
Like many things its difficult and managed by the justice system.
As for the rest, they're the laws. True enough "maybe" they would be over turned but they're on the book.  I broke all this up for ease of reading.
[deleted]
Even if you thought free speech was stupid and should be restricted, this is *still* a stupid law.  Requiring twitter to implement a system to notify authorities of anti-semitic speech on their network is totally asinine.  If law enforcement wants to monitor twitter for hate speech, that's their business.  It shouldn't be twitter's responsibility to monitor it.  France seems to be getting really stupid lately.  They're also the country that ruled google had to pay websites for the privilege of linking to them in search results.
About the time those children grew up and realized they could live a slightly more comfortable life by imprisoning and fining people who do things they don't like
There's six.  http://toplessinamerica.com/Topless_in_America/Topless_Destinations.html
Beam him into space.
&gt;has no higher power  Buddhism as it's been practiced in Japan has certainly attributed god-like powers to Buddha, from the ability to grant "things that should not be" to mortals in this life, to the ability to cause disasters when people abandon the sutra, to many other things.  But just because something isn't monotheism doesn't mean that it's not a religion.  &gt;Buddhism is not a religion it is a belief system and moral system.  Buddhism as it's practiced by some white kids in America may be "a belief system and a moral system."  And I'm not going to fault them for taking and adapting Buddhism to their modern Western lifestyle, but it's fundamentally different from Buddhism as it's been practiced in India, Sri Lanka, Tibet, China, Myanmar, Vietnam, Cambodia, Laos, Korea, and Japan.  Buddhism as it's been practiced in Asia for over 1000 years is as definitive of a religion as you can get. 
[deleted]
To be fair, they could make some pretty cool action movies with this kind of footage.
EU courts supersede national ones in many cases. 
How does forbidding hate speech get rid of naziism? It just pushes it underground! Now there's no way to have productive public discourse where people can learn *why* naziism is bad.
&gt;who chose war? the 750,000 palestinians who fled palestine in 1948 or the foreign empowered zionists that declared a state on a disproportionately large area of the land? you've subscribed to the zionist bullshit framework muchacho.  I think you're being wilfully ignorant of the facts, *muchacho*. The U.N. proposed a two state solution (after decades of British failure to create a single Palestinian state), the Jews were happy with it, and the Arabs rose up in violence, triggering the 1947-1948 civil war. They. Chose. To. Fight.  Then, yes, the foreign backed Jews fought back, won, expelled loads of Palestinians, and claimed much more land than was proposed by the UN for themselves.   The Palestinian Arabs really shoulda taken the deal (or any of the prior deals pitched by the British since WWI; all were better than what they got by fighting).
Franchement, ça me paraît plus sensé. Merci!
Talk about being "split down party lines".
Fuck you.
&gt; Piss off, bigotry has nothing to do with it.   How convenient. And whites don't like people of PoC because of rap, lol. You're not fooling anyone, racist scum!
What was he wearing?
Beautiful logic and line of reasoning. 11/10
People like you really need to go get help.
Firstly, you're totally ignorant about what schizophrenia is. Secondly, gender isn't biological. Thirdly take your transphobic self and fuck off. 
I can't tell if you're joking. All generalizations are false. If you believe the only new Buddhists are white potheads, boy do I have people to present you.  Also your rudeness is simply uncalled for.
Isnt 32m just about squat to them? Just pay it and be done. 
That's the Alex Jones version of the story.
good. let the rich pay. they're the ones who are most responsible for this mess and who profited most from the system while it was still working.
I believe that is from Futurama when Zaff Brannigan is talking about one of his famous victories.
[deleted]
All the media outlets are propaganda for an agenda, wake up!
The only storming over open ground that happened in Normandy were the beach landings, and even there only on some of the beachheads. Most of the fighting in Normandy was through [Bocage](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bocage), fighting their way from hedge to hedge.
You don't have to teach hate. A person who is completely unfamiliar with this whole thing could see it strange that someone decided to cut off their penis, and take massive amounts of chemicals to resemble another gender.
**Part 3: Sex and Gender Identity don't always align**  Before we get to cited research, let's briefly acknowledge that homosexuality and bisexuality are another indication that one's sex isn't a perfect predictor for one's identity / orientation / mind.  Let's also acknowledge that when a person says they're attracted to the same sex, we take their word for it. Your assertion...  &gt; I'm unable to find anything that suggests that gender identity is separable from one's sex.  ...ignores the large body of evidence of people (of all ages) who report that their gender identity doesn't match their sex. Is there a logical reason a physically male child who claims to be a girl should be held to a higher burden of proof then a child who reports one of the many types of synesthesia, or any other uncommon condition?  It seems you require a fully understood biological mechanism, in order to believe that Gender Identity and Sex don't always align. Do you hold reports of synesthesia to a similar standard? Do you accept synesthesia because a very small number of people seem quite insistent that they're experiencing it? Or do you deny what they're experiencing, because you don't personally experience it, and nobody has a complete biological explanation for why a mind is sometimes unusual like that?  Anyway, you specifically asked for science, so let's get sciencey.  Male to female transgender people have have female neuron numbers in a limbic nucleus:  http://jcem.endojournals.org/content/85/5/2034.full  Hormone levels in the womb seem to correlate to gender dysphoria:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prenatal_hormones_and_sexual_orientation#Gender_Identity_Disorder  (This section cites proper academic papers, but is likely more accessible to the casual reader, which is why I'm linking to Wikipedia rather than these papers directly)  So, we have some a bit of scientific evidence that, straight out of the womb, a child's brain might have developed inconsistent with their sex.  We're only beginning to understand this ([like synaesthesia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Neural_basis_of_synesthesia)). As a transgender person, I very much look forward to what we'll learn in the coming years, so I can better understand myself.  One last bit of research is relevant, when considering the merits of stigmatizing people like Ms Meadows, and teaching children, adolescents, and adults, that it's correct to treat transgender people like that:  http://www.livescience.com/16110-transgender-teen-mental-health.html  At least in the US, 41% of transgender people attempt suicide at some point, compared to only 2% of the population as a whole. If a child, teen, or adult identifies as transgender, the most important thing is for them to be in a fully supportive and inclusive environment. If a child in Ms Meadows class were transgender, the best thing we can do for that child is show them we want them to be happy in this world, just as reddit wishes Ms Meadows had been happy, rather than harassed to death.  As you said in your original post, it's important to think of the children. Hopefully, what I've written will help you understand why I objected to the original passage of yours I quoted:  &gt; it seems infinitely more likely that the idea was picked up somewhere  I wish I had more time to speak on how permanence / transience or gender dysphoria, but it's 2am here. Succinctly, there are seldom absolutes in any aspect of this. Different people experience it differently.  We needn't understand this fully before extending basic human dignity to transgender people, nor is there any intrinsic reason to treat transgender people poorly. This much is obvious to most people, with respect to gays, lesbians, and bisexuals.  I'm sure I didn't answer your questions as best as I could, but the nature of your questions gives me hope that it's within you to learn, and adapt your understanding of the world as new evidence comes in. Sorry I couldn't deliver all the evidence on this.  If you have further questions on this topic, feel free to reply or PM me.
I'm not sure what you're getting at..
[deleted]
Relatively easy?   Unless you invented a gun that is accurate at a half a mile correcting for wind and a moving target. Then happen to be in the perfect spot where you get LOS for more then a second as the president walks from his car to a building then it would be relatively easy. Unless you are a sniper with skills that rival snipers in the movies guns are out. The easiest way may be to use a biological weapon but the hard part is obtaining it.
 Really, the organized miners are the ones making the most cash off it. They have stockpiles of the bitcoins, there just arnt that many put for exchange a the moment. Really, it is just like anything else. It is only worth what others will pay.
[deleted]
Damn, those are some serious human rights violations. TIL: Canada = worse than North Korea.
&gt;On July 9, 2004, while leaving the Forbes office, Klebnikov was attacked on a Moscow street late at night by unknown assailants who fired at him from a slowly moving car.[2]  &gt;Klebnikov was shot four times and initially survived, but he died at the hospital after being transported in an ambulance that had no oxygen bottle and the hospital elevator that was taking him to the operating room broke down.[15]  When Russia wants you dead apparently *everything* is in on the conspiracy
[deleted]
This is such a common misconception among my fellow countrymen.  We do not have absolute freedom of speech in the US, and for good reason.  Every government draws the line somewhere.  If you talk about hurting the president, or you talk about helping people we're at war with (or engaged in anti-terrorist activities against), or if you simply use hate speech and it can be directly linked to the incitement of violence; you're going to jail (often for a VERY long time).  You cannot use your speech to knowingly cause harm, like yelling "Fire!" In a crowded building, or to knowingly defraud someone.  You cannot just say what you want when you want it at government meetings or during court proceedings.  There are a LOT of good reasons to restrict speech, and other countries have just drawn the line a TINY bit further back than ours.  It is not the beginning of a slippery slope any more than our prohibitions against inciting violence.  It is completely compatible with the ideology on which the US is founded and under which it currently operates (two different, albeit related, sets of ideologies).  Your high and mighty act reveals only your own ignorance.
 Well you're a piece of shit that never learned to save.  Why should they be grateful?  Are you going to take it?
If this happened I do believe that as soon as many troops emerged from the ground, you would see hundreds of thousands of defectors just throw down their guns.   Do not forget the amount of NKs with family in the south. 
[Putin backs up the shit that he talks](http://images.4chan.org/pol/src/1364129040643.jpg)
They will be grandparents and will be the silent majority
So what can we do with these guys? Cant we just kill them or something? 
Women are equals in Islam. There are Muslims who keep to old culture and traditions that devalue them. We're talking about a country that is backwards when compared to other modern nations remember.
"Fewer," not "less."
Oh...a boy can dream...
Not have. It is a decision for them to make. They do it to express their faith. In Muslim Countries, the backwards culture makes the people believe it is a requirement and that's wrong.
Please, explain your rage-comment?
I'm not sure many people here read the article. The title is very misleading. 
Google searching will yield many women who are showing their boobs with free amina etc on them.
&gt;Billionaires don't commit suicide  I'm glad you can speak for the mental health of all billionaires everywhere, and the situations they live in. I'm not saying it isn't suspicious. However, billionaires are human beings too, subject to heartbreak, loneliness, guilt,   depression, and the myriad of other things that cause people to take their own lives. Don't discount that across the board.
[deleted]
It wasn't bailed out the by EU or the UK? What the fuck are you on about? 
No the Golden Age of Islamic intellectual advancement was ended by the Mongols, in the 13th century. And it had nothing to do with rejection of science, so much as millions of heads being assembled into skull pyramids by the Khans: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_Nishapur#Nishapur_under_the_Mongols
There is no way to know that for certain.  Maybe there will be coup d'état, ending Kim's rule and leading to a different leadership that is not so moronic. Maybe the population of NK themselves will revolt and end the dictatorship. Maybe Kim will succumb to international pressure if the situation in NK gets so bad that the regime is getting destabilized. Maybe something completely else will happen, something that we haven't thought of yet.  Although I agree that a war is *likely* to happen, there is in way to know that for certain. We've seen dictatorships collapse from the inside before after all.
Pedantry doesn't add anything to discussion.
The first sound is generally the rounds hitting the ground. The second is the rounds being fired from the gun itself. It kind of depends on where you're orientated though. Generally, where the rounds strike is closer to you than the plane so you hear them first.   Source: Spent 2 weeks on an A-10 range watching them shoot and drop bombs. 
Do I not see what?  Rape is defined by sex forced onto a person.  Rape is not when a perfectly willing participant happily engages in sex and then later finds out her boyfriend lied.  For some odd reason (your pathetic ego), you are pretending to believe the second definition is rape.    
This is a very good idea. fuck the banks
This is the kind of country we should be liberating (regardless of the misleading title).
Vote Comrade Putin, or else.
The word antisemitism since it was first used has always meant hatred of Jews. You should read the [wikipedia page on antisemitism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Antisemitism#Etymology_and_usage). Words don't mean merely the sum of their parts:  &gt;In 1873 German journalist Wilhelm Marr published a pamphlet "The Victory of the Jewish Spirit over the Germanic Spirit. Observed from a non-religious perspective." ("Der Sieg des Judenthums über das Germanenthum. Vom nicht confessionellen Standpunkt aus betrachtet.")[14] in which he used the word "Semitismus" interchangeably with the word "Judentum" to denote both "Jewry" (the Jews as a collective) and "jewishness" (the quality of being Jewish, or the Jewish spirit). Although he did not use the word "Antisemitismus" in the pamphlet, the coining of the latter word followed naturally from the word "Semitismus" and indicated either opposition to the Jews as a people, or else opposition to Jewishness or the Jewish spirit, which he saw as infiltrating German culture. In his next pamphlet, "The Way to Victory of the Germanic Spirit over the Jewish Spirit", published in 1880, Marr developed his ideas further and coined the related German word Antisemitismus – antisemitism, derived from the word "Semitismus" that he had earlier used.  &gt;The pamphlet became very popular, and in the same year he founded the "League of Antisemites" ("Antisemiten-Liga"), the first German organization committed specifically to combatting the alleged threat to Germany and German culture posed by the Jews and their influence, and advocating their forced removal from the country.  &gt;So far as can be ascertained, the word was first widely printed in 1881, when Marr published "Zwanglose Antisemitische Hefte," and Wilhelm Scherer used the term "Antisemiten" in the January issue of "Neue Freie Presse". The related word semitism was coined around 1885.
I'm Irish.
i created this account to clear some things for non Arabic readers:  1) The Arabic article says "تقارير صحفية تؤكد" which means Definite sources,i checked the arabic article (first time I've ever heard of this website btw), but doesn't cite any of these sources.  2)This has sparked new rumors on many other super biased arabic websites by claiming that Iranian bodyguard Mahdi Yaa'coubi "مهدي اليعقوبي" shot the president, which i believe is rubbish.     This whole thing is growing way out of proportion on the internet, even though i hate everything Ba'ath party i can confirm that this is absolutely false news.   edit:grammar   
Don't know why unreasonable standards should be something to strive for. I hate living in a world where it is ok to kill a medium amount of innocent people with the excuse that we could potentially kill even more.
Maybe there's a spot near the DMZ where they're in range of a Starbucks wireless network. The only problem is they need a spy in SK to go buy a magnum frothy-coffee every day and relay the password.
"I can’t compare it with anything but ... decisions made by Soviet authorities ... when they didn’t think much about the savings of their population." -- Medvedev.  Ha.
Unless this show has been uninterrupted. Dr. Who has a gap of 15 years (1989-2005, with a movie in 1996).
I do..  Source: Armenian
Should have made Sudoku mandatory, that shits intense.
Maybe the news stations aren't reporting on it yet?  How is Armenia by the way? I've never been but I want to go this summer to see my family there. Currently practicing my reading/writing.  Are you guys welcoming of Americanized Armenians?
It ain't the first country to make chess mandatory. That honor goes to Kalmykia! But good for Armenia.
Oh. I misread the title. I thought it said mandatory cheese. haha
They both teach a way of thinking that is currently lacking in school.  Chess teaches strategy, and paying attention.  Personal finance teaches the basics of money management, and how you can have the life you want.
Different games tickle brains in different ways.  The way I see it, chess forces one to be attentive, while other games often allow to be lax in some details as long as you got the general strategy correctly.  This is why I personally don't like chess...   X-COM is great, but I'd rather point to 4x games... Many of them get pretty close to mathematical modeling of economic processes at some level.
Dude I don't even care.  I just wanted to make sure that your dumb derailing comment didn't make it to the top. You were on your way and I played a part in shutting you down.  MISSION ACCOMPLISHED. 
now you stalking me and write offensive things to my comments toward other people. I dont understand what you trying to achieve, if I was ashamed of it I would not let anyone know about it, and since I let you know about it I dont hide anything. I dont rape anyone since its not pleasant to me. I care and treat animals as equal beings but you cant fit this in you narrow mind. Zoosexuality is not even sex centered or about sex as it is about living with other species. We dont harm anyone, so why should we consider arbitrary rules of some countries, especially country where just couple decades ago interracial marriages was illegal. 
Headline: sale of molasses and yeast skyrocket in egypt.. More at six. 
Tell that to the Palestinians. 
Cowards...shows how "dedicated to peace" they really are.
5 of the top 100 in the world are currently Armenian.  I'm sure there's a national pride element to this.  Especially when there's a fair number of Russians, Azerbaijanis, Eastern European/Balkans, etc that probably make this a regional rivalry.
Ah OK. It was the first of the cs major. Technically the class was 125 or something, but cs 125 doesn't sound like a first course, so I changed the story to avoid confusion. Apparently misunderstanding was still had.
&gt;These aren't due to their race,  The aggregate characteristics are due to the things that a race classifies: a suite of cultural and genetic traits.  &gt;the race as a whole isn't capable of coordinating to face the problems because the race is distributed  Although there is no "central authority" for any given race, when things happen that pertain to racing and ethnicities spokespeople from these races and ethnicities often communicate their views. People can speak their criticisms of a race, write books, etc. 
A shit movie about going to a rave?
It's literally banned. Germany has an acceptable names list. [see here](http://german.about.com/library/blname_reg.htm)
[deleted]
[Nutcracker Sweet Gift Baskets](http://www.nutcrackersweet.com/) has been in the gift giving business for over 25 years.  Located in Toronto, Canada our wide variety of Gourmet Gift Baskets, Sweet Gift Baskets, Christmas Gift Baskets and Baby. 
Hell yeah! Punish the dead! /s
Who's talking about just Saudi Arabia? Obviously only you. take your meds and go find another hobby. Only a user for 16 days and you suddenly know everything about this place?
[deleted]
and how do you know this?
While I agree with this article in spirit it is a terribly biased piece of writing.
Unless people are solely getting information from an expert such as the one in this article, or an aboriginal health science class, then you know the claims are exaggerated. Yes their is generally great differences in quality of living between the aboriginal and other groups, but it is not entirely caused by the government. The government provides them with the same universal health care. The problem is the higher you go (geographically) , the more disperse the population is, which makes it difficult to choose medical facility locations. The govt. also offers a lot in the way of tax breaks, subsidies, and other such payouts to try to increase their s.o.l. In my opinion, a huge problem is educating the knowledge of how to better oneself with these financial resources (I also see the need for more clinics and educational facilities in the territories, but its hard to allocate resources in such remote areas where the population is vastly scattered). Obviously not all, but many waste the payments they get from the government on non-necessities such as alcohol, cigarettes, new cars and things that are not needed. They also choose to eat very unhealthily. In cities such as Thunder bay with a large aboriginal population, fast food eateries are extremely popular with this demographic.   I sorry if this comes off as offensive, but as a Canadian who had to pay his own way through university, I spent my summers working up North where I got to witness some of this while tree planting. Im admitting that while working up north is when I met almost all of my aboriginal friends. I have met a few while at university in southern ontario. But that may be because Lake Head uni is far closer. To be clear I am not basing any of this off of coworkers I met while tree planting. But I did spend considerable time in various cities and towns in northern ontario. (I do not claim similar first hand experience in any of the territories). I am just saying it takes two to fix some problems.  Aboriginals are not forced to live on reservations but choose to. They also decide on the quality on infrastructure that occurs there. If someone wants the govt. to be unable to interfere in an area. They cannot turn around and blame the govt for not interfering.    I am very open to opposing views, so please respond. But lets not try to be dicks about it. 
This story has been in the news for awhile, but it seems like the government here in China has been trying to keep it on the down low. I live in Shanghai and when I told my gf about this issue, she had absolutely no idea it was going on (she's local Chinese). In fact, I had to give her access to my VPN since the stories I sent her were all blocked...  Edit: She lives right along the Huangpu River, and it worries me that she wasn't even being informed.
This will be my last reply on this topic, you fucking simpleton.  If Iceland takes that bank money, those banks don't simply tell their depositors that they just lost their money. The depositors still have their money. They bank simply loses some its profits that it would have taken to pay out massive bonuses to its executives. Don't fear for the bankers though, they will figure out a way to fuck people and still pay themselves.   You are one stupid motherfucker, has anybody ever told you that?
because you're too stupid to understand it.  
imagine if masturbation and chess were core courses.
eh, no...
Nobody claimed Hainan was US. Why would the US deploy spy planes over her own territory?
Now? Diplomacy/international politics are always a giant kindergarten, and the rhetoric between NK and SK is just an overcrowded sandbox with all kids on drugs.  But I agree that this seems like they found some new, even crazier drug.
Wow really? I had JC2 but trade it in pretty quickly afterwards, didn't seem worth the cash. It's well worth 10 bucks though. 
they better be splicing pig and elephant DNA next  
I wouldn't let someone light me on fire, as I said (that should go without saying in any case, you should have been able to infer that yourself). But if someone I found attractive wanted to oil me up on my birthday, I'd consider it, sure.
Yea that makes sense, that would reduce their value significantly and spike the interest rate, not sure if it would be that much of a problem for the US after the market correction happens.
Two Words: Nipple Lasers.
[deleted]
Yes. Never heard of the horrifying antarctic army and their penguin spec-ops units?
[deleted]
1000MW looks bigger. 1000000kW!
That would require North Korea to provide schooling to 20,000 elementary school children...
As a Russian the only thing I have to say the EU leaders who pushed this are great picks for celebrity death pools. Only the stupid or the suicidal steal from the Russian oligarchs. 
Thanks for posting, depressing how little coverage this is getting. 
[deleted]
They're not stealing. If the banks open on Tuesday, everybody who has any money invested will lose everything, and the country will collapse.  The choices are   A). Cyprus taxpayers lose most of their money to pay for the bank's risky behavior, bankrupting Cyprus's government B). Russian oligarchs using Cyprus as a tax haven and slush fund lose some of their money to pay for the bank's risky behavior C). everybody loses all their money  At this point, it isn't stealing. Everybody who invested in this bank lost all their money. The money's gone. The question is who gets paid back with Europe's money? Cyprus taxpayers or Russian billionaires?  This is oversimplified, but closer than 'stealing money'.
They can ban it all they want. I'm still sitting like that and if their evidence is a picture off my crotch on their cellphone I'll file for sexual harassment.
I really want to see the transcript of what they are saying in the video
GOD DAMMIT IT'S SO CUTE!!!
Local government cannot pass laws of that kind in Ireland, they have nowhere near that kind of power. This crap has already been through Reddit when it was news, back in JANUARY. It has been laughed at and dismissed as "nonsense" by the Government. And it sure is fucking nonsense.  
You're looking for ® or ™
My friend is in Air Control in South Korea and he confirms this. Maybe we all should join the military...
You have been banned from /r/Pyongyang
Yeah, a trans man is a man. You might have meant to refer to trans women, in which case I would disagree. My experience is that most trans women are seen as women, because the observer rarely thinks that the stranger they are looking at could be a trans woman. However, when the observer knows the history of the person they are looking at, they might mistakenly see her as a man out of their own ignorance. There are a few trans women who have more severe masculinization and they might be seen as a man by someone who doesn't know any better. However, there are plenty of cis women who are also mistaken for men due to masculine features. So that kind of attitude is really nothing to be proud of. It is deeply humiliating for a cis woman to be treated like a man by someone who is intolerant towards trans women. 
Environmental catastrophe in 3... 2... 1...
&gt; Hindu zealots  &gt; zealots  My life for Ganesh
[deleted]
[deleted]
Tell me how more regulation solves your problem?  It certainly won't make those "PhD students" more likely to join the government mass.  I don't understand why when government fails so well at regulation, you people cling to more regulation.
What if you're the first one to get infected?
[deleted]
Math, and some science. 
[deleted]
That was then perfect summation. Really a terribly written article that borders on propaganda.. Sure, personality cult, famine, WW3 threats, but please at least act like you're writing a piece on geopolitics for a major publication.. There is so much more to North Korea than "hurr durr they gonna nuke Japan but they're too dumb lulz"  This isn't the Sioux Falls Technical Community College Gazette, you're a journalist. Fucking act like one
i dont think we will ever implement it in big cities. But i doubt towns cause much of a problem. Most towns with less than 20k people dont even have a policestation here.
China broke Soviet Union's southern land border encirclement by way of Vietnamese proxy.   That was the point of the 1979 Sino-Vietnamese war, to show USSR was a paper-tiger when it came to the USSR-Vietnam alliance to encircle China. 
It would surprise me if a lot of these cases were actually vicious attacks rather than simple stupidity. That is, I imagine the prevailing mentality is "let's see if I can hit this far away object with my laser" rather than "let's see if I can blind the pilot" since a laser is traditionally used to point at objects. That said, stupidity is no excuse to break the law!
lol, is that bridge the failing euro or the failing dollar ? Thought so.
While I agree his sentence is harsh and federal prison is no place for a teenager,  from their perspective they aren't fitting the punishment so he'll learn. They're making it harsh enough,  and "scary"  enough to prevent others from doing it. Including older people who are not immune to performing actions without thought for consequences.  If they are lenient on him the example wouldn't be wide spread and people who heard about it would think he was punished with leniency because it's a law not taken seriously. 
Remember North Korea's economy was doing better than South Korea until the late 70s.
No, Italy has no double jeopardy protection, a prosecutor can keep stringing a non-guilty party along until a conviction sticks. This is why, though, that the US will never give Knox to Italy: It's a violation of her rights, through and through.
Watch her get acquitted a second time!! 
Soon North Korea will run out of countries to threaten and will have to start sending threats to the animal kingdom. 
Canada is a NATO country.  If the US or any NATO ally was attacked Canada would respond militarily and support the US.  You don't attack our friends.  
Very good points.  I wonder how they'd choose the target, though. There would almost certainly be some civilians around at probably every statue.
Correct.  I said that up above.
WHY does it have to be "chauvinist discourtesy"? WHY can't it just be the same type of asshole behavior that leads people to place their bags on seats when the bus is full?  And why the fuck are you annoyed if no one is using the space anyway? Lastly there are real problems in the world, quit bitching about made up ones.
Lingerie: Not a matter of clothing style but of decency - you are not allowed to go into public in nothing but lingerie either  Swastikas: Forbidden under the memorial laws  Furry: Well, it has sexual implications, it hides your identity, and it cuts down the respect of the pupils ...  So not really a matter of clothing style or culture in these cases.
Wow, thanks for the compliment ;)  I have rarely had problems with Turks, but I know there are many. Surprisingly, we have very few problems with Italian, Serbian, Russian, Egyptian, Persian, whatever, immigrants, and a lot with Turks. Somehow they are a lot more reclusive and protective of their differences than the others, and it is certainly our fault that we did very little to integrate them into our culture when we first got them in for their cheap labour force.  These problems are not really stemming from their muslim roots, anyway; only the right wing here claims there would be a problem with that, and to me, it is quite absurd. The problem is a lack of cultural integration, not of different religions.
Firstly, it's just ignorant to claim emerging markets are following the same economic trajectory or adopting the same tools as each other, much less those of Western economies. The corporatism of South Korea, for instance, is starkly different from the industrialization models of Japan; China's modernization is apples to Taiwan's oranges; and Singapore is incredibly different from Indonesia. The vast difference in how each cougry utilizes currency controls, corporate favoritism, and a host of other economic tools all tell a different story than the one you and Mr. Mao are trying to pass off as a fact. There are a variety of different models on display.   Secondly, the drivel I responded to was yammering about capitalism as somehow introducing the novel concept of economic exploitation into Asia. It is patently false that Western capitalism represents a more exploitive and damaging political economy than, Maoist agriculture reform, Timur's mountains of skulls, or even Mamluke "taxation." We can debate the merits of western capitalism, but Asia is happier, healthier, and richer than it has ever been because it stopped acting like it had been for the past 3000 years. 
Faaaabulous!
I'd prefer him to go out gangnam style. 
[deleted]
My dad used to have a bad habit of not reading anything about a movie before seeing it because he "didn't want to ruin it for himself".  Fast forward to me at 9 years old wailing like a bitch in the movie theater and my dad looking super embarrassed as the guy who traumatized his kid with Event Horizon.
Rather the sins of rasul allah as told by the holy quoran (logos) and the collected hadiths made sunna by muslim ulamas. Later made sharia law through the fatwas issued by ulamas practicing fiqh, were even the most liberal schools of hanafi (sunni) and jafari (shia) wouldn't tolerate the practise of polytheism. But what do I know...  Edit because I somehow wrote hanbali instead of hanafi
I want there to be a wind farm out my window! Here in Toronto we only have [one lonely one](http://imgur.com/4eopRZp) to look at.
Do you know how many other religions those questions could be directed toward? Do you know how many atheist parents do the same shit? Are you asking these as rhetorical questions, or are you genuinely interested in what I have to say? Did you ever stop to consider your view point may in fact be wrong or misinformed? When was the last time you tried to understand a totally different viewpoint other than the one you live and came to find something out about yourself?
We won't agree there. There's lots of ways to create wealth... some of of which are even ethical and karmically sound.  You can make yourself and others wealthy while also improving lots of people's lives (and without ruining other people's).  I think you're painting with a broad brush.
Yay someone mentioned us 
I fucking hate Donald Trump.
So fucking what? Yea there is a treaty but extradition treaties are pick and choose. Many European countries won't extradite back to the US if the person faces the death penalty and because of US notions of double jeopardy and how it would create a absolute shit storm if she was extradited for a crime she was acquitted for, the US isn't going to send her back. 
*some light appaulse and awkward smiles*
It IS double jeopardy:  If a person faces "the trier of fact" (a trial) and a decision is rendered, then that person cannot be tried again. The idea that a higher court can vacate a acquittal is outrageous in American law. The prosecution gets one shot and if they fuck up they don't get another chance. Italy's legal system is a joke (they convicted scientists for not predicting earthquakes) and I would be pissed if the US allowed her extradition.    
I suppose the 'triumph of capitalism' approach here would be to say, "If you want the view to be exactly the way you like it, you can buy it at market price."
Congrats, you're a racist.
A combination of clergy sex abuse revelations and a more secular climate has created **an excuse not to** attend Mass.
The more you know, eh? ;o)  If you have time to watch a BBC documentary, then I highly recommended the award winning ["You've Been Trumped'](http://www.movie2k.to/You-ve-Been-Trumped-watch-movie-2711506.html) 
&gt;How is that not a problem with the Muslim religion?  It isn't, it's a problem with human nature.  Muslim and Hindu are just X and Y in this story.  You could have the same story, different nation, different religions, same result.
Valid reasoning and I wont deny your point. I was just incensed at the implication that there was *any* misogyny behind my reasoning. I would apply these thoughts to ALL creed, class, gender, etc.   However I will insist that the command to *wear* is one of overt opression and the command to *not wear* is one of altruistic **intent** at very least.  All this said, i really have no problem with head coverings if the face is fully exposed. If you want to cover your hair, or shave it, whatever. I left that out for sake of argument, kind of how i'm philosophically agnostic and practicing atheist.
Come on people... Who done it? ... Who done it?
People who kill other people should be removed from society in the most efficient way.
"Bing" said Chandler Bing
But, come on...  It *is* India.  edit: I know the joke's in poor taste, but there's been a lot of posts about rape in India, lately.  Seriously?
  Eat the fertilizer runoff. Consume the pesticides. Of course the property will be fenced in, so only those who can afford the fees can see the course. The local residents can look at a big fence.
[deleted]
http://www.huffingtonpost.com/jim-carrey/the-judgment-on-vaccines_b_189777.html
Glad to see that President Obama is finally getting it. But don't count on the Palestinians doing what he asks. The reason why their nation exists to fight Israel, take that away and they become less than a footnote in the history books.
This is just like what happened to the Cape wind project. Ted Kennedy--who had  supported many environmental initiatives during his tenure as senator---protested the project. Why? He didn't want the view from his family's compound on the Nantucket sound to be spoiled. 
That doesn't really make sense. What makes a corporate named building okay but a corporate *re*-named building not?
[deleted]
WHOOSHH
The problem is not any invasion, the problem is China and how happy it would be to have the US occpy an unstable country on it's border...
THIS. IS. FUCKED.
It's just a book people! Please move beyond the Middle Ages and get over it already....
No you didn't, FRANCE did and it wasn't even Canada back then and they went home after
I smell a Korean.  Who let you on the internet, anyway?
Our witch hunt for WMD's in Iraq will impair our response to secure the nuclear weapons in North Korea... Jesus Titty Fucking Christ.
Forgive the insulters, they are just frustrated. Sometimes what seems so clear to one person isn't so clear to another. I hope you keep looking. You may not like where it takes you but at least you'll have the courage to face it. 
Did anyone notice that N Korea doesn't have a teleprompter? 
Hivelocity provides reliable and affordable Xeon dedicated server packages. If you are looking for hosting with Xeon dedicated servers visit us today! 
When you say "we" you mean the corporate media right?
Bagpipes.
You and I must read a different reddit.  I wouldn't want these mad fools in charge of anything.
Bullshit! North Korean internet cafe... http://www.businessinsider.com/the-human-side-to-north-korea-2013-3#they-even-have-internet-cafes-35
America is pretty much like Batman. 
I don't know about that, considering the meme going around lately regarding their technological progress. Can that piano box be used to edit photos?
The rambling lies are exercises in absurdity. It is not news. This does not belong here.  Take it to anythinggoes or conspiracy.
It's true and the invasion will happen via surfboard.  The situation is detailed [here](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-u7nJPRKJlq0/T2jDDFdwPwI/AAAAAAAAAms/AXKLyIdgscE/s1600/surf_nazis_must_die_1987.jpg)
I see the Free Trade apologists are downvoting you.
[deleted]
Unless the person is so wide they take up 2 and the person in the seat next to them is squished up against the wall or the armrest. The airlines may sell each seat on a 1-person basis, but reality does intrude sometimes.
And ain't it funny how the Nobel prize went to a kind of dick who has done nothing for anyone except those with money.
China also likes to think longterm. 
World War Z does a pretty good job of explaining the militaries inability to stop it early. Short slight spoilery version: leadership screws up and underestimates the threat, big showy attempt to stop a horde fails and panic takes place. Military has to withdraw and try to establish safe zones while letting other area be overrun.
This is why we can't have nice planets.
Noooooo
Well they were referring specifically to Christians and Jews. What makes this so outrageous is that the school is funded by the Saudi education authorities, not some random rich Saudi nut-job, and the textbooks were approved. And worse still, after being caught red handed they then lied about removing these offending textbooks.  Fuck the Islamic world seriously. They burn down embassies when someone draws a cartoon, and yes the Saudi government gets involved in decrying everything. But when they're caught doing something they don't give a shit. And frankly after burning school girls to death (google that) I don't think Saudi Arabia should dare open it's mouth over _anything_ ever again. 
Capitalism is the very reason this entire thing has happened.   Capitalism would gnaw its own legs off if you gave it the chance. So what's happening here is that the big ugly thing is just eating other people's legs. But once it runs out of legs from without...om nom nom. 
&gt;Society needs to stop conforming to other people's unhealthy habits  Problem 1: Muscle weighs more than fat.
It's called business class, or simply flying with more expensive airlines. 
Idiot.
Fuck yeah fat motherfuckers.
Stop downvoting him. He is correct. There is no such place as Kurdistan. Seriously, if you're going to downvote someone post information as to where they're wrong and show the internationally recognized borders of Kurdistan.
That's not segregation at all. Here in Norway, teen girls get free birth prevention pills, free tampons and pads. Boys get no such offer because boys don't need it. Treating people differently because of physical differences is the only sensible thing to do.   Of course, in this case, people with a medical obesity (as in, not just lazy and such) should have the extra expense covered by the government. I'm my opinion, anyway. 
This isn't really fair for people who are tall. I weigh about 230-240 but I am not fat at all...
the plot...chickens
&gt;The woman reacted when the 27-year-old man put his hand on her buttocks at Glorias nightclub in Lund last summer.  &gt;She instinctively turned to confront the man who grabbed her and hit him in the face so hard she broke the 27-year-old's nose.  Which is correct? I don't know.  
I don't know anything about the old timey plane costs. I do know fuel was plentiful and planes were smaller though.  We run puddle jumpers out of our local airport that'll take a person across state for a couple hundred dollars. While small, they are roomy. Only four seats wide.
I'm not much less than that and I'm just overweight, not obese.  I am over 6' tall with a large build, though.  Size 14 shoes and all that.
Right.  Good argument, kiddo.
This is how they shall be split.  South Korea   Best Korea  Best Best Korea
[deleted]
Don't worry, you can get to those hard to reach places, women love you more than small people, and you tend to earn more money. 
It's almost as though common sense policy works better than Zero-Tolerance policy...but that's crazy right?
&gt;Explain how the UN will enforce anything on the US.  [With troops?](http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;q=un%20troops&amp;psj=1&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_qf.&amp;bvm=bv.44342787,d.b2U&amp;biw=1266&amp;bih=1019&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;tbm=isch&amp;source=og&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wi&amp;ei=QU1TUZ7fJ8nO2gWe04CwDA#imgrc=_)
Yip, keep on raping your country and feed your peasants ignorant bullshit. The time when families had numerous children are long gone. The one child policy is not coercion, it is called SURVIVAL.  You should step out of your front door and visit China, better yet, visit India. 
For starters, blind spots:  http://rt.com/usa/pentagon-f35-report-combat-012  http://www.wired.com/dangerroom/2013/03/f-35-blind-spot  http://www.thestar.com/news/canada/2013/03/06/f35_fighter_jet_plagued_by_poor_visibility_pentagon_report_warns.html  
[deleted]
or younger people? which they do. which we understand.
Unless you want your airline to actually have customers. Then it might be a bad idea.
suppose they booked it under the name of "Cat Fatperson", when Cat Fatperson doesn't show up for boarding they reassign the seat to somebody on standby.
[deleted]
They don't make money off fighting drugs like the US does.
Can anyone explain to me a situation in which medical obesity cannot be solved? I have been dieting through a variation on the warrior diet which essentially is eat one meal a day. Following this I tend to lose on average 2.5 pounds per week without any exercise. Therefore anyone who is crippled has no excuse.  I found this list http://www.webmd.com/diet/medical-reasons-obesity . I don't see anything on that list that can't be solved with dieting.  basically, what I am trying to say is that even though losing weight may be harder for some people, it doesn't entitle them to receive government funds.
1 gram of anything lasting 10 days? Who wrote this? A gram of amphetamines, MDMA, cocaine, heroin or grass will last no more than a few hours. 
+1 for libertarians
Thank you. Times a million.
AMA- Fat guy.
Near here and was shocked when an eagle came down and picked up one of our chubby squirrels. I guess we know who's responsible now. 
I'm pretty sure I've got Comcast, with about 40 megabits, and I *definitely* noticed.  Slow as all fuck.
You **STILL** can't answer my question. So here are some more you can't answer:   I just posted [a list of 31 different benefits of marriage](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1b39oy/china_says_it_fired_2_flares_at_vietnamese/c93qmdf). You claim to be against all of those benefits for both straight married couples and gay couples. So go justify what you claim to believe. Give me 31 good reasons you're against those 31 benefits for everyone.   And I'd like to remind you that your answers so far are contradicting each other. If you have so much respect for "the cultural landscape humanity held for thousands of years", then why the fuck do you want to **CHANGE THAT LANDSCAPE** by taking away all those traditional and important benefits of marriage that you dishonestly say you oppose for both straight and gay marriage?   You're just a delusional liar. You can't answer simple questions, you can't justify your hateful beliefs, and you can't tell a consistent story.   And to top it off, you **TRY TO PLAY THE VICTIM**. That's pathetic. **UTTERLY PATHETIC**. 
We need to invade canada and turn it into us. then we will free medicine. logic is undeniable. 
Turks love to haggle 
Eh, masturbation ≠ menstruation. 
If we are being really fair then really small people should pay more too because they get a (relatively) huge seat and heaps of legroom while us normal or tall people are squished. Economy is practically business class for them. Just kidding, mostly.
Not necessarily.  I'm all for having a passenger+luggage weight limit, over which there is a charge.  For example: In Australia, our carry-on luggage must be under 10kg, else we pay a surcharge. It is common for me to fly with passengers that easily weigh 20kg more than I do, yet they are still allowed their 10kg carry-on. They are allowed more weight by virtue of being physically larger/heavier. The weight limit of carry-on (and checked luggage) is obviously completely arbitrary.  Considering most airlines treat their passengers like freight anyway, the move towards weighing a passenger AND their luggage seems the only sensible solution, as long as there was a reasonable upper limit. Something like 120kg per passenger, which would easily cover most passengers and their luggage.  On the flipside, passengers whose combined weight total is less than, say, 70kg, would receive a credit towards their fare instead of a surcharge.  TL;DR- Weigh the passenger and their luggage together.
There's actually a fair amount of controversy over the F-35's prowess in the air-to-air role. It puts a lot of eggs in a very hypothetical basket. For example, the idea that it can consistently and reliably shoot down the enemy from beyond visual range without the enemy ever knowing what's going on is based on a lot of optimism. For example, in actual combat the AIM-120 AMRAAM missile has only had a 50-odd percent success rate against non-maneuvering targets with no countermeasures, flown by poorly trained pilots. Its success rate in a beyond visual range engagement is 40-odd percent.  Obviously we can expect that to improve with a newer model of the AIM-120 fired from a stealthy platform with LPI radar, but by how much, and against what kind of targets? The Typhoon, for example, has multiple different forms of missile detection and sophisticated ECM. Who's to say if the F-35 can shoot at it with impunity? That's just assuming that some branches of modern technology -stealth, LPI radar, and missile reliability- can always be expected to be superior to other branches of modern technology: RWR, MAW and ECM. But I see no reason for that to be necessarily true.   Typhoon pilots have also claimed that they can detect the F-35 from a lot further away than what Lockheed Martin claims - I won't bother looking for and linking to the stories since you either just believe them or you don't, but the point is that it's not a completely black and white issue.
[This is where the two roads mentioned cross](http://goo.gl/maps/ytA3Z).     As you can see it's pretty close to the Acropolis, hard to live much closer really. 
Hell yeah. Not only are you taking up extra space, you are burning up more fuel than those around you.
look at it this way, in 30 years she will be unable to have children 
Seems to be ISP location dependent ?  Same with another story today from the same source (Miamiherald),  as reported by others too.
Too late CNN, zero dark thirty was awesome.
The whole concept is asinine because of how ridiculously terrible it would make the flying experience. How many people, regardless of body type, will acquiesce to the time and anxiety costs of a public weigh-in? There's no possible way the weight-based surcharge would cover the lost revenue of people whom either would fly on an airline without such a policy, or stop flying altogether.
...says someone who is not gay and is not denied the rights thereof.
Ah yes this is happy day for PandaBearShenyu. I am proud of my motherland and fellow yellow men for developing new technology. China number one!
Sorry, but didn't you just try to justify sexual assault by saying: "If you cannot act with some fucking decorum in public and treat other people with respect then you deserve all the shit heaped upon you."?  
The argument here was that the previous poster "could not choose to be enrolled/vote". I know you can vote early. 
Are you forgetting whatever they attack also has nuclear fallout as well?
&gt;how to you jam a passive IR sensor  [Well this is one way.](http://chamorrobible.org/images/photos/gpw-200905-UnitedStatesAirForce-090115-F-0623L-885-clouds-F-22A-Raptor-stealth-fighter-flares-over-Kadena-Air-Base-Japan-20090115-original.jpg)
"We need to call a meeting!  It's an emergency!  So we need to have it in a couple of days."
What about Australia? 
Global reach, global power
The Eurofighter has its own problems. It is the epitome of what was possible with the previous generation. 20 years after the previous generation was outdated.  Britain is teetering on the point of dumping it because the operational flexibility of the Rafale or F/A-18 is worth more than the Eurofighters ability as a pure air superiority fighter. If it weren't for BAE stabbing the nation in the back over the QE class contract* then I suspect we'd already be looking elsewhere.  *if you want to see a real screw up the QE class has it all though. It may be heavy enough to actually not look stupid next to a Nimitz class. However no nuclear reactor and the screw up over cats and traps means it is technically inferior to the French de Gaulle class. All the expense and prestige with none of the usefulness.
They have friends.
All depends on what the R0 is. SARS was 2-5 I believe.  Also depends on the rate of mutation of the virus. It's weird that it's main point of entry is through the lower respiratory tract, which is in contrast to SARS which was upper respiratory. Right now that gives us the advantage to limit spread, but it's also a lot easier for it to mutate to favor infection via upper respiratory as well. Very dangerous virus regardless.
said he, holding his golden rod in his gold laden papal regalia.
Some research today suggests not all calories are equal though, calories from sugar are worse than calories from fats, as they relate to weight gain, for example.
http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Buddhas_of_Bamiyan
Why don't they speak up then?  It's easy to not say anything.  The church should publicly come out in support.  If they won't, they're effectively opposed as that has been their stance for the longest time.
Having to hide who you really are just to be included is stupid. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Not to mention the US literacy rate is often over-reported.  The amount of "functional illiterates" is considered quite high.    Anyways, if we are thinking in scale, 35% of the US population is still only equal to 8% of the Chinese, so?
In his defense, he primarily got to this position by practicing what he preaches.
*shrug*  The point isn't the cost of one specific church, but rather the consistent hoarding of wealth, and then spending that wealth on ornate Churches rather than the People.  God doesn't need a stone church with gargoyles and stained glass windows, I doubt he's impressed as God.  Would probably be happier if you were having the service in a pole barn and using the millions you saved to feed and clothe and educate the poor and needy.  &gt;Bankers' best guesses about the Vatican's wealth put it at $10 billion to $15 billion. 
Tapeworm works too.
Nope.
[deleted]
Nope, the two (sub)species split between 600.000 and 800.000 years with Homo Heidelbergensis being the likely common ancestor.
Everytime I see them I'm just amazed...mostly that we know they exist and that whatever we don't know about is probably even more insane.
Wow, like most of reddit you are simplifying a very, very complex situation.   First, living simply has nothing to do "war crimes." Living simply is built in as part of the Jesuit order. This order of priests has a huge focus on education (e.g. the many schools in the U.S. like Georgetown, Creighton, and Boston College) and working with the poor. They tend to see Jesus' actions as political and revolutionary- a radical and vocal love for those who society deemed unacceptable. This means questioning the structures that cause poverty and at the same time, maintaining solidarity with the poorest of the poor. Living simply is an attempt at solidarity with those who are marginalized. Again, it is built in to the vows that the Jesuits take.   As for complacency, sure he may have disagreed with the regime, even very strongly. But, to out right condemn the regime would be suicidal not only for himself, but for all Catholics he represented in Argentina. Furthermore, if he spoke out he would have been killed. Now becoming a martyr is not something new. However, to be in the positon of potential martyrdom is much harder than you and I saying he should have done it. He may not have been courageous enough to speak out-- who doesn't value their own life?  Last, the main issue is with the extradition of Jesuits whom he decided to not allow back into the country. It is argued that he was doing this for their own safety. Plus, there are reports that he worked in other ways against the murderous regime that are secretive in order to avoid public discord from his position as a cardinal.   That's not to say he's a perfect person by any means, but it is a huge step in the right direction. To have a Pope who is concerned about other social teachings, besides gay marriage and abortion, will be refreshing. Yes he has views on the subjects that I personally disagree with, but with things such as the eradication of poverty, he is much more radical and modernizing than the most recent popes. 
Telling North Korea to stick it with a 2.13 billion Dollar aircraft ha.
Someone got laid so hard people are still talking about it tens of thousands of years later.
And now it's one of our biggest industries, so if we cut it people claim it will hurt our economy. I think we could find better things to spend money on, but whatever.
Quite the contrary. For example, I support the right to quality contraceptives and want a call to action toward rape culture in rural towns where high school football dominates the narrative. I am also outraged at the flagrant disrespect of women's rights and dignity by patriarchal forces in the Middle East. They have to change these factors themselves, but the lack of outrage over here (and even complaints that it's okay since it's their culture) is simply unacceptable. When someone who claims to hold the torch of feminism lets narcissism and martyr complexes take over in the pursuit of making a name of themselves, that hurts feminism as well as progress in general when people who are part of the status quo start threatening this person with rape and death.   Snark doesn't solve the world's problems. Real-life activism, blood, sweat and tears do. 
is it just me or does anyone else not approve of him because of his stance on gay marriage? i feel like a lot of people are shrugging it off to the side. its like the most important human rights issue in the first world right now...
Calories in versus calories out. You can't cheat thermodynamics. You're probably eating more cheese and granola than you think you are. 
98 billion dollars spent last year in health, orphanages and homes for the elderly across the world.  The world's biggest charity.
Keep you looking the other way while China and Iran fuck you up the arse?  EDIT: you=America.  I just saw that you are indeed Canadian. My apologies for the presumption.
Well, they always factor in, because unless we are acting as part of a UN Peacekeeping force, an aerial attack will always be followed by some kind of ground attack. Otherwise what's the point? I suppose we could be defending SK or Taiwan, but our air power alone would not be sufficient to prevent an invasion of either. 
Foxconn does not have a high suicide rate. it has a publicized suicide rate but in reality the suicide rate is not higher than US cities or Chinese cities.  The media wanted to push a guilt trip on iphone users.
I'm a Political Anarchist/Atheist
[deleted]
You both could be bluffing...can't tell though, the dark side is clouding my vision.
He's American? And he was in the Air Force*? Well he's *certainly* an evil propaganda spewing capitalist pig here to imperialize this comment thread, right?   Sorry sir, but sound borderline insane.
&gt; Not sure why you are just focusing on the Indian government  Because that's the link you provided me.  &gt; And...well....GAME OVER...if you're clueless as to the evils of Monsanto. I can't do all your research for you.  I'm not sure whether to be kind and point you to /r/skeptic or be an asshole and send you to /r/conspiratard so you can have a deep look into the mirror.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
My grandfather was present for the trading of POWs. I think you may want to reconsider that statement.
Is this a joke?
[deleted]
i...wat   it still goes no where
[deleted]
Its like... He is actually doing what Jesus said you should do.
[deleted]
No, it's not me pushing that perception. It's not even /r/atheism.  It was you that did that yourself, just a few comments above. Like I said, when those christians come in to /r/atheism... the ONLY things they mention usually, are A: Not hating the gays... B: Not shoving their religion down people's throats and C: being just another person, with intelligent views like the rest of us.  If that, to **you,** like you say, is "watered down and overly PC," It's **you** pushing the idea that all "real" Christians are crazy and bigoted. Do you at least see where I'm coming from, or were those replies above just not even relevant to what I was saying?
As an atheist: Fuck yeah Pope Francis nailed it!
It's a servant's job. Jesus was calling his followers--by example--to a life of service. The pope is supposed to be the pinnacle of this ideal. It *should* be a position of service, but is treated that way only *very* rarely.  It kind of weirded me out when Francis was elected and world leaders called to congratulate him. It doesn't seem... seemly to congratulate someone on accepting something that shouldn't be taken as a personal point of pride but as a dignified position of service and humility. 
Yet funny enough as soon as Obama became president (first term) we had people claiming on this website that "things will be different" and "the wars will end" etc. - so where were you with your "healthy scepticism" when it was most in need?
nowadays it's a sign of PR.
I have always felt the Catholic church was headed in the wrong direction. Seeing this makes me think they may be changing course. Love this!
    2 and (n)/(n+1)
China probably wouldn't engage US force, but they could remain a North Korean enabler, which would make the fight much more deadly
cute
moo?
I did, on one of your other comments, farther down. And what's the worst the picture's gonna do? Surely you're too enlightened and euphoric to believe a little gif could do anything. And if it was really bad, I would have marked it as NSFW/NSFL to keep other people out of it.
pope fiction?
What part of moving one's money from one highly risky place to another, at least *equally* risky, place seemed better, exactly?
Lol I'm not even Christian but ok... So I have one right here. It's called Random Processes for Electrical Engineers. What page is it on?
What is he talking about? You unify your nation by denying the existance of the ethnic minorities within your borders? You make their language illegal and war upon their culture, and for this Hagel admires you?
I grew up a catholic child and would dread the moment when you had to go drink the wine. I'm not sure if it's done this way in all parishes but the pirest would simply wipe the rim of the chalice with a white cloth. It both disgusted and amused me as whatever germs it wiped away are immediately smeared back on there when the next person takes a sip. 
looking at those isobars, I'd say it'd be a hell of a time to attempt a sailing record.  those bars put the wind at beam reach almost perfectly along the  entire great circle route.
Right, cause that's not ignorant at all. 
I guess depending on timezone this means you are either going to work on Easter or on Saturday.
I'm impressed with how susceptible to PR you appear to be.  
respect has to be earned.  particularly damned respect.
Why do you think the dad pays child support? Because he must compensate for the fact that he can't be near yhe child and support him both emotionally and financially
Not necessarily.  There is a secret club, where the return/risk ratio is much lower, you just need enough money to buy in.  They don't tell us that so we'll think that rich people are just lucky.  They're crafty bastards, not lucky in any way, if anything, below average luck, about +1 but their dexterity takes a hit, -2, while ingenuity gets them a +4.
Having lived in China for a few years, I'd also quickly assume the restaurant owner is Chinese. They eat *any*thing over here, for "medicinal" reasons... Not to mention how they treat their animals/pets
Yeah those two countries have regimes built to last! Smart move.
Who cares. They are getting increasingly irrelevant with every day. 
No, th citizens of North Korea pay.  Nort Korea does this shit all the time when they need help or food or wants to lessen sanctions.  Always worked before why not again?
This sounds precisely like how every other major bank system works in the world. A certain amount in each account is guaranteed safe/insured the rest can be lost if the bank collapses.  This is why most people with large amounts of deposits spread it between multiple banks/accounts.  He's actually lucky he getting anything at all, if the EU did not complete the bailout the bank could/would have gone under without giving him a cent
I'd peg him for an Alex Jones fanatic.  Trifur is defending his opinion; sobravenewworld looks like a 14 year old girl PMS-ing for the first time.  Probably peeved because he's not married or saving - so call the stranger a cunt, his wife dumb and tell them they're delusional for making sound investments.    Have a cookie sobravenewworld, your blood sugar is low :/
In 2007 or 2008 I saw an article about "sharks circling National City Bank", I went to withdraw my savings account (around 20,000), they insisted I take a cashiers check, I asked for cash.  I didnt trust any banks to put money in, things were falling apart at the time.  He called over his manager and asked if I really need cash, I said yes, he asked if I was going to Las Vegas?  I said it wasn't his business.  He called over another manager and I eventually got them to get my fucking money (it was tense though), and the door security guard escorted me to my car in the parking lot.  5 months later instead of collapsing, PNC bought them out, I kept everything in a safe for another year till the dust settled and walked back in almost 2 years later with my money still wrapped and dated 2008 on the wrappings.  They asked where I got the money, and called over the manager, I said I withdrew it 2 years ago and am now redepositing it.  They said they never had someone pull that much money out and then bring it back in the same wrappings without spending it.  Maybe it looked stolen to them so they had to check everything out and confirm I pulled that much out originally.  The whole thing was a major pain in the ass, but the point is, if you get wind your bank is going to fail.  Don't wait, sooner you arrive, the more likely you can yank out any problems.  Yes I know my amount is tiny and is technically covered, but I also know that if things were bad enough, the FDIC doesn't have a clear set amount of time to give you 100% of your money back.  Especially if there was a large enough financial fail cascade with multiple large banks at the same time.  I don't think there would be enough money to pay everyone back, big chunks of people might get a percentage of it back and could take years to get it all back, if things were bad enough you might never get it back.  You just don't know.
better the devil you know..
[deleted]
Because they don't want Reddit to think that two white British men could ever commit such a foul act.  
I'm wondering if they had any actual plans once they removed Saddam , or was this an improvised/let's see how it goes situation. Personally I don't think they did their homework.  Sh'ias were always a "problem" in Iraq, and Saddam was the man that kept things under check.  This is the reason that it was a dictatorship. 
My only question is, do they have enough boats to get the missiles to the bases? 
So he touched her, and she confronted him to let him know that wasn't OK, and then he touched her again. I'd hit him, too.
you're missing a period, so what's your point?
Truth is, it seems like nobody knows WTF is going on, who is pushing this and why.  Which makes it hard to respond.  In general, the clearest response you can give is usually one that an opponent WANTS you to do, that will actually benefit them.   They're not particularly clever or devious gambits, rather, these are potentiated primarily by the obsessive secrecy and erratic forms of communication inside DPRK.    Maybe there are folks in the State Department who truly know what's going on, but if so, they're not going to show their hand by telling the public HERE.
Why am I not surprised that /r/Worldnews is filled with racist assholes. If this was an India rape article it would filled of tons of racist comments but now that its in the Western world lets downplay it and act like it was a freak occurrence.
Please please please let this be what happens!
Unfortunately you are correct: that is how much the average putz "dislikes" war. 
Yeah I wonder how the group training sessions went xD 
While I can appreciate the hyper-realist view, the formation of those organizations demonstrates countries surrendering sovereignty for shared, positive sum games. The IMF doesn't increase survival for any country but those that are worst off; powerful countries aid weakened countries because of dependence. I don't think dependence is bad either, I think it is a deterrence for war. While you might argue that greater countries support lesser countries for their own benefit, that doesn't argue against liberalism because it is still a multilateral positive-sum action that requires interdependence to operate. &gt;Yes... one of the most being that the people love it. Don't be fooled by it. It's just another measure of control. States are not moral agents.  While I would NEVER be foolish to believe that states are moral agents, that isn't a component of liberal int'l theory. Morality really has nothing to do with the way states interact with each other.  I'd be very careful in using history to support current international views; it is a fallacy to assert that because something has been, something is. I prefer a multi-theory approach because I earnestly believe that you can never understand relations completely and practically without utilizing the multitude of theories existent. While realism and liberalism are both antagonizing and useful, I think historical materialists have important views regarding lesser developed countries and their interactions with those of the North. I don't like tautology, I think Michel Foucault has written grand critiques of universalism. edit: I should add that I don't agree with ALL of Foucault's work (Habermas is much warmer to read), he just has great critiques of schools of thought such as tautology. 
In my experience temper tantrums didn't get me off the kiddies table. Looks like China may say it's the naughty step for Kim.
&gt; I know it suits your entitled outlook to assume everyone overextended themselves  A great many people did.  Why exactly are you so angry?  Is it because you make a bunch of money in the stock market?  &gt;so you can feel good that money-printing and asset-bubbles are now considered "investment,"  Neither of those are investments.  &gt;but the fact is that many of us lost businesses  Mmm.  Yes and why did that happen?  &gt;entire industries were taken out by the housing boom and subsequent bust.  Well it was the bust that took them out but they are starting to recover now.  &gt;Why is it fair that the investor class takes no losses  Why would it be fair for them to take losses in something they did not invest in?  If I invested in ship building and you invest in fast food should I get a cut of your profits if ship building has a bust? Should you be punished for my bad luck or failure to plan?  &gt;while millions of middle-class lose jobs and their livelihood  That is a sad fact of life.  We have been lucky to have such a long streak without such a major recession (or depression)  I think many people forgot why you need to live well within your means and put aside 20% of your income.  &gt;White-collar Federal Reserve welfare recipients is what the fuck people like you are.   Every bit of money we have invested my wife and I have earned.  &gt;You've probably never worked a real day in your life, big-man.  First, that would not make my views invalid.  Second, you are mistaken.    &gt;I'm angry, but if you aren't, you're part of the fucking problem.  Or I was not stupid enough to be seduced by a housing boom that could only bust.  I knew plenty of people who were.  I even warned them that it would bust a few years before it did.  Things like this are easy to see far ahead of time.  Yet somehow people keep getting sucked into the next big thing and think that "This time will be different!"  But it is never different.  &gt;Fuck you and your cunt wife.  Yes.  Fuck us for spending less than we earn.  Fuck us for living with much less than we make. Fuck us for not getting caught up in the next big thing and investing prudently.  God forbid anyone should ever need to save money in case life sticks a knife in their back.  You are blaming everyone else but you have only yourself to blame.  The larger economy is always having ups and downs.  Failing to prepare for that is stupidity.  If you were running a business and did not put aside money for an eventual downturn then the failure of that business is your fault.  Not anyone else's.
Jeb approves this post.
I think yourself and Monty managed to put it much better than I did. Totally agree with you though, it's a bloody good line. Also, if I recall correctly, it slips by almost unnoticed, because Withnail &amp; I are conspiring at an aside while Monty waxes lyrical. Superb piece of understated cinema.
A lot of North Koreans are religiously—and I use that term deliberately—devoted to their leaders (as Kim Jung Il and Kim Il Sung are still leaders of the country in the minds of the people), and it wouldn't surprise me to see a long, drawn-out mini-war between whoever is occupying and trying to rebuild the nation, and the dedicated and loyal North Koreans. The country is covered in forests with hills and mountains, and their urban centers are not spread out. There are lots of areas with only one or two roads, if any, leading to or through them. On top of that there are likely secret outposts, roads, tunnels, and camps scattered all over the country. It may not be hard to control Pyongyang, but it would be difficult to wipe out North Korean resistance groups.
Ping pong anyone...?
[deleted]
Gotta love that Stephen Harper
yes. thats exactly what the money in the swiss, cayman island and cyprus banks are doing... creating companies.  what fucking rock do you live under?
Republican Motto: "We won't kidnap and kill you, I swear".  What the hell is this socialist populist circlejerking doing on Reddit?
And your point is? It's not like for example the Jews stopped moaning about the holocaust, which happened about the same time.
Since he's only looking at a year, you wouldn't even get that far.
It's funny how most people don't understand this simple concept.  What do you with a freeloading "friend" who seems to be constantly borrowing money from you and never returns it?  What if he always tells bad stories about you all the time in an effort to get more popular/win chicks at bars/etc?  Similar ideas at work here, except in a much larger scale.
Actually, you did.
Fair enough.  Kind of figured which is why ad added that qualifying sentence.
Spanish guy here.  We are into the crysis and we are having so much problems. In example... 90% of the young people has no jobs (i am, ofcourse, a young guy without job, with a psychological degree and honourable study in new technologies, and I have no job and I have no future here). We have 5 millions of people without job (spain has 45 millions of inhabitants) and every week and every day this number grows.  I though that France was doing good with this global crysis and I didn't know that you were so fucked. You mentioned thtat you are afraid about things happening in a non peacefully way because what has been happening the last few days, can  you explain this last sentence?  Thank you.
Thanks Obama!
TIL
family reunion!
[Well, uh](http://i.imgur.com/706OKBV.gif)....   metric is too obsessed with base 10. 
As a Hawaii resident in Oahu, I would still feel safe, even if they could hit us. 
of course you wouldn't. you're a model student ;)
Hey you guys. Can't we all just get along? You know? For the Greater Good? -A Tau Firewarrior.
**Full war Declaration**   The moves of the U.S. imperialists to violate the sovereignty of the DPRK and encroach upon its supreme interests have entered an extremely grave phase. Under this situation, the dear respected Marshal Kim Jong Un, brilliant commander of Mt. Paektu, convened an urgent operation meeting on the performance of duty of the Strategic Rocket Force of the Korean People's Army for firepower strike and finally examined and ratified a plan for firepower strike.  The important decision made by him is the declaration of a do-or-die battle to provide an epochal occasion for putting an end to the history of the long-standing showdown with the U.S. and opening a new era. It is also a last warning of justice served to the U.S., south Korean group and other anti-reunification hostile forces. The decision reflects the strong will of the army and people of the DPRK to annihilate the enemies.  Now the heroic service personnel and all other people of the DPRK are full of surging anger at the U.S. imperialists' reckless war provocation moves, and the strong will to turn out as one in the death-defying battle with the enemies and achieve a final victory of the great war for national reunification true to the important decision made by Kim Jong Un.  The Supreme Command of the KPA in its previous statement solemnly declared at home and abroad the will of the army and people of the DPRK to take decisive military counteraction to defend the sovereignty of the country and the dignity of its supreme leadership as regards the war moves of the U.S. and south Korean puppets that have reached the most extreme phase.  Not content with letting B-52 make sorties into the sky over south Korea in succession despite the repeated warnings of the DPRK, the U.S. made B-2A stealth strategic bomber and other ultra-modern strategic strike means fly from the U.S. mainland to south Korea to stage a bombing drill targeting the DPRK. This is an unpardonable and heinous provocation and an open challenge.  By taking advantage of the U.S. reckless campaign for a nuclear war against the DPRK, the south Korean puppets vociferated about "preemptive attack" and "strong counteraction" and even "strike at the commanding forces", openly revealing the attempt to destroy monuments symbolic of the dignity of the DPRK's supreme leadership.  This clearly shows that the U.S. brigandish ambition for aggression and the puppets' attempt to invade the DPRK have gone beyond the limit and their threats have entered the reckless phase of an actual war from the phase of threat and blackmail.  The prevailing grim situation more clearly proves that the Supreme Command of the KPA was just when it made the judgment and decision to decisively settle accounts with the U.S. imperialists and south Korean puppets by dint of the arms of Songun, because time when words could work has passed.  Now they are openly claiming that the B-2A stealth strategic bombers' drill of dropping nuclear bombs was "not to irritate the north" but "the defensive one". The U.S. also says the drill is "to defend the interests of its ally". However, it is nothing but a lame pretext to cover up its aggressive nature, evade the denunciation at home and abroad and escape from the DPRK's retaliatory blows.  The era when the U.S. resorted to the policy of strength by brandishing nuclear weapons has gone.  It is the resolute answer of the DPRK and its steadfast stand to counter the nuclear blackmail of the U.S. imperialists with merciless nuclear attack and their war of aggression with just all-out war.  They should clearly know that in the era of Marshal Kim Jong Un, the greatest-ever commander, all things are different from what they used to be in the past.  The hostile forces will clearly realize the iron will, matchless grit and extraordinary mettle of the brilliant commander of Mt. Paektu that the earth cannot exist without Songun Korea.  Time has come to stage a do-or-die final battle.  The government, political parties and organizations of the DPRK solemnly declare as follows reflecting the final decision made by Kim Jong Un at the operation meeting of the KPA Supreme Command and the unanimous will of all service personnel and people of the DPRK who are waiting for a final order from him.  1.From this moment, the north-south relations will be put at the state of war and all the issues arousing between the north and the south will be dealt with according to the wartime regulations.  The state of neither peace nor war has ended on the Korean Peninsula.  Now that the revolutionary armed forces of the DPRK have entered into an actual military action, the inter-Korean relations have naturally entered the state of war. Accordingly, the DPRK will immediately punish any slightest provocation hurting its dignity and sovereignty with resolute and merciless physical actions without any prior notice.  2. If the U.S. and the south Korean puppet group perpetrate a military provocation for igniting a war against the DPRK in any area including the five islands in the West Sea of Korea or in the area along the Military Demarcation Line, it will not be limited to a local war, but develop into an all-out war, a nuclear war.  It is self-evident that any military conflict on the Korean Peninsula is bound to lead to an all-out war, a nuclear war now that even U.S. nuclear strategic bombers in its military bases in the Pacific including Hawaii and Guam and in its mainland are flying into the sky above south Korea to participate in the madcap DPRK-targeted nuclear war moves.  The first strike of the revolutionary armed forces of the DPRK will blow up the U.S. bases for aggression in its mainland and in the Pacific operational theatres including Hawaii and Guam and reduce not only its military bases in south Korea but the puppets' ruling institutions including Chongwadae and puppet army's bases to ashes at once, to say nothing of the aggressors and the provokers.  3. The DPRK will never miss the golden chance to win a final victory in a great war for national reunification.  This war will not be a three day-war but it will be a blitz war through which the KPA will occupy all areas of south Korea including Jeju Island at one strike, not giving the U.S. and the puppet warmongers time to come to their senses, and a three-dimensional war to be fought in the air, land and seas and on the front line and in the rear.  This sacred war of justice will be a nation-wide, all-people resistance involving all Koreans in the north and the south and overseas in which the traitors to the nation including heinous confrontation maniacs, warmongers and human scum will be mercilessly swept away.  No force on earth can break the will of the service personnel and people of the DPRK all out in the just great war for national reunification and of all other Koreans and overpower their might.  Holding in high esteem the peerlessly great men of Mt. Paektu, the Korean people will give vent to the pent-up grudge and realize their cherished desire and thus bring a bright day of national reunification and build the best power on this land without fail.   Source: http://live.reuters.com/Event/North_Korea
That doesn't look like an innocent mixup, but more like the North Koreans opportunistically killed two American troops.
Not facebook official if thats what you mean. NK says they enter war with SK, but they arent entering *war war*. They war with south korea, but they're not *in war* with south korea.
You can sell (some) hemp products. However it is illegal to manufacture them here. 
&gt; their rockets could not hit Fort Hood due to range and accuracy incapability  I think this is the funniest part about his claims. Even if they worked according expectation, only his country's highest order of ICBM, the Taepodong 3, could hit the panhandle of Texas. I don't think this rocket has even seen field testing yet. Essentially, his claim wouldn't make sense even if his country's technology was at all reliable.
Well, note that there are giant protests in India by women complaining about how the police there handle rape reports. We folks in the United States or Europe who have the impression that Indian police do a particularly lousy job of handling the reports haven't (mostly) formed spontaneous prejudice against Indian special victims units. We're responding to the articles about the women marching in protest marches in India.
CNN is just mad that North Korea is muscling in on their fake rogue state franchise. 
I hate to say it, but top tier CEOs demand more than a million dollars. This is just going to cause French companies to contract out their CEOs somehow, give them more stock, or simply lose access to them. 
[deleted]
edited, that's still a hunk of cash the doctor needs to make up (and doesn't include residency where a doctor is basically broke ass poor and still working double the hours).   Leave it to reddit to claim the most overworked profession on the planet is overpaid. 
What an absolute joke. How can a 30 year old run a country or declare war. Hahahaha, the ugly little fuck that he is.
"Rational" Russia? Dude, they can't even get their elections straight let alone be "rational". They're even more insane than America. I don't know where people get this idea that Russia is stable and in a great place right now. They're not. Even if they tried to start a conflict with America they would be obliterated. America is too strong military wise.
General strategy was for American Armor to advance over and secure the DMZ. South Korean troops were  come behind them to do most of the fighting in NK; to avoid fulfilling their propaganda of American soldiers destroying their country. Though he never specified whether or not this was different for an all out NK blitz or what. 
Spin the bottle on the world map! Which country do we threaten next???
&gt;Isnt Japan also an ally of SK? Then again that might not matter as NK unification would be seen as a threat to them no?  [No.]( http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Article_9_of_the_Japanese_Constitution)  Lots of people in Japan think this should be repealed, but they're the minority. Unless attacked directly, Japan won't get involved. 
Anything to break the monotony of our short, pointless lives.
Why work if it makes you less money than you had on welfare?  Why work when there aren't any jobs?
For some reason despite the serious tone of all this I still imagine Kim Jong Un brushing his teeth in his feety pajamas before being tucked in by a general at the end of the day.
It's a valuable resource collector, and shouldn't replace actual sources in the same way Reddit shouldn't replace Youtube. Find the information, and then click the [1] down to find the source.
Those would be some big ass barrels 
William Wallace ?
Ok
Hard to go full retard when DPRK is already world's greatest golden retard!!! No argue! _It is known._
ANYWHERE OTHER THAN REDDIT
The leaked diplomatic cables reported that some party officials would be happy with reunification under the SK government.
Why doesn't China smack them?  
[deleted]
Is this adressed to me?
/r/neutralpolitics is what you are looking for
Even if they had another 50 years, they won't get much farther than they are now. You can make the most awesome, coolest car in ever in the history of humans, and it's not worth a goddamned thing if it doesn't have gas. NK doesn't have the basic infrastructure to be able to support a war. 
I only support a war with NK if it frees the NK people. There are likely massive crimes against humanity going on in there.
If they help it will only be for a slice of NK. No matter how well we get along now it all comes down to buffer zones
not quite such a long way when you have an entire country to pick your slave labour from.  Heck, if they dug 5 miles a year that'd take ten years.  It's not that far given the amount of time and slave labour they have had.  oh, and the south have already discovered some tunnels, so it's safe to assume it's do-able.  --edit-- Don't make the mistake of assuming they have to dig a new tunnel for the nukes and start from today.  A tunnel dug 10 years ago is the same as a tunnel dug today.  If it's big enough to a tuck of slaves to go down, it's big enough for a truck of **BOOM** to go down. 
Yeah, in a dick waving contest, human rights are just afterthoughts am I right?  This sub is scary...
She was from Niagara Falls. You wouldn't know her.
Last time I checked, Glasgow wasn't in the US.. Have I been missing something?
East germany, however, is not part of that powerhouse. East germany still is a poor and backwards place compared to west germany.
That would be the responsibility of the 35th ADA (air defense artillery) Brigade located in Korea. I can imagine they have been in a higher than normal state of alert over the past weeks.
THIS JUST IN: VAPES.
It seems North Korea and America would have a few things in common after all, then.
Too bad they won't get it, because it's not worth losing most of your intellectual capital because the boss is overpaid.
I like how you get downvoted because you dont make up a fairy tale about a China SK/American coalition. Has everyone forgot about the first Korean war?
The full scale bombing of civilian population centers in Germany comes to mind.
Go home Kim, you're drunk.
They go back to the status quo by slowly laying off the rhetoric. Consider how NK has gone after each time Kim Yong Il would start escalating, although I admit KYI never took it to this level. They just stop issuing threats (typically after the west gives them a tiny scrap for peace reasons) and tells all their citizens that the enemy was so afraid of them that not only did they back down but they gave tribute. As for generals getting shot, I doubt that will happen, they will rejockey for internal position based on who is percieved as having the better hand in the event of a coup, but that should be it. 
Kim Jong un keeps plenty under his bed for snackin.
I'll let you off lol. 
I'm not going to jump into a big debate about what war is right and what war is wrong - personally, I think they all are.  Some are necessary, unfortunately.. and some aren't.  As for the politicians?  Pfft.  I say put them on the front lines, with rifles in their hands, if they want the fight so bad.  Let the rest of us stay home.  Personally, however, I do believe that we defended ourselves during WWII also.. granted it's a little murky, but in the end if we didn't step in we would have been jumped on anyway.  All a matter of time there.
KJI's sister and brothers still hold high ranking positions.
[deleted]
They managed to launch a satellite into orbit quite recently, not exactly an embarrassing thing to do.  
*baby baby*
In essence: "I'd rather our children starve in the streets of Moscow than live in the same home as a loving gay couple."
I've heard the Siberia workers are better off than working in North Korea itself.
It was good Friday yesterday, a religious holiday, the pubs were closed because of this (Ireland). I would have liked to have went for a pint.  Tell me my rights weren't infringed. 
This is the problem with crowdsourcing. You get a lovely wordcloud, but not necessarily a workable constitution. 
*"Everyone's idea of freedom is different."*  Men&gt;Women  *"Western media is telling you something Egyptians themselves don't believe in."*  Yet they are the majority government.
Because a repeat offense isn't the same as bringing up something that was done before hand.
Yes and you are the proof of it.  I guess instead of finding a real job you had no other chance than going to invade a foreign country for ~~bp-exxon-shell interests~~  freedom. h4h4  Iraqi people are so happy with us now, especially in baghdad.
Why is he being downvoted? He is completely correct.
the marchers were mostly young liberals who took on Mubarak's regime, but many voters are Muslims who vote for Islamic candidates that suck. 
o mondieux
Yes, because Obama is the reason we give money to Egypt.
Yes, but we still had to have an industrial revolution.  There's no way the US would be the powerhouse it is today without that, and China is going through a similar period of development in its own history.
China should worry about my arrival, not rivers disapprearanceseses. China is stupid. Everybody knows that. They buried an army made out of clay, like it was going to work somehow. How stupid is that? Pretty stupid, I'd say. Now they have ME to deal with. I'm coming, like a monkey in the night, only quiet, and weildng a thing they can't deny as the thing they think has been foretold to be the thing they expect. I'll be dressed well, and they won't suspect a thing. Until it's too late!  It would be funny, if you were me. hahaheheehahahmm. Funny. Don't even attempt to criticize me.
Canada's per capita gun crime is minuscule compared to the US.
Actually, the article hardly touches that topic at all. I read the Constitution and it guarantees rights for women, "the Egyptian Constitution *as it was passed*" is fine and not the real worry. The article instead spoke about how they think the new government *may* make new laws that take women's rights away (and many on the left are suspicious and mistrustful of Morsi, which the author clearly is too), although this hasn't really happened yet since the political deals aren't hammered out fully.  And unfortunately, Todd Akin was not the only politician who was talking about rape during the election. He lost his race badly, thankfully, but those [mandatory transvaginal ultrasound bills](http://www.google.com/search?q=transvaginal+ultrasound+bill&amp;hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;biw=1440&amp;bih=698&amp;ei=CNlXUYKxF4LZ0wGP_4HABQ&amp;start=0&amp;sa=N) are still going forward.
What a stupid headline! Don't they have proof readers?
&gt;Look, the laws you point out (as you, in all fairness, admit) are pretty old.   Many of those state constitutions are still that way.  &gt;The point is, just because there are no specific laws in place that are non-secular does not mean that Turkey is a secular nation - it is the actions and behaviors of the government that determine this.   No, it's the constitution that determines this.  &gt;I Googled "Secularism in Turkey," and learned that there is mandatory religious education in Turkey, and the government clearly favors Muslims by funding Islamic groups and organizations, while at the same time denying religious minorities the same access these public funds.   Cite mandatory religious education, please. I'm not saying I don't believe it doesn't exist in some context, but I would like to see what you're talking about specifically before I accept your conclusions.  &gt;You are arguing a technicality.  Can a person in Turkey go before the judicial branch and challenge a non-secular law, yes or no? If the answer is yes, then they are secular and this is not a technicality at all.  &gt;Turkey has a history of human rights violations against religious and ethnic minority groups. This continues today.  So does America.  &gt;The Turkish government clearly favors Turkish Muslims over other minority groups.  The US clearly favors White Christians over other minority groups.  &gt;The government must serve as the example for the people if Turkey is to create a truly secular state. Until then, Turkey will be an Islamic nation.  Fine. Then the US is a Christian nation.    
i don't understand why bank deposits aren't safe anymore? folks used to keep their cash under the bed and then they were 'taught' to keep it in banks so its 'safer'.  i mean, how am i supposed to explain to a kid whether it 'better' to deposit their savings in a bank or keep it in a piggy bank in their room? 
Although this article only addresses one company when there are many others that also utilize nPB glues, it's some much needed insight into the real-world effects of our regulatory climate.  &gt;Businesses found nPB appealing partly because the E.P.A. had given it an endorsement of sorts by adding it to a list of chemicals that do not harm the ozone layer. But an unintended effect of that action was to allow sellers of the chemical to market it as federally approved "nonhazardous," green and worker friendly.  
Yup, exactly.
Hey you are the one who is "inclined to agree" with people who want to fight, not me.
[deleted]
"Unreliable nukes are this nation's backbone!"
constitutional amendment. 
Good palawon is one of the most amazing places on the planet
York has a lot of anti-semitic sentiment. Not to say that BDS of Israel is anti-semitic (it could just be ignorance), but where there is anti-semitism, there will always be hatred for Israel.
Descending into mathematics when it comes to lives is a sticky scenario. It may be true that two lives are worth more than one, or dozens worth more than two, but if we judge our actions based only on their consequences then we start to get into utilitarianism, which itself is a questionable moral philosophy. A man's first and foremost moral obligation is to ensure that his actions are not amoral - then to ensure that he prevents injustice.
Getting called out on fucking kids has really made the Catholic church PR-savvy.
why dont you go educate yourself and read the UN convention on law of the sea before you go off spouting ridiculous questions/statements and making a fool of yourself
I think more to the point is you should keep such a disgustingly oppressive and hateful message to yourself, no one's making you do anything different with your life, so why are you making others live by your rules?
You are absolutely right. The government needs to reclassify marriage as civil unions and let "marriage" remain an entirely private affair.
Well, the African and Middle Eastern countries hilighted are predominately Muslim.
The Imgur link is giving these away, get creative!
Who thinks that he can't? Maharajah was merely relating what he believed to be the church's position. I didn't see him complaining that it was a hindrance in his life.
Thanks to the semantics clusterfuck, no real progress has been made because people can't make out the distinction between tax benefits and an imaginary promise of a monogamous and committed relationship.
Came here to see this post. Very satisfied. A+++++++ Would click on thread again.
April fools..
East-side LA?
I'm now receiving emails about a Cyprian prince that wants my bank account number to transfer his money to.
Seems to me like the intermingling of politics and business as usual (by Greek/Cypriot standards, anyway, although other countries are far from immune from it).
Is that the street value again?    How much did the heroin cost to produce and ship vs the cost to capture it?
That's not a good point to make. Considering its most likely the news that made tourism decline. I mean it might be the entire reason people aren't going to India, but it seems to be the main reason.
You sound like a cultist. If you come across someone not indoctrinated into your silly cult, which you do all the time since you hold fringe beliefs, you react as if that person is hallucinating. How mature is that?  Are you freaking out because I didn't rabidly agree with you after you mentioned Mitt Romney? Were you expecting a Reddit-typical response of immediate hatred and class envy? I don't care how much money Mitt Romney has or makes, any more than I care what an actor or sports star makes. That's their business. The only reason you've singled him out is that you've been trained like a seal to react to such stimulus. All because he dared to run against a political party that doesn't care about you but for some reason has your blind allegiance. If you're exposed to the name of the person you're supposed to hate, you see red and get into lynching mode.  You're suffering from an acute case of tribalism. Examine yourself and see what you can improve, otherwise you'll be a jealous, bitter, greedy cunt for the rest of your life.
Seems to me there is more of an atheist reaction of outrage over the alleged "christian outrage." I think most of the "reaction" is made up in their head so they have something to talk about...
1. surface navy, not just navy 2. strongest, not biggest. A navy that has many hulls but not the crew, fuel &amp; planes to outfit themis useless, which was the case for most of the Japanese Navy. The Soviet Navy might have been bigger in numbers, but lacked the capabilities of the Canadian one (first and foremost aircraft carriers). 
Okay, I was stationed on the Northern Sinai section of the Gaza boarder back in late 2011 through early 2012. Where we were located we mostly dealt with drug/human trafficking and the occasional terrorist threat. Our objectives were to deal terrorists first, then the traffickers, then any refugees we encounter. Of course, we primarily dealt with the Sudanese refugees, because there were just a lot of them.   The traffickers were usually Bedouins who lived in the area. Nobody was happy with what they were doing, and we tried to stop it whenever possible, but at least they were just trying to make a living. Then we had the legitimate terrorists, usually coming from Egypt directly, or coming through Egypt after sneaking out of Gaza. These fuckers only goal was to get into the settlements on the borders to kill people, or if they were crafty, get into a larger city where they could wreak havoc.   On top of all of these hostile elements there were the Egyptian border guard. Before anyone asks, I don't know what their actual Egyptian designation was. We were always told that these men were criminals and had opted to serve out their sentences on the border, a story which may or may not be true. It mattered little why they were there, we only cared about the fact that they spent just about every single night shooting at the smugglers, shooting at the refugees, and even shooting at us. These guys would get bribed by just about anybody with money, which would result in them laying down covering fire for smugglers, or even looking the other way while the terrorist cells would slip in the country.   We were stationed there in response to these attacks, many of which happened farther South from where we were stationed, but had elements which slipped through our section of the border: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2011_southern_Israel_cross-border_attacks   Where we guarded the workers constructing the fence between Egypt and Israel. So excuse me if I am not a fan of Egyptians or the Egyptian armed forces.
You haven't read the article at all. Don't comment.
So is this in China?
The actions of one teenager explains the feelings of the entire country of 30.5 million people?  Can we take the arbitrary example of Adam Lanza and claim that all Americans are just sick of damn school kids? Or of Anders Breivik and claim that all ~~Swedes~~ Norwegians are homicidal Islamophobes? 
Well, Sex trafficking isn't really anything new in that part of the world.  Is anyone really surprised at how high it went to sustain itself?
I wouldn't necessarily say that China's economy is dependant on the USA, but China certainlly has deep ties in the global economy. Any move against the US and its allies would probably cause them problems with other countries more than with the US. 
weak sauce.  chip on your shoulder, much?
Yup yup.
And that means what? If anything that should cause a revolution faster than in the other cases...but culturally uprisings are not in their nature. 
I would be nice to have some way to have some way to disable it. The way it is right now most comment threads are useless.
If you want to get rid of it, add the following URL to your adblock filter:  http://www.redditstatic.com/reddit.en.*.js
Someone in this topic posted that going via  i.reddit.com disables it. I'm just using alien blue instead.
April Fools Day on Reddit. Aaaaaanything can happen
[deleted]
Hehe. The best people are the people who look through comment history and assume things :D  I haven't played in months!
I have two pitchforks, thank you.
The website isn't reachable and your a) doesn't make invalid was i was trying to say   but yes, I could have been more accurate with what I've said
In the last few thousand years, God has protected exactly zero people from anything.  What makes you think he is about to protect this woman?  
Nukes? North Korea can't mount a nuclear warhead. They have no delivery system.
Those are hara-kari models.
It wasn't taken for no reason, the banks were insolvent and needed recapitalization and debt restructuring or they'd fail and depositors would lose everything anyway.
The person you're responding to did not imply otherwise.
I bet if Russia and China actively supplied MANPADs, ATGMs and other equipment to those Islamist scum NATO losses would also be somewhere close to this number.
Seems unfair that at 6'2 and 210 I should have to pay as much as the morbidly obese 5'3 210 lady.
I don't even know what to say anymore. Any response I might have for this has already been used hundreds of times by many different people. 
[deleted]
But we aren't talking about a 40 ton airplane; these are small airplanes that only carry a handful of people at a time that are implementing the fees. So I don't think it's really a fair comparison to make. 
Now you have zero
no much different to any other countries leaders then 
Although being tall is most of the time fucking awesome, there are some retarded down sides.
&gt; weight of the passengers have very little impact on the variance in fuel usage  The plane only seats 12 or so people. If everyone was double the average weight it could only seat 6.  Or are you talking about large planes? In that case do you have a source on the fuel/weight cost?
[deleted]
Unfortunately that's unlikely to happen. Just look at how the whole "charging for checked luggage" thing started. Or, in another sector, how almost all mobile communications companies in the US got rid of unlimited data plans. If profits go up enough they will compensate for loss of customers.
I'm the foot fuckin master
[WHY I OUGHTA!!](http://www.reactiongifs.com/wp-content/uploads/2013/03/yee.gif) I'm starting to wonder how many people have tagged me now and how often I am going to be addressed by name on reddit. 
We already have this in Britain. Well done, France!
I am a big guy and I am all for it. The only condition I have is that, if the person weighs more and pays more then the seat ought to properly accommodate that passenger and (more importantly) not inconvenience other passengers.   Edit: Lets face it, it costs me more fuel in my car to move myself around and it costs the airline more to get my butt up in the air, why shouldn't I pay more and Mr. or Ms. 120lb pay less?
I couldn't find any reference with a quick glance, here's the link if you want to take a closer look:  http://www.forbes.com/2007/02/07/worlds-fattest-countries-forbeslife-cx_ls_0208worldfat_2.html
[deleted]
There was an article posted a couple of weeks ago that said North Korea grows great quality poppies for prime opium which can be refined into high quality heroin.  The heroin from North Korea is a very sought after product because of its potency.  North Korea will smuggle hundreds of kilos through the Chinese border and have many high ranking North Korean officials sell the prized heroin.  They have maybe a dozen top ranking officials in China and Asia overseeing the selling of heroin.  One NK defector claimed that these officials were ordered to sell $100million worth per year per group.  Each of the dozen or so officials had a small group with them to help with the sales.  This seems like A LOT of work but because of the high potency of the heroin, it is certainly attainable.  Any time they get caught, they have plenty of money to bribe local officials to let them go back to North Korea.  If nobody has posted the article by the time I get home I'll dig through my web history and link to it here.
&gt; I can't image there wood off been  FTUFFY (Fuck That Up Further For You)
Oh, fair enough.   Well, the burden of proof is not on me. The other guy is emitting a highly questionnable affirmation, he's the one who should back it up with some data. And yes, if he has absolutely no data to support his highly questionnable affirmation (and I suspect he doesn't), he should shut up. 
The bbc is just copying the mythbusters
sourcE?
The children in Gaza are Literally Hitler, I see, thanks for the political analysis you fucking retard.
Source?   Big pharma and insurance companies are refusing to treat people without money. As GM crops set us up for more and worse diseases this is a real concern. 
20 comments, no one bothered to double- check?  - The lashes are for sexual relations with another man, not the rapist. - The lashes are scheduled to be dished out when she's 18. But it's unlikely to happen at all. - The rapist is going to jail.  The people who really should be lashed are the fucktards who put up that website. Even Fox News has the story accurate!
yep yep yep. i think people might just assume negative aspects of being "not normal," similar to being ignorant (neutral in meaning lack of knowledge).
Yeah, there are almost no people who are against abortions in France, and the few that are also want to bring back a ban on homosexuality, so we tend to ignore them. 
And people like you are what keep the hatred in that part of the world going
You keep using the word "irresponsible" and I don't think you know what it means. People have sex, prevention doesn't always work, pregnancies happen. Why should that individual be forced to have a child when the preventative measures didn't do their job? Even the most responsible people can become pregnant.
THIS!!  I'm 6'2", and I went to Asia last year on a Chinese airline, and they're legit made for 110lb 5'5" Chinese people.  It is terrible how planes are just designed for tiny people, even non-asian airlines.  
Children born prematurely in the beginning of the 3rd trimester (even the end of the 2nd trimester) have good chances of survival with neonatal care and can use their lungs outside of the womb at that point.  So just because a fetus doesn't need to use an organ in the womb doesn't mean that organ isn't developed enough to function.  Also babies have legs and cannot walk yet - I fail to see your point about fetuses. Walking (not to mention running) is a long road that requires many neurological pathways to be built and muscle coordination to be learned. Babies begin to build those neural pathways in the womb, NOT once they are born. The "quickening" (or when a baby starts to kick in the womb) is the first steps that a baby takes to building neural pathways to walk. So even by your own analogy a fetus is developing and learning to be a human being from a neurological standpoint.
news.com.au is not the Australian govt and its articles don't constitute standard instructions. It's like a random paper in the UK giving standard instructions to travelers to the US on "how not to get shot". 
I was on the receiving end of "shared" episodes for all of Season 1 and 2.  I also bought the DVD box sets for both seasons after the fact so I could show them to my friends and family and get them hooked on the show.  Am I a criminal for wanting to watch them on-release instead of five months later?
All I can think of is Oprah.... You get an abortion!....You get an abortion!...We all get Abortions!!!
She had sex with a man around age 14. Statuatory rape, not consensual sex.
But then that brings up a whole new set of problems. Who gets sterilized? Where do we draw the line? It could easily escalate into something akin to the hocaust.
Right, and Michael Jordan retired and played baseball for a couple years because he was tired of basketball.  
Sorry, but almost no jobs give you paid workout time.  And many jobs require some level of mobility in order to do and not be an embarrassment to your employer.  Also getting fat requires over eating, if you don't over eat, you won't get fat.  So it would be silly to pay officers to work out when the work outs are only necessary because they choose to over eat.
I think he meant he wishes he could upvote for wit, and then again for cake day. 
Do you have a source for the Unicef scam?
So infertile couples are a mockery of marriage too? 
Well hold on now, if there are only hundreds of non-rapists in a country of billions, then I would declare that country a country of rapists.  It's like America is known as a white Christian country because 60% of it are.  If it's 99.999% rapists, then...
Edited accordingly, but to be fair the US was directly responding to North Korean aggression and first strikes.
You'd be surprised to learn that there is probably a house in your neighborhood that is being used to grow and it's run by some people that are sending that money back south. While you're getting local produce, the money *can* be going south to the cartels.
Weh weh weh
So no numbers provided?
1) No, he's right. German power companies have to pay you for any electricity you put back onto the grid.  2) It's bologna.
now this is how you progressive.  in America he could have just said something about Bush and FoxNews and it would have been just fine.  too bad you were caught sir, you were doing a fine Progressive job!
Seriously, how can you just base a whole opinion about India men based on one article that looks like a racist piece of propaganda. Australia is actually well known for it's overt racism against Indians in general.   The article claims to interview 1 cafe owner who claims to know how Indian men think.   That's like I interviewed one victim of the Columbine shootings in the US and then claimed that all Americans are bloodthirsty murderers.
I will never deny the holocaust, or the suffering of 12 million innocent people, but enough is enough. It happened 70 years ago, I (Anne) Frankly, don't care. Nobody did anything about the Tutsi massacre, until it was too late. I see all these people devoting their livelihoods to finding out who else didn't open the door for every Jew, Gypsy or retard that came their way. The holocaust is over and most of the survivors are dead, this was not the worst thing that has ever happened, or will happen again.   I feel it is better to devote more resources and sleuthing to ending **slavery** in Mauritania, genocide in the Middle East, and protect our fucking rainforests, so that our Grand Kids don't get holocausted by smog.
Here's a thought, since it is NO secret that rape is a very real possibility, DON'T GO TO INDIA!  I am really getting tired of, primarily, self entitled Westerners going to (fill in the blank country), without the FIRST thought of learning the actual culture FIRST, believing that the world is their personal zoo.  Hikers "accidentally" cross into IRAN and get caught and everyone whines about the poor hikers.  A woman decided to play "human shield" in front of a house in Israel / Palestine (border depends on the day of the week).  After being ordered to move repeatedly, they had the bulldozer run her over and all I read was that poor girl.  One if you are going to be ANYWHERE near a hostile nation, KNOW WHERE THE FUCK ARE (Oh wait isn't that the first rule of hiking?).  If you challenge a bulldozer, don't be surprised when you LOSE, after all IT'S a FUCKING BULLDOZER.  Look, I am a white middle aged American (wow and apparently a grumpy one at that), and I have the RIGHT to go ANYWHERE in the United States of America I want to, but if you think that I'm going to trot on down to South Detroit at Midnight and NOT expect to get robbed or shot, or both, then you are just being naive.  The world is not your zoo, and the people in other countries don't give one flying SHIT about you wanting to "absorb the local culture" or your desire to go to (fill in the blank country), to become a member of the world community or whatever bumper sticker nonsense you tell yourself and friend about your travels.  If you don't put yourself in bad positions, you are LESS LIKELY to have bad things happen to you.  Using common sense in your travels does not mean hiding in a bunker or being a Xenophobe, but can certainly prevent you from being kidnapped, raped, and / or murdered.
Jesus tittyfucking christ
It all makes sense now.  Kim Jong-Un is a cylon.
[deleted]
Probably be buried but what's the deal with Rodman there? Also the fact they've named those flowers kimjongilia is pretty damn funny. 
[deleted]
/r/pyongyang  
Or staying in the same place in time.  *Think about that*.
Are you going to tell me that piracy doesn't hurt them? You think people don't see that they can get it for free and do that instead of paying, something that most of them would have otherwise done? Even cdprojekt red came out and said that piracy really hurt them, and that was even about a game that a *lot* of people agreed not to pirate.
I wonder if they just intentionally make it more depressing.
Nice try, Kim Jong Un
Given NK's military strength, their closest equivalent is Easter Island.
[deleted]
fine, in that case we're mostly on the same page.  Although in theory you ought to be able to set up a payment method that accepts anonymous donations.  I know bitcoin supports that.
Probably the very same rocks that attacked Russia lately!
Wait John McCain has a ship named after him? I'm imagining the bow of it shaped like the growth on his jaw...
A great way to look at it, seems so obvious now. Thanks :)
I'm not a bigot. I just hate monotheism. 
I literally asked a question to clarify my own knowledge.  
[deleted]
EDIT:  [They are allowing them home, I stand corrected.](http://www.reuters.com/article/2013/04/03/us-korea-north-idUSBRE93002620130403)  By no means is this standard procedure.  This is a very serious test of NK-SK tensions that is putting billions of dollars worth of income at risk for North Korea.
So butthurt..
It looks ten times cleaner than my city. No crumbling buildings, graffiti, abandoned cars, broken windows. If the South ever gets control over the entire peninsula, then I bet they could make it really great place to live and visit.
Read in Stringer's voice. got a good lol
[deleted]
She's not my girlfriend, she's my girl friend... I'm not lesbian...   Also, girls in India don't report rapes. You are lying if you try to use skewed statistics.
"India" "Rape" "Western women" -&gt; Upvote  Thats how /r/worldnews works. We need a new sub where actual "world news" are posted and discussed.
This seems to be a graceful move by Israel; bombing an empty area is more a bark than a bite when you consider the history of this conflict.
Doesn't help them very much to have the money if sanctions prevent them from buying stuff with it.
I actually am deathly afraid of confrontation, traveling, and plain human interaction in general.  I also have asthma, one leg is longer than the other, and I am anemic.    If this happened to me, I don't have a girlfriend, but if I had one and this happened - **I WOULD TRACK THESE FUCKERS AND MAKE THEM SWALLOW THEIR OWN NUTS**
So could we really justify killing their soldiers, who are not only misled, but forced into fighting without actual chance of victory against us.
really? so im not the only one?
Sexy was brought back by the Great Leader in 1963. Everyone knows that.
Fuel air bombs. Wtf over.
Not really comparable. East Germans could travel to the West (not all, but enough) and most had West German TV at home (illegal, but nobody cared). East Germans knew pretty well what was going on in the West - they also had special shops ('intershops') were they could buy all the West German goodies for insane amounts of money.
&gt;public perception  &gt;worldwide image  Yeah, meaning money. Those things going down result in dollar-amount damage.
Here is an opposite suggestion: what if the rest of the world's countries (I.e. American news/public broadcast) are coming up with crazy conclusions about North Korea because nobody can gain access to their country as well?
Oh well! its 8:45am! time for my jolly bike ride!  imma ride my bike, la la laaa...  and here's my office!   problem solved.  
[deleted]
Maybe we should let colonial British reconstruct, *most *of the countries of the commonwealth nowadays are doing Ok imo
Let's see.... the little guy is the 3rd leader of North Korea's hereditary dictatorship. His grandfather wasn't crazy, his dad wasn't crazy and neither is he. This is all theatrics and negotiation. The real problem is that everyone gets used to a certain level of antics after a while. That means the North has to take it to a new level every now and then to keep being noticed. Maybe this time they've gone too far, or maybe not.   If war *doesn't* break out in the next week or so, look for things to settle down before the next round of antics gets going in 2 or 3 years.  
Oh yeah, cause thugs listen to the voice of reason. They're thugs, they don't give a shit about you . I'm not saying go and start a problem where there isn't one, but you can defend yourself when attacked. 
There's only the little matter of the South Vietnamese fighting alongside the US with about ~200,000 dead. Still no balance by any means but not nearly as one-sided as you make it sound. Next thing you will tell me how well the US did in WWII by comparing the total number of US casualties from the US to those from Germany... Historical relativism at its best.
what about Riddick?
The problem is that you can't win the hearts of the people in such a small amount of time and you can't be a war with them while trying to win their hearts.  So, ultimately this idea that you can win the hearts of the people is bullshit. You can't go to war and win people's hearts unless you cutting them out of their chests. You also can't do nothing for 100 years and then expect to win them over in 5-10... while bombing them.  It's ridiculous. Instead you just go crush them and leave. If they do it again you crush them and leave. You just keep doing that until the people get the idea and if they don't .. fuck them. Eventually they will get tired of living under these types of leaders and they will revolt and start building a real nation.. and if that nations threatens us.. we go in and turn them into dust once again.   At least there would be plenty of jobs... constantly rebuilding their cities. The point if you have to let time go by to win their hearts.. or control them.
No it's 19%, not 25.  Stop using inflated bullshit statistics.  And the sustainability argument sounds like you're trying to imply their population is increasing when it's actually decreasing.  So no, nit's not natural to seek new fishing grounds.  If their fishing grounds are expanding while population is decreasing, it's genuinely a case of grabbing new resources.  &gt; Evil? Hardly, it's a matter for survival of China as nearby fishing supplies have dwindled.    And who's fucking fault is it that this happened in the first place?  Not the rest of the world's fault.  China has always had a poor environmental and sustainability record.
[Not true.](http://www.deathpenaltyinfo.org/costs-death-penalty)  Unless you're talking about just straight up murdering someone, vigilante style.
Obvious troll is obvious. Go back to your mother's basement. 
Source of the sacrifice? My tour guide. His name was Sahli, I just know what I was told and relayed the information here.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I've had my HTC desire z since launch and it has never given me any problems. I've dropped it from face height onto concrete and have dropped it in a puddle. HTC as a whole can't be said to have shitty quality, just check for reviews before buying a phone. Some are hit and miss.  Also Samsung make a lot of phones just like everyone else.
What ever lets you sleep at night.  I think it is a better idea to have people not want to kill you, but if you think nukes will save you that's your choice.
Yet here we are, the law has to draw a line in the sand somewhere, and some states have drawn that line at any level of intoxication. Is it right? No, it is not. The law really sucks when it comes to shades of gray, and a lot of the rape conversation takes place in that shade.
Lasciate ogni speranza, voi ch'entrate.
Oh, as I understand it, he was beaten and *handcuffed* even.  I can't *imagine* what kind of drugs he'd have to do to sleep...and then what kind of drugs he'd have to do after dreaming.  In his shoes, I'd lose my marbles...I'm not putting any blame on **him**.    I'm saying benzenated is a hipster.    *edit:  no actual edit, I was hoping for an underline.  Oh well.
Learn the difference between a red herring and an apt analogy, troll.
I hope this shit doesn't happen to guys done for statutory rape, ie. 18 yo with a 16 yo GF.
Well it's really a service, but the overhead is proportionally low.
I'd rather not live in a third world shithole war zone, thanks.
NK is not going to go through with any of its threats.  Kim must know that his military is a mere speed bump (if that) for the US military.  Therefore, I see these threats as all bark and no bite to the outside world.  So why is NK doing this?  I've come to notice the massive propaganda the regime feeds its people.  This propaganda allows those in power to manipulate its citizens.  This manipulation allows the regime to stay in control and seize more influence.  NK knows its not going to attack SK (more than likely), and it also knows the US will not intervene (as long as NK doesn't provoke SK or the US).  This is why they make this threats.  Kim will soon die down this rhetoric, and once he does soon the world will be a little more at ease.  He will then be able to say to his people that the "almighty" US military was afraid to face us.  It will show his perceived "strength", although the rest of the world (which is not Kim's main focus) knows the true weakness of the NK military.    Until there is an intervention, or a revolution within NK, these child-like games will continue leading to more severe consequences for the citizens.  It is time for SK and the US to finally put an end to this.  I know the US has been involved heavily military around the past decade, but this is one intervention that would be worth it.  The bad reception the US military gets is its involvement after the intervention.  Hopefully one day a foreign soldier will be able to put a bullet through Kim Jung Un.  
Yea, these people love to shove emotion into it.
As long as it was   a. the only way.  b. accidental.  c. thought it was the only way at the time. (this is kinda a grey area)  *Edit: may be more i am not thinking about.
I felt sick just thinking about if that was my girlfriend.... normally id say execute them to jus be rid of them but these guys deserve a special kind of torture and slow death. 
Do people actually want him to be successful? The whole idea seems horrible to me.
Please tell us more about your deep, intimate experience with the subtleties of Indian micro-cultures. 
Or "the US also did it..."
My drug is cynicism.  Not even once.
&gt; Most people would choose death over life in prison.  I'm inclined to say you're quite wrong, unless you can back your statement up with a source.
You are mistaken. Though, initially being pushed across the 38th Parallel all the way to Pusan... this was BEFORE the United Nations became involved. The counter offensive pushed the the North Koreans (invading territory) back across the 38th Parallel and began pushing past until China, and by proxy the Soviet Union became involved. After about 2 and a half years of relatively little territory gain on either side around the 38th Parallel... an armistice was called.   A stalemate if you will. The war never ended.   Since the North Koreans were the aggressors and since NO TERRITORY was gained by them. If was most definitely not a getting "whopped" in any sense of the word. The North Koreans lost more men, and civilians, and armor as well. They gained nothing from their invasion. Where did the "US" though you should have said UN lose?   Where did you get your information? Did you just go to yahoo answers and look up it up?   Source: Will be happy to show you my BDUs (fatiques) from 1951. :)  
[deleted]
One case is all i need.
[deleted]
Good.
There's also this video released few minutes ago. In the video normal soldiers of NK talks how they will destroy USA ---&gt; http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_embedded&amp;v=PYrCei02TaI
[deleted]
That's complete bullshit. You're out of your fucking mind if you believe that.   http://bjs.ojp.usdoj.gov/content/pub/pdf/SOO.PDF https://www.ncjrs.gov/pdffiles/172837.pdf https://www.ncjrs.gov/pdffiles1/nij/grants/219181.pdf http://journalistsresource.org/studies/government/criminal-justice/female-victims-sexual-violence-1994-2010# http://journalistsresource.org/studies/government/criminal-justice/female-victims-sexual-violence-1994-2010# https://www.ncjrs.gov/pdffiles1/nij/210346.pdf http://web.archive.org/web/20101229140836/ http://www.ovw.usdoj.gov/ovw-fs.htm 
What Fidesz does to the constitution will shift the balance of power closer to them and set the cultural climate of this country for the following years. But they have been careful so far to keep the country a working democracy.  The Hungarian intellectual-political landscape is broken in two and there are two, both disgusting opposing sides one has to be on if one is to be part of the upper classes: the inheritors of Horthy (Fidesz) and the inheritors of Rákosi and Kádár (the socialists and liberals). Schiffer tried to break their duopoly but was screwed over by the liberals who saw a rival in him - rightly.  So the post-kádárist part was culturally dominant in the last 20 years and the post-horthyist part gained momentum and will probably be dominant in the next 10 or so. It went in terms of influence from 60-40 to 40-60 in the last years, but will stay here as Fidesz is about to lose their 2/3 majority.  The post-kádárists have significantly better connections to the western media, since they were fast to wash their hands and cozy up to left interest groups in the west after their eastern sponsors withered away (well, it's more complicated than that, but that's the gist of it). Now they use these connections to broadcast their pain about losing their cultural dominant position in Hungary to the world - and for good measure exaggerate the hell out of any move the country makes in order to make it look bad, weaken the currency and help their chances with the elections next spring.  Again, of course it1s more complicated than that. But it's the main part of it and it is really disgusting - they gamble with my livelihood just so they can get back to their advisor positions and decide whose plays can be brought to stage in the National Theater.
this is trash
Most countries don't go to war thinking they'll lose.
It's just mocking the usual jerk about women all faking rape
Not sure, I guess I'd have to be raped first and murdered by fire to judge for myself. On one hand that woman's scarred and traumatized for the rest of her life (allegedly). On the other anything else this guy may have accomplished in life is snuffed out and eradicated.   It's such an emotional issue that I don't think you're going to find an unbiased answer. Do I think burning to death is worse? Not necessarily. 
You don't understand.  This has nothing to do with people I don't like.  If India doesn't fucking fix the problem the _only_ "justice" is from lynch mobs, and that's not much justice at all considering most rape victims in India are certainly not going to be able to get a mob together and there's no process to adequately determine guilt.   In consideration of the circumstances Indian women face in the justice system it was honestly no surprise at all for me to have read that a rape victim killed her "alleged" rapist.    If you leave justice to the people you get lynch mobs.  So either prosecute rapists or deal with people murdering them themselves (or deal with loads of women getting raped and doing nothing about it)
The event that led him to being set on fire was breaking into a woman's house and trying to rape her. So I don't see how this is relevant to the discussion.
Im nobody to judge here. But i wouldnt want some random stranger to enter my house, kill me, and then claim that i tried to rape them, as an excuse.   Murder is murder, no matter how you look at it, and dead people cant testify. It should never be allowed by any law. I believe this woman was raped, and im glad that there is one rapist less in this world, but this doesnt make murder any less wrong.
[deleted]
[BOOOOOOOOOOOM!](http://gifs.gifbin.com/042012/1334602684_footage_from_the_north_korean_missile_test_from_conan.gif)
And building on that, in theory, that greater intelligence could in turn create a greater intelligence, and so on. We are literally incapable of imagining the technological advances that will come after that.
&gt;Indian ~~rug~~ carpet burn  FTFY
This just in, NK announces "final, complete absolute last time i swear i mean it this time" warning
"You're"  "You're" life must suck.  This is one of those Times where 'your' works.
did they release Avatar on VHS?
While I'm pro carry myself the issue is one of the 5 might be carrying too. Still that said it is nice to have options, even if they may get you killed.
Sounds like a tutorial level in a CoD game.
This is a horrendous idea.
*hurr i knw all 'bout of north koreas secret weaponry durr*
[deleted]
Dude, this was news like a month ago
World cup is there in one year.
Probably the same reason the US still has troops in a unified Germany. Which is why, exactly?
xD LAWL NORTH KOREAN MISSLES HERP DERP  1 upvote = 1 respect
Until the baby comes out.
The US is placed in a very difficult situation here. China is going to see if we will back off from this conflict. If we do back off - China would have just gained a lot more power in this region because they know the US doesn't want to start anything. My guess is the US will go through with all out war, if we are pushed there, to maintain our authority. The only way this will end is if China intervenes and subjugates North Korea and defuses the entire situation, or if the north backs down. Their new great leader must be put in his place.
oops. Didn't link. Here! http://www.skyhunter.com/marcs/GentleSeduction.html
True. Still, I'm very nervous because nowadays destruction escalates quickly. Power snowballs, and can become an avalanche of unchecked aggression and death. All in all, I'm just very nervous about this whole "insane dictator with new nuclear toys" sort of thing, but I seem to be in the minority.
We were talking about the situation in North Korea.  How are North Koreans not relevant?
They could try to smuggle it in via the drug routes. 
*If we attack*.   They have vowed military action *if we attack*. Read the original North Korean statement, for Christ's sake. 
What North Korea is doing is basically the equivalent of Dale shouting "POCKET SAND" and then waiting like five minutes to actually throw the pocket sand.
Maybe your XBOX has tricked you into thinking that white people are more civilized.
In the spirit or reservoir dogs... "are you gonna bark all day little doggie, or are you gonna bite?" 
Please tell me [this](http://www.bbc.co.uk/doctorwho/gallery/s2_05-06gallery/hires/rise_of_the_cybermen.jpg) has already been posted here!
[deleted]
And then get assassinated by the reanimated original Franz Ferdinand
[deleted]
Well it's certainly polite of them to let us know first.
Three strikes and you're out. And, well, three outs in an inning. 
Because we believe in the US enough to either shoot down the nuke or to rectify all of the victims deaths by simply kicking North Korea in the Great Leader's Crotch.  Sure, picking fun out of a potentially lethal situation is dark, but hey, at least we have modern technology that beats their starving fighting force.
And this time, he means it!   http://imgur.com/toO3geq
" WE REALLY REALLY MEAN IT THIS TIME GUYZE"
War is about money, and there is no money to gain by backing NKorea. If China was showing approval for N.Korean actions, they would not be parking tanks at their border, but flying advisors to NK. 
*throws can at you*  
I realized this right after posting this, I meant the U.S Nimitz, same harbor, much different situation
This planet is too stupid for its own good
i blame it on the constant surge of NK posts. People here are desensitized to it at this point thus its become some huge circlejerk.
[Meanwhile at the Pentagon](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-W6as8oVcuM)
The US has been under double secret probation.
I was surprised when Kony wasn't even on the ballet.  All that rallying and people talking about "KONY 2012" and I couldn't even vote for him.
doesn't israel have this technology?
given known technology I agree. 
*So close ...*
It's basically saying that it's more difficult psychologically for a soldier to shoot an enemy child than it is to shoot an enemy man.    Fortunately, North Korean soldiers are only child-sized, they're still grown men.  
more dickwaving
No-one claims that it's perfect.  No-one claims that it's the best in the world.  But compared to the American system, well, there's good reason why "American-style health-care" is used in Canadian elections in the same way that "communism" or "terrorism" are used in American elections.
[deleted]
They were counting on China but now it looks like China is starting to distance themselves from them. They still give aid, but they won't back an attack and have urged them to stop making threats, and have placed troops on the boarder.   Other then them no one has anything to do with them and many countries are sanctioning them.   Short answer: no one
&gt;With the world on alert, experts say North Korea does potentially have the capability of hitting Australia with a missile - but only if they're very lucky.  As an Australian, this sort of parochial reporting makes me cringe. 
Both my grandfathers served, one in WW2, the other in the first Korean war. War serves it's purpose. It's ingrained into humans for some reason. But I personally believe it's still democracy VS communism in it's most basic form. The muslims fought with the Nazis. Russia, China, etc... WW3 will be no different.  I don't think that Iraq and Afghanistan are for resources, if they were gas would be much cheaper by now. Logistically it's to prepare us for WW3 as we can clamp down on Iran when the shit breaks out. Look where all our bases are over there and tell me I'm wrong.
You changed it all up and that's not what we were expecting cause it didn't follow the pattern. You're silly.
The UK have resorted to eating horses recently too. 
Thats so rich :)
SIGNED BY IL-SUNG FROM BEYOND THE GRAVE!
Conspiracy Keanu, eh?
[deleted]
She mostly lives in Arizona now, but comes up to AK in the summer.
It's starting to sound like those rugmart closing down sales. NK should make a commercial to show the world how super cerial they are.
[deleted]
Thousands upon thousands of dead people in Iraq and Afghanistan beg to differ with you asshat.
Artillery would probably be the biggest threat. I guarantee there are quite a few anti-missile systems set up along the DMZ or around Seoul itself. 
If only war and threats were this cute.
Oh god, you're one of the ones with the "everyone is unenlightened I'm smart and possibly a genius@ attitude too? Calm down you itchy twat.
Your highschool history class has failed you.   The USSR and China hated each other and had border skirmishes. China and Vietnam fought a war against each other. Both China and Vietnam battled for influence over Red Khmer Cambodia - a regime that was ended by Vietnamese military intervention.   Socialist Yugoslavia kept its independence from the Warsaw Pact and never wanted to be aligned too closely with Moscow.   Going back even further, during the Spanish civil war Stalin ordered the communist party there to stop their communist revolution because he didn't think it was strategically sound for the Soviet Union.   And then there are the constant fights, confrontations and purges between various factions of socialists, from the staunch opposition to Lenin in 1917 to Stalin's hostile takeover which left Trotsky for dead to Gorbachev's serious confrontation with the red army leadership.  The Soviets "protected" others to keep them in line with what they wanted, namely crushing uprisings and protests in East Germany, Hungary, Czechoslovakia and Poland. When that wasn't beneficial to Soviet interest anymore, Gorbachev simply told them that Soviet tanks wouldn't come to shoot at protestors anymore.
And I can't condone being treated like disposable property.  Being violated tends to bring out the irrational, ragey side of me rather than the victimized or "benevolent and forgiving being" side of me.
ah, connecticut.  that annoying bridge between massachusetts and ny.  Still in the middle of nowhere, under no threat of attack.  
What I mean is that if they start shooting, other people shoot back. They may not have many artillery pieces for very long.
Oh! Fuck that "@" is supposed to be an end quotation mark (").
[deleted]
Can we just wipe them off the map and be done with it?
If you read [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Electromagnetic_pulse) article, it lists a test that damaged the much more rugged electronics of 1962 almost 900 miles away from the blast in Hawaii. It wouldn't be a total wipe out of all electronics, but it would be majorly disruptive.
N.K. isn't going to do a damn thing without Chinese backing and they will not support any action against one of their biggest trading partners. If N.K. unilaterally strikes first the Chinese are not obliged to help them and then they'd be fucked and they know it. So they're going to keep goading the U.S. into striking first, which won't happen.
Except it went rather terrible for the USN when they were exercising with H.M.S Gotland. The little sub apparently "sunk" both USS Ronald Reagan and and numerous support vessels including nuclear submarines.
What exactly does this buffer zone mean in a 21st century context?
Kim doesn't really think he'll win a war... Right? 
[deleted]
This has to be one of the most retarded exchanges I've read in a long time...
except for when you are robbed when you step outside the airport, that has increased like 500% in the last few years.
beautiful Tasteless come back to the US where you belong
The U.S made huge military cuts after ww2. U.S military readiness was no where near what it is today. Not to mention the U.S military of today already has a senior officer and NCO corp with a wealth of combat experience.  You are a a squishy faced retard.
&gt; Unless Kim just doesn't want the country anymore  yes surely he will have a higher standard of living as a private citizen elsewhere in the world as opposed to being a third world dictator
just reading through some Good points, Chinas image having the UN leader from china would tarnish the reputation on a global scale if the do aid NK. I think its in both the US and Chinas interest to neutralise NK. With the Chinese creating a puppet government and fixing NK after it has been completely titty fucked by the SK/US forces. China does not want 22 million extra squinty refugees. Although points have been made about there buffer nation. Yes, obviusly they wouldnt want US present on their doorstep. So they will most likely invade from the north, SK/US from the South and that will be the End of the Kim Dynasty hopefully both Sides come to an agreement on the NK's Future and are finished with the annoying little cunt. No ones wants war right now it will shit on their own economies. But i can tell you one thing the US or SK will not be pushed around anymore by a fat yellow cunt that has 1 million brainwashed soldiers thats for sure.
No need to worry - it's probably just magma.
[deleted]
You need to calm down
[deleted]
CNN frontpage: covered in N. Korea this, N.Korea that, articles speculating how a war will play out. Literally 5 stories in a row about a N.Korean war. Seems like War is right around the corner just looking at the page layout.  http://edition.cnn.com  S. Korea's chosun news agency:  http://english.chosun.com  -Modest article about N.Korea shutting down an industrial complex. -A second article about how businesses suffer form N.Korea sanctions.  No other mention of anything!  -Click on on national news, nothing! -Click on world news, a second link article about Chinese troops massing on the N.Korea border. -A link further down about Americans deploying a missile defence system due to N.Korea's threats.  Click on "HOT ISSUE" not one mention of N.Korea!  Click on Opinion: Here is where you actually do find something, 3 articles about the topic, all filed under opinion, as the should be.  I'm not doubting N.Korea is a rogue regime, probably as crazy as they sound. Im doubting the wests interpretation of the situation and posturing by its media is a little on the scary sensationalist side of things and wondering if it has crossed the line into bias.
China is gonna go in solo and annex them.
No he didn't.
&gt;look at bicycle theft (or anything really). Does everyone report their bike being stolen? Does every report lead to an arrest? Does every arrest lead to a conviction?  I'm really at a loss to explain how you can repeat what I said to you back at me and think it is a rebuttal.
But look how much money Dick Cheney made!
Man, that would be awesome.
A flawed justice system doesn't mean all vigilante justice is in fact . . . just.  Afghanistan doesn't have a great justice system either.  But I suspect some of the people executed by mobs there have been innocent.  Not so?  
I ended up getting the Navy Expeditionary Medal.  Nice try though.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Navy_Expeditionary_Medal
MiddleKingdom49 envoy banned himself from being posted in r/Pyongyang.
The US &amp; China are not really at odds unless you count the trade imbalance.  But politics and business are worlds away from war.
My moms car
I google people I meet all the time. Partly because I'm a nosey, and partly because I'm paranoid. Facebook has become very useful for checking people out.  
If there wasn't prison, I would sell marijuana and other drugs.  But there is, so I don't.  There, it worked on one person, at least.
It does. Most people in the prison system have been found to have personality disorders. Men a tendency towards Antisocial personality disorder and women towards Borderline personality disorder. These are long term disorders which the person deals with for their entire life and is part of who they are. They are still sent to prison.  Why?- because it's not an acute episode of mental illness. Something that occurs rapidly over the course of a few weeks culminating to breaking the law.
You started your post with "No,"    No what?  What are you refuting there?  You didn't seem to refute anything in the post you're responding.  Anyway, ignoring that, I don't see the point of your comment.  Who cares if deep down, someone really wants to do something criminal but they don't because they know there are consequences, that's what matters more.
I think if anyone were to occupy, it'd be the South Koreans, with US forces back watching from SK bases. 
Slightly good news. However I plan on renouncing my Jewish heritage in order to secure a safe future for my children. Born Jewish is a curse. Not believing in the religion is even worse, because someday someone might murder me or my children because they don't agree with my great great grandfather's decisions...and it's not enough to have torn the fabric of my family tree through the holocaust. I have to endure stupid taunts about how I have the fucking gold, or how 'we' own all of America...and so many people think what I feel is not real.   People are going to start killing each other again over stupid shit like race and religion.   Hatred for Jews is everywhere, and we pretend like it's been vanquished so it's ok again to quote the "Protocols".   I spoke with a group of teenage Muslims and asked their views on gays or Jews? Fascinating and terrifying. Will I be proud when if my child stands up for his heritage and ends up in a hospital? 
She was raped by her father. Likely many times. That kind of thing has a habit of causing severe mental illness. 
Uh, dude, if your post history is correct you're in Canada.  The Western Hemisphere is not known for virulent anti-Semitism.  Actually, it appears to be worse in Europe.  My now-ex is a Russian Jew.  At least here in the States Jews are doing just fine, from my experiences around him, his family, my roommate last summer who was a Jew, and other Jews I've known.  Maybe you're hanging around the wrong people if someone is taunting you about all that Jew gold.  Hell, my ex used to joke to me how he was still waiting for his share.  Using a group of teenage Muslims, most of whom are probably first-generation and insular and probably wacky as shit, as some sort of reflection of Western society at large is stupid.
but Sk is America's gwen. 
MOTHER OF GOD...
Message to North Koreans... Bet you wont hit us (for the love of god wipe us off the map)
Whiteman Air Force Base, I had a friend who flew the B2s out to Iraq every Wednesday and then came back all within the day...
NK is not the threat. China is the threat. NK has a paper military. 
It's not great, it mainly just retweets stuff from the self-aware roomba. 
Men have certainly died early for their pride. This isn't the wisest move to make against Caligula with nuclear weapons.
Well done Jeremy.
Boost phase possibly yes.its at home but I have a PDF from one of the think tanks the joint chiefs use to do thinking for them. Long story short, I don't know for sure but there are probably 2 or 3 AEGIS type destroyers/ cruisers in the sea of Japan as mobile ballistic missile missile interdictors. The SM3s they carry can intercept BMs mid boost phase. If anyone is interested I can post it when I get home. Its a dry read though.
Yea, I highly doubt that.
For one, Arnold Schwarzenegger took none of his $206,500 yearly salary as [governor of California](http://voices.yahoo.com/schwarzenegger-earned-0-lost-200-million-as-governor-7630448.html?cat=49), to answer your question.
Diplomacy is the board game that lets you know who your true friends are, i.e. no one.
perhaps_youre_right.
Dissociative episodes where people "black out" in a sense or can't remember/have no concrete perception of what they're doing are indeed a real psychological phenomenon, but you're right in that the troubling thing about them is they're a very rare disorder but anyone could theoretically claim to experience them--insincerely--to try to escape blame for their actions.  Without a thorough psychological history of her life and analysis by psychiatric experts it'd be impossible to say for sure how credible her story was.
#no #nuclear #radiation 
I suppose so.
Go ahead, attack us. Ask Japan how that worked out for them.
For me personally it's what she did that makes it so outrageous. She's responsible for the death of 3 girls. 3 families will never recover and she now is living what seems to be a really nice life. That's what bothers me. 
&gt;Hobbyists in the southwest *have not got* a missile into space *your* moron  That's precious.
What?  Magazine or Museum of Arts and Design?
In the same way that Peter North spreads jizz all over the eagerly waiting faces of paid actresses.  'MURICA!
Who funds these guys?
this is what i don't get about so many people claiming that china wants NK as a buffer zone. when we go to war, we first and foremost strive for air superiority to air supremacy. the difference between SK and NK in this regard is entirely trivial for this goal.  further, the boarder of NK and china is relatively small. nobody in their right mind is going to try a ground invasion into china across a border like that.
Oh my god.  I just realized that Anonymous now knows if /r/pyongyang is satire or not.
[deleted]
I was making a reference.
You forgot to say "committed only by immigrants". I mean, what kind of half-hearted bigot are you?
I give it two thumbs down.
I doubt it. China would not risk starting nuclear WWIII and sacrificing their entire growing economy to help out NK. Nobody sane would do that ever.
small local non profit animal rescue groups are also against most of those things and actually stick to their convictions. The rescued animals are cared for in homes and have a no kill policy. Those guys are the real hero's. I know a lot of people who care for cats, dogs and other animals so they have a home to live in while they are up for adoption. Money for their food and expenses come out of meager donations, and mostly from their own pockets.   I saw a local rescue group blow their entire 12 month donations to have a damaged eye removed from a kitten so that it didnt have to be put down. That cat is still alive today, and has an amazing life. PETA, or even the RSPCA would have just put it down.
How uncivilized. 
Mine was something to the effect of:  "Pearl Harbor tells the story of a Japanese sneak attack on a love triangle in Hawaii.  It's a two-hour movie squeezed into three hours".  Great review; horrible political ideologist.
There are WAY too many animals in underfunded shelters to be adopted out. We breed insane amounts of animals and then act all shocked when they're not all put into loving homes. There simply aren't enough homes to go around.
How would the world respond if they were seen mounting something that looked like a nuclear warhead on the rocket? We have no way of verifying that it *isn't* one, but would we take the chance of them firing it?
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;But still, there is no way for most people to have any real idea how North Korean politics works.  I talked to a 2 star general that had done a LOT of time in SK. He said that even having met with NK leaders, he still only had a vague understanding of their moves and motives.
The greater harm is the hard done to society so its important to punish severely those who violate decent human behavior.  Not that this is in any way a fair punishment though.  2080 lashes is rediculous but its just as bad that we don't even punish homosexuals who violate human decency and have managed to brainwash the American public and push the nation the the verge of collapse.  Homosexuals should suffer corporeal punishment if they are open and pervert society with their wickedness.
So your logic is " I think what he thinks is bad, so lets be violent and attack him to preserve what we think is good " ? Sounds pretty fucking stupid to me. 
So basically this has nothing to do with what I said at all. Got it.
[deleted]
Not entirely true.  And the fact that you don't have faith in Shinto does not negate its tenants to the millions that do.  In Shintoism, it is believed that: "After death, the soul remains eternally upon this land. It is believed that the soul does not travel to a distant world. This faith has endured for centuries until the present day… Upon leaving the body, the soul is in a more peaceful a pure state far from the hustle and bustle of this world."  In other words, the sould is cleasned of the sins of the body.  An immortal soul has no guilt, or love, or hurt, or envy, or any other concern that troubles humans.  The spirit is beyond the temporal.  There are over 2,466,532 Japanese and former colonial soldiers (mostly Korean and Taiwanese) listed as being honored among the dead at Ysukuni, pretty much every Japanese war-dead since 1869.  All of them, according to the beliefs of Shintoism have left behind the deeds good/bad of their temporal lives.  As the old Japanese saying goes, hate the crimes, but not the person.  &gt;Maybe it's not that everyone else is ignorant, maybe your just doing the same thing everyone is accusing the Japanese of? Maybe? Nah, couldn't be... Just keep mentioning the cultural names of the things they choose to prioritize over history, maybe then everyone will come around.  Come around to what?  Never once have i justified anything that the Japanese do.  The only thing i have done is voiced that these things are much more complicated and nuanced than your average Redditor believes, and lazy statments and understandings do nothing by perpetuate populist myths and resentment.     
Better if he dies in prison, defaming woman's honor is serious shit. If he still come out alive, someone in the public will end up killing him. Somehow I don't think this is enough punishment. For god sakes he raped his own daughter as if this isn't bad enough he went on to do it for 7 years. Fu** him, he should not be killed but be made to suffer until his body gives out. 
The Guy raped his daughter for 7 years. 
Might as well rename /r/worldnews to /r/rapenews
None of that is relevant to anything.  Here's some bits and pieces.  MS13 operate in Australia and supply a lot of the coke, which is distributed by assorted bikie gangs and such. MS13 is powerful because of US drug policy, they make most of their money by selling into CONUS. South American drug policy IS US drug policy, the DEA operate in Mexico and even work with authorities as far as El Salvador, the home nation of MS13. They are obviously not the only South American gang to import into Australia, in 2010 it was found that Mexican cartels were also operating here.  Australian drug policy was changed to align with the UN's "war on drugs," which exists because of Nixon and his "war on drugs." Drugs were outlawed much earlier though, about the same time the US started it's anti-marijuana propaganda. The video you watch if you get drug diversion, is an American movie.  The US political parties work alongside the Australian parties, the Liberal party has multiple ties to the US Republican party. They put pressure on our politicians to fall in line with America's policies. One of the recent issues that comes to mind is internet piracy, I believe even the President chimed in on that one.  To live in Australia and deny America's influence is silly. You honestly have to be blind and deaf to history. Yes we have close ties with Asia, but most of those countries have similar ties to the US as we do.  EDIT: Also...  &gt;Emperor_Mao [-3] -7 points 15 hours ago (29|36) I am from France, and we do lots of things differently to the U.S... so what. We have a left-centrist government, who also happens to be fairly libertarian. Pretty much every thing the current government does should be alien to you stupid American hicks.  And then  &gt;[–]Emperor_Mao [-3] -3 points 19 hours ago (1|4) Honestly it is true though. You yanks are all softcocks now days, and someone from the 60's would kick any one of your asses. Luckily my country is still somewhat manly for the time being. In Australia we don't eat none of your poofter sauce "aka mustard" and we don't drink any of your poofter beer "budwiser". Men are supposed to be men, and meat pies with Heinz tomato sauce is obviously supposed to be a regular dish.  I was going to look for more examples but your comment history was causing my brain to haemorrhage. If you think the Australian government is left-centrist, I also don't know what to tell you. 
Wholeheartedly agree. Laws should be made from a detached standpoint not an emotional one, and I don't see how this helps the daughter. As you said elsewhere-I'm glad our justice system is better than emotion. 
I like the way you think and express yourself  
I'd say one of the major factors is that Islam was quickly adopted by some of the poorest and least developed countries.   It was designed to be readily adapted by the poor. Consider some of its most attractive features: classlessness, racial agnosticism, simplicity, just to name a few.  A Brahman friend described how the classlessness of Islam was attractive to many of the lower castes in India and other parts of South Asia.  An example of how the religion intentionally avoids ethnic/racial conflict is their refusal to depict Muhammad. Something pointed out by numerous Hindus and Muslims is that Jesus is often depicted as being an attractive white male. That itself can alienate a lot of potential constituents. The focus is on the message and away from the person.  The religion itself seems to be a lot less taxing in terms of resources. The mandatory acts as far as I'm aware of are the Five Pillars, and they are mostly personal responsibilities. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Islam#Five_pillars  There was more I discussed, but I am not an expert and shouldn't continue with details until I am more educated on the matter myself. The takeaway for me though was that the religion well-crafted to be easily adopted by the masses.  While this is nice, the weakness of this design that you also have a lot of poor, undereducated masses on your "team". It just looks bad. I'd imagine if Christianity was mostly popular in just the poorest countries in the world, rather than the wealthiest ones, it would quickly develop a terrible reputation as many of the worst of society cherry pick (or make up) the absolute worst/archaic rules to follow in the religion.   This might not be the only factor, but it's an important consideration when judging the religion.
Kamikaze Submarine nuke. 
Theoretically they could. Death by torture.  But even the nutiest of death penalty supporters don't usually support that.
It's the final countdown!  ...only it's not.
Here, a case from witchcraft burning in 2013. Go do something about it man; and while you are at it declare the country to still practice burning of women for witchcraft   http://newsfeed.time.com/2013/02/07/woman-burned-alive-for-witchcraft-in-papua-new-guinea/
About bloody time.
I'd forgotten about Tetley's Ale, probably because it's pretty bad
http://i.imgur.com/o7Az5uC.jpg
I'm sorry, I just woke up.  North Korea has been making threats?
Korean youth made a word for that: multagi. It also happens to be magicians favorite trick.  
The cause is worth protesting. It's a start. Who cares where they're from...they're women. It matters to me... I'm Canadian. I think I'll walk around with my boobs out and be angry. I should be. We all should be. 
Grab your popcorn and strap in ladies and gentlemen, [and...](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xSLlZh9yelk)
The missiles are Kim Jong Un's arms.
I do. Please share.
[The Mouse That Roared](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p7L7WLFBYR4&amp;feature=player_embedded)
North Korea builds missiles.  North Korea tests missiles.  North Korea moves missiles.  North Korea moves missiles again.  North Korea loads missiles on to mobile launchers.  North Korea moves missiles again.  North Korea aims missiles.  North Korea moves missiles.  North Korea accidentally fires missiles at Pyongyang.  North Korea aims remaining missiles.  North Korea forgot where some most missiles are located.  North Korea finds one missile, but drops it and it rolls into the sea.  North Korea asks for foreign aid.  I figure that's where we're going.
You made the claim, it's up to you. Obviously you're talking bullshit though. 
I wish these earthquakes would have better timing.
They probably just need more then.
Unfortunately the more worrying part is that the very attention to detail can be used against the observer.  It is just like a magicians sleight of hand, you give your observers something overt to observe and when their attention is focused on that you do the "trick" portion of your act.   Now I'm not saying this is necessarily the case here, but any good strategist knows how to do this, and like it or not the NK military *isn't* filled with actual stupid people despite (seemingly) stupid policies they have adopted.
The thought is that the shockwaves from an underground nuke test could trigger a powerful earthquake as North Korea is along a somewhat active seismic area.
On Tuesdays and Thursdays of the 3rd week of the second month following a leap-year.
It's stupid because you group all Muslims together but you separate the "not very nice" westerners from the rest. You have a double standard that is almost certainly caused by subconscious racism that you will immediately reject due to cognitive dissonance. 
&gt;We have free food      Sponsored by McDonald's™
Kinky.
Their research skills suck balls or are non-existent. While protesting against persecution of Pussy Riot they cut down a monastery cross, as a symbol of fighting against authoritarian power and repression of opposition. The joke was that the cross was dedicated to the memory of Stalin's victims.  tl;dr: While protesting against tyranny they attacked a monument commemorating victims of another tyranny.
I am 39 years old.
Sorry, it just does not make sense. Any time a group does something like this, there is always some small chance you end up getting caught. One of the people involved feels guilty and comes forward, traced IPs revel a pattern... something. Even if the risk is small, it is there. And it would be extremely embarrassing. I'd almost say more embarrassing than if they were caught trying to assassinate Kim.  So, there's risk. Now lets look at the reward. Compared to sanctions, frequent military drills in SK, increased US military action in Asia, bombers being flown all around NK, and the list goes on. All things that the US is doing publicly, and would be far more effective than a few insults over Twitter. It does not add up.   North Korea will probably never declare war without China's full support, because they know they can't win. US intelligence knows this better than anyone. There is not a snowball's chance in hell that "Anon" hacking their twitter will make any kind of difference.  You need to pick your battles. This one makes you sound like a crazy person. Stick with the whole "government using Anon" thing, but don't feel the need to attach it to every little thing. For instance, if Anon hacked into and released some private North Korea documents; then I'd almost be with you. It would be reasonable.
Underground nuclear ordnance testing? 
come on! keep on shifting! let that nut go!
Wasn't this the plot of the first Superman movie? Lex Luthor wanted to trigger a massive earthquake to create new oceanfront property in California. Maybe Kim Jong Un just saw that movie?
&gt;Wolves, the largest member of the dog family,   Shouldn't dogs be a part of the wolf family?
That wasn't the reason for going to war with Iraq...
Well, I don't see the point in releasing them into the United States unless they are citizens. I more meant release them back to where they came from and I guess holding them in prisons on US soil would work too. It would be a far better use of them than their current primary use of drug related mishaps. And if it is mainly about holding them in a proper fashion, then why not just get Gitmo up to code? Surely how a prison is operated is executive power.
[deleted]
April 15 is the birthday of Kim Il-sung, the North Korean late founder and the young leader Kim Jong-un's grandfather...
Is he still bitter towards Mufasa about Simba leapfrogging him for the throne?
NK: Hey you guys should prolly bounce, some shits 'bout to pop off.  UK: Right... I think I'll have another cup of tea first though.
I like to think he learned from his mistakes. 
Do you know that for certain?
This times a thousand. The theatrical version (with voice-over) is NOT a classic
No, you threaten to burn God's house down... ^^^with ^^^the ^^^lemons
[deleted]
Seems more like a self-fulfilling prophecy...
While I agree with this generalization, I specifically like to believe that Elizabeth Warren is one of the true "good guys" in Washington. 
I don't disagree. But decay takes a while. It may be decades or centuries.
It's all fun and games until one of them eats the raw meat that is his body.
People who aren't on the internet all day don't understand it. There is no significance of saying, "people on the internet like my drawings" to someone who doesn't dwell here all the time. 
No, and I wasn't referring to North Koreans. Replied to the comment about the U.S. steam rolling through NK.   But, what the average NK has is a want of basic necessities. If things get worse and NK military cannot protect the embassies then they may actually get stormed. I'd doubt it, but you never know.
There's a difference between extended mental attention and extended sexual attention.   "You show guys your tits and see if they get turned on or not." Well, for one, plenty of guys aren't turned on by just any kind of breasts. They usually have to be young breasts, not old withered ones or ones used to breastfeed. So, maybe it's not exclusively about the breasts after all.   That said, whether a man gets turned on is not my (or women's) problem until a man makes it so. Men decide what to do with their dicks, not I. It's not a crime to have an erection or not be able to prevent one. 
They're individuals who share characteristics, but if you honestly can blame Islam for his horrendous actions- why not blame every American for every other American's actions? We share the same basic culture, right? No matter where he is from, the brother's actions are a reflection of HIS problems. 
[deleted]
They are filled with the violent cannabis criminals! :)
Nobody tell KJU, ok!? Turn the lights off you idiot! Now everyone be quiet.
Helicopters!  MORE HELICOPTERS!
Snide? 
So wait, is this what moderate islam looks like? Im confused
That's odd.  I expected some religion to take credit for this by now.
From what I've read, most of the food and money didn't reach the really needy anyway.
newspapers these days: "We have something super extraordinary big names with us but we are not going to disclose it". Hence,  Screw you guys i am going home. 
[deleted]
America has several political parties but a  a flawed winner takes all system that results in 2 parties dominating the rest.  Cuba explicitly implements a dictatorship.  So anyway, I'll ask again: Why does Cuba do this?
There's little more to do now. NK firing missiles can be defended against. The ships are in position. It's a case of waiting for the launch or launches, plotting the course, and shooting them down if they're off to somewhere inhabited. The greatest risk at the moment must be the quality of the missile guidance system. The things could go anywhere. 
In a manner. I'm an FPV pilot, a skydiver, a paraglider and an ex aircraft maintenance engineer.   I just get aeronautics *shrugs*
[deleted]
Iraq had the third largest standing army in the gulf war.   100 hours on the ground. The end. 
I am against this for the most part but in the US there have been times where protesters cross the line. The thing is that when they do, there are already laws that they are breaking. A better law would be ones that make them manageable. Force organizers to pay for security and rope dividers so that the rest of the area can operate without being impeded by the protest.
[deleted]
two is better than one.
[deleted]
Blame Canada? 
[deleted]
Chill out he was just joking
Is that what it was? I thought they were zip tied but I must have been mistaken. 
Kim Jong-Un is almost as much brainwashed as the citizens. He grew up there too, but he was a spoiled fuck.
[deleted]
I think they would have had a better chance of keeping the law if they had left the protest alone. Sometimes the downfall of tyranny is the lack of restraint by tyrants.  And yes, I know tyranny is a strong word, but since it refers to a government that does not follow its own laws, it makes sense to use it when a government is breaking them.
So meta. Perpetual meaninglessness. 
you're more than welcome to go to another site. 
You're right, sorry. That's what I get for trying to comment tired. 
They're going to hit HAARP so that we can't control the weather and earthquakes anymore. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/High_Frequency_Active_Auroral_Research_Program
Well it's not impossible, remember Goebbles said (paraphrazing) that large amounts of people are more likely to accept a bigger lie than a smaller one and also that if you repeat the lie enough then people will start believing it to be true.  So it's not impossible with a monopolized and centralized information system is the main point in this comment.
&gt;And why do you want to stop genocide?  Because I have seen the effects of one with my own eyes. Any civilized human being should be repulsed by one. We can no longer live in a world where states are allowed to behave thusly. I don't care what the cost is to accomplish this. Normandy was the largest amphibious invasion in the history of the world. If we must do something even more incredible to stop this one in North Korea, then that is what we should do. By any means necessary.  
[Hmm...](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/World_War_2)
Anyone see kim clapping, and just get fueled with rage that he has a huge stomach? that he seems well fed, and clothed, but his people are near naked? dying...im tired of there shit, war is a bad thing, but kim needs to die.
Ok, but I argue that you cannot compare living in a country where it is legal to torture/murder a woman for a slight transgression with being a housewife. Just because one is brainwashed into being happy with that, doesn't mean anything.
You're an atheist, and you wished death on "religoids".
I apologise, I thought you were referring to classified information in general.
So asking a question, stating that you clearly don't care about inmates, and then an insult. No strawmen argument there. Unless you're going to provide context, you sound like you have no idea what a strawmen argument is.
I think you don't understand the gap in destructive force between the largest MOAB weapon and the smallest nuke. According to Wikipedia, the US MOAB has a [yield of 11 tons of TNT](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MOAB). The Russian equivalent (sarcastically called the FOAB) has a [yield of 44 tons of TNT](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/FOAB).  The smallest yield available on a US nuke would be a[ B61 dialed down to its lowest setting, .3 kilotons](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/B61_nuclear_bomb). So let's compare:   * MOAB: 11 tons * FOAB: 44 tons * B61: 300 tons (Of course, if they turned the adjuster switch the other way, the same B61 could yield 340,000 tons)  In conclusion, there really aren't any circumstances where a conventional explosive of any sort can replace a nuclear weapon of any sort.
[3203 people were arrested during the "printemps érable" last spring](http://fr.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gr%C3%A8ve_%C3%A9tudiante_qu%C3%A9b%C3%A9coise_de_2012).
ROFL, the "CIA"
What was I just saying about stupidity? We are obviously talking about finding a general direction. Unless you're in the fucking Arctic Circle you should be able to use the Sun for direction finding just fine.
The aliens are going to be pissed....
Your username lied to me.
Hell, we're still doing it now. The Mississippian culture in Missouri built large earthen mounds at what some suspect were the sites of religious buildings of ancient American cities (specifically, Cahokia). They're being dug up to build apartments. America as a collective rarely has the moral high ground on these kinds of things, just individual Americans.
Well no shit.
Despite all these "let me explain it for you" replies, I understand that perfectly fine.  I still believe "there are a lot of Nazca lines" is an irresponsible attitude.  I don't really care if only part of the monument was destroyed.  P.S.  &gt;If I have to make a comparison as for you to understand  &gt;I hope you can see where I'm going with this.  Get your head out of your ass.
Absolutely. 
It goes both ways really.  Asshole use religion as an excuse and religion makes ordinary people act like assholes.
I hope they do. I think the fedora wearing faggots over in r/atheism could stand to have the herd thinned. 
No.
&gt;discrimination due to race and gender are protected under the Charter  Source?
Whoa. Calm down grandpa.
This just in: atheist labels Muslims with words used by racists against brown people.   Coming up next: Why Christians never get called "backwards savages". Hint: implicit racism.
We'll probably get FTL before we *totally* destroy the solar system so take it as you will.
This is so uncool. I've always wanted to see them myself when I grew up. Now I won't get to see all of it :C  In retrospect, imagine if a meteor pebble knocked down Stonehenge.
Checked the history, whoever added that was ridiculous. 
US attacked North Korea in 1950? El oh fucking el. Why don't you read the very article you cited on Wikipedia? US troops withdrew from SK in 1949... how could they attack when they weren't even there? 
It's a hentai girl with a penis and a vagina, both aroused but she's green and has few but huge spikes. Basically it's a girl with a dick who looks like a cactus. And she has a speech bubble with two hearts in it next to her mouth. She's smiling and blushing a little.  You're welcome.
There really needs to be jail time for the people who vote yes on laws like this.
[deleted]
Don't think they are going after some arb guys who were conscripted to the Wehrmacht.... These were SS folk.
There is absolutely nothing in El Comercio about this. I hope that they sue the shit out of this report for using their name. Also, they have not been "destroyed". El Comercio clearly quotes that "they are in danger due to the heavy machinery and work going on nearby."
[deleted]
It's nice that they do this on the Holocaust Remembrance Day.
I know what I'm talking about and those things won't have a -major-impact on the banks, it will disrupt them for a few days, a few weeks maximum but those banks won't collapse and they won't lose a wide number of customers.  Yeah it's bothersome, I do agree but in the end it's nothing too serious either. 
Foundation
Well, I think that removing individuals who are in your way, ally or not, holds true for most organizations. Why would Mossad be more or less likely to do that than any other organization? Are there publicly known precedents?
If the kid was in America the FBI probably would have given him the guns and explosives and *then* foiled his terrorist attempt.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
damn, you so reasonable.
We messed with nature in the first place to acquire said farm animals. Who's to say the Japanese aren't inventing a way to farm whales 8)
Well maybe but they are pretty rare, there isn't regular shootings and I have never seen a non-police owned handgun/rifle.   When I was in Orlando there was almost a gun related murder per day and I do understand Orlando is a pretty bad city for crime.
Same in the US.  This is also not uncommon for the debris that should be recycled due to hazardous materials, notably electronics.
The FBI have enabled supposed terrorists then foiled the terrorist attacks, which they themselves helped to set up.   It's happened in more than one occasion and has been reported on several times. 
Could never happen.  Handguns are illegal in England.  England is a violence-free paradise.
Its not all that dissimilar from the laws in secular society though is it? How many times have constitutional issues been sent through multiple interpretations on their way to the ultimate arbiters of 'truth' the supreme court? Only for even some of these people to usually disagree with how to interpret things!
There is an awful lot of speculation here. I have not seen anything in the article or any links by posters to suggest a motive for this woman's actions. With this in mind, anyone should feel ashamed of themselves if they have come to realize that they used this tragic act to support their own ideology. 
This problem goes hand in hand with the fact that bad and ineffective teachers cannot be terminated.  These Pearson programs and hand holding of the curriculum is because administrators cannot get rid of bad teachers, yet do not trust them as a whole to perform optimally.  So they bring in all this wacky craziness decreasing the performance of the best teachers, but making the dissemination of an average education idiot-proof.  The administration also needs concrete numbers showing growth to validate increased expenditures.  Throwing programs at students designed to assist them in passing a specific test for funding or data points to be used at public meetings is not helping, but with the costs of education skyrocketing to absurd levels people want reassurances that it isn't going to waste.  The only way to resolve all of this is to pay good teachers what they are worth and fire the bad ones.  Give good teachers autonomy over their classrooms and hand-hold the ones who are undergoing retraining.  If the teachers can't cut the mustard they should not get the same pay rate or raise as the ones who are exceptional and put in the additional work required to be a highly effective teacher.
That's assuming that the US and SK would pre-emptively attack NK. The diplomatic calculus is very different from Iraq. We benefit by NOT having NK causing problems, and taking over a country with no resources and a lot of refugees causes problems...
The same hold true for all the Jewish refugees from Arab countries. The difference is that Israel allowed them to move on, and become part of the state. Whereas the Arab world has always used the Palestinians as a tool against Israel, had they allowed them to integrate they wouldn't still be packed in refugee camps in Syria, Jordan and Lebanon. 
If everyone is starving and homeless why the hell do they want with your crusty jewelry?
Or men getting paid for it
As a future educator, this is terrifying. 
&gt;North Korea does have a space program.  Yes, they do. My point was that they want to be seen as technological superpower, when they could barely get a rocket to orbit (something first done nearly 60 years ago, so not exactly breaking tech).   &gt;Do you really want me to post some pictures of little girls with parents who have A LOT of money spoiling them while millions die from lack of food and health care? I believe we have entire TV shows dedicated to that here in the US.  On the other hand, Obama isn't talking about how USA is a communist wonderland where everybody is happy and well fed FOREVER.  &gt;Do we not have people using bulls in the US as well as tractors?  I don't know. They haven't used bulls here in Finland for any work during my lifetime (30 years). I thought this went for all developed countries.  &gt;Honestly, you're just playing right into the brainwashing the US provides about North Korea the same as they provide to their citizens about the US.  I have also have read some books with interviews from people who escaped that place. This might affect my views on the subject.   &gt;They are AT WAR and have been for several decades. We are currently at war with North Korea, we just have a cease fire signed.  USA is, EU has somewhat better relations. We even had embassies there till about last week.  &gt;You know what I'd do? I wouldn't let fucking tourists to my currently at war country grab pictures of whatever they feel like, regardless of the content.  They have had the no-photos policy even before Soviet Union did the parrot sketch. For that matter, Soviet Union didn't have much against snapping photos either.   &gt;North Korea has been at war and preparing for the continuation of war for 50 years now. They haven't forgotten and they don't think the cold war is over yet because it isn't, a communist North Korea and a capitalist America are literally at war at this moment and have a very iffy cease fire signed.  Well, you do have a point there. This might also have something to do with the fact that the local government hasn't really done anything to make things better either. USA has tried (you can't say that too often, but it's true here).
Lose-lose
i hope the same thing that is happening to these sri lankans happen to you so that you may get some first hand perspective.
I don't think this is news to anyone around him.
So far every picture I've seen of North Korea look like they stopped advancing technology in the 70's. But then you have South Korea, who's national sport could be Starcraft. How the hell does a societal gap like that happen?
[deleted]
"you're welcome nigger" -swiss
Well you seem to take the Quran as a reliable source considering you ask people to read it to justify your hate. Is it only a reliable source to suit your needs and then for everyone else it's not?  &gt;Every religion starts and ends with its doctrine. I implore you to please study the Islamic doctrine before you lend it your support. There are better, safer options for both communal and spiritual engagement outside Islam.  Can you please show me the proof you have that I haven't studied it? Or are you trying to insult my intelligence without knowing at all who I am and what I know? Seems a little ignorant of you, don't you think?  Stop spreading hate - you yourself said it.
Learn more
By 'ever seen an anti-muslim rally', I meant 'have you seen one of these rallies, full of skinheads telling the 'pakis' to go back home'? There is clear racism on display.  &gt;Also, I love how you're using the same trolling tactics in every single of your Reddit posts.   I've called precisely no-one a sexist for disagreeing with me thanks, but it's nice to know you're stalking me to let me know what an awful man I am for believing in equality.
I'm not suggesting all out war and invasion, just letting them make a move. Anything they do can be contained. If they launch missiles and they all get taken out in a defensive effort, what's NK going to do next?
Still have a whole nation of people brainwashed ? News of the failed attack would never reach the general population.  NK needs to fall. It's ruining millions of lives but we don't want to act because it would spawn problems for us ?  After WWII the world said Never Again. It's on a smaller scale and not right in Europe but those are people there who need to be freed.
This is what I thought would happen, tensions rise just until the tipping point then NK asks for a call and demands aid. 
[This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_embedded&amp;v=RAET2qDc0yE#t=56s) moment made me fear for the safety of the non-combatants filming the video.  EDIT: How do you say "trigger discipline" in Korean?
And Hockey Night in Canada. 
Seeing this headline made me have a weird thought... Now that his grandfather and father are dead, what if he's doing all this *as a way to get the US and ROK to the table with a mediator as a way to actually end the Korean war without losing face to his military leadership?*  Thereby opening the door for Korean Reunification?  Holy shit, wouldn't that be great?
At this point I'm pretty much sure climate change is inevitable. We won't rest until we have literally burnt *all* the hydrocarbons on the planet.
Waiting any longer and hoping that it won't come violence will only give NK more time to develop more deadly technology and missiles that can reach the US. Every time we give in, their hand gets stronger.
Eventually, somebody will have to act first and attack them with a preemptive strike. A second holocaust is better then a world where we live in fear of a rouge nuclear armed state. And by somebody, I mean my crazy southern cousins with aircraft carriers and nukes; the Americans.
Sunlight is the best disinfectant. Hope all those tax dodging oligarchs, corrupt businessmen and politicians tremble in their sleep.  Bastards hiding from the tax man while millions struggle to get by.
This will be incredible! Can't wait to see them till they pull it off!
He is being downvoted because this is a fine.  The point of the fine is to discourage people from doing it.  It is not about fixing something that cannot be fixed.  If something in the reef was fixable, that would be something they ask for on top of the fine.
*Locks door*  He locked the door!
racism so funny when they are our enemies
Its only tragic that he got gang fucked by a marauding group of dick hungry sows. 
What exactly was it that caused you to turn into an anti-Israel conspiracy theorists? Why do you devote your time spreading this nonsense? It seems pointless, you know everyone just laughs at people like you right?
Looks like a version of go. It's like Asian chess. 
China won't help them. They won't honor the mutual defence treaty because NK is causing all the shit. If anything, China might actually attack them if shit got out control but most likely just close their boarders and stop north Koreans from crossing over.  China at most will either do nothing or do something to end the conflict sooner.
We need to inform people that these are fake courts, run by fake judges determining who is fake in the eyes of the fake law.
Ah, very much so. Minors are incapable of giving consent. It is barbaric that minors are treated differently. 
[deleted]
I have only read a bit about him on Wikipedia. But, to be honest, most of the guys who just wanted to listen to him weren't known to the bystanders at all.  I imagine how it would have been the other way around. Males screaming at unknown females that they were "fucking scum" for wanting to listen to somebody who is internationally renowned as a female rights activist ...  Edit: I do smile at the frustrated "scuhhm" at the end of the video. Democracy at work, thanks to the functioning excecutive.
North Korea not in unfriendliest?
Still can't wrap my head around all the pro-israeli redditors.  Its astonishing actually, here is this internet based group trying to speak up for one of thr most battered and oppressed people of the world. And what happens? They get slammed by one of the other big internet communities.
You mean the Kirchner Islands /s
What if it was a Smurf that I fucked. Since my penis is already blue, can I pick a different flavor Kool-Aid?
Actually palestinian refugees are not lebanese citizens. If you know some history, palestinians and arab leaders had a plan of giving lebanon to the palestinians and making it a whole muslim state, by arming them and the muslim lebanese citizens. That's why the civil war started back in 1975. In one of his most famous speeches Yasser Arafat says :"the road to Jerusalem passes through Jounieh" (a city in the middle of the lebanese coast which is mostly christian). It's a good thing we have kept the palestinians as refugees. I'm all for their fight for their land, but they can't do to us what Israel has done to them. 
wether.. really?
Find the right agricultural machinery such as Loaders, Backhoes, and Trenchers for mining and construction work. Here you can get the reliable equipment to move soil and other kinds of materials. 
How is that something we need to "urgently" be told? Don't editorialize the headline. Rule #2 of r/worldnews.
[deleted]
How can you know that you don't know if you don't know? The idea of knowing, my favorite way to understand the word is the idea of experiencing something fully and creatively. IE Knowing in the biblical sense "And he knew her" her has sex with her, since you can have physical biosex with concepts we must consider that experiencing a respective experience to what one is observing is knowing.  If I talk about skateboarding and you relate to my descriptions to your experience skateboarding then you "know" what I am talking about, no?
Ding dong the witch is dead!
Yeah she won't be missed by many here in Ireland anyway but RIP all the same.
Love her or hate her, she still screwed up the structure of the UK economy that we feel to this day. I don't believe she knew what she was doing at the time and had the best interests of UK business at heart, but it lead to manufacturing all but disappearing and becoming increasingly reliant on banking. I don't think she's a PM that should be remembered that fondly
Check my downvote on the original post. I'm pretty sure it is. How dare anyone say anything not particularly flattering about 'Murica. It illustrates my point about her splendidly. Doesn't have to be offensive, just has to show something greater.
Growing up in Ireland in the eighties she was spoken of as some sort of bogeywomen. Apparently we weren't the only ones who thought so! I had no idea she was so hated in the north of Britain.   She helped to end the cold war, sure, but in general she was some bitch.
Curious to know, while in India what did you volunteer for? Nice to have an American with such profound insight on post-independence India's role in international affairs.
No I dont. Bit unfair to lay that entirely at her door given that all of that was started by the Beeching report back in the 60's. 
I'm reminded of this [great article](http://www.independent.co.uk/voices/comment/not-all-socialists-want-to-dance-on-margaret-thatchers-grave-i-want-her-to-go-on-and-on-8143089.html) in the Independent.  Already the gushing starts.  &gt;Personally, I dread Thatcher’s death. It will be a nightmarish blend of the hysteria that followed Princess Diana’s tragic accident and a month-long political broadcast for the Conservative Party. “She put the ‘great’ back in Great Britain,” our impartial media will lecture us; those who dissent will either be purged from the airwaves or demonised as spiteful lefties. Senior Labour politicians will feel obliged to join in the serenading of a PM who, in many cases, laid waste to the communities they represent. I hope she goes on and on.
&gt;The economy was in shambles  And we'd be much better off now if she never took power.
My dads from Manchester and absolutely loves Thatcher :S
It is part of the political play in the DPRK. Kim Jong Eun antagonizes outside forces to keep the military elite at ease by showing that he is just as serious about their military first internal policy as his grandfather was. Also by keeping the US and the rest of the world on alert helps provide the "us vs. them" mentality needed to keep a starving and impoverished population from questioning the true nature of things. By constantly spewing internal propaganda that the US and ROK are preparing to invade (the "evidence" used is the annual military readiness drills in South Korea") he makes sure that the people under his regime are completely paranoid of outsider invasion and supportive of the pursuit of nuclear weaponry that is, as far as the people know, the only thing keeping enemies at bay.   Sorry about any formatting issues. I'm posting from my phone
You really have to be a shitty politician for the masses to celebrate the passing of an old woman with dementia. 
Are you seriously comparing tyrants to Margaret Thatcher, who was democratically elected multiple times?
It's beer o'clock.   The world is a better place for her leaving it.
Nah, fuck her.
[deleted]
You might say the crowning achievement for actualization of the "American Dream" for African-Americans is new here.  
Kids used to sing playground rhymes about hating Thatcher. Generations were united in it. Waiting for her death became a cultural touchstone.
[deleted]
How is this "World News"?
[deleted]
They'd better do it soon, before the media goes Thatcher, and everyone forgets about them again....
the daily mail can claim its not a state funeral
&gt;Why is this illegal? It's their money let them do what they want with it.   Hey it's my knife, lemme do what I want with it.  **stabs Chasem over and over**  Whateva, I'll do what I want!
[deleted]
[deleted]
No, my fault, thought I was in my inbox and not the other bit, I'm still getting to grips with Reddit. I wasn't expecting so many replies my my initial comment so was overwhelmed with who to argue back with first!
Collectivism always turns to totalitarianism, barring small scale socialism.  
to point out, taxes were 98%. That's... Unfathomable. No one paid it - if you were that rich you just emigrated, either properly to the US or western Europe or to a tax haven and then "holidayed" in the UK. See the Laffa curve.
Hitler was voted in by his people
&gt; It's our duty to look after ourselves and then, also to look after our  &gt; neighbour.   That's cool, and what we should strive to do in our *indvidual* capacity. But the government doesn't operate at the individual capacity.  Society and government exist at a higher level. There is such a thing as the "system", which is the sum total of the behaviors of all its parts, such that the actions of some impact the actions of others even though they have never met. This causes feedback loops which effect everybody in society. Entitlements act to stabilize the system to attempt to minimize cascade effects caused by things like social inequality, which can cause increased crime and social unrest, which in effect can cost society more than if the entitlements were paid in the first place in dealing with the aftermath.
We are already in our dark ages.
Once again, N. Korean officials stumped by modern technology. 
You are a brave soldier. Here, have a medal (otherwise known as an upvote, but hey you can still try and pin it to your boob)
The world economy was on a downturn. Much of Europe was in recession, and the mighty post-war US powerhouse was slowing down. China and India had yet to see their current rise. Yet in all this, Britain outperformed its competitors. Pro-Thatcher believe this to be Thatcher policies (Crafts 2001) whilst leftists believe it was inevitable - the UK had done so fantastically badly for the last two decades that it now had a chance to catch up technologically and managerially by importing techniques from the US (Layard 1989), therefore Thatcher only increased inequality. Only morons think it was an exogenous pull.
Remember that Margaret Thatcher was democratically elected for three terms, openly and transparently campaigning on her policies. *Some* people may passionately hate the former PM, but her re-elections speak for themselves.
http://www.guardian.co.uk/commentisfree/2013/apr/08/margaret-thatcher-death-etiquette
Oh dear lord, come over you. Why would you say something like that? You poor poor fool.
Actually it gave huge money to the likes of dairycrest and their ilk but bugger all to farmers.
Her role in international affairs was equally belligerent whether in support of the Chilean dictator Pinochet, her opposition to sanctions against apartheid South Africa; and her support for the Khmer Rouge.  Here in Ireland her espousal of draconian militaristic policies prolonged the war and caused great suffering. She embraced censorship, collusion and the killing of citizens by covert operations, alongside more open military operations and refused to recognise the rights of citizens to vote for parties of their choice.
IT'S ABOUT FUCKING TIME.
Isn't the inheritance of anger just called politics to 90% of the population?
Smarter, meaner, more right-wing Reagan 
There's everything in India..
This...needs to be made some how....a gif, put to music.  
As an American... Who?  Just kidding.  Thought I'd give the Brits a cheap laugh at our expense in their time of mourning.  Can't say I'll miss her much, but she was a piece of history.
Now what did I tell you about your assumptions?
This is the one part of the gay rights movement I don't understand.  If you want to put straight and homosexual marriages on a level playing field, why make a big deal about things such as this? I don't have a problem with gay people, but I don't like having "oh, look, gay marriage" shoved in my face, just like I don't like a straight marriage being shoved in my face.  And calling me a bigot for feeling that way is like saying I'm anorexic because I don't like being force fed. 
Yes, privatize social security, he actually got a lot of blow back on most of his plans and didn't submit them. 
That's a valid point, thanks. The main point I was trying to get across was the beginning part, I just got sucked into trying to make a rebuttal to other points people were making.
Chinese government officials are in denial over just how bad pollution is. So much so that they've stopped reporters from reporting on it and doctored environmental reports to make things seem better than they are.
[deleted]
Source?
Everything she did was is persuance of a single ideological goal - Moneterism. Loosening the grip of the Unions is fair enough if you think we'll all be better off for it. She was committed to the idea that we would be. That would be fine if she could have been sure of the outcome, but there was absolutely no way of her knowing the outcome. We all know now though. We know that banking deregulation doesn't work, De-Nationalisation doesn't offer better value for all and corporations can't be trusted to act fairly because they can become more powerful than entire sovereign governments. Therefore her most prominent legacy is of a social experiment that has failed badly. She was only an asset while people rode the first wave to shore, i.e. the 1980's. All down hill since then.  
Except pie fights. Soviets love pie fights.
Well there must be a lot of rich people in Britain, maybe even a majority because she was elected into office three consecutive times.
Just to add something maybe a little bit less hostile: Apparently East Germany paid some reparations to the Soviets, and there was also stuff supposed to be shipped to Russia. The Wikipedia article I read says that did not work because France.  Poland [waived its reparations claims](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/German_reparations_for_World_War_II#Poland), I would think under Soviet pressure (maybe the idea that reparations collide withe communist idea of building the future together yada yada). Generally, the eastern bloc countries did not get much reparations, AFAIK. Poland also did not get anything out of the Marshal plan ("Russia say Nyet").  And, as already mentioned, there was the annexation of some former German territory (South East Prussia, Eastern Pommerania, Silesia, Gdansk (technically), minor parts of Saxony and Brandenburg, I think). Silesia, for example, was a very industrious region. How that compares to the forcible transfer of parts of Belarus etc. to the Soviet Unions is for others to discuss. 
\&gt;Russia  \&gt;functional republic democracy  Pick one. An autocrat needs to appease people so he may rule them.
I'm European.
http://Indiaisadouchebag.com
Time to move to Greenland.
When I see an arbitrary cliche defense like this,  I can't help but to assume you have absolutely no idea how to hold an intelligent conversation.  You saw someone make this defense once, it baffled you and now you think kicking up some dust is going to somehow make yourself and others think you won an argument.  Go back to the minors kpanzer, maybe you'll have a spot at the adult table in a few more years.  
We need a war to put this to use.
North Korea is like uber-Jonestown.
Well I guess that was inevitable.
Don't forget nuclear, for a while, bruce power was one of the biggest in the world
He can still claim that this, while stupid and insensitive, was actually a joke. The format he used would back him up. If he acts smart by lawyering up and remaining silent on the issue, he should have no problem getting away with it, again. Then after being found not guilty, he can write a book about it, like OJ.   Oh who am I kidding, he doesn't seem all that smart. So he is going to prison and I doubt anyone would want to read a book written by him anyway.
Actually, doraemon could use time machine to go back and kill your parents.
They told embassy staff to leave before the 10th, this isn't much of a surprise
[deleted]
&gt;No one person is gonna start shit unless everyone else is on board.  I'm just saying that's a pretty broad and ambiguous generalization, considering the historical context. Your second comment is pretty spot-on, but I'm just wondering what you explicitly meant by the first one in a roundabout, reddity way. 
China has, actually, distanced themselves from NK.  The president of China said North Korea has no right to throw the region in crisis as NK is doing now.
i know lucifer is your lord.  jesus is all truth.  babel and the pyramids are broken!  that is why they all fight.
cool, I take it you're going to be signing up to the military then?
Same as BC.
Only in the domain of thought-experiment and only during some afternoon a couple of years ago.   I find myself spending the rest of my time being the bizarro-version of you. 
Wat.
Family guy, American dad, and Cleveland show are all the same show. Granted Family guy is ok, American Dad is meh, and not very funny or entertaining.
what the hell china
Many people in China become absolutely dependent on their children when they get older. It's not economically feasible for a great many of the population not to have children, and the elderly are already starting to hurt from the effects of China's one child policy.
I find this highly disturbing.  She wasn't Hitler or Bin Laden.  She was a shit PM, granted, and she did a lot of shitty things, but to rejoice in her death is just barbaric.  Rejoice at the fact the shit PM she was is no longer in office, don't rejoice in the fact that she can no longer breathe.
No you idiots. The solution to a psycho with a gun isn't to give guns to everyone.   Let the authorities take care of this. (China and US) And I know its a strech to think China will attack N Korea but they sure as hell wont stop us if N Korea moves first.   I would be more worried about South thinking they got attacked and letting a nuke off the chain. 
Bullshit, you know how much the earth gets polluted from extracting coal, oil and fracking gas?  You're a fucking moron, you don't have a clue what "Clean" means. 
No , reliable forms of power such as gas, nuclear do not and can not be backed up because of the large and stable power they produce.  Sure you will have excess capaticity in a nations electricity grid which could survive the dropout of a few power plants. But it is more to meat surges in demand. E.g NFL game.   Wind does have a place in power generation but we can not depend on it. It's to un-reliable.
I actually don't remember hearing about a smog day last summer. Maybe I was just to busy then to hear about it but it definitely escaped my mind so I imagine that this was somewhat successful so far.
Did you just wake from a coma ? Its 2013 mate. Thatchers rule ended in 1990. We have had lots of other prime ministers, from both labour and conservative. You cant blame Thatcher for all the wrongs today. Labour did a great job of running up our debts, and encouraging the shitty welfare state we have today in their last 12 years in power. Slide some blame over their way too.
Looks like this was centered about 50 miles away from the Bushehr Nuclear Power Plant.  
Too many Hero burgers, or not enough?
We learn a lot about he atrocities committed against the Indians in American schools. We also learn about the bad stuff we did to the Japanese during WW2. It's  the more recent stuff that is glossed over.
I think some wind-farms are rather pretty, tbh.  http://tinyurl.com/cnzhgmb http://www.mypennines.co.uk/images/west-pennines/whittle-hill1.JPG Or at least don't detract much.  Oddly enough, a great-uncle of mine was a devastatingly smart man, and he hated wind power. He died at the age of 90 or so, some 10 years back- said "developing nuclear power was the future, why are we going backwards now?". 
Same. We're deriding it right now!
Same way private hospitals in the US turn patients down.  When you turn a public service into a for profit scheme whoever runs it will cut as many corners, jobs, wages.... as posible in order to make it as profitable as possible.   So companies got privatized, ditched their workers and sent as many positions to say, India, as possible where people will happily work for a fraction of the local wage.  And when someone complains about it they will be told "hey, it's economics", we're a business now.
Do you want to grab lunch?  
[deleted]
And what? Innocent until proven guilty. They can't prove he didn't shoot himself up and OD
"We do not wish harm on foreigners in South Korea should there be a war"...sooo, we're gonna start a war. Ok. 
I'm sad that there is nothing there...
This assumes that the leader isn't a complete fucking lunatic, which was the whole point. Following the money will do you no good if you're trying to understand a person who is chasing spectres.
[Calvin &amp; Hobbes](http://assets.amuniversal.com/c55ca8e4250d102d94d7001438c0f03b)
actually that sounds like the least painful one of the bunch. The others ones sound like then inflict you with massive slow tissue damage.
^  That exact post is also found [here at this link](http://m.outlookindia.com/story.aspx?sid=1&amp;aid=794747).  Redditor lllllllllXlllllllll, you have a [history of reposting other peoples pictures](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/1busdc/fire_tornadoes_are_rare_in_nature_but_when_they/). It may be safe to assume you now copypasta text also.
We won't need to do a second-strike nuclear response, because North Korea doesn't have the capability of launching a nuke on a missile according to the CIA, at least.  And if they did, their missiles are not exactly strategic weapons at this time. They're more like 1960s NASA rockets.  Huge launch pads, towers.  Not underground silos where you just pop a hatch and launch a missile on 5 minutes notice.  It would take the better part of several days to prep a missile for launch in full view of satellites.  We'd blow it up the instant we saw they were about to take off.
http://i.imgur.com/HuPGaGX.gif  Relevant
I am a war weary individual at this point, but that still doesn't fix the whole "ranting about your enemy"  crux of the issue part, now does it?
[deleted]
Or just a basic understanding of game theory.
It's not about Mutually Assured Destruction with the DPRK, it's about MAD with countries with far more capable military forces who might take us not following our own nuclear-for-nuclear policies as a sign that, given restraint and posturing, the US won't use nukes to protect its allies.  War in the nuclear era, ironically, is rarely only about the players on the field.  And the tactics used in war are often made as messages and demonstrations to national actors who aren't even fielding forces at the time.
False theres way to many people.
Also, next Monday is Kim Sung ills birthday. 
So in other words, it was right.
We know about all their big missle tests through seismic waves, so it's highly unlikely they'll have something with a big bang they we aren't aware of.
[Had to log in just to upvote you, you win this time.](http://i.imgur.com/v2o1aHn.gif)
I don't think anyone in high levels in China, Japan, the US, or Seoul reasonably believes that a preemptive attack on NK could every happen. It just is not worth the cost of life that it would require.   There is really nothing that could happen which would provide an avenue for preemption. Even if NK does fire a missile tomorrow, I doubt it would lead to war.  NK will have to invade for a war to happen. What made preemption possible in Iraq is not available in NK.
There's a rumor that her children won't even attend the funeral.
Thanks! That was the idea.   Guess people didn't get the joke. The comments above me joked about the non-specific *thing*. I kept going with the joke and created a stupid meme about it, or as you said:   &gt;This is the dumbest fucking meme ever.  Mission accomplished.
&gt;Name calling I try to resist.   I did not say I always resist. You may want to offer an apology.
You went there and reported back?
It's obvious when you look through his history (or just look at his username), but I'm bored at work and poking the troll is rather entertaining.
...so I didn't say that.  Got it.  Thanks!
you have a point, but you are dead wrong in the reality of this case. There is zero chance of NK winning a war with SK right now.
Israel doesn't have a state religion (look it up). Israel also has freedom of religion, freedom of speech and freedom of the press.  This is why I like Israel more than Palestine.
The only things I know about her come from Doctor Who... 
They can't trace a picture to a phone?   Really?   That seems pretty simple. 
[deleted]
If they mess with us Russia will come up from behind them and shove a sickle and hammer up their ass
Isn't tomorrow already today over there?
Try an SO living in South Korea.  But if it helps I'm not even slightly worried, they aren't, that's for sure, so why I should I be?
TIL The Feudal System is still in effect
OT: Your username starts with the word Prof and ends with Tobias. My username starts with Prof and ends with Saibot (Tobias written backwards). Coincidence?
dununuunuuu, dunu-nu-nu-nu-nu-nuu
Okay I really have to ask now. Who is that Lady and what has she done that everybody is so happy about her passing? Short and simple please?
There seems to be some confusion in the comments about the title.  The air force is *grounding aircraft*, not *grinding up* aircraft. Grounding simply means that they will not be in use and effectively made reserves.
When America stops owing people money then we'll talk. 
[deleted]
Doubt it, N.K. is not dumb, they know they could easily escalate into full war with a test missile *over* Japan. They could maybe get away with firing into their waters near Japanese waters, but no way could they put any kind of missile over Japan. They wouldn't retaliate because their missile was shot down, they already had intent to attack.
If you are a small, poor nation with, at best, a handful of crude nuclear devices, facing a nation with enough long-range nuclear capability to basically destroy the planet, I think you'd probably be tending to every bit of offensive and defensive capability you have.
Use it all ya want. 
Honestly, it's because they know how to exploit the system by crying racism at everything. 
bye
[deleted]
A bit tasteless? It's disgusting and cowardly. Thatcher isn't around to defend herself anymore. Which is exactly why the cowardly extremists of the loony left come out in droves only once she died.   You sound like a traitorous coward, with weak knees and a jelly spine. 
The way they gave stats on that isn't very good for a comparison.  Here's [a list](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_military_expenditures) of top 15 contries by total military expenditures. (Fun fact: you have to add up all the other 14 contries on that list to out-do the defense spending of the US).
I recommend people watch "The Promise," a four part (free) mini series on hulu, about this long israeli-palestinian conflict. It's very well made and definitely very engaging. I spent a Sunday evening/night  watching the four 1.5 hr episodes...seriously it's good. Even if you're not interested in the history of it, there's great character development. 
[deleted]
Why don't you link to TorrentFreak instead of this blogspam?
In other news, it appears that human beings breathe air and blink their eyes involuntarily.
It will be hilarious if they fire all those missiles and they all blow up...
North Korea is letting me down for the moment. HURRY UP IRAN DEVELOP YOUR JIHADIST NUCLEAR MISSILES AND BOMB BOMB ISRAEL AND THE USA QUICK!! IM COUNTING ON YOU TO DESTROY THE INFIDELS!!!
How much input do these peaceful people have on the statements made by the Iranian government on world affairs? Look it up.
[deleted]
Evidently you haven't met cossack women
Daisy cutter much?
There's no set area for a zip code.  I think it's  more of a population distribution (there are more people living near major cities like New York or LA). 
Wow! Not only are you helpful and attractive, but you're also polite. Way to go!
Sweet my 3 favorite countries!
[deleted]
Yeah, no one ever said Hitler was a pussy!
[Same Article Here](http://www.setyoufreenews.com/2013/04/09/germany-gives-japan-its-backing-as-n-korea-tensions-rise/)
Stupid is as stupid does
Actually the Russians initially welcomed the Germans, it wasn't until they realized that the Germans were worse than Stalin that they pushed back. It would have turned out much more different if Germany showed restraint 
yeah, I like how americans take the word "defense" so literally in the name of Japanese Armed Forces and the american secretary of defense, and the department of defense are just part of the normal military
&gt;They have announced plans to build up their military.   Source?
Finland doesn't need to beat their chest. 
OMG YES.  This is the greatest 'Murica gif mashup I have ever seen!  Reminds me of Total Annihilation... 
Wait until your currency revalues and inflation hits...  Then you'll find out just how rich $100k is.
It's happening again...
Sounds like there isn't much to lose.
For more up to date stuff on what is going on, go here:  http://www.reddit.com/r/NorthKoreaNews/
The Axied Powers 
That's when you build a pylon in the corner of the map.  
Reality.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-zu3rlYKrlk
why does anyone actually believe kim jong un is running the show?
Will Ireland be neutral or "neutral" like last time?
That is not true! We were the first to politically oppose Korea, Vietnam and the wars in the Golf! As well as always strictly opposing weapons sales from and military bases, personel and material in our country! We are the innocence in legal person!
Unless you have friends in the 2ID
&gt; This $600,000 award will provide the proof-of-concept FDR system over the next 18 months, and a working spacecraft would be ready as soon as 2020, Pancokti predicted – but if NASA wanted to throw money at the project, this timescale could be cut.  $600k would be a drop in the bucket as far as government funding goes.   It seems like something like this would be a worthwhile long-term investment to throw some cash at - not just for the ability to reach Mars faster, but also to make it feasible to reach the asteroid belt for mining and to send remote bots and maybe eventually expeditions to the moons of Jupiter.  While I'm sure there would be many other challenges to overcome to make these happen, the thought of better propulsion to make these even remotely possible is pretty exciting.
I would watch the fuck out of this.
[deleted]
Woah TIL.    This demure lady bombed Korean Air Flight 858 killing all 115 passengers. "I deserved the death penalty for what I did."
**TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE**  **TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE**  **TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE**  **TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE TRIPLE NUKE**  
Half the shit, the Soviets got the rest.
[deleted]
Ask Viacom. 
Oh, fucking great. Now we'll have another fucking Reddit-wide circle jerk.
[deleted]
It is a matter of the unknown. We know the Earth is habitable. We know what the surface of Mars is but we are limited with our ability to understand Mars as we are millions of miles away. If we can actually go there, we can set up an infrastructure to learn about the planet and make discoveries we could not have in the past. It is never about what we know but what we don't know. 
Its your reddit birthday, 1 year wasted many years to go
"Alleged" has nothing to do with legality. "The five-year-old allegedly spilled the grape juice on the carpet." Alleged simply means supposed. 
So far you have had a number of chances to back up the claim, and so far you have produced none.  I think we can safely say that this myth is busted.
I got bored and decided to do the numbers.   Halfway to mars, the acceleration of gravity due to the earth (ignoring mars because I don't know how to even begin calculating that) is 3.15x10^-8 m/s^2.   That's 3 hundred millionths of a meter per second squared. I think we can agree that is pretty inconsequential.  
Wonder if it's the same for the penis.  Penis better off without underwear? 
Galilee is a very satisfying word to say.  Galilee Galilee.
Its obviously a false flag operation. Someone musta misread there que. NWO repilians ectect... 
They're good at buggery though.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-5i1cJIwE7M
I'm gonna ask, what's wrong with CNN?  I genuinely would like to know, along with others I'm sure. 
We could kill two birds with one stone. Give Thatcher a cheep funeral, then charge people a little bit to spit on her grave, and a bit more to dance on it for a few minutes. Once the funeral is paid for, donate the remainder to research. Everybody wins.
You are overstating their influence.  While they are one of the more effective fighting groups, likely due to experienced foreign fighters and commanders, they are not active in the entire country.   They, like the other rebel groups are localized.  In the end they will have to fight the other groups once Assad falls.  A group foreign fighters who target civilians will have a hard time maintaining any popularity in the post-assad fight for power.    &gt;Also there is a difference between jihadist leanings and openly declaring a merger with the Iraqi wing of Al-Qaeda, as the article suggests.  There was never any illusion of what they were.  This declaration is just stating what most people already knew to be true. 
Anon isn't really a specific organization but a term used by out of touch people to refer to the techie masses that post on boards like 4chan or reddit.   When I was a kid (I'm 30 now) i knew who lived in every house for blocks around my home. My neighbors had a responsibility to make sure I could travel around the neighborhood relatively safely and maybe stop in for a glass of water. People were responsible to their communities for their actions and that was a bigger deterrent than being responsible to any kind of legal system. We knew who on our street had a drug problem, who had been to jail. As we have lost all grasp of communities and let our neighbors become strangers this no longer exists and it turns to the only community left to shame the guilty.
They don't have a site you moron, it's not a fixed group, it's a fragmented mess of people doing different things for different reasons, they all just happen to like the label of anonymous. Why is this so hard for people to get through their skulls? There are dozens of *anonymous* sites thrown up by everyone from actual white/black/grey hats to script kiddies.
&gt; $600k would be a drop in the bucket as far as government funding goes.  One day I'm gonna write a reddit bot that goes around and adds up every time some redditor says "oh it's such a small amount of money compared to the overal budget" when speaking about their pet interest or project.  I have a feeling the accumulated amount of all these "drops in buckets" would be more money than exists in the United States. 
Green hair?!? That's one of the most powerful cards in all of Duel Monsters!
That's it, I'm moving!
Does one guy giving away thousands of dollars in BitCoins on Reddit help this effect? 
[deleted]
no... Anonymous is exactly this, random anonymous people using the name for their cause. Anonymous is a decentralized and anarchistic group. 
Never gonna be worth *nothing*, though - this was my point.
http://p.twimg.com/AuqnWFgCIAAzgi5.jpg  This is a truck driver who constantly had sun on one side of his face. That + boobs would probably mean sag, I would imagine.
Baader-Meinhof
I think he's incorrect in saying it's "overvalued", imo. Bitcoin, especially in these early days where the network is smaller, is volatile sure, but it's value is what it is set at. It's not overvalued, and not undervalued.  However, assuming nothing "breaks" bitcoin (a flaw discovered), it really only has up to go, in terms of value. It's like gold in the ground. Not only is some gold being lost, but it's becoming harder to find. It will continue to become harder to find, and eventually it will be impossible to find.. literally. The algorithm has an end, meaning, no more bitcoins can be generated after a certain amount.. and long before that, it will likely cost too much to even *try* to find more.  So with that said, it's only going to get more valuable and more rare.. as long as there are no serious flaws, or network takeovers in the near future, of course.
IIRC Google Plus nearly destroyed the company. Historically, Google has been a pretty great company to work for but ex employees said that management became obsessed with Google Plus and began limiting/scrapping independent projects and put all their man power into trying to compete against Facebook. I think now that Google Plus is an epic flop, the company is beginning to get better again.  Also, I think that was around the time where Google had been purchasing websites such as Youtube. Also, there are allegations that Google has been giving out people's data to advertising companies.
Car bombs are pretty low tech
"It's called a Traumatic Brain Injury"
goes the weasel 
http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/0/02/Kiev-UkrainianNationalChernobylMuseum_15.jpg
Mt gox is a market place. Them saying the value is $125 means that there is a standing offer to buying bitcoins at $125
...Oops? D:
mine. 
&gt; Bitcoin is like a ponzi in that the returns from current investors come solely from new investors driving up the value.  That is how almost all investments work that don't pay a dividend or some kind of cash flow. Investors in Berkshire Hathaway, for example, only earn returns because new investors are willing to pay more for their shares.
False.  Influenza naturally mutates at a higher rate than HIV.  Normal HIV reverse transcriptase is about 10-100x *more accurate* than Influenza virus RNA polymerase. 
it's basically a pennystock with a larger market cap than you will typically find amongst such stocks.  And you need look no further than consider the fact that proponents will say 'well you can divide it down as much as you want, so even if its worth $5000 a bitcoin you can use or buy .0001 bitcoins'.... meaning it's a penny stock
Well then I'm glad you are not a judge, and I hope you never serve on a jury, because either logic is not your strong point or you are too easily manipulated by emotion.  It really astounds me how badly people want to believe that she was raped.  I'm not saying she definitely wasn't raped, I'm saying there is no good evidence to suggest she was (and some circumstantial evidence that suggests that she wasn't).
&gt; The minute I buy any type of investment vehicle  ...  &gt; buying our first house  ...  &gt; and now (btc)  I'm going to assume you're being sarcastic, but if not, you have a weird idea of what qualifies as an "investment"... :)
Then I'm fucked, and I don't care about your potatoes. My grieving brother Raul however, still accepts my tokens.
PO
[deleted]
[deleted]
China iirc. And who's to say countries don't send them aid or money without anyone knowing. 
I agree, it's a bullshit number and should probably have been 99% or greater, because honestly normal people just don't give a fuck. Bitcoins are popular because of people who don't understand them and people who use them for illicit activities.
Thank you though please keep in mind that I have no academic authority to speak about the Korean conflict. My assumptions could be as flawed and under researched as any other opinion in this thread.
The lead up to this nuclear war is sooo boring.
&gt; Sweden is incredibly wealthy and tiny. Of course they can spend more per capita.   But but USA is even wealthier measured by GDP per capita. You should've picked Luxembourg to make your point. 
I live with my 19 and 17 year old cousins.  I provide for them and I don't let them act like that nor do they attempt to act like trashy people.  They are responsible people whom I trust.  Their "peers" however act like little want to be thug punks.  I walked into my house a few months back to my friends 14 year old brother and his girlfriend screwing on my couch.  It is parenting to an extent but with the labor force we are dealing with these days, kids aren't raised by their parents.  The Nuclear Family is dead.    When they see that stupid ass piece of shit in the hospital for drinking promethazine and codeine based cough syrup mixed with sprite, they see a millionaire celebrity rapper.  My cousins have only recently moved in with me, but they work hard, they study, they are respectful, have manners, and have goals in life.  The crap these kids are listening to is partly to blame whether the kids on Reddit who downvote this want to admit it or not.    It's disgusting to see how kids behave these days.  As for video games causing school shootings, video games aren't part of the widespread need kids feel to "fit in".  This trash ass rap is what the popular crowds are listening to in schools and people feel the need to be a part of that group so like sheep they will conform to the social standards set by their popular peers.  http://www.azlyrics.com/lyrics/lilwayne/fuckyou.html  If that wasn't enough:  http://www.azlyrics.com/lyrics/lilwayne/moneyonmymind.html  Is this the kind of filth you would want your kids listening to?
Pics or it didn't happen...
The difference between fiat and virtual currencies is the number of aircraft carriers backing it.
Hell, even UPS ground would be quicker than this.
The grand illusion that what we do have a impact on anything that can be called remotely large scale is still thriving i see.
I expected a weight loss secret in that article, OP.
Yes but the same could be said about Uzbekistan being a "vortex of meaninglessness and shamelessness". 
&gt; If he was drunk, it is rape.
Cold
Family guy episode where Peter makes his own country?
[Calibrations?](http://fc08.deviantart.net/fs70/f/2012/186/f/b/calibrations___rough_cack_animation_by_leemo626-d562do3.gif)
[deleted]
Were missile launches this slow in the past, or is it just North Korea?  I have a feeling modern tech just makes us more aware of each step.
AND MY AXE!!!
Not even a decent parody. Korean was terrible.
Except..they don't have the technology to miniaturize/weaponize a nuclear device.  They can set one off...with MONTHS of preparation in sterile, pristine conditions. They can't launch one. Shit, they can't even put a satellite in orbit.
ILL PUT MY HEAD IN THE SAND IF I WANT, BUDDY
I hope the Japanese, S. Koreans, and the US are all talking to each other.  I'd hate to see everyone go after the missile like 6 year old soccer players going after the ball.
we should just hurry up and blow that crap up
&gt; But was also a thinner atmosphere than the current atmosphere.   source please and also exactly what epoch we are referring to. I am referring to the stage immediately after volcanoes and comets pumped up the earths atmosphere. All i can find is theories and assumptions  http://pubs.acs.org/subscribe/archive/ci/30/i12/html/12learn.html &lt;- If scenario 3 is correct here and that 90% figure is true it is possible that a large portion of that carbon was atmospheric.  Edit * from article "These carbonates had to come from the atmosphere, by way of the oceans, so we propose that, after the original oxidation of CH4 and CO, Earth’s early atmosphere was at very high pressure, up to 90 bar, and that it consisted primarily of CO2. "   &gt; Also, the sun is substantially brighter now than it used to be.   Am aware of this, hence my comment about things being to hot in 800 million years. 
Oh for fucks sake. I absolutely hate the idea of a possible war, no matter how small or large it may be, but this is some of the most idiotic banter and scaremongering I've read yet from a site that capitalizes on these things for page views and ad dollars.
Aw yeah, Ferris Wheel of Doom is back y'all. 
FIRE ZE MISSILE!
I said **American criminal procedural shows** - as in, you know, TV?  I never once implied that actual American police forces do this or not.  I find, however, people are quick to blame police for things that are basically out of their control due to them getting all their legal information from TV and other media - which is unrealistic in many cases.
Not really.  Almost all of their equipment is laughably outdated.  We WANT them to use it in the event of a war, because if we're fighting them on conventional terms, it will be short work.  What we don't want is an Iraq occupation/Afghanistan where guerilla warfare is the method of choice.
Arbitrary rules set by a private company, which would adhere to those rules rather than gain their percentage from a massive government initiated kickstarter for future inter-solar space travel?  I think their primary and only real rule is to make money.
Yes?
Mt Gox is the largest exchange in the world, and it ground to a halt because it had so much traffic, thus causing a panic sell.  Imagine owning $50,000 worth of assets one minute and not knowing what the market price was the next. Its a function of poor institutions, not a lack of asset value.
He'll practice on button-shaped cakes first
This is like trying to figure out what's in the safe. 
[deleted]
Anti-climatic as hell BUT this may have potentially saved innocent people. 
Thats just disagreement that there's actually rape. Its kind of a grey ares sometimes. What if their both drunk?  btw i went thtough your post history and noticed ur the person who answered my WoW question. wat a coincidence
As others mentioned, Japan's colonization of Taiwan was generally beneficial rather than exploitative in the case of China and Korea.  There's generally a mutual respect, especially since Japan was the economic powerhouse in Asia during the '70s and '80s when Taiwan was modernizing and itself becoming quite wealthy.  A lot of modern Taiwanese culture is influenced by modern Japanese culture.  Taiwan, especially Taipei, often feels a lot more like Tokyo than it does Shanghai: clean and very polite.  Still, displaced mainlanders make up a disproportionate share of the political and economic control of Taiwan, and many of them still remember the Sino-Japanese War, which was quite brutal.  So "looooove" would be an overstatement.  But between Koreans, Mainland Chinese and Japanese, the Taiwanese probably respect the Japanese the most.
They do recalls for American cars all the time. Do your research before you buy a car and buy one that you like and that fits your needs and is safe and whatever else you want from whatever car maker and country you want.
&gt;are you telling me to keep my mouth shut and go to the back of the bus?  No, I'm telling European nations to stop making being a Muslim illegal.  Switzerland banning minarets, France and other countries banning Muslim women from wearing their hijabs and niqabs, etc.  Europe, shining beacon of social justice.
It will be interesting to see exactly how many moves he has left leading up to an actual act.
Everything about that show is fantastic.
lol you're just feebly jumping from one accusation to another, hoping something sticks.
North Korean citizens also don't deserve to live in a state with constant famines, prison camps, indoctrinating propaganda and political oppression. Yes, war is horrible. But it's certainly not all bad. Though lots of people will come to harm in the case of conflict, many future generations of North Koreans would likely benefit from significantly increased life standards. And everytime this threat-bargaining pattern from NK succesfully repeats, we're basically just prolonging the suffering of its population. There simply doesn't seem to be a non-horrible solution to this problem.
Russia will launch that shit for you, you know they need the money.
They already have a mirror on TOR. I don't have the .onion on me right now.
Well, I think it has to do with the fact that you can't run controlled experiments in economics, because value is subjective. According to the Austrians, most mainstream economic models make unrealistic assumptions about human actors and therefore lack any predictive value (unlike the same mathematical models when applied to physics or chemistry, for example).  It's a pretty well developed area, and agrees with a lot of the standard mainstream "microeconomics" (e.g. supply and demand)... but not so much with the standard "macroeconomics" that says stimulus spending will work for example.  Probably the best known resource for books and articles on the subject is www.mises.org, in case you want to know more.
[deleted]
Man, that body would be so ragged near the end of it...
We were very close to get one with the US and it went down the drain. It was our fault not the US's.
they made a statement that it would be down last night so that they could add new hardware to accomodate the increasing amount of users and trades
Obviously that was mentioned within the context of this discussion.  Keep up, man.  [Here](http://archive.org/details/bittorrent) [are](http://www.dominikbodi.de/baen/index.html#list-of-torrents) [a](http://www.frostclick.com/wp/) [few](http://www.gameupdates.org/) [more](http://terasaur.org/browse/recent) [legal](http://mabula.tangram.dnsalias.net/mixes/) [options](http://www.vuze.com/).  [Miro](http://subscribe.getmiro.com/#)/[Miroguide](http://www.miroguide.com/) is also a torrenting set up.
I can ask the same about American newscasters and DJs.
So...you are saying if NASA makes missiles, I mean satellites, that can accidentally crash and burn at precise locations on the planet in effort to...collect data or something, then it can get funded?
The key word that wasn't in the title is "scenario"
Meth, but the kind that makes you really verbose.
Do you or anybody else have a video clip of Rodman in the wedding gown? I've found only pictures.
It is illegal to buy a car for cash. I don't think it is actually possible. Too many complications with the certificate and stuff that proves who owns the car.   he could own it, but if he is ever stopped by police and doesn't have the right papers they would take the car.  Edit: I am talking about NORWAY, not US. And it only goes for new cars. Not used ones. I thought it was implied since the article was about Norway.
I managed a movie theater way back and a guy lost his wallet in the seats and didn't realize it.  The thing had at least four major credit cards and over $700 in cash.  I was shocked when my employee dropped it off in the office so we could call the guy.  The man came in and picked up his wallet and was very thankful that he got it back.  Of course he was an idiot not only for carrying that much cash at any given time, but because the dumbass did the exact same thing two months later and the same employee found his wallet still stuffed with cash.
When I worked at Pizza Hut I would make my own stuffed crust, but would put shreded cheddar/mozz in there along with bits of bacon
Yeah, guilt can be a bitch sometimes. I still feel guilty sometimes because when I was 12 or so I "hacked" my friends Runescape account and took a few hundred gold and a black longsword... It wasn't even very much to me and in just a few days he was back to full power, but I still think about it and regret it now and then.
I admit it. I just googled for the alphabet they used. I claim no knowledge of any Scandinavian languages, other then what I learn in IKEA and from [this guy](http://images1.wikia.nocookie.net/__cb20111104173209/muppet/images/4/41/Swedish-chef.jpg)
But anonymous has nothing to do with the law... &lt;.&lt; so how is it even relevant here?
Don't tell that to 80% of American redditors.  You'll crush their dreams.
*Merfen slams Josepherism's grasp of colloquial usage of words.*
I can never understand the people that return the money. I for sure as hell would keep that money. Growing up and struggling, and just stumbling into money like that... It would pretty much be fuck everyone at that moment and I would rather risk going to jail.
What if there were girls in the practice who didn't want the father to intend not for a religious reason, but just because they didn't want him there?  Would that be ok?
[deleted]
I'm wondering why they are threatning us. From the everything I've read it seems like they are threatening us with no demands. I feel like the media isn't telling us something. 
gotta go a little bit north
well they should get the money from the Italian politicians involved since they bribed them before.  Italians don't need Lookheed Martin products anyways.
Beyond despicable!
[deleted]
[deleted]
File a BBB complaint on those crooked fucks, write some bad reviews online and find a different mechanic.
Perhaps seeding some of the stuff on [Biotorrent](http://www.biotorrents.net/browse.php).(one of links I posted earlier)  Or seeding some of the music on [etree](http://bt.etree.org/)(again, posted above)  I'm sure there's more...but I don't have fiber so haven't looked into it too much. :D 
For a second I thought this was in r/nottheonion
True, but it's a *public* swim class.  If it were a private free class, then they could make whatever rules they please.
&gt; I can't stand hypocrisy, in any form.  The irony.
Not since the accident...
canada is wasting a similar amount on the exact same jets.   when will we learn?
No you can not.  Heisenberg's uncertainty principle forbids this.
News outlet: Only runs articles and such about NK. I don't think it's really us/the citizens who are obsessed with it.
Eh, there was a period of time where it was happening a lot. Two DUIs and one time me and my friend were sitting in his car with too much weed and we happened to be in a very quiet neighborhood...where there was an attempted murder a week ago that we had no idea about and the cops rolled us for looking Asian and suspicious. Shit happens!
Does anyone know what, if any, carrier strike groups the U.S. has over in that region?
Where I live it wouldn't be nowhere near OK for any book, including bible/quran.
Didn't take nearly long enough.
So the Sex Pistols were big fat phonies.  Big surprise.
What do you think was holding that hydraulic hose together?
/r/nocontext
The unwanted cyber police strikes again.
So if I rape a girl there is pretty much zero chance of me even getting arrested. Not if there are a dozen witnesses, and apparently the girl is incapable of testifying.   Better yet, if myself or someone in my family gets raped and it isn't on on video I guess I shouldn't even waste my time getting the police involved.   Two lessons learned:   Rape is very easy to do, and anything short of a professional film crew is not enough evidence.   If you or someone you care about gets raped, your only real option is vigilantism. If you call the police you can be sure they will do nothing except make sure you don't seek revenge.
Reasonable comment in r/worldnews  -12 downvotes. 
Muito Bem!
&gt;After the treaty was signed, a number of the signatories made requests to the United States for military aid. Later in 1949, President Truman proposed a military assistance program, and the Mutual Defense Assistance Program passed the U.S. Congress in October, appropriating some $1.4 billion dollars for the purpose of building Western European defenses.  While NATO doesn't guarantee financial aid, it does increase the amount of money you will get from the FMF if you're not strategic (i.e located around Iraq/Afghanistan).
Which Korea?!?!
Why is everyone so surprised?  NK is an absolute joke of a country.
No one in East Asia is happy about nuclear escalation there. Why would China want to give more legitimate reasons for Japan, South Korea, and Taiwan to arm themselves further and be strongly backed by their respective populations?  &gt; if war breaks out, NK would surely make a mess of our markets, the USA is barely recovering now, 2 wars, etc....  This idea of economic warfare to fuck with the USA is old-fashioned. As if Chinese leaders would dare screw with our economy when it could so drastically affect theirs. They don't merely risk economic crashes there like we do. They have to deal with socioeconomic crashes that range upwards to bloody revolution (as per their history).  I assure you that like us, the people over there are far more concerned with themselves, their immediate economic concerns, safety, social stability of their own country, etc, than they are with some dick swinging contest you're making this out to be.   *"Oh if the US markets are messed up, and US doesn't recover, China will be the next economic super power!"*   Almost no one thinks like that except the most idiotic and adolescent of people.
Which again, no one seems to have seen and no news source has validated the claims beyond mentioning it. I can't imagine an investigator who was presented with any clear photographic evidence would go, "nope, fake. I can tell because of the pixels" and dismiss the case.  There was no physical evidence due to her not going to the police right away and the pictures obviously gave them nothing to go on either (for all we know, it could've been a picture of her topless holding a beer, or riding a moose in her underwear, it's all speculation).  And you can't just lock someone up one word alone. Evidence is needed. It sucks but it's the best way we have of making sure innocent people don't end up in jail (well... you know what I mean).
[deleted]
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ygE01sOhzz0  relevant, very relevant
I looked in the top comments specifically for an ED joke. Thanks.  Wtf is wrong with me?
There was a server time-out, they took too long and now have to re-enter them.
[deleted]
Stupid memes, stupid memes everywhere!
What's next? Shameless? Life on Mars? Damn brits...
Your wife farts like that too
What taepodongs do you have? Nodongs, semi-dongs?   North Korea, a wonderful worker's paradise of different taepodongs. 
Don't feel bad North Korea, my missile usually lowers after a few hours too.
This should be in /r/circlejerk ... STFU already stop upvoting this hype driven, garbage journalism.
Viagra will do that.
That's basically my point: there's no good comparison on this level. Though, if you still maintain that comparing Norway to the US is apropos, I'd like the point out that North Dakota's 700,000 population is a hell of a lot closer to Norway's 5,000,000 than Norway's is to the US's 315,000,000 (not to mention that Norway's population density is about 30/square mile, that figure is about 90 in the US and about 11 specifically in ND). 
It's pretty simple... Immediately send fast movers to take out known communications sites while deploying B1 and B2 strategic bombers and F-18s to decimate as much artillery as possible, as fast as possible, considering how much of it is pointed towards Seoul. Rebuff any advance they try to make through the DMZ, and start rolling the tanks.   Also, hunting the submarines.
Also it's April, not March.
If your missile remains up for more than 4 hours, contact a doctor immediately.
["MEIN FUHRER!!! I CAN WALK!!!"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s4VlruVG81w)
This is starting to look like something out of theonion
Zionists run a tighter gig.  
Scroll won't work in FF giving up.&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
And I thought them beavers in Thailand were dangerous...
Boo hoo
biggest pussy award goes to....  NORTH KOREA!!!
1992: Israeli member of parliament Binyamin Netanyahu predicts that Iran was “3 to 5 years” from having a nuclear weapon.  1992: Israeli Foreign Minister Shimon Peres predicts an Iranian nuclear warhead by 1999 to French TV.  1995: The New York Times quotes US and Israeli officials saying that Iran would have the bomb by 2000.  1998: Donald Rumsfeld tells Congress that Iran could have an intercontinental ballistic missile that could hit the US by 2003.   Not to mention all the warmongering. Want to know why America sucks up to Israel so much? Five letters: AIPAC. No politician wants to get on their bad side. 
How exactly does that start mathematically. If you approach infinity, surely you can approach from it...
im with you, i would of kept the money
&gt; valid groups with reasons get slots  So there's a catch after all, who would have thought? 
No shit. I live in Seoul, and by far the worst thing about the last month is watching America collectively shit themselves. I had a friend go last week and she was absolutely stunned by the way this is being blown out of proportion.  I am sick of getting calls from my family, getting questions all over my FB wall, and seeing r/worldnews clogged up by this garbage.  But it's not your fault, it's the fear based American media. I never really understood how bad it was until I moved overseas, and now I refuse to have anything to do with it.  You probably wouldn't understand really unless you lived here, but this type of crap happens all the time. It's been happening for decades.  Some of you will want to tell me that this time was different. It wasn't. It really wasn't. This is the same song and dance that has been happening here for years. The only real difference was that the Norks were so used to SK's apathy that they did realize what a complete freak out the American public was capable of. 
Hard to come up with one liners when dealing with hard cold reality.  A young dictator in an impoverished country that has entrenched itself in a futile war against a vastly overpowered enemy and has resorted to starving its people in order to keep miltary output the only priority.  He has no hope and he knows it.  The likelihood he survives another decade is dismal.  He needs to assert himself to survive each day, but he's posturing with nuclear weapons and the rest of the world will not tolerate it.  It is not a laughing matter, but their desperation can come out as comical out of context, and this is in context, so its not funny at all.
I have a feeling that the US Government really does want a war with NK.
what's circle jerking?
i see nothing that could go wrong with this
He supposedly eliminated one guy by launching a fucking bomb at him.
LOL. That guy is like that Nazi who killed hundreds of Americans in Inglorious Basterds. Complete propaganda BS, made up in the times of dire desperation. Less that 500 Red Army soldiers were shot in that whole little war.
my condolences
I used my time machine to verify the falsehood of this post. The fakenessibility of the Iranian time machine is fake. 
Yea, but then why involve the rest of the world? Why don't they just SAY they won a posturing fight? If it's a media vacuum in Best Korea, why don't they just say they nuked Seattle, and the US capitulated? The people wont know any difference, and any who do, you could intimidate into silence. Why do they have to bother our news feed?
Yeah, I'm all over that.  Hopefully the bullet train is fast enough to outrun a speeding missile... 
You clearly do not understand the buddhism then. Historically buddhist monks went to defend their country in many cases
[deleted]
No, they have nuclear capability.... Just no power
^^^Look ^^^at ^^^his ^^^username
Kim Jong il was at least SMARTER than this motherfucker. He. Doesn't. Learn! 
I swear there is a coordination to keep every stupid DPRK thing up on reddit.  Every stupid threat.
OP drops a bombshell.   This isn't revolutionary news
Well, obviously you need to have nuclear weapons to make nuclear warheads. But as we know that NK has nuclear weapons, I wonder why it is big news that they could strap them to a missile and send them on their way?
[deleted]
"Oh, these people don't think the way i do. We should shot them repeatedly because they offend us !"  srsly ?
Right with you.
Kinda stating the obvious isnt it ? If humanity doesnt want to be extinct it should spread to other planets like a virus does.
"My unseen Longerdong missile will make the whole world fill with envy"
We'll need lube. Lots of lube
[deleted]
I really don't think so. The US, SK and Japan just can't let such a behaviour pass.  It's like someone shoots a bullet at you and just because it didn't hit you, you will attack him because you know he's capable and willing to harm you.
We're (USA) also obligated to help protect Japan per WWII treaties.
Someone explain to me why Japan? the US and even SK would've done the same without a second thought.
You just don't *get* it, man. Back when *we* nuked Japan, it *meant* something. These days, a nuke just doesn't have the same *feeling* it used to, you know?
[deleted]
Id say what happened to your family is about on par with what happened to Palestinians during the creation of Israel.   Neither of which is on par with Bosnia, Darfur, or other Acts of Genocide. But that does not make acts of Ethnic Cleansing any less evil.   And i dont need to read up on it thanks, i actually have a good friend who's family went through it too.   Crimes against one group does not justify or lessen crimes against another.  And that works any way you want to read it. 
[deleted]
Well I think its wrong. She hasn't been relevant for many years, her death changes nothing for those celebrating it. Alls it does is dishonor her and humiliate her familiy who are probably already in grief.
The thing I've found about Europeans is that they don't consider themselves racist.  Yet they will make these comments or 'jokes' that leave me speechless.
So your argument is that if enough people commit a crime they should all be allowed to get away with it? Or that if an investigation looks like it will be difficult, the police should just not even bother? 
Do you have a source for this?? I would love to do a bit of reading.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Canada is better, less crime, nicer people, nicer society.
Yes they do. They've got a very streamlined appeal process also. But many, especially those with connections, earn the sentence I mentioned.
North Korea is basically a gang of chavs. If you defend yourself they show up at your house with knives.
Regardless, they're still gonna need more evidence than that to go to trial.
Interesting; I sincerely respect your lack of hipocracy. So this argument makes it sound like you don't believe in any morality, including factoring in the harms of your actions to other humans who aren't your progeny or the product of your genetic material. I think there is a lot to this semi-nihilistic position, I just think it is hard to legitimately believe in. If you don't believe in morality, how do you not have moral qualms with things like slavery or rape?  It sounds like your way of life is awesome. I would totally eat those chickens, just like I would eat meat that is just going to be thrown away.  For me its about not being part of the economic demand for a product when I have problems with its production.  
I'm thinking it's a trackball-operated forcefield run by three gossipy girls.
You better not shoot down the missile we launch at you or we will be at war! Thats like me telling you im going to punch you in the face, if you punch me back we are going to have a fight.
It's all theatre, dude. His finger isn't anywhere close to the button
Could be china trying to pull Japan into a fight through n. Korea over land disputes. I remember reading an article about crazy anti-Japanese sentiment in China. 
if enough people hated her to make it a number one song it has to be for some reason not just because they are pricks. 
&gt;the communist country lashed out at Tokyo's standing orders to destroy any missile heading toward Japan, threatening such actions will result in a nuclear attack against the island nation.  wait, so if i've understood this properly:  *"when we fire missiles at Japan, any attempt from Japan to defend itself will be interpreted as an act of war"*.  am i missing something ?
If a regime change happens, he should be the one to lead his people. Only because it seems like he's the only one with a decent state of mind.
Fiat.  Like Nazi Germany did.
you mean like GWBUSH 
That's how I read the situation. NK was never going to test these missiles near Japan (they would have already).
&gt;  This is the equivalent to throwing a tantrum  Ok, this is like the tenth comment I've read today that uses this exact expression verbatim.  I wonder which mainstream news outlet chanted it first, prompting all you brainless idiots to adopt that as your own opinion?
Boring troll is boring, and unfunny.
I assume you are asking this rhetorically but this is really the same question... and know ones actually knows.
I hate to break it to you, but look at how that same attitude worked out for the UK; not pretty, to say the least.  I say this as a half-Swede who visits and keep in touch with my Swedish relatives. My father is Danish, and they are having a terrible time with the muslims there, too.  &gt;"We WILL change the muslim view on homosexuals here too, it's a must."  And what will you do if you fail?
There are people who are forced into certain jobs by abusive relationships being being denied the chance to a education and other social activities.  Is the answer to ban jobs?
it IS normal. 
But the senate approved article one about marriage being either between a woman and a man or between two humans of the same sex, without modifying it, so no need for a second vote for this one.
In Sweden same-sex couples can already adopt.... but sadly there is not any countries that allow them to adopt a child from.
I think the song is more a backlash against the current media coverage of Thatchers death. I've found the BBC coverage especially to be lacking objectivity  There is also the issue over her £10M state funeral, which has implications beyond the cost. The PM is not the head of state, that's the Queen, and the fact that state funerals do not take place for ex-PM's. The risk of a state funeral is that the Queen and military are now seen as partisan, which is not a good idea  
Ah the keynesian view that " we can pay people to dig holes and fil them up until the economy is fixed" that is essentially what you are recommending as Greece has plenty of roads going to every corner of the country, but hey government  spending is the manic cure all for all the armchair economists on reddit, never,ind that the government DOESN'T HAVE ANY MONEY To SPEND
Greece actually just posted a ~500 million euro surplus for the first quarter of 2013. This doesn't include the interest on their debt but it is still a good sign considering where they started.
[deleted]
It's spread out enough to where they've run widebody jets (starting with 747s) from Tokyo to cities a little further down the coast of the big island, like Osaka.  One interesting experiment is to pull up Google Earth with Panoramio and look at some of the photos in the very center of the island.  Like [this](http://www.panoramio.com/photo/5482652) one.. you'd think you were in Idaho.
That's a silly oversimplification of the human mind. One "chooses" to be gay the same way somebody chooses to have agoraphobia or chooses to have a speech impediment. It is developed subconsciously over years.      I highly doubt that gay people (at least the overwhelming majority of them) are born homosexual. You turn gay.      This phenomenon is easier to recognize with "bisexual" people, which is an even more obviously developed tendency.
This is exactly why I don't donate to these "charities." They come fully loaded with a hungry bureaucracy and very little of your donation gets to where you intended it to go.
moved already
I myself am Azeri and you are talking total bullshit. Azeris are 100% Turks, not perso-turks. Turkey Turks and Azeri Turks are 100% the same (Both are Oghuz Turks and both speak the same [Turkic language](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Turkic_languages) ). There isn't such a thing like perso-turks. Turks and Persians are 2 entirely different people.  
[deleted]
Well, that's one way to get them to eat their vegetables.
Homo marriage is bad enough, but adopt children? Those poor kids! Repurpose the "underground railway" and rescue them!!! 
"Privilege" refers to the special treatment people get for belonging to certain groups- such as being white, male, able-bodied, etc.- that they are so used to they don't realize it is a special privilege.  For example, job hunting is easier for whites because people are more likely to hire whites than blacks, but this privilege is largely "invisible" to white people.  Men don't have to deal with constant sexual harassment on the same level that women do, so they often don't realize it exists.  "Check your privilege" first emerged as something people would say to someone who is arguing that a particular type of persecution doesn't exist- just a reminder that hey, maybe if you are a man, you don't exactly know what kinds of problems women do and don't face.  It started out as a reasonable thing, however Reddit now makes fun of it because it has been co-opted by hateful groups of angst-ridden teenagers and radfem scumbags on the internet, the kind of people who want all white cis males to die.  :/
Well said.  Not to mention the fact that I'd be willing to bet most of the people buying this are probably barely old enough to remember Thatcher, if at all, and are just joining a pathetic circlejerk because they think mocking someone's death is "gd 4 teh lulz".  Who is suffering here?  Not Thatcher - she's dead.  The only people affected by this are her family, who whatever you think of them are not responsible for her actions when she was alive, and haven't even buried their mother/grandmother yet.  Absolutely pathetic.
Clarification for Redditors, since the original article is the problem.  **North Korea is not communist.**
Ofcourse, fox is a journalistic gag. However the one thing I am confident about is that 'em patriotiots know all about American soil.
&gt; but this should really serve as a wake-up call for why we need legalization. It took me like a week of begging to find someone to buy alcohol in high school but I could get virtually any amount of pot I wanted within an hour. If it's not regulated there's no way to control access.   So you admit you smoked pot in high school, but want to take that away from high school students today.  How about we legalize pot so everybody can smoke it every once and a while?
First, your statement was ambiguous enough to be directly misleading.  You made it sound like "oh, marriage for *everyone* including gays?  Well then why don't I commit incest, because that's equivalent to gay marriage?"  Second, saying "gay marriage" instead of "marriage for everyone" makes it sound like you're doing something special for homosexuals, instead of just *not* marginalizing them any longer.  Third, and unrelated, nobody likes when you complain about downvotes.  That'll just get you more downvotes.  Regret what you said, or the way you said it?  Edit it to change it structurally, not just to add a complaint.  Alternatively, downright delete it.
 &gt; Ok you're acting like I said I talked to every Japanese person in the country at the time.  No, that's exactly what I'm saying you haven't done.  What you did was make a sweeping generalisation about "them" as a whole. Something backed up by a *mere* two weeks in the country. It's not what you said, it's how you said it. As if you're the wise one back from a little known foreign land, who knows all the secrets. After just two weeks.
I imagine that they have great bong etiquette.
BC LOVE FROM TEXAS!!
Sorry that I'm replying a month late, but is there any chance you remember what the comment you replied to said?
Same question as: "why religious logic is so hard to understand". 
Not counting Ricky and Julian, Canada is probably like 8th.  edit: scrolled down to see someone already made a tpb reference. :(
Listen potato head.  You think someone was doing this to save a couple bucks?  Someone used the wrong protocol and it was unintentional.  I can understand your anger but don't think for a second those responsible have slept a single wink since they realized this error.  Not to mention you could never in your goddamn life be half of what those people who made this mistake have become.  It's not fucking office secretary work.
I live in Greeley and you're absolutely right. 
hahahaaa not surprising at all 
You mean the same country that fought alongside the Indians in the French and Indian war?  The same country that was allied with many tribes.  The same nation that many tribes loved, and allowed to be integrated into their tribes.
We must go to war!
WTF did we (Hawaii) do to end up on this nut job's hitlist? Korean nationals are one of the groups of workers that we're brought here many years ago for agricultural work and I don't suppose many of them gave up to go back. I know that there's very little reality in the claims NK has made about the capabilities of these weapons, but I'm not happy at the idea that they would even want to target us :(
I laughed at that, I couldn't help it.  The level of stupidity was just too much.
In fairness, N Korea is doing a lil more in terms of actively taking a role in bringing attention to themselves..
because they threatened to nuke a bunch of people and resume the Korean war?
They're probably aiming to just bury the American gate before joining joint operations using the Russian gate.
The real crime here is the video is only available in 240p.  Those monsters.
As a canadian who just recently graduated high school, (no pun intended) this does not surprise me in the least.
One of the strongest  in the world.
This is sort of funny, but don't read too much into it. North Korea media is not North Korea intelligence.   It would be like saying the Americans [don't know where Nevada is](http://mediamatters.org/blog/2011/12/13/foxs-graphics-department-fails-mislabeling-stat/185288).
Yawn. Another threat, what a big surprise.
To be fair, the baby is not Aussie until it's born, no?
I don't personally do drugs, but yeah it's possible. 
are there illegal citizens? 
This is opinion. Is there an r/worldopinion page or does r/worldnews take that banner?
So far it's only killing children and old people.   While bad, it's not "code brown" time yet.   When it starts killing healthy young men and women in their 20's, who have no underlying conditions, is when you should start to panic.  
If I may disagree, I think there's a difference between talking shit about Thatcher on a web forum, and showing up to a funeral to shit on someone.   You're allowed to talk trash about someone after they die, but a funeral is not for you, it's for the grieving.   I think it's similar to an athiest showing up to Sunday mass to yell at everyone that god doesn't exist. If you don't believe in god, don't go to church, don't show up just to be a jerk to the people who do.   People who show up protesting at funerals are just hurting the grieving family, and are crashing an even not meant for them in order to taint it in the worst way possible.   
Looks like it's been removed already.  Another win for child Molesters. 
Exactly.   * The government used to sponsor blatantly distorted and racist propaganda comic strips in newspapers before television.  * Then television came around and we all know how distorted that is, hint: Fox News  * Now we have the internet and, call me paranoid, but I am sure the US army's social media propaganda machine has had a hand in creating many of these Kim-Jong Un memes from the start  All I am saying is that the average asshole on the internet wouldn't know if it was true anyway because funny.
Depends where in Canada you are.  Here in Alberta I have had to do multiple piss tests, have been arrested for less than a 1/4 oz. (resulting in a court appearance and a couple hundred dollar fine), and the cops shut down the local 4/20 rally every year.  The last few years there has been more cops at the rally than smokers.
The current situation in Libya is not connected to denuclearization. They disarmed the nuke program because we fucked up Iraq when we even _suspected_ they had nukes and Libya didn't want to be next. 
Yes, but you're implying that a natural death at an old age is some sort of triumph for the justice you seek
"but carrying yourself with dignity and treating others with such" thats the point, she destroyed the dignity of whole communities,left children in poverty and her legacy still blights millions.She deserves nothing more than the truth to be told about her, not the BBCs rose coloured glasses view of the dictatorial hag.
economic incentives  
Peru obviously has no idea what GMOs or Monsanto do.
[GMO opponents are the climate skeptics of the left](http://www.slate.com/articles/health_and_science/science/2012/09/are_gmo_foods_safe_opponents_are_skewing_the_science_to_scare_people_.html)
Someone get this asshole a ". . . for idiots" book. 
&gt;This research was undertaken at the University of Reading with the support of Monsanto Plc.  I'm not sayin' anything, I'm just sayin'.
You had a comment outside the GMO stream.
Yeah according to a page that "has issues" the CIA is actually the AP
So heirloom tomatoes are GMO?  I grow varieties that have been around since before we knew DNA existed.  How is that GMO?
But that's un-American.  Here in the land of the free, ANYONE* has a chance to become a millionaire.   *Anyone^Born^to^Rich^White^Parents
The articles mentions "giant white corn"... Although in Peru we vall it simply call it "corn" (or Choclo), I'm pretty sure the article refers to [this corn on the left in the picture.] (http://i.imgur.com/ctMWx.jpg) The one on the right is regular U.S. sweet corn. 
[deleted]
This article is over three years old - nothing like recycling old news for an agenda.  What happened pause of the last decade?    
Noo don't bend over for the U.S. again!
Look at your username.  If that is any indication of your personality and ability to be objective then I might as well just refer you on to yourself because you're only going to warm up inside an echo chamber.
It is ok. I'm never going to go to Israel. You don't need to create dumb laws to keep me out.
You're not only well off the mark but in dire need of a history lesson. Kindly do the world a favor and go make yourself a bleach margarita.
Oh no...
&gt; Lol are you suggesting that I believe in propaganda because I can forsee CEOs changing their businesses  Yes. 
See, those scientology invisible alien spirit things are real. 
In death Reagan is every bit as cognizant as he was when he was President.
Damn it, I just made [this GIF](http://i.imgur.com/itR49g3.gif)  If he gets assassinated i'll never have a chance to use it :'(
[deleted]
Mortality rate is something to be worried about, but then again the very same thing also works to prevent wide spread infection. But there is no reliable mortality rate yet for H7N9 to speak of so..
I can't believe people are scared of GMOs, but still buy organic bullshit. It's horrific, and people wonder why food costs are so high. It's the future, it's the same thing we've been doing, but more efficient. 
Sex in a jar.
&gt;most executives are paid that much for a reason...they're fucking smart and damn hard workers.  [citation needed]
I'll use contrasting negative polarized lighting.
Ever heard about google?
Your comment abounds with ignorance.  So I take it you support nuclear war, eugenics, testing on orphaned children. LOL..  no one is bashing science.  People are just skeptical about one of its products.  Just because someone doesn't want to eat something that may be potentially dangerous doesn't mean they're against science.  You're basing your beliefs on faith, which is as inane as any faith-based belief system.
About time! As an Irish citizen I'm glad that we are showing ourselves and the rest of the world that we are capable of moving forward and being good human beings. This good news is definitely needed after the tragedy of Savita Hallappanavar's death.
13 people dead compared to 25,000 every year is not worth the attention its getting. If you want to be all uppity and talk about life threatening diseases, you guys should be focusing on influenza or any number of other diseases. Not a disease that's being aggressively controlled and quarantined and has killed less people in 2 weeks than influenza kills in half a day.
I will celebrate your indecisiveness with Tranya.  
Ah yes, propagate stereotypes about the US. That will help. The problem is that people who only care about short term goals influence their politicians to do the same. They push for objectives that make the people happy so they can be re-elected and ignore the longer term goals of expanding human knowledge and even the future of the human race itself. We can get back into space, so long as we push for those advances that will help in the long-run. Not just the short term ones.
The simple answer to this is neither of those can consent.
Interesting, I never knew about these. Are these not all letters from Paul though, and thus the opinion of one man (quite possibly based in the old-testament based Jewish law of the time), not necessarily from Jesus/God? Granted, my understanding is that Paul's influence largely developed modern Christianity, as he was the one that actively endeavored to spread the movement beyond the immediacy of the small group that existed for the first 30 or so years after Jesus' death, so it makes sense that it became an ingrained aspect of the faith for many in that regard. But nonetheless, anyone who takes that and extends it to say "God forbids it" is on somewhat shaky ground. If someone says "my religion teaches against it", I would be inclined to be much more understanding. 
It's not a shame that she made your beloved USSR go kaput! 
Not only is it spelled correctly, your comment is grammatically incorrect in that it fails to use the subjunctive.
It just sounds like a fancy excuse for apathy to me.  So if I say I hate black people you don't care because its not gonna make a big difference to you?  Its still short-sighted and selfish, and the sort of thinking that allows socially regressive policies like racism to continue on in society.
One day I will be as brave as you.
Damn 3D printers making those bankers get high all the time!
Or verse-versa! 
This is probably the most mind-numbingly stupid thing to get mad about.  Is Justin Bieber of all people supposed to be a philosopher or something?  No shit his worldview is a little distorted.   This is /r/worldnews not the fucking tabloids.
How would stripping yourself completely defenseless do anything to deter NK from attacking as soon as the last defense is sent back to the mainland?  If anything, NK's temptation for preemptive strikes would only strengthen.
An object orbiting the moon is in an unstable orbit due to the Moon's "lumpy" gravity so this captured asteroid would require the installation of some kind of propulsion system. I suspect the destination orbit would actually be a LaGrange point, which would require less maintenance delta V than a pure lunar orbit.
why is this in world news? If he was mobbed or shot or had another form of serious harm done to him because he wrote that, then I'd accept it.  All i wanna do is read about silliness like North Korea.  why does actual silliness like justin bieber have to infiltrate every corner of my beloved internet?
And achieved what? Not getting completely exterminated and wiped out?
I don't get it. I mean, how hated she was as PM, she should be given the same respect we grant other dead persons. Dancing on her grave or giving her burial to the cheapest bidder just seems disrespectful. I wouldn't dance on Hitler's grave although he'd definitely deserve it.
The world isn't running it. Everyone just let China take over the market because of their cheap labor and willingness to endure environmental destruction.  They have recently begun restricting exports which has caused this scare of them running out. 
The idea is great, considering how many people grow up without a solid understanding of the systems that govern much of day to day life.   The problem is in the execution. 
**There was no Anne Frank and if there had been, the Zionists who took out the rest of the non Z Jews would have gassed her too!**  &gt;The J's are fond of telling sob stories about how the wicked Nazi's led by wicked Adolph Hitler, did a job on the Jews, except [AH and the Nazi's were Jews](http://www.ynetnews.com/articles/0,7340,L-3347309,00.html), who perped the Holocaust then went on to establish the illegal modern state of Israel.  &gt;It was a Zionist plot to kill those Jews true to the Divine Covenant, by which Allah assures Jews the Messiah will appear, whose purpose will be to restore the fortunes of the Jewish people, and to establish the nation state of Israel, and exhorts them to patience until that time comes.  &gt;[Katherine Schweitzer](https://www.google.com.au/search?q=Katherine+Schweitzer+&amp;ie=utf-8&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;aq=t&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a) was a Hungarian Jew, the only survivor of a family of fourteen to survive the Holocaust, last seen alive in Sydney Australia December 22, 2006.   &gt;She went public in the nineties on the television show Australian 60 Minutes, saying the Jew who arrested her and her family in 1944, had taken up residence on the same street in Sydney.  &gt;November 30, 2006 an account of her arrest and internment in Auschwitz, went onto a union email to around five thousand e addresses world wide, December 28, 2006, her body was found in a wheelie bin inside her high security apartment!  &gt;[According to Alex Jones,](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FAWf4d4hVtw) George Soros then in his teen years, "cataloged" the possessions of Jews deported from Budapest at that time .. we say he was "hands on" in her case, that he had her killed to avoid the truth coming out. [The Holocaust: Inside job say Schweitzer and Kaplan!](http://www.dockersunion.net/vb/showthread.php?80-The-Holocaust-Inside-job-say-Schweitzer-and-Kaplan!)
Hard to anthropomorphize the electorate or even the parliament.  Too many faces.  Thatcher's just one person though, and she is the personification of everything she stood for.  Why *wouldn't* she be the lightning rod for that sort of feeling?
&gt;She obviously did good things to the country as she wouldn't have been re-elected twice.  It's touching that you think this. Never change.
I did a lot of research on the accusation of priestly involvement on the fascist side and found it to be fabricated. In fact, the left's slaughtering of nuns and priests was far more commonplace. 
yea, I try to limit my knowledge to those with degrees in the field in which I inquire. not that I don't like to hear other peoples opinions, I just don't like hearing racist remarks as why the plan will fail.
Fucking stop already. Everyday for the last week "blah blah fuck Thatcher blah blah socialism", you're circlejerk is fucking annoying. I dont even want to come on to reddit when Brits are awake now because this circlejerk just continues of how bad this politician is. Really? A politician is bad? YOU DONT SAY!!!!!!
Cremations also have funerals//sorrow day? most of the time..
...or by predatory lending practices
The founders of anarchist theory were left wing.
i'm not saying it's aliens.  But it's aliens.
Wouldn't it have the advantage of having less countermeasures used against it though, for example much harder to shoot down/destroy before it made contact?
As an American of Irish descent, I would be happier if the IRA would have acted more honorably, less like thugs.   For instance, Lord Mountbatten.
...and then her supporters throw money at it to say "see, she was right all along".
The same could be said of Richard Dawkins, his degree is in zoology and is frequently being pulled up for his obvious lack of knowledge in many scientific areas.  However, it doesn't stop his views on theology (of which he has zero training) being quite mainstream.  Global warming has split the scientific community with a growing number of scientists claiming it is untrue.  Climate change is just a cop out, because we do not live on a stable planet, so of course the climate changes.  In recorded history London had a much nicer climate with vineyards growing quite happily.  The Global war mists have used some blatant bad science to convince the public that the ice caps are melting, one of the most blatant is sending film crews to the historic North Pole and saying "look at how little ice there is", of course the ice melting there because the poles shift.  Go and watch Top Gear at the North Pole, where they went to the real, magnetic North Pole and guess what?  Ice everywhere!
what happens to the girl after she gets divorce from this contract marriage? 
[link](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MDTBiEOoslc)
[deleted]
[deleted]
You know what's fascist? to send armed motorcycle groups to the voting centers to cause mayhem. Something that happened quite frequently in these elections.
isn't the pajarito thing like an expression to say "somebody told me but I ain't saying who"? 
[deleted]
then you're an ugly american... meaning you have no understanding and have been intellectually lazy to assume that everyone dislikes her.
I got 2 pop-ups for opening this link.  I don't like how reddit makes links an extension of their site meaning that by disabling ad block on their site I am open to any bs ads that others hold.  is there anyway to just go directly to a link?
Don't forget the Carter Foundation Lawyers were very clear that any money received by the foundation from Venezuela had nothing to do with the elections.
yay another round of blaming anti-racist policy as a way to avoid putting blame on the banks(and deregulation).
Didn't you hear? The moon is really just a [holographic projection...](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WKLVMEMzMbo)
&gt; He also moved Labour from the working mans party to the unemployed party.   Yeah, he ended the longest suicide note in history and managed to make Labour electable again after the Winter of Discontent in the 1970s made them a pariah party.  Without him there would still have been a Tory government in power in 2000.  Fuck that guy!
and Iran.  
Absolutely! These people are tarnishing his good name! I face the same sort of professional difficulties. With my degree in Commerce and my professional Accounting Designation, I find I am discounted immediately when I give out advice on hair styling, on the legal intricacies of Uganda, and so on! It's an outrage!  Then again, it could be, just maybe, that my "expertise" is in accounting and audit and that, should an actual expert that, you know, **STUDIED** in these fields disagree with me, it could be that I am, just maybe, kind of, sort of, .... **WRONG**. But never let the truth or reality get in the way of Monckton, right?
Zombie Thatcher.
I'm pretty sure this isn't *World News*...
Source? There's is an idiom in Latin American culture that has to do with birds telling you things. For example, i don't think grapevines are a berry effective method of communication
So..in other words..Chavez was a dictator who actually cared?
Unaccepted in any society? Funny how I've fit in with the Muslims in the middle east, the Christians in the west, the mixing pot of eastern religions in the far east, and generally never felt like I don't fit in.  You know why I fit in well as an atheist? Because I don't care what you all believe. I treat everybody like equals, like people. You want to pray? Pray. You wanna take a walk to the nearest mosque with me? Make sure it's enjoyable and I'll come. You wanna sing weird religious music with me? Only if it sounds good.  Atheists, as long as they aren't irrationally hated or irrationally hateful, fit in anywhere. A lot of religious people enjoy my company because they speak openly and freely without worry of religious persecution.
[deleted]
 "I have never been charged with any crime. I have never received a trial."  Still better than being shot dead right in the field where you were captured. 
Screw the people to make money? Sounds like a few first world countries.
[Pretty much](http://pinstripebindi.files.wordpress.com/2008/07/youre-a-douchebag.jpg)
You knew it had to happen eventually. As a financial tool, it only has as much value as the market places on it. It isn't even that rare. The problem is that people still treat it the same way they did 1,000 years ago, before there were easily accessable global currencies and other resources to put your money into.  It's amazing how few people can actually spot a bubble when it's right in front of their face.
Fucking remember this when you line up to ensure only the government has guns. You think because your passport is blue they will magically think you different?
justin trudeau is a fucking moron. 
I upvoted because the people who downvoted you are just fools who refuse to see the reality of the world they live in. They have no idea what it's like to wake up one day and suddenly find out that your currency dropped from buying US$6 to US$0.06 overnight.
I think [1001001 was saying](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1cdwc6/price_of_gold_collapsesinvestors_panic/c9fmdhu) that the drop being the result of Cyprus is bullshit, not that the idea prices are dropping is bullshit. Maybe I'm giving him too much credit, but I'd liken the latter argument to something like "water is NOT wet".  Prices started dropping before the Cyprus news, and the volume of gold subject to sale as a result of Cyprus isn't substantial enough to cause this kind of swing. On the other hand, though, the speculation is that Cyprus having to sell of their gold reserves will have a side effect of other troubled Eurozone nations being forced to do the same. In short, it's panic driven, with a little bit of real world events lighting the fuse.   At the end of the day, I don't think enough attention is being paid to the people that have been saying for years now that gold was in a bubble. Gold (and other precious metal) prices were inflated by many measures, and only going up as average Joe's dumped money into them in preparation of the fall of nations. Like any bubble, it hurts when it goes ***POP***.
Sweet !
You can't, especially when they have you in their arms, because they're made of metal. And robots are strong. [Sign up for Old Glory Life Insurance today!](http://www.nbc.com/saturday-night-live/video/old-glory-insurance/n10766/)
No worries dude :)
How this shocks anyway is beyond me. Gold tanks when equities rise. Every US index is hitting a new all time high, why would hold *not* fall?
So sad. If and when I seal the deal I hope my SO is cool w factory made gems. At least then we can be relatively sure no one died to make it. 
Spoken like a true grow-up. I salute you.
Integrity is an awesome character trait. I only wish it were more common.
How nice of him.
Political Islam is worse than neo-Nazi ideology, sir. And in no way I insinuated that you support political Islam. I was just making a remark about how political Islam is dangerous.   The quran indeed does not specify what women have to wear. But it is well established in Islamic Sharia what woman have to wear and *why*. Again I ask you to research why women are required to cover themselves as opposed to men. And no it doesn't have to do with religious pride.  I can't say anything positive about fascist, sexist and xenophobic ideologies. And it doesn't have to do with emotions. Also I do not claim to be an expert of Islam or know the *true* interpretation of it. I merely realize the danger of many interpretations of it. 
Do you even read the news?  China is voting against them in the UN and recently issued a joint communique with the US supporting denuclearization of the Korean Peninsula.  They are not NK's friend, they're just stuck with a crazy refugee situation on their border and want to contain it.
Cono de la madre.
Jews.
The part Reagan played in the end of the Cold War was prolonging it. Reagan's hard-line anti-Communist policies and heavy military buildup did ultimately lead to the USSR recognizing a financial inability to "keep up," but those same policies also fueled the USSR's political hardliners who insisted they still had to try in order to protect themselves from the US. If not for Reagan, the Cold War might have ended a decade earlier.
http://boston.cbslocal.com/live-video/
I would think that as the price of gold rises the willingness to use expensive extraction methods increase as well.
I get a feeling this is terrorism, but not international terrorism. Just a lone nutcase with an agenda.
[deleted]
Obligatory warning to take all early reports (casualty figures, suspects, motivations, etc...) with a big grain of salt.
I really hope that all of those innocent people are going to be ok...
[deleted]
Sounds like you agree with my statement that it's hypocritical to suggest neo-liberalism has led to human rights abuses while defending those with significant ideological and material ties to these same abuses? Great. 
Lets inflate the asset bubble, get a bunch of redditors to invest in it because its popular and trendy, and then sell! Sound familiar? 
According to RES most comments are the same links, lots of spam here. Id like to ask what caused the explosion? 
[deleted]
This is VERY close to the london marathon too. I hope everone survives and this doesnt set a president for the future. It would be very hard to control thousands of people along a 26 mile route...
We don't even know if it was a person who did the bombing. Perhaps a gas main blew up the building.
At the finish line of a major event? I don't think so.
[deleted]
Five minutes -450 points. New record?
o god that 4th picture i see some guy with his legs dismembered holy shit.
Boston PD reporting 3 dead so far.  Got this from Twitter. Don't know the validity.
The finish line of an international event where there is a live camera feed and dozens of photographers seems like a good spot to make a point.  Sadly, ease of access, moderately low security and high media visibility made this a suitable target.
Hello Pacificdreams I worked for the U.S. NAVY I was a http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hospital_Corpsman. We lost 2 Men that were fathers and several others got injured in Haiti. It was a humanitarian Mission in 1999. The remains of two servicemen killed Friday in a truck crash in Haiti were being flown home to Jacksonville Naval Air Station. Petty Officers 3rd Class Harleigh F. Lestrick and Richard S. Bryant, both hospital corpsmen at Jacksonville Naval Hospital, died when the truck they were riding in overturned. http://jacksonville.com/tu-online/stories/060699/met_2b1truck.html  Lestrick was on my Flag Football team. I'll always remember him. On a very cold morning he saw me walking. Lestrick stopped and gave me a lift to the hospital. Man that heater in the car felt awesome. Bryant everybody called him Scott was a good man always smiling. I was safe and sound in Jacksonville when these group of people went to Haiti. To help people in need they got rocks thrown at them. One of my other friends got hit in the mouth and chipped his tooth. The saddest thing was after the accident people ran up to my buddies and tried to strip them of anything they had on them. I asked my mom How? Why? She told me these people don't have nothing. That's when cold hard reality of the World hit me. How bad it can be hasn't even happen yet. I live in a Little Havana, Miami the First 48 has filmed homicide episodes here way to much. On my birthday last summer two guy attempted to rob me using OC spray and a beer bottle. I was able to fight them off make enough noise and scare them off. My moms told me there been a lot of stabbings. She has a buck knife about 3 inches. This weekend I decide to carry it's a good thing I did. A different pair of muggers tried the same thing I had the buck knife open it up when the guy behind me warned his partner in crime that was attempting to rob me to stop because I had a knife. That buck knife saved me from bodily harm injury maybe even death. It's crazy how a 2 on 1 with the element of surprise can be stopped if you're prepared and not a soft target. I heard the fear in the voice of the attacker he was just as sacred as I was. That's the only time I've ever pulled a knife. It's sad I have to be armed to leave my house and walk the streets in America I'll be going to the V.A. to talk to a counselor about this  The first time this happen the responding Cop told me I should have shot the 2 muggers from the 1st incident because they stabbed a guy and put him in the hospital. I rather not have a gun in the home because I've battle depression and mood swings where I get really sad about being abused when little kid. But I know I'm going to need one next time. I called the Cops and reported both incidents. My cousin told me to move before I get killed. "Get the fuck out of there!" This is where these criminals go when caught and convicted  They get out they're more violent ,raped, extorted, abused and PTSD then released to society. Out dated over crowded jail that's = to the worst prison.  Louis Theroux - Miami MegaJail Part 1 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TZVqbAUMM9A&amp;feature=player_detailpage  Louis Theroux - Miami MegaJail Part 2 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Hq3P_00Cdko&amp;feature=player_detailpage
When it happens on the day of the Boston Marathon, the odds are spectacular.  Realistically, the odds are no different than any other day. 
good question
But there are runners from all around the world involved, and this could easily be a terrorist attack
Unfortunately 
[deleted]
Jeez, you're sarcastic.
They just made a call for all off-duty officers to respond to their station right now.  Medics via live broadcast.
[deleted]
KTLA channel 5 has said that recently there was a third explosion. Unknown whether it was controlled or not 
[deleted]
Saving is not hoarding though. Saving is good, but hoarding means the product in this case gold or money is not returned in to the economy as a reasonable rate. A good example of hoarding is the recent Bitcoin crash. It was being mined, people weren't spending it that much, most often hoarding it waiting for the price to rise. Then suddenly something happened in the market, in the case of bitcoins the ASIC machines, and the selling starts. That selling triggers panic selling by other people and the price of bitcoins crashed.   Same thing for gold. A lot of countries have gold reserve, someone like Cyprus now has to sell a large % of their reserves and people start panic selling before Cyprus sells. This tanks the gold price because suddenly the market is flooded with gold and not enough buyers.
Bomb have not been confirmed yet. Don't jump to conclusions. 
Although the mods are being absent minded, lets discuss the topic at hand. I had heard that the count of wounded is going to skyrocket and that the whole road is absolutely covered in blood. Why would anyone attack the marathon though?
[deleted]
if it is rag tag it is actual terrorists, its the extremely proficient attacks that should scare you. Those are false flags like 9/11
(via CNN) Boston police: 2 dead, 22 injured in explosions near Boston Marathon finish line.
Tax Day and Boston this is a little strange. This may be domestic.
Borderline crass, but Ill be optimistic and take it as grim humor.
[deleted]
Very Interesting.  Can any Redditor debunk this?
Yeah - basic investing isn't particularly shady and it's very easy to show that it's beneficial for the economy as a whole.  Derivatives are where things get decidedly more murky. Incidentally, also where a lot of investment money is currently being made.
Damn.
Now i know where Kim Jong un is
&gt;The likelihood of a gas explosion is independent of the presence of a large group of people.  Exactly, so possibility of gas exploding (A) in the presence of a large group of people (B) is P(A) * P(B). And P(A) * P(B) &lt; P(A) because 0 &lt; P(B) &lt; 1, and if you assume that presence of large group of people isn't that common occurrence you have P(B) as a "very" small number and thus you can say that gas exploding in a large group of people is much more unlikely (P(A)*P(B)) then just gas exploding (P(A)).
[deleted]
Fucking NY Post needs to learn when to quit with their sensationalist bullshit.  Now is not the time to exaggerate.  
Fits with homemade kind of work.
Oops, I forgot to actually answer your question!   Strangely enough, this thread has actually made me **very** happy.   I love that although the comments were harsh, my original post which I changed to "Don't try to teach Americans anything on Reddit"  Got upvoted.  That to me is a great great thing. =)   Have a nice day troll!  I appreciate your effort.. works better on stupid people your strategy though ( I use it myself from time to time ;)  ).   I can't fault you for thinking im dumb-  my conduct indicated that. 
what im saying is if i die, they won't die from needing a man to drive them. 
Then it's still Keynesian economics, but it's also economics generally.  I see your point though. All of my knowledge of economics is based on the Keynesian model so I have no way of knowing what specifically is Keynesian and what is general theory.  Thanks for clearing that up.
[deleted]
Seconded.
It's been two and a half hours...
No, it's still a privilege.  The Athenian democracy had its limitations, but nobody went around saying, "You know, Demetrios, I just don't think you're cut out to be a citizen.  You're not *my kind of guy*."
As a European, if I ever become a mod of this sub, I'm going to delete all European stories. 
[deleted]
Fiat currency is also the only way that the money supply can, in theory, be controlled rationally based on economic conditions as opposed to being dictated by conditions in gold mines. Miners run into trouble one year? Money supply contraction! New gold vein discovered? Sudden massive burst of inflation! And the money supply doesn't expand to keep up with economic and population growth, leading to deflation and currency shortages. Great for creditors and banks, terrible for debtors and wage earners.   It says a lot about how rabidly people hate the Fed that they are able to convince themselves that the gold standard would be more rational than the status quo.
any second now...
It's not just an internationally recognized marathon, it's THE marathon. If there's one race where the world's best show up, it's Boston.
A slough of well-visited and approved threads regarding the Boston Marathon explosions have been deleted by the /r/Worldnews mods.  The response to these moves has made it clear that this news story is of international interest, and belongs in this subreddit.  In light of this situation, it seems clear that one of three things needs to happen: 1). New Moderation:  the current moderation team has, despite clear ad consistent popular protest, shown grossly poor judgement in enforcing the spirit of this subreddit.  Thus they must be replaced. 2).  Change the Rules:  If the current moderation team is to continue in their current capacity (enforcing only the letter of the law), then the rules must be modified.  While it is clear that most US news stories are irrelevant on the international stage, a blanket ban on US stories is detrimental.  The rules should be changed to reflect that all articles of worldwide interest and relevance are welcome. 3). Change the Default Subreddits:  If /r/Worldnews is determined to ban relevant US news stories, it should no longer be a default subreddit.  In this case it should be replaced by a catch-all subreddit such as /r/News.  Edit: I apologize for the traffic post - Worldnews does not allow self posts.
Oh the cocksucker responsible is gonna get it good. I hope the hospital can keep him alive. 
[deleted]
You should be a comedian. 
I'm not an expert, but I'm pretty sure Scandinavian countries are pretty secular...
That poor old guy who got knocked down by the blast.  I wanted to run out there and carry him out.
My comparison is in the sense that both people in both places want change. I did not compare them in terms of severity or hardship. I think Syrians are facing the worst regime that exists at the moment and our hearts and souls are with them. If you live in Saudi, you know how much Saudis appreciate the situation in Syria.   
[deleted]
It's an American v. British English thing. In the U.S., "government" refers to the whole state, while in Britain, it generally refers to only the ruling coalition of parliament.
no one said that
uh oh. This isnt good
holy shit the guy that lost his legs just breaks my heart, best regards to anyone affected from this tragedy
I did.
No one is denying the bombings in Iraq are terrorist acts.  Stop being sensationalist.
Yea but your defense of this woman doesn't make any sense, considering the circumstances. Use your head. 
Or any of the defaults honestly...though some are alright.  
Don't worry. I got your sarcasm.
And what the fuck are you?      I'm sure some asshole can dig up dirt on your people, too.
Exactly. I came for news because I haven't heard back from a few friends only to find it had all been deleted... again.
why do you think so... pretty coincidental don't you think?
I feel stupid thinking this....but anyone think there's ANY correlation with what happened here at home?
/r/redditrebirth is aimed at identifying and removing mods who abuse their power. It's really, really small right now, since its brand new in response to the worldnews scandal, and I think it needs more attention. Check it out if you're interested.
Wait, face famine?  China has $3.3 trillion dollars in foreign exchange reserves, she can buy the entire world's official gold bullion supply twice (2x) over, I highly doubt she will be starving anytime soon with that amount of financial firepower.  Can you imagine how much food that can buy?
there's a turban behind this somewhere, mark my words.
It's possible he might, but I imagine it will likely not come back as well as it was. His ear drum was most likely blown out. Sometimes ears will take days or weeks to heal; sometimes years; and sometimes healing never happens. If he gets an infection, which affects nerves in the ear, it might also cause hearing loss.  My mom is deaf in one ear due to nerve damage from a virus; as long as he can hear from one ear, it takes some adjusting, but he'll appear pretty normal. Even I sometimes forget she can't hear from one ear, and I'm her son.  My thoughts go out to your uncle and your family, negsteri. You guys will be okay.
And again, they've never heard of the expression "put up or shut up"!
Im going to save your post. Just to see and wait what happens.
It's a little facetious to compare the two.
Those people are responsible for the bullshit happening in their country : they chose Islam. No sympathy for them.
Americans setting off a bomb on U.S. soil *at an international sporting event with thousands of foreigners present* **is** world news. That's why it's on the frontpages of thousands of newspapers today, across the bloody world. 
That's some amazing footage, right there. Right place, right time, to both catch the shot and not get pureed.  Makes me wish google glass was common so we'd have more perspectives on the event and what happened, instead of just this traditional camera shot.  I wonder how different the world would be if we had footage like this of stuff like the Lincoln assassination or pearl harbor or such - on the ground, right in the thick of it.
Again, what are you actually governing?  What are you able to get done?  And "forcing...out of jurisdiction". How do you force those in it?
I agree with you. An established terrorist group would have claimed it by now. IMO it is either a new group or a deranged individual.   The bombs weren't in cars and they weren't left overnight. Somebody walked down that street and left the two backpacks/bags/whatever that exploded. Carrying two backpacks isn't that suspicious so an individual could have been responsible. Where the single person theory becomes less convincing is the other unexploded bombs. They were some distance away so an individual would be more exposed as he/she walked around with the backpacks full of explosives, past sniffer dogs etc. But maybe the person took one bag at a time from their vehicle. I'm just thinking aloud so my speculation could be totally wrong.  But for such high profile bombings to go unclaimed is unprecedented as far as I'm aware. Even when Osama was in hiding he was releasing mission statements, proclamations and videos. He wasn't fighting an anonymous battle. He wanted the USA to know. That's the whole point.  
You can auto rotate to the ground without engine power as long as you aren't in a v22
Dude 
So it's alright to call Jews leeches now?!  Don't want to admit that the entire Israeli subsidy is to fund US based ammunition? Don't have the intellect to do a little research to find out the truth?  'They' is demeaning, and it pisses me off to no end that I live far away from Israel but dumb shits keep lumping us together.   For fucks sake. It's people like you that make me avoid my Jewish heritage altogether.
I was actually looking for the reason for such slow and odd tremors. Thanks for helping me make sense of it all. 
/r/askscience  
I have no idea about this, but could the units of the Richter scale be in Moments and you're both talking about the same thing?
Allah, for the most part, in this case. But yes. Give them a break...  
Wrong, but if you don't understand that I won't even bother wasting time on you
Awww gee thanks mister time travelerist.
Now kiss.
it's not a competition
&gt;Why hasn't the media talked AT ALL about the Sandy Hook theme to the marathon, and the victims' relatives being right by the explosions?  What are you talking about?  If anything I keep on reading about it and wonder why they are reporting such a nonsensical story.  What does it matter and how does that tie into your false flag theory?  You people are fucking looney tunes man.
A lot of people here have already said how sorry they are... 
&gt; If an ideology contains bigotry, you should fight against that bigotry.  But would you still ferevently be claiming the ideology containts a lot of good, and that we aught not to attack its supports?  Because I'll say outright, fuck Nazis. I don't tolerate their ideology.  &gt; However, it seems more natural to compare Islamophobes to Nazis, since they share more of an ideological basis.   Uh. No. Islam"ophoes", first of all, is a wrong term. We're not afraid of Islam.  I am anti-Islam. I believe Islam is poison to the world. I am not anti-freedom of religion, or a far right-winger (Pretty far right, but not autocratic right) nor am I an autocrat. I oppose Islam **exactly** because *Islam* is a far-right, autocratic theology/ideology.  We are **not** saying "All Muslims are bad people". That would be ridiculous.  We are, however, saying that **Islam** as a religion and ideology is bad, that following it makes you a worse person, and that it does not contribute to humanity, but rather, take away from it.  That, too, goes for Judaism - Which is basically the same as Islam, really.  &gt; Many of the Nazis were complicit in straightforward genocide, which is a whole other level from Islamophobes or Muslims.   You realize Islam as an ideology is almost certainly responsible for more death and genocide than the nazis every were, right?
I think both her fans and enemies would disagree when you say she didn't stand on her principles. That is the whole reason she was disliked so much. She didn't want to compromise. 
How is that angry at all?
/r/news 
Holy shit this is not a good week for the world.
&gt; McKellen then admits to being at a dinner with Mubarak. Way to pick your morals Sir Ian.  It's funny, I'd never heard about any problems with Egyptian democracy until a year or two ago, when it all kicked off in Tahrir Square.  How old are you? You're *way* more informed than me (and, apparently, Sir Ian). 
reparations are useless. it just goes to the pockets of the corrupt directly or indirectly  direct investment in the people, like this, is what works:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Microcredit  and don't get me started on sex tourism. i am in favor of imprisoning disgusting men from the usa when they step off the airplane onto us soil  
Are you comparing two people being killed to 70 people being shot? Loss of life is loss of life and i really wasn't trying to be disrespectful, i was just voicing what i felt at the time. I wasn't saying Boston is meaningless, it was simply a commentary.
I have a lot of people on my FB feed saying that they don't care about THOSE people and the news needs to get back to the Boston marathon bombing :(    
accurate description of /r/politics
All I've got to say about Thatcher is A.M.F.
[deleted]
Jesus that really is incredible... Reminds me of the story by Isaac Asimov "The Last Question"  in which humans learn to harness the power of the stars and begins to expand exponentially. Here's a link: http://filer.case.edu/dts8/thelastq.htm
Wow, you're a cunt.
[deleted]
I agree completely, teacher's personal lives (with the exception of certain criminal activity) should be completely separate from the learning process.  I don't see why you had to get upset about "activist teachers" going against sexuality being treated equally in the school instead of discriminating against one group like Section 28 does.   Also, you should probably not consider "activist" to be a bad term. It means people are getting involved in their community, which in itself is not negative.
I agree that they shouldn't just release the name of the moderator's. The hate of the community is too strong to do that. 
Or, you know, it's just a way of saying, "Hey, I'm hoping for you.  I'm even going as far to call upon *the highest fucking power I believe in* to do that."
Yeah, if they rip somebody else off they have to go to terrorist court for copyright infringement and have trial by suicide bombing.    Whoever leaves the prettiest abstract splotch of blood and guts wins.  The terrorist art community is all about abstract.
Friday: I'm in love
Maybe...we should take another look.
[deleted]
&gt;Please visit /r/news for updates on the Boston Marathon Bombings: Also see these live update threads at /r/news and /r/worldnews.  I don't think double standards quite have the same influence anymore...
They wouldn't have back then either. The whole point of claiming responsibility is to show strength and resolve and instill fear. If they claimed responsibility and then we found out it was some guy in his basement, well they'd look silly not scary. 
So basically, your liberty is not at stake and no one else's is worth defending. How very patriotic. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Contains the initials U.S. twice and America, this should be in /r/news, DON'T YOU KNOW THE RULES?
Don't forget the bombing in Iraq that killed at least 50 people.   It truly is a sad week 
So they care more that the bomber isn't Muslim than for the well-being of the victims. Okay.
Wow people need to calm their shit. /r/worldnews is apologizing and people still need to complain due to the fact that they took the thread down and put it back up. Who cares if the majority of readers are from the US, it clearly states that they try to not cover us internal news and to be honest its easy to mix up whether or not the BOSTON marathon is a worldwide event. I live in boston right now and this a tragedy (luckily my friends were not close to the explosions), to be honest I would rather members of Reddit move on from a trivial mistake from these mods so I can read about why explosives were detonated, who is responsible for the blame, and also the everyday heroes who provided aid.  
Photo #10 is a molten vagina
As it happened on tax day, I was thinking the same thing. Timothy McVeigh II: Electric Boogaloo?
Or they will just label them as being Americans who support Israel, which is what they always do?  But I do see what you are going for: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/No_true_Scotsman
Eric Rudolph at Centennial Park comes to mind.  But it doesn't matter right now what group is tangentially responsible or not. Whoever did this will have an insane reason why they targeted the marathon, as did Rudolph for targeting the Olympics.
powerful stuff.
[deleted]
[deleted]
NuclearFist of Freedom.  'Murica!   :-D
Because we all know praying doesn't count unless it's done on the internet.
heh
Most likely if anyone related to them does abortion as well, they would look hypocritical if they don't fine he/she.   The thing is NZ politics is transparent to a point. Although we have our secrets that the public does't know about, they moment they are known, they will be attacked so hard that they usually forced to leave office.
To play further, most of the plots that have been "stopped", have been instigated and inspired by the feds.
Ha, my first thought was, "I hope there aren't too many Arabs at that race or near Boston."  I haven't kept on it much today, but it doesn't seem like Muslim Extremists did this to me.
Dammit beat me to it. 
Turkey is, and always has been, an interesting state. The "Foothold" to the Middle East reminds me of Ikea: all visitors are welcome, but you cannot walk through without being constantly reminded where you are. 
For radon mitigation in Illinois, radon system installation and radon testing services, call Nelson Radon Reduction. Visit our site to learn more. 
The americans had little in the way of evidence in general.
Some attacks have been thwarted by those security measures, though.
that doesnt work here move on
We're sorry! 
so you are not true muslim
The smoke gave it away. Ever seen a muzzle loader or a musket fire? Lots of white smoke....
It's hard to see it right now but it is. The bombings, though tragic, happened and it's over. The racism and fear-mongering that will go on for years from this will affects thousands, if not millions of people, directly or indirectly in purely negative ways. Just look at 9/11 and what it did for hatred towards muslims/middle eastern people.
When you think about it, it took millenia for Christians to stop treating people like slaves.
Well the signs indicate someone with little experience or funds. This is likely a lone wolf attack. At this point it could easily range from far right or left extremist to a self radicalized jihadist.   I fail to see what screams mentally disturbed young white male about this. But a gut feeling is a gut feeling, and I wont argue with that. 
Common denominator? Jobs.  FTFY
It's comin' right for us!
So you don't think there is a difference between people dying from an attack, and people dying from an accident?
i'm white so i know.
[deleted]
Chinese guy here I can't give you takeout unless you roll down the windows
yeah maybe so, ones decisions should be based in logic not emotion, so even if I may sat that if I ever lost a family member to a terrorist because I wouldn't be thinking straight.
thanks a lot for your support, i also feel sad in how people try to justify the abuses.
  'Torture Lite' is still torture; on that we agree.  I strongly disagree with your equating  the "enhanced interrogation" practices to the physical violence and depravity of the Iraqi Army's rape of Kuwait.  I don't support my government's adoption of torture,  but I think you should understand  "stress and duress" tactics are common the world over.   Interestingly, when practiced by the UK in the '70's, the ECHR determined them to be *not torture*.  
[deleted]
You don't have to delete, I would just change a few things personally. 
Lolwut
**Treat Level: PARFAIT WITH BANANA**
and then claim self-defense!
I'm just saying.
sorry in advance but here's a shameless plug to visit and perhaps join our small society at /r/vzla! right now /u/evidenciacomprobable is running an [interesting thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/vzla/comments/1cic1g/would_you_vote_in_elections_like_this_venezuela/) with quite a few amateur videos of irregularities captured by venezuelan citizens this past sunday throughout election day and the following. could be worth your attention!
Leg 'er down a smack 'em yak 'em!
In this thread....names....  names on watchlists everywhere   
The decision was made within an hour of the event, it's not like all the context that emerged afterward existed at the time.  Breaking news items aren't always clearly national or international. The subreddit suffers from hazy boundary-syndrome, so let's not blame the mod(s), as much as those actions may have incensed and inconvenienced some (note: *inconvenience* is not a particularly heinous crime. There are a lot of self-righteous expectations around here...)
[deleted]
In other news, manatees go on indefinite strike after one of their idea balls was removed from the tank.
Globalization
Sometimes these news sources will report on world affairs - US foreign policy actions, for example?
&gt;It has been clearly proved over the course of this days that there was no way Maduro won the elections  It has been "clearly proved". OK great! You should be able to clearly justify your claim.  &gt;Both by the goverment denying a recount when the law allows it (to cover the cheating done) and by a general overview of the surroundings.  * Ok, so "there's no way Maduro won the elections" because although he won the official electoral count, there has not been a recount. O..K...  * What's this about "a general overview of the surroundings"? "A general overview of the surroundings? What does that even mean? 
When a bill reaches its third reading it's usually a foregone conclusion that it'll pass.
*Kiwis
Iran has proven time and time again that it doesn't have any nuclear weapons. It doesn't have the manufacturing ability to produce enough weapon grade material to build more than *maybe* one, low yield warhead. 
A wild Sisko out in the wild!!  Back to drama finding!!
But it is not in the mind of said cop to wish to cause fear.
It's nice to see our NZ neighbours make such a progressive move. Congratulations from North Queensland.
Hamas and Hezbolla are both proxy's, who are not only funded but actively armed by Iran and under direct governmental control. And there is still a difference between not stopping national from funding then being funded, armed and trained by the government. Im not saying the Saudi government is good, far from that, but Iran is worse. 
Whaka yeah! 
Jesus that's a dumb thing to say. You are incredibly fucking stupid.
Why am I not surprised? 
So wait, your humanity, your dignity, your PERSONHOOD is dependent on whether or not another human intends for you to be alive?  Also, can you kindly explain more about how a child is a parasite? I thought parasites enter your body by an exploit and not as a normal healthy consequence to an action you performed. 
&gt;Is there really any way for us, the people, to hold our elected officials accountable for these kind of things?   Yes. It's called voting. And I don't just mean presidential elections.
I really could not possibly care less.
Ricin? Someone is watching too much Breaking Bad. 
the Liberals can always vote on conscience. It is only the front bench that cannot cross the floor, unless they want to resign of course. 
You simultaneously overestimate LE and underestimate the power of crowd sourcing and the ability of people who are not "professionals" in a relevant field necessarily.
I believe the "I" stands for intersex.
[No, he can be seen to the right of the police van after the explosion.](http://www.flickr.com/photos/hahatango/8653970482/sizes/o/in/set-72157633252445135/) Please realize that what you are doing here can actually hurt people. If you have some "promising information", send it to the authorities instead of trying to hype it up through social media.  edit: If you actually want to help out instead of playing detective, here's a few useful links.  boston@ic.fbi.gov - FBI Contact  [Donate link to The One Fund](http://onefundboston.org/)  [Limbs for Life](http://www.limbsforlife.org/)
le epic redditor
&gt;  I feel like there is something wrong with that, that I don't feel as appalled by the violence in the middle east as I do in the US...  This is a construct of being in the same (or similar) social group and being able to relate to the victims.  To wit, Iraqi people feel worse about Iraqi bombings than they do U.S. bombings.  Russians feels worse about Russian bombings, etc.    I don't think there is anything wrong with your reaction.  It's normal, we're all just mammals, and we care about what is near to us.  It's tempting to jump to conclusions about American exceptionalism, but I think in this case incorrect.   You don't think U.S. lives are more important; you just relate more to Americans.     Finally, as you say, Iraqi bombings are common enough that they aren't *new*.   U.S. bombings are rare and this instance is new.  New = News.   
Finally a leader that Washington can appreciate.
You really should post this as a top level response instead of response to a comment. 
http://i.imgur.com/N0Bp0.gif
As a resident of the world- fuck yeah. Hope they blow this piece of shit up.
[deleted]
I'm not sure it's unreasonable for them to want MEK reclassified as a terrorist outfit.   Nice to see them offer condolences for Boston, they were good in the wake of 9/11 too (condemning the attacks, holding vigils, moments of silence etc.)  I've known a few Iranian guys over the years - nice guys, I certainly can't fault the ones I've met anyway. One was a revolutionary in 79 who I worked with when Bush was ratcheting up the anti-Iran rhetoric. At the time, I asked him what he thought of today's Iranian regime, his answer was something along the lines of 'yeah, all our governments are a bunch of assholes, buddy.' 
I'm glad Steve Jobs invented the camera phone so that we can finally have cameras in our pockets at all time.
Why so your cops can harass you for jaywalking while he get away. 
[deleted]
Nope: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Richard_Jewell
Im not sure but my god i've never heard (im sure there are some out there) from any of my friends having a bad time with a jewish girl, and by my experience, O M G
I agree but the camera's spotted him placing a bag so it most likely looks like they've nailed him.  However, yeah, innocent until proven guilty.
Iran has a Pat Roberson and Michelle Bachman? 
I'm Lebanese. Every single Arab/Muslim person I know is praying for it not to be a middle eastern guy. We're just like the rest of you. The looks and glances and the hate we experience here, in North America, is already bad. Please don't make it worse :( 
&gt; I'd like to see it backed up by a credible news source  Says the guy who sources Venezuelaanalysis? Really? PICTURES are not enough for you?  &gt; Interesting how according to you the PSUV are the ones causing the violence but so far the deaths have been all or mostly PSUV supporters.  Source it. Please, no venezuelaanalysis, its a disrespect on people's intelligence.  &gt; Sounds like fiery rhetoric for sure but not "hate speech."  Yeah, because firing form their jobs people who don't think like the governor is Okay.  &gt; Sounds like a lot of the charges the opposition is making are false[1] , so its no surprise there's not a source for the accusations more credible than the Capriles campaign.  *“Do you really believe that hundreds of witnesses could be forcibly removed from the voting centers without anyone saying anything? Why haven’t any of those witnesses made a denunciation or talked to the media?” he said.* This are witnesses who were threatened in rural Venezuela with being killed, don't expect them to start giving interviews on TV.   Funny enough, Mario Silva is our own Alex Jones in Venezuela :)
[deleted]
Yup... There is a very good chance he is government CBRN (Chemical Biologic Radiologic and Nuclear) detection...  That looks like a Blackhawk backpack... Standard use for Law Enforcement and other governmental work... Very expensive and rugged.   The jackets look like 5.11 Saber and the pants look like 5.11 TacLite... 5.11 is very popular with law enforcement and other governmental work...  Not going to tell you how I know this stuff... 
Figures, they just have to jump on everything. Even if it's not there, they just need a story.
I wouldn't necessarily say that. Look at the returns Spain got on their Green Energy program. Unfortunately this particular sector has more than its fair share of hucksters and snake oil salesmen.
[deleted]
[Pat Robertson Warns: America 'Asking For Wrath Of Almighty God' If Any Concessions Made To Palestine](http://www.mediaite.com/tv/pat-robertson-warns-america-asking-for-wrath-of-almighty-god-if-any-concessions-made-to-palestine/)
He doesn't exactly look like he's happy to be there.
She loves me, she loves me not... 
[deleted]
Thank you for your important.......contribution?
This just in..... North Korea has NOT nuked the USA.. and aliens have NOT been found on earth....  I must have missed something?
Goodbye, Blue Monday!
[deleted]
Podrías agregarlo al thread en /r/vzla? No estoy en la pc. 
flight of the conchords is such a good show
Unabomber was smart, he got caught.
A redditor who is really in touch with their id.
As I said,  &gt;**Some** estimates are as high as 98% of drone strike casualities being civilians[11][12] — 50 for every one "suspected terrorist".  50 to 1 = 2%  Source: [Article  #12]*Drone Strikes in Pakistan: Mitigating Bloodshed or Amplifying it?*, by Raiyan Khan, Stanford Journal of International Relationsn, page 1.  &gt;This leaves the media to fill in the  blanks, and as a result various news sources offer a wide  spectrum of statistics in terms of the effectiveness of  drone attacks – **numbers ranging anywhere from a 98%  civilian casualty rate to a 10% civilian casualty rate.**
I see what you did there. 
thanks, i feel right at home.
I'll wait for the official confirmation by CNN.
Thanks for correcting me I'll never do that again. Teachable moments!
[deleted]
luckily this isn't terrorism 
I have some advice for these 'physicists':  switch of that screen, go out side, and play. get laid. socialise. and stay the fuck off reddit. it'll be good for you schucks to get a dose of reality.  NEXT&gt;
&gt;??? Seriously ??? Are we going to play the "no it wouldn't" / "yes it would" game?  There is no such game.   Your statement is false. At the very least it lacks evidence. And as you were the one making the initial statement you are the one who needs to provide evidence. I dismissed it and my dismissal was sufficient. If you want to continue to assert your statement, feel free to prove it.  &gt;If the universe is shown to be a simulation that means there's a creator.   No, it doesn't. It only means that it is a simulation.      &gt;The whole "the universe is just a random event" theory gets tossed out.  No, it doesn't. It only means that it is a simulation.  &gt;And the simple facts are, everything we know about the universe fits with the idea of it being a simulation:  What? No.  &gt;The universe had a start date  Begging the question. Ignorance.  &gt;the universe started with very high entropy, just like created things, and totally unlike random crap.   Begging the question. Ignorance.  &gt;there is a "lower limit" to possible measurements in the universe (plank scale) which implies a "pixelated" universe.   Begging the question. Ignorance.  &gt;So as it stands, the evidence is in favour of a created universe.  No, as it stands there is no evidence and you begged the question while making shit up. What do you expect as a response to the unsubstantiated assertions you just made? These aren't arguments at all.
look, if they want to play nasty games with their neighbors, thats their business, and none of ours. i am not an antisemitic, but i was never thrilled with how the state of israel come to exist. at gunpoint, a group that has been there for thousands of years is forced off their land and it is then given to a sworn opposite of their religion. way to establish activating a warlike state that will last a millennium. with the bickering back and forth, sword rattling etc, each side trying to take a little more off the border every week, and the israelis having a rather draconian method of driving out palestinians, they have not established a peaceful relationship with the neighborhood. personally, i believe this was dine with malice aforethought when the land was chosen in the first place. to cause maximal constant conflict with no hope of there ever being a resolution. the US should not be just giving away subsidies in cash as foreign aid, nor should it be giving away military aid to anyone who will not compromise and treats a segment of the population as poorly as the israelis do the arabs (not to say the arabs dont return a lot of venom right back at 'em). we are exacerbating the situation with gun giveaways.
Here is an [other source as well](http://www.911myths.com/index.php/Dancing_Israelis). Also would you mind showing me where it says Israel had direct involvement of 9/11 since I don't have time to read the whole report?
The law is, not beliefs. He based his reasoning on beliefs, not the law.
military.  all i can tell you
And who asked them to do it?
I was thinking that because Israel was in the title instead of Hamas it would go to the front page instantly. Seems the items putting Hamas in negative light gets down voted.
Commonly accepted definition is a poor country, or a country in which the large majority of the population doesn't have access to things like Electricity or sanitation systems... I would say all of Africa except for South Africa are third world countries.
70 people, possibly more believed dead at this time. 
are we sure that wasn't just put there now?  An hour ago is "in the last week" too.  (I don't know how google+ works)
So basically, near the end, they wrote that we shouldn't jump to conclusions but here's something for shits sake. 
I'm in Waco as well, it was a fertilizer plant filled with ammonium nitrate. Google that chemical and the first thing that's comes up is bomb related material.  It's commonly used as a high-nitrogen fertilizer as well. This was the result of people not following safety procedures to the letter and an accident turned into a terrible disaster in the blink of the eye. 
Step 3 - ??? Step 4 - profit 
It's only the 20th anniversary, happened in 1993.
What you're probably seeing in that one frame is an artifact of how the camera takes video. The cells may update left to right in a continual sweep. This is due to a "rolling shutter" I'd bet during that split second the explosion's light had already happened and it was only caught on the left side of the camera. Similar: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xqw0-BQXAM8
Any word on how far away that was from the blast?
[deleted]
Or 9/11
I live in arlington, and I didn't feel a thing.
Thank you for the link
That person does not know how to use a camera
I hope your mom is alright. ):
Good. I don't give a shit about the teenager's religious views if they are going to get him killed rather than have a completely safe medical procedure to save his life. Bravo to the judge for seeing that he does indeed know better than the kid and telling him so.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tew4oHz_Fow&amp;t=90s  You can see the roofs being blown from the houses.
Yes it can be used in some recipes of meth production, but I believe most of the restrictions are to prevent people from making explosives.  The OKC bomber used Ammonium Nitrate and look at the devastation that caused...
[deleted]
While this doesn't appear to be terrorism, the thought has to be considered. Terrorism is a real threat in our time and most certainly more so than in 1947. 
That's what's happening with Singapore now. From what was 2.6million to 5+ in less than 4 years. Then again, Singapore doesn't have a real 'native' population to speak of..
[deleted]
&gt;**That being said, when you are on the middle of it, it is hard to walk away from people who's lives are in imminent danger.**  All the respect to you and people like you, who do what you do.
I'm tired of paying for this shit though. France and Sweeden can foot the bill. Ima chill 
I don't think it was about killing the president. It was about sending a message. Every terrorist act is about the message.
Here, here.  Bloody ridiculous that these idiots are allowed to die needlessly.
/r/outside becomes morbidly real
This company is going to get fined like crazy. Open records show that they have not filed a Tier II Or a Form-R. Was also cited previously for not having an Emergency Plan.   My speculation is that there was a small fire happened and a volunteer fire department didn't know they were working with water reactive materials considering this facility didn't seem to be up to par with their emergency procedures and compliance.  Such a tragedy that all these people have been hurt, if anyone knows somebody that's been hurt by this I am truly sorry. It is a bad week for the US but we can and will get through all this.  Edit-I'm on my phone at work can't post links, but you can find most of this information on the TCEQ website. This is the stuff they don't report on the news.
Ah, the long reddit tradition of commenting on articles one hasn't read.
squats, deadlifts, bench and pullups are all you need if you want to actually be strong. I love the rock, but these are all pretty boy workouts
You're living in the previous century. China does not need a buffer country. Hell, their trade with South Korea eclipses the "trade" they do with North Korea. If anything Beijing would welcome a unified Korea...as long as they stayed within the Chinese sphere of influence (which would likely happen naturally over time...without the North around any more Seoul wouldn't put up with petty crimes and rapes committed by American servicemen on their soil one more day, they'd just thank us for the help and kick us out). 
This reminds me of that Malcolm in the Middle episode where Francis is essentially enslaved by that crazy lady in Alaska. Except this is real, so it's terrible.
Yeah great point.   Another good one I read somewhere is imagine asking someone in 1900 "how long do you think a transatlantic crossing will take 100 years from now?"   Their answer is likely to be off by an order of magnitude (i.e. guessing a few weeks instead of a few hours) because their frame of reference would be the ships of the day, rather than aircraft, which would have been inconceivable. (imagine trying to describe jet aircraft - metal tubes with wings, that fly at over 500mph, seat 500 people at a time, fly at several thousand feet in the air etc).   Likewise our frame of reference for 50 years out will be completely obsolete.  People who have been born on Mars and never been on Earth? Full-blown Martian colony trading with Earth? Some freaky technology that breaks people down to the molecular level, transports you along a data link like an email, and reassembles you some place on the other side of the globe, almost instantly?  (the last one would mean that asking someone in 2013 how long a transatlantic crossing in 2063 might take could be off by an order of magnitude...!)
He he he, you're funny
Who aren't Israelis? These Palestinians who want to run in the West Bank? That's correct, so I'm right, any Israeli citizen can travel freely in Israel, but these Palestinians are not Israeli citizens.  Does that mean you admit you lied when you said "Only Jews are permitted free travel in Israel "? 
[deleted]
[Here](http://www.ekathimerini.com/4dcgi/_w_articles_wsite1_1_17/04/2013_494382) is a report from a reputable Greek newspaper. [Another source](http://www.enetenglish.gr/?i=news.en.society&amp;id=687).
&gt; while conceived with good intent, turned out not to work too well.  Somehow I doubt that the intent was ever something other than enriching those who have the controlling stake in our societies. 
you think it is that hard for someone deported to come back across the border?
because *'MURICA!*  you aren't the smartest crayon in the box, are you? 
Thanks R&amp;R
Thats not what i said, at all.   deruke said that greece couldnt post a threat to anyone and thats just faulty. Greece wont win any major wars, but if an extremist government decided it wanted to fuck shit up it would lead to human misery on a grand scale. Greece isnt a threat to the sovereignity of any nations, but it could pose a grave threat to millions of individuals, including its own citizens.
[deleted]
But no one remembers being tortured....
Always darkest before dawn
I've seen it happen at plenty of American restaurants.
Too many explosions in recent US news to get the hivemind to boycott anything. But next time I buy produce I think I shall avoid greek products now.
You can't call me racist, I'm not friends with niggers.
how about you make friends with your neighbors so you don't have to worrry about getting bombed by them!
While ideologically I agree with you, imagine how much worse the migrant workers would fare if farmers were boycotted and had less income.  I think the popularity of Golden Dawn is because they hand free food to people (provided they bring all the necessary paperwork showing they are Greek). It is a classic ploy but retardedly far-right groups to gain support. I'm still happy they're mostly detested by the vast majority of Greeks and are always laughed at on television
Tibet and Xinjiang are very rich regions in terms of natural resources and mineral deposits, they also provide things like medicine and serve as a natural defense for China.  The communist party really couldn't care less about how another ethnicity lives, they just can't let go of these fringe lands go, or else all the other 50+ minorities will be asking for autonomy. If the party starts loosening their grip, there is a very real chance China will implode from within. They will not stand anything that promotes solidarity outside the party. The Tibet issue is both ethnic and religious, both of which are highly sensitive to the party. This pretty much dooms the Tibetans to become the subject of tight control from China.
So fucking what, the banks can wait until Greece is in the black again. If it takes twenty years before that happens so be it, if it takes 100 years to pay them back so be it. If you had a policy of Greece only paying back when it was making money it would force the EU to trade harder with Greece and is the only logical way forward.   Making people go hungry and suffer is just fucking cruel.
I'm almost positive when they wrote the amendment to ban slavery, they left out any word of someone in prison or custody of the state, so "slavery" still technically exists there, but it's legal and no one seems to care because they are inmates at a federal prison. 
&gt;Is this disease a bigger or smaller problem than before the medicine? I'd say it's a smaller problem, as it's less of a threat to people, despite more people dying.  -  &gt;If you don't like the above logic, think of it this way: You're born as a in a random location in the world to random parents. How likely are you to be a slave? In 1800? Today? AFAIK the answer is that you're much less likely to be a slave today.     The problem with slavery was never how scared you would be about your probability of being born a slave, it was the human suffering caused by slavery. the human suffering caused by slavery now is greater than it was in the past.   with your logic, if the population was 60 and 30 people die, that is worse than if the population was 6 billion and 2 billion people die. 
I'm just going to go ahead and say that I'm kind of glad they look white.  I think it is self explanatory but we just don't need more reasons for people to draw conclusions on large populations based on the actions of a few people.  
[deleted]
Crazy conspiracy theorist. That's why he got cut off. No need for that crap at the press conference. 
Wait I thought Kenseian economics debunked austerity measures. IT's the right that likes them because they use these times as a means to shrink government.
They weren't profiled for their ethnicity or descent.   He and another were carrying a backpack and dufflebag. If they didn't have bags, they wouldn't have been suspected at all. Racial profiling isn't what made people suspicious, it was their large bags.
Possible hat on one suspect? http://www.bridgestonegolf.com/images/product/accessories/b330seriescaps-800.jpg
http://www.fbi.gov/news/updates-on-investigation-into-multiple-explosions-in-boston/updates-on-investigation-into-multiple-explosions-in-boston
I have a habit of making Big Lebowski references. Too much time on reddit I guess.
Read that earlier. Creeped me out how detailed it was. Guess we wait and watch. 
damn, good eyes!
idiot
[deleted]
Identifying a license plate's imprint is very different from finding two suspected terrorists from a few blurry stills of CCTV.  Reddit isn't that great.
Hopefully people who were in the area taking pictures will look closely at their pics and see if they happened to catch a good shot of them in the background, or something.
Tatrz
If we want them found, we should post the pics to /r/NSFW - there's nobody that crew can't identify.  edit: spelling
Bang Bros maybe.  And not the good kind.
They are only ahead of Reddit because they have ALL photos and videos... Reddit has the man power though. 20,000 eyes scouring images helps
calm down. 
He wouldn't dare.
Read this in a Russian accent
don't know how you found that, but good eye!
[deleted]
It's sad this response is so widely accepted on Reddit. People are people. 
Yeah, I'd probably use a throwaway. 
Is that kid in the white hat... is that... is that *Paul Ryan?*
fuck off
That was the equivalent of finding everyone on this thread and collectively kicking them in the balls/gap. Good show.    
Working in a motel != working for a motel. heyooooo
[deleted]
ok yeah you have fun trusting your obama administration. cause those guys couldn't have been part of the govt., the POTUS never lies!
How do we even know these guys did it?
Oh, fuck. He sounds Indian. Oh shit, for my sake(and all Indians), I hope it isn't him.
It makes me smile seeing so many people dedicate their time trying to solve this
I'm a huge Runescape Gold seller, I'll see if I can find any purchases by him in the past 4 years from our site.  Obviously won't post any private info.
He's a real person.  We've messaged back and forth because he banned me from /r/politics and wouldn't give a reason.  In fact, nobody at /r/politics will give me a reason.  Eventually, I messaged the admins about him, and had a few messages back and forth with /u/cupcake1713.  Relevant text:  &gt;&gt;We will not remove the moderators from their current positions unless we find hard evidence that they have been gaming the system (banning users from a subreddit is not the same as gaming the system), not just speculation from users who are quick to blame.  I pointed out that banning people for political ideologies, making submissions disappear from /r/politics/new, and the like, constitute gaming the system.  No response on that yet.  In any event, Reddit, [meet your enemy](http://imgur.com/6pbGX7T). 
http://i.imgur.com/I1dF69f.jpg  From /u/the_kony_express
He looks significantly shorter than 6' in that picture. 
[deleted]
People keep asking "How do we know these guys did anything?". A: There is photographic and other evidence of them placing their backpacks near the bomb sites (not yet shown to the public). Also if you notice suspect 2 in the new photo, post-explosion, he has no backpack on. They would not have released the photos of these guys' faces if there was not sufficient reason to. The FBI is not CNN.
I bet the fbi contacted him and he squirted in his spiderman panties.
[deleted]
Newt is setting up something on the moon.
Photo taken from here: https://maps.google.com/maps?ll=42.348904,-71.081779&amp;spn=0.001232,0.002064&amp;sll=30.518202,-97.67292&amp;sspn=0.259974,0.528374&amp;t=h&amp;hq=the+lennox&amp;hnear=Boston,+Suffolk,+Massachusetts&amp;z=20&amp;layer=c&amp;cbll=42.348952,-71.08182&amp;panoid=E-fx4fTE4_V5WDNsX2t_gA&amp;cbp=12,73.95,,0,0.23
[deleted]
http://abcnews.go.com/US/sunil-tripathi-surveillance-footage-shows-missing-ivy-league/story?id=18845517#.UXChhbUp98E
This may help them find him.
[deleted]
[deleted]
i'll agree with you there.
Of course.  
One guy has tan pants, the other has jeans.
They are suspects, and need to be checked and questioned. You speak as though arresting these guys is analogous to throwing them into an active volcano.
That's not the suspect with the white cap, check the FBI's pictures plus the missing guy isn't a suspect at all and doesn't look like them.
I don't.  Asterix and Obelisk really did a number on those poor Romans.
[deleted]
There should be a subreddit where everyone can upload their boston pictures from Monday.
You have potato?
Thankfully, I am powered by downvotes.  Huzzah!
lol what indications exactly?
In my professional opinion, it certainly isn't him.
Have some gold, it might just save you.
That's nice.  They should give the money to victims of sexual abuse.
Here is my question. What could have possibly influenced these two to detonate WHEN they did? Why not detonate towards the beginning of the race? 
I'd just like to state the obvious here, just as a little PSA:  If you see someone who you think resembles these men, please just report it. I have a feeling a lot of people with big noses are gonna get the shit beaten out of them in the next 24 hours. 
I guarantee one of the first things we do when we discover life outside of Earth is figure out how to kill them and how they could kill us. We colonize them, or they colonize us...either way, genocide and war is on it's way. Thus is the nature of intelligent life.
@FBI - the guy in the tracksuit, behind and to the left of the woman in the pink sweater, might be holding a camera. There's a chance he's caught a better picture of the suspects.
the little boy on the railing is the eight year old who died.  his sister, next to him, lost both her legs.  mom, somewhere in the area, was severely brain injured.  
Why dont you read the rules of this subreddit - here let me point it out for you since you can't bothered shifting your eyes 10 centimeters to the right   &gt;/r/Worldnews is for major news from around the world except US-internal news / US politics.
A pope that actually follows his religion.... Wow
Yeah this kind of shit happens all over the country every day. Our tax dollars at work.
my feed just died
Look at the posts in r/worldnews immediately surrounding this post right now and tell us all why this is the only post you are complaining about not being world news.
Definite second officer down, suspect possibly down. definite hand grenades.  Hope they get these losers alive. Officers ordered back.  white male blonde hair with pajamas. wha???
[deleted]
There are actually over 3,000 foreign exchange students going to MIT both in the undergraduate and graduate program.  With MIT being a well-respected INTERNATIONAL school of science, I believe it holds more weight as it would in a small community college.
do you even read the article, or do you just come here and post it for karma?
[deleted]
Helicopter being dispatched to the light the area up. 
Oh man, if he's really Middle Eastern, this is not going to be fun.
[deleted]
'Murica jr.  We loveyoubros
RPGs on 14, 16, and 18 Hazel! Go, go, go!
[deleted]
Cue drunken Alot sitting at the bar.
a friend of mine who's an EMS just texted me and said he heard over the radio it's the marathon bombers
'murica
[deleted]
Whats the link to the radio feed
Apparently they're now confirming that the suspects ARE the marathon bombers. 1 is dead.   [source](http://www1.whdh.com/video/7newslive)
http://www.ibtimes.com/4chan-false-flag-conspiracy-theory-predicts-boston-marathon-bombing-arrest-friday-1202073
So wait, did I hear that right? Just kidding, no foot pursuit? 
http://i.imgur.com/lPxlDhz.jpg
I agree, it is Americas fault. That fat bitch. Shes like bigger then Europe!
Apparently they found a pressure cooker at the scene in water town..   coincidence? 
lol im nakie in bed :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
lol  Ok...
Enough views to construct a 3D virtual reality walk-through? Come on, too slow, I wanna be right in the middle of the action... ;-)
http://imgur.com/a/hRltJ  New photos
I thought the guy on the right is (was?) Mike Mulugeta. No?
You ever tried to sneak past a german sheaperd? Those k9's can smell fear from a block away. 
[deleted]
Is it me or does it appear that both suspects have prosthetic noses and possibly suspect two has prosthesis around his eyes, in order to alter apearance?
/r/conspiracy  
there is a bomb on the doorstep of this place right now with wires coming out according to the scanner. i might be completely wrong this is the internet http://i.imgur.com/O99q6SY.png
Racoonpeople is saying that the police are liable for where the suspects' bullets go i.e. if a suspect shoots your property, police have to pay for it.   That sounds like a bit of a stretch...
I just want to know why.  If these guys are college  students, makes no sense! Smart, good looking guys who had a good future likely, do something this horrendous and kill so many innocent people FOR WHAT?   What did these guys get out of this? It makes no sense!   edit: removed MIT, I just assumed initially from reports, but they're indeed not MIT. sorry for any confusion
Me too.
Reddit's checks and balances system.
the local peeping tom thinks that the police response was out of proportion
WHAT?!
NO BUS FOR YOU
To evacuate people
Get down on your knees
[deleted]
Injured officer hurt his back carrying all the donuts for the ~9000 officers at the command post
[deleted]
How does NBC know that? 
https://twitter.com/jraske/status/325173077312933888/photo/1  dude in gray jacket fucking with a car
thank fucking god... ill talk a white chocolate mocha ~~double shot!~~ fuck it make it like a quad shot.  
I hope they arrest the bastard. He should face justice.  Don't give him opportunity to die as some anti-hero.
I'm looking at @reddit, and I don't see that. Can you post source?
[deleted]
**Looks like the suspect was a 2011 Cambridge City Scholarship winner**  http://www.boston.com/yourtown/news/cambridge/2011/05/cambridge_announces_2011_city.html  (Ctrl+f) "Dzhokhar Tsarnaev"  EDIT: And a wrestler - http://somervillenews.typepad.com/cambridge_news_weekly/2011/04/cambridge-rindge-and-latin-school-greater-boston-league-winter-all-stars-2011-.html
Not working
[deleted]
Video linked on Tsarnaev's Facebook page: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0lgTvAMP2Ak 
Sounds like they have him cornered at 17 Willow Park
Too white, because if you aren't from Kansas or Germany you have to be dark skinned. Why are people in my country so fucking stupid?
[deleted]
[deleted]
They are saying he is posting online??
That twitter account is brand new
Look slike you accidentally linked infowars. Honest mistake, I'm sure. Only other thing you could be is an actual retard. Which then just makes it kind of astounding you're on the internet at all. Bravo..
fuck da police
[deleted]
jeez, blokes taking photos and emailing pictures right around the corner. couldn't get much dumber
You people were listening to the same CNN during 9/11 and the aftermath.  Take some stock of yourself and rethink your opinion about GWBush and the results of a terror attack.
Send him a gift. http://imgur.com/kLPZK6Z
I was born in China. Both my parents are British, I'm blond and have blue eyes, hold a British passport, and I speak with a British accent. Does being born in China make me Chinese?
Hey, you should try shutting the fuck up. I heard it is fabulous.
&gt;Really, what does that even mean?  That there are plenty of Han Chinese, they form huge blocks of homogenous areas where there is nothing but Han Chinese due to statistics alone. In terms of diversity (cultural, genetical, etc) I don think turning to the Han is the ideal response here.   &gt;What's the problem with that? And honestly, should racial segregation be good?   No but neither is ethnic smothering of a region for political purposes.   &gt;Should Tibet be independent and wants progress, landlocked, with no expertise and a medieval mindset, can it really bar the Chinese out?  Just because an area is traditional doesnt necessitate external intervention. USA doesnt lay claim to Nigeria because they have technological superiority.  Im confused, are you the one supporting White Australia policy?  &gt;Face it, you just hate the CCP,  Cant say that I am a fan  &gt;nothing to do with Tibet.   Given that they are governing the region and responsible for many of the actions and reactions occuring there, Im pretty sure it has something to do with Tibet.  &gt;And you can't do shit about it  Well, Im bitching about something on reddit right now, Im sure that counts.  &gt;better buy a plane ticket to Lhasa and give pseudo-Tibetan Han Chinese owners your tourist dollars, while you still can.  Too far from Shanghai and if I go to China, I have to go to Shanghai to say hello to relatives.  &gt;Hey, maybe you shouldn't have started the swearing. ;D  Hey, maybe you should have realised I wasnt swearing at you. "The fuck you on about" is asking for clarification, not in the nicest fashion since I could tell from your single comment that you were not the nicest person.  &gt;What's internet points to you anyway? You feeding on it?  Nothing. I just find it cute that you downvoted it. Classy. Keep it up.
[deleted]
&gt;I expect some serious crackdown from Putin in the next few weeks  As a Russian, I wouldn't expect anything of the sort. After Putin allied himself with Chechen warlord supreme Ramzan Kadyrov, Chechens have become more or less a privileged minority to the point of being pretty much exempt from criminal law altogether. Cracking down on local power structures because of something done by a random shithead in a far away country... yeah, not going to happen.
Ask your boss... if he says "yes"... quit!
[deleted]
&gt;BBC Monitoring reports that a man named Anzor, who said he was Tamerlan and Dzhokhar Tsarnaev's father, told Russia's Interfax news agency his children were framed. &gt; &gt;"The special services framed my children because they are believing Muslims," he was quoted as saying. "Why did they kill Tamerlan? They should have taken him alive. The younger one is now on the run; he was studying in his second year at a medical institute in the US. We were expecting him home in the holidays. Now I don't know what will happen."  Wat?
They know everyone is listening to the police scanners so they have to pretend they are working. 
Makes you wonder what drove him to bomb a city.
There were Chechnyans fighting as insurgents in Iraq, we've killed a lot of them.
well that's just rude.
&gt;What the fuck *Humans*  FTFY
and about menstruation... don't worry, this also happens in the christian bible...there seems to be some conflict..  They ask you about menstruation. Say: 'It is an indisposition. Keep aloof from women during their menstrual periods and do not approach them until they are clean again; when they are clean, have intercourse with them whence God enjoined you....'  Quran 2:222, "The Cow," Dawood, p. 34
I'm sorry could someone please inform me with what happened with the 60-70 year old with the "device"? I'm trying to keep up but this seems to have slipped by me!
Why the fuck would you need to 'gain support' for fighting a state that is trying to break away and become an Islamic theocracy? No-one wants to see that happen to their country.
They are. You seem to have serious issues understanding simple social interactions.
Yes we are, that one mosque already accepts homosexuals, why the fuck would i be debating whether that mosque accepts homosexuals or not if it's in the fucking title already? The debate is whether it will happen universally or not, I am not going to debate whether or not something that already happened will occur.
I hope his family sues Wakefield..  Dishonest science especially when dealing with public crime should be criminal.
&gt;war of independence against Russia  .  &gt;Whereas the first Chechen war, at least in its opening stages, was still mostly a struggle for self-determination, the war’s second iteration had an overtly Islamist, missionary character. Instead of being localized to Chechnya, it also increasingly implicated the republic’s Caucasian neighbors (most directly Dagestan and Ingushetia). And while the first Chechen war took on the form of a fast-moving asymmetric conflict, the second assumed the character of a war of attrition. A grinding, bloody campaign inevitably followed.   http://www.securityaffairs.org/issues/2011/20/berman.php
&gt; The letter, addressed to President Joachim Gauck, did not contain an explosive substance as initially thought, the Federal Criminal Police Office (BKA) said on Friday evening.  In other words: calm down everyone; there's no explosive after all. We 'sploded it anyway, though.
NEW SCANNER LINK: http://audio4.radioreference.com/732518686
Well...... That guy lives 5 minutes from my house. In the Port Tennant region of Swansea I believe. Brb gonna get my Hazmat suit on.
Okay if we can compare China to India head-to-head, then we can comapre China to Western Civilization as well.
Upvoted for '!='
what does complexity have to do with excel spreadsheets? excel can do many things and the theoretical models are not that complex. It wasn't too long ago that hedgefunds calculated their trading strategies in excel, in fact i don't doubt some still do.
[deleted]
Yes, that's it exactly.
[deleted]
[deleted]
did they say what was on the note?
Within certain boundaries, yes you'd be right. Where does it end, can I be a muslim and transgress all the basic doctrines of Allah and Muhammed? Can I be a Catholic and not believe in original sin or the papacy? Eventually we find ourselves just playing semantics with these names, their meanings lost long ago. We just don't have other names for them yet. 
This is ridiculous, they actively beat the shit out of immigrants and stab people in the streets.  They don't do good for their people, they just gave them a scapegoat because their country can't manage its shit.
&gt;EXACTLY  So you agree with what I'm saying and have been saying?  &gt;Holy shit, you're dense. Really.   Well color me surprised, I guess not. Forgive me if your language is a little confusing.  Okay, so I think you're actually being honest in the way you portrait yourself to be correct (even though you aren't), so I'll avoid using the vitriolic, red-rag type of language that you're starting to throw around.  You're saying that what we define as "illegal immigrant" today will be legal if we change the system in order to redefine what the term "illegal immigrant" entails, thus making it easier for legal immigration. The problem with this statement and its logic is that simply redefining what something is doesn't change what's happening in reality. Those that wouldn't have qualified for immigration previously (because they are not able to ensure a foundation of living/pay the immigration expenses in order to patriate) but now would qualify to be here will still be the same type of people causing the socioeconomic troubles facing their specific communities. The only difference is now they're entitled to government welfare when they weren't before. And even with all those new immigrants you let in, there will still be those that you keep out ("99% of prospective "illegal" immigrants"). What's to keep those individuals from sneaking in as they would be doing with the current laws anyway? Especially so, considering that the previous generation of illegal aliens were given legal status with no repercussions for breaking immigration law, so what's the incentive not to?  So what's changed? Illegals already pay sales tax and are already charged for taxes automatically through payroll. The income level that illegals are vastly representative of are charged zero or very little income tax and don't own properties to be able to qualify for those specific taxes, either.   Where the logic behind any of your reasoning?
It's actually not the rats that carry it. It's the fleas on the rats.
I agree, there's no benefit in comparing body count, and someone from syria would complain about someone in mexico.
If that's bothering you, then you're in the wrong thread.
That's the loophole that fundies are counting on. THEIR abortion is ok, medically necessary, and Jeebus made them rich enough to be able to afford airfare to escape to a place where they can get the treatment. But fuck the poor slut who doesn't have the money to escape, she's going to have to accept her fate and birth the damaged baby. Oh, and then we'll scream
Suffering requires consciousness. That "poor baby" was a mindless hunk of meat, not a person with feelings.
msnbc reporting a body has been found in a boat.  edit: scanner reporting he is moving. he is moving around the boat across the stern to the rear of the boat. reports the tank of gas on the boat is half full acording to scanner reports.  EDIT 2: just heard there is a fire on the boat.  EDIT 3: JUST HEARD SOMEONE SAY THEY DIDNT WANT TO "LIGHT THE BOAT UP" UNTIL THEY GET MORE CLEARANCE.  EDIT 4: FBI HAS LAUNCHED FLASH BANGS INTO THE BOAT. POSSIBLE RETURN FIRE BY THE SUSPECT.  EDIT 5 7:50 EST: ALL UNITS BEING TOLD NOT TO RETURN FIRE. SOME POLICE ARE STATING "MAINTAIN RADIO SILENCE".  EDIT 6 7:55 EST: "NO MOVEMENT FROM THE SUSPECT" REPORTED. FLASH BANGS HAVE BEEN LAUNCHED. NO IDEA IF THEY HAVE STORMED THE BOAT OR NOT.  EDIT 7 8PM EST: FLASH BANGS/OVER PYROTECHNIC DEVICE THROWN INTO BOAT. RIGHT NOW "FLAMELESS SMOKE" BEING REPORTED BY SCANNER.NO SIGN OF MOVEMENT. UNSURE IF THEY HAVE USED THE FLASH BANGS BECAUSE THEY WERE STORMING THE BOAT.  EDIT 8 809 PM EST: SUSPECT ON THE WEST SIDE OF THE BOAT BY THE REAR. POLICE ARE STATING THEY HAVE A VISUAL ON THE SUSPECT.  EDIT 9 813 PM: POLICE HAVE JUST STATED "YOUR CHANNEL IS BEING BROADCAST ON THE INTERNET" AND HAVE ORDERED THE RADIO OPERATOR TO BROADCAST ON ANOTHER CHANNEL. THIS WILL PROBABLY BE THE LAST TRANSMISSION.  EDIT 10: THEY ARE TRYING TO GET THE MEDIA OUT OF THE AREA WHO ARE TRYING TO GET CLOSE TO THE SCENE.  EDIT 11: IT APPEARS THEY ARE ONLY TALKING ABOUT MEDIA AND STANDARD TRAFFIC NOW SINCE THEY FOUND OUT IT WAS BEING BROADCAST ON THE NET.  EDIT 12 836PM EST: FBI ARE REQUESTING FOR SHIELDS TO BE BROUGHT TO THE SCENE WHERE THE SUSPECT IS.  EDIT 13 8:40 PM EST:  A BLACK BAG IS BEING REPORTED FOUND UNATTENDED ABOUT A BLOCK AWAY FROM THE SUSPECTS LOCATION. POLICE ARE BEING TOLD TO "LOCK DOWN THE PERIMETER"     EDIT 14 8:42 PM: SUSPECT IN CUSTODY . SUSPECT IN CUSTODY BUT BEING TOLD TO NOT ADVANCE. UNSURE IF THIS IS WHITE HAT.  EDIT 15 8:50 PM EST: SUSPECT IS BEING DESCRIBED AS "BLOODY". NEGOTIATOR IS ON THE SCENE. SUSPECT APPEARS TO BE IN CUSTODY ACCORDING TO SCANNER REPORTS. STILL UNCONFIRMED.  EDIT 16 8:52 EST: MSNBC AND SEVERAL OTHER STATIONS HAVE REPORTED HE IS IN CUSTODY AND THE STANDOFF IS OVER.  ITS OVER HE IS IN CUSTODY.AND THATS WRAPS UP MY COVERAGE ON IHV2RTRNSUMVDEOTAPES T.V. STAY TUNED NEXT FOR AN "ABSOLUTELY FABULOUS" MARATHON.
I'd rather him not die. I want to see/hear from these people when stuff like this happens. Death and it's just an immediate, unresolved end.
Natural is not good. 
Which is exactly why abortion is and should be a personal decision.
[deleted]
Thank you. uStream went down for me about 15 minutes before they caught him
To paraphrase Uncle Ruslan: What a loser.
Not [really?](http://www.ndtv.com/article/world/sunil-tripathi-missing-student-wrongly-identified-as-boston-marathon-bombing-suspect-356334)
Do we actually know that he's guilty though or is he still just a suspect?
Are you kidding?  If he's dead, he's dead.  It is over.  I think it is far more satisfying to lock a criminal up for the rest of their life.  Every day they have to wake up and think about what they did to end up in a shitty little cell for 50+ years.
"the Right"???? I'm a committed progressive but I'm not foolish enough to believe that "the left" in the US is much different from "the Right"
[deleted]
Upside of how reddit sorts: Now it is the top comment.
It would make sense from what I've seen this far - I imagine his brother was the "mastermind".  *Edit*  I wouldn't call it brainwashed by Islam though, brainwashed by extremists - yes, Islam - no.
[deleted]
no. no, no, no *no*.  no
[deleted]
That's the state next to Maryland right?
Terrorists are watching Breaking Bad now? I feel like I don't understand the world anymore.
[deleted]
Geographyically, it's still europe. The borders on land are the ural and the mountain range between Georgia and Russia, which is where Chechnya is located. This way of defining europe is used frequently, for example population numbers of europe (*not* just the EU) would inculde all of russia that within those borders.  But it's far away from the nations that are usually refered to as easter european.
According to his twitter, he has a cat
I do as well. I'm far more interested in understanding what went wrong so that we have a better chance of preventing it happening again. 
News reports said the old guy was Russian. Was just going on that.
That Negotiator needs a raise.
&gt;Just "people" don't decide to go out to murder others, assassinate police officers, and design a variety of explosives to use against other's and themselves.  But they *do.*  That's exactly the point.  It's tempting to assume that only someone different from ourselves, someone visibly monstrous, could commit such crimes.  But that's not the truth.  And it's critical that we remember that.  Because it is that knowledge, not inherent moral superiority, that keeps "ordinary men" from falling into these patterns of action. Germany in the 1930s wasn't filled with demons, it was filled with normal people.  Only by remaining cognizant of this fact can we remain vigilant against such transgressions.
Probably treat him with undeserved kindness and sympathy to build rapport. They may deprive him of some comforts like quiet, and restore them to encourage cooperation... good cop / bad cop.  Really, Cheney's not in charge anymore. Torture didn't work. Interrogation is all about psychological manipulation, and there are much more powerful tools in that toolkit than torture.
Sociopaths beat their wives. Most people planting bombs have some kind of ideological reason, even if it's a crappy one. 
You can disagree all you want, it's not going to make you correct. It's even spelled out in the very link you posted, but since you're not getting it, i'll try to describe it in a way you understand.  Say you're creating a cute meme picture for /r/adviceanimals. You find a picture of a squirrel and slap the word "evil" on there. Is that a valid meme? What about if you put "offered peanut, bites finger"? Now we're talkin'!  Starting to make sense?
Denny Crane
Who downvotes this stuff.
[deleted]
On behalf of all Americans, I preemptively apologize for anyone saying that the bombers were Czech.
&gt; We are living in the future.  I'd think it's safe to say we're living in the present.
&gt; It's been a very, very long time since anybody in the western media expressed any sympathy for these freedom fighters.  Which ones? The Islamist terrorist ones? Or nationalist separatist ones that fought and won the first war with Russia?
[deleted]
Lol sure. Terrorism is over. Gotcha.
THis is the local cop who thinks hes a hot-shot and wants to impress the cool, mysterious FBI agents.  Hes like HEY GUYS LOOK WHAT I CAN DO!, then the FBI agents walk by un-impressed. . .  .  
Why don't you just sell some of your stock or get a loan from your parents? /s
Really? What is normal and what is abnormal? Last I checked every single terrorist on this planet have been normal, so what is so hard to fathom about this guy being a normal?  It doesn't take much to start killing people on this society. In fact, I can find almost infinite number of causes why someone ought to kill other person(s). What amazes me is that so few act out, it is almost as if majority of people are literally pussies.   I bet you that if we made murder legal for a week, we would be losing a lot of people, because everyone would be killing each other. And that is very normal for a human being, by the way. Just part of human's animalism, nothing new there, nothing abnormal about it.   You'll find about this the hard way if you didn't already figure it out by now. World is only going to get worse, just wait when this third exploitation economical system crashes and you'll end up with bunch of angry people without any chains or respect to a law that speaks against murder. This is normality at its finest - the true face of humanity.
Would flying her out of the country be illegal?
Chechens don't kill Chechens, Russians kill Chechens 
Does uncle Ruslan like Cats?
They have him on video dropping the bag. I understand technicalities, but I'm also comfortable with labeling him a guilty douchebag. I'm not a judge, so I'm cool with it.
[deleted]
that isnt really a slavic name. 
Sweet 16
[deleted]
Rape should be punished by forced castration. It is the only way we could be sure that none of the perpetrators would ever be able to do it again.
After ten of them, I am a cookie. 
Most "ladies nights" in bars don't ban men all together (at least, i've yet to go to a bar that does). The women get a hefty discount to get them INTO the bar, so the men can meet them. 
|I don't know the other candidates so I can't say either way.   Says a lot to me. How about Vladimir Zhirinovsky, for starters? Do a little homework there.  I just get a little sensitive when criticism of Russia's brutality comes up while we are still watching outcomes from Bush's false pretenses war in Iraq.   [Russia-US relations spoilt by Iraq conflict](http://english.ruvr.ru/2012_12_20/Russia-US-relations-spoilt-by-Iraq-conflict/)  Why not use all your reddit karma points to buy yourself a pound of moral authority?  Have a nice Guantanamo day.  EDIT PS: If you'd any idea how much money Russia had spent in Chechnya mending fences since these wars then perhaps you could be convinced, applying the principles of the Pottery Shop Rule, that Chechens are better off now than when they were led by people trying to create a Central Asian Caliphate with God-knows-whose money.
People taller than me make me feel intimidated and un-masculine. What do you suggest for me?
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I have no qualms with people (men or women) checking me out at the gym. Makes my work out seem that much more worth it. 
Right above Australia.
I just went through this argument with someone I know.  Here's what happens at pools - there are time slots. The slots cater to specific people, e.g. elderly, children, special needs, athletes, etc.  The idea of women-only hours is just another slot so people are more willing to go to the pool. Elderly people do not want to swim with screaming crotch fruit, nor do athletes want to constantly be checking if there's an old person meandering into their lane. Parents also do not want someone swimming practice laps to accidentally run into their spawn.  There is now a Muslim Women Only slot at many pools in Toronto, because it is against their religion to be seen by a man in a state of undress. I don't see the issue with this, but a lot of people seem to think it's a problem.  **Why is another slot in a timetable full of slots an issue?** It doesn't matter what the slot dictates - that's just how pools *work*. If you have a child and show up at the pool during certain hours, *you will also be turned away*.
There's a guy that goes around to bars and sues them for ladies night.  Makes $500 every time.
Yes, but you can't do one without the other. The guy in the article says he would be satisfied if his membership rates simply reflected the fact that he gets less out of his membership than a woman does. 
Not sure about that. At least half the comments I hear at work between men talking about their last gym trip are about women's arses, or saying how the fatty in front of them made them want to vomit. The other comments are usually about how amazing they are in the gym.
Honestly, every time I go to my gym I get harassed. And it's always when I'm doing squats. I don't feel like I should have to switch gyms just because a handful of people are inconsiderate assholes. If my gym did this, I would definitely take advantage.   No, not every man does this. But I go to the gym to workout, not be hit on. I try and make it clear by wearing headphones and being dismissive, but that doesn't stop anyone. You aren't the one being harassed, so you don't see it as a problem. But when you're trying to get through a tough workout and someone interrupts you with god awful "advice" just to talk to you, it gets extremely frustrating.
&gt;and are fighting against those institutions for equal treatment of both sexes  I'm sure. I see "slut walks" but I don't see feminists trying to get family courts fixed.
*"unattractive women"* really? Interesting, I've always wondered how far does this go?  So if I'm fat and ugly, can I sue a modeling agency for discrimination? Can I sue Harvard (or its UK equivalent) for discriminating against my intelligence?
Wh-.. I don't even... where the fuck do these people come from?
&gt;Some organisation appears to have asked the gym  Now, is it not likely that said org. is a womens' rights "feminist" organization, staffed, run, and supported mostly by women?
It's a council-funded gym, and women-only hours are often put in place for some Muslim (and Orthodox Jewish, I think - not certain, though) women to use the facilities in them. Almost every single council-run swimming pool has women-only hours, but he's not suing them, is he?  Also, it's the Daily Mail - why is everyone taking their bait anyway? ಠ_ಠ
Mirpuri here.That is the biggest pile of garbage i have read today. I have 7 siblings and every single one of us has a university degree. I have a brother and sister who are qualified GP's, another sister who is an accountant, brother whose a lawyer etc. Then i can point at my extended family who have similar backgrounds. This dude wreaks of class discrimination. The Mirpuri community were predominantly villagers and a lot of people have not shaken of this sense of superiority. The fact that this idiot received so much approval for sweeping generalizations is depressing. What this moron also isnt telling you is that Mirpuri's (or people from Kashmir pakistan side) make up the majority of Pakistanis in the UK. If a rape is going the be committed the probability is that it will be from a certain group of pakistanis as we make up about 80% of Pakistanis in the UK. Does that mean that we are prone to committing acts of rape? Or does it mean that stupid people do stupid things. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/British_Pakistanis#Demographics As for this morons statement about uneducated: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/British_Pakistanis#Education 
Nobody is saying this. The whole article is a straw man, a general manager said no because he didn't feel like changing policy over a single complaint, not out of "misandry". If a number of people were interested in men-only hours, I don't think anyone would complain.
This is all your classic, 'fight sexism with sexism' case. In this situation women are given superior treatment, yet they say it is to protect their rights, which only hurts the rights of others. 
._.   That made my brain cramp up...
Doesn't make financial sense to duplicate most of the equipment and then have only a portion of the members use it.
It's okay if you can't find it.
Yes, I agree with you. I would consider myself a feminist as well (although a male one), as well as an egalitarian (because I believe some focus should also be placed on men's rights, such as on issues like this. Admittedly less pressing matters, especially in first world countries, but important nonetheless).
It's a fact that the minority muslim immigrant population disproportionately contributes to rapes in europe.  Get your head out of your ass.
Well to be fair I think that mothers put significantly more time and resources into the child if you consider gestation. I'm not meaning to discredit the role of fathers, but rather to give credit to the mothers. 
During SHTF, it's supposedly, I give you some bullets, and you give me all your ammo and supplies. 
Article from 3 years ago on the front page of world news.
So you think that people who live in Michigan make up a unique ethnicity? What if a Chechen moves to Michigan and becomes an American citizen?  Edit: comment no longer valid due to correction.
http://i.imgur.com/FxB3m.gif
Well, let's assume for a minute that the culture surrounding the way we treat women is a problem (I'm not saying it isn't a problem, just that that's not the main point of discussion for what I'm saying).    Responding to that by, in this case, segregating the gym isn't the right response, I don't think.  It's just treating a symptom of the problem.  And it is an easy, simple response, but that doesn't make it the right response.  It's difficult, but wouldn't it be better to try to take care of the problem itself?  Having a time where the gym can only be used by women doesn't actually help the root of the problem at all (in this case, the way women are treated in general), and it creates more problems.
Brazil...south of France. right? :)
poor_yorick, please help settle something. Are you a fat male frustrated virgin? Or are you a fat unattractive female who can lure men to stick it in her once in a while, but never to commit?  I await your answer.
Or they've been conditioned into doing so.
South Korean society is not a blood thirsty revenge state. They know how brain washed the North Koreans are. It's called compassion. 
Chechyans. Chechnon. What the hell the difference? As long as I don't gotta pay them, I don't care where my blacks come from.
have you ever heard of gay men, who will stare at men, or lesbian women, who will stare at women (maybe you)?  Does that make you uncomfortable? Should we make special hours for everyone to feel the most comfortable at all times?  Won't happen. So why should we care about your comfort?
I can't be the only one who thought it was funny that the guy who told Americans to "open a geography book once in awhile" was named 'Mirca'
Fucking dumb bitch. 
It took me a few seconds.  Then I bust myself laughing.
So the government will be able to ask Facebook to share the data that users have already voluntarily posted publicly on Facebook. So what?
adorable  except for the coldplay background music 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
except the US
[deleted]
I don't think people caught your sarcasm. :(
I look foward to the day when we can call a spade a fucking spade.   Islamic **people** are not the problem.  **ISLAM** is the problem.  Any bullshit set of beliefs can be used to justify things, but Islam is unique in that it sets so many precedents for violence in the history of it's bullshit warlord false prophet and it's suppression of basic desires, both of which result in violence and rape respectively.  
Everywhere has racism against some group or another. 
Come to New Zealand! I won't lie and say we don't have racism here but I guarantee we won't have something against you for just being Eastern European. It is pretty multicultural in Auckland here.
Should probably let everyone know what a twat Harper is before its too late
perhaps if they were running in a marathon, there would have been more overage 
And don't drink Fosters 
These women are AIDS infested. 
[deleted]
They are the real victims!
Oh, end the fucking yawnfest, Kim. You're boring us.
Caught me. :( Didn't even bother with the source until I read old_french_whore's comment... And even then I only hovered over it to see the url.
Well done.
Well, skyline, you have already forfeit any credibility you may have had after your first comment here, so I suggest you do yourself and us a favour by refraining from further degrading the quality of the discussion.
I can.  It would be amazing.  Downvote if you want, but I am in favor of million dollar organs if they can be paid for.
I think when China has an earthquake and only 160 die, you call that a success.
To be fair there are like a thousand translations. 
It's a bit normal in Japan because of high seismic activity but not at all in the rest of the areas.
Haha if you replaced 'white people' with 'Muslims' you'd get upvotes instead...funny how this subreddit works...
America's good deeds in the world far outweigh its negative acts.  America never claims to be a moral authority. And really, who can?
Its all the edge of a plate, and relatively close in proximity to each other.  One part releases stress, the parts gain new stress and will shift until its more stable.  Its all usually fairly small changes.
Good point. I'm sure they feel much better now 
You came to the wrong website. Here, all that goes on is *anti*-Americanism. Trying to be constructive towards the country doesn't get nearly as much Karma.
Why would Muslims be going to a christian school in the first place? Are there no state public schools in the UK ?
what? why germany? that just seems kind of random. Why should they or anyone in the EU have moral authority?
Whatever anyone might believe, I wish humanity as a whole would at least value freedom, including freedom of religion.
[deleted]
This is what i asked you:  &gt;since when Europe had sympathy with Chechnya?  no offense but do you know difference between America and Europe? that huge ocean between them?
News flash: nobody gives a fuck what you think because you're an atheist. As a human being. Who also coincidentally doesn't believe in God but believes most other atheists on this site think they are the grace of all human opinion
I don't even see how this is news 
[deleted]
Wow, these comments.  Reddit really is the biggest collection of self-righteous cuntrags on the internet.  You people are the worst.
http://imgur.com/3Gpey
http://www.amazingsuperpowers.com/2013/03/real-lady/
Why is it the correct response in China to dig in their heels and maintain to people that their beliefs are stupid/wrong (though put more diplomatically), but the correct response here is to give up and legalize harmful substances? We all know marijuana shouldn't be illegal, but we have good cause to outlaw most of the others. They tend to harm the individual and make them dangerous/unstable. Why don't we explain to people that through their little 'hobby', they're indirectly responsible for the torture and death of many thousands? Explain to people how they're harming themselves and society by indulging? Edit: My point is that this is basically what China is doing to the folk medicine users who want their "illicit substance".  Really, I think the drug war is stupid, but I have zero respect for the vast majority of stoners who are so selfish that their habit is worth the lives/livelihoods of the millions of people who are sacrificed to establish the network to get them their product. Even with marijuana, unless they know the supply chain intimately (unlikely, unless growing it themselves), they should abstain until they're able to successfully lobby for its legalization.
They hate deviant sex acts, and everyone who does them.  Regardless of them actually hurting anyone, because in the legislator's minds its only a matter of time.
So brave.
We only hate Christianity, there I said it. 
At least it was a natural occurrence...
Eh.  I'm actually proud of my ignorance of superstition.  
Yeah, all Americans are fat and stupid, too, right?
"We don't need no education! We don't need no thought control!"
Im not talking about the Islamic world, my focus is specifically on Western Europe pre and post Rome's fall, which witnessed a dramatic social changes, mostly for the worse.
I try to use the principle of charity in online arguments.
Or, in some cases, feeling. :(
Let's say all religion all the time attempts to disregard empiricism. It still only applies to *the people that choose to believe in it*. The existence of religion does nothing to prevent me, you or anyone else from thinking critically or conducting experiments. Yes, sometimes religion comes in context with science and we have to fight to make sure that science prevails. However, I would rather live in a society that has to battle religion that one that is comfortable eradicating it from the planet.
No there is a lot of scientific controversy over his methodologies and his only supporters are scientits that are also funded by his funding group Pioneer. The Huffington post presents commentary on most of the articles on the topic and provides insight. It is certainly valid in this case. The reddit comment is also valid because it presents the error with associating any characteristic to an entire ethnicity which is what you are trying to do. The genetic variation is too great among populations and gene mixing only increases that. I also presented other peer reviewed articles but you only point our the ones that you think are the weakest. Specifically the one talking about IQ gap black-white shrinking and adopted black children having better IQ.   Edit:misunderstanding of one of the sources. My point still remains though as the scientists who did the study weren't able to reach a conclusion due to biases and errors introduced through their methodology and uncontrolled factors yet the scientists in this thread can?
Yeah, bullshit.    Most of the detainees are Yemeni, and the President of Yemen has not just said he'll take them back, but strongly criticized the US for not giving them back.  
China's government reminds me of the US Republican Party. Their response to every accusation, sometimes preemptively, is to turn it around and say, "I know you are but what am I!?" as if we're all back in the third grade. If you want to know what either the Chinese government or the GOP have been doing wrong, watch to see what they accuse others of doing.
I say it wouldn't hurt to try something!
So where can we get his porno collection?
[deleted]
I would like to see the citation for 24/25 are Muslims, not that I don't believe you I would just like closure.  And doesn't Sweden have Radical Feminists on the case?
[deleted]
that's a strong claim. got some sort of a citation or backing for that, chief?
Well that is that for those that are superstitious. But what about those that are a little stitious like myself? 
Hahahahahahahhahahah holy shit bro. You really had me going there for awhile. A+ 10/10 would be trolled again. You gave it away with the "misandristic bullshit" line.
Possibly.  Chances are a portion of the root system is still somewhat attached.  But even if it's partially connected, you'll still expect to see a large portion of the tree die.
Wait! There's still [hope](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/1cqlc4/what_is_some_of_the_deepest_darkest_corners_of/)!
The Jews brought the slaves over actually.  Here is a Jewish historian's admission to it:  http://www.blacksandjews.com/MarcLeeRaphael.html
I'm pretty sure that Obama was elected and took office before 2010.  He had over a year to close Gitmo and do away with the detainee program like he promised during his campaign.  He did not.  Therefore he lied and broke his campaign promise.  Keep trying...
Uprising or Insurgency?  People try to rise up against their governments all the time...they are called terrorists.
Considering that water is not currently a right, how would privatizing it further be fucking the poor (any more than they are already being fucked)?  I don't necessarily take a side in this debate, but I do not understand a lot of the arguments made against this.
You've obviously never lived off of a well.
Thank you for the link, much appreciated.  And yes, I totally agree that simple infections are probably going to be the epidemic that we have tried to pin on every new disease we find.  We became far too complacent when a simple pill or injection cured whatever ailed ya.  I really lucked out with my staph experience, it was anything but pleasant but other than a fair amount of pain and a bit of scarring I emerged unscathed.  As far as staph goes, I consider that to be scot-free.  I don't wish it upon anyone, and may neither of us or anyone we know have to have any dealing with it again.
Exactly, AIPAC and whatnot seem powerful, but they really can't affect American policy.  What is American policy?  Remove America from the situation, figure out what happens, then you know American policy by its effects.  Few countries can stand against the International Community, i.e. the faculty of Georgetown and Stanford.  Russia, China, and Iran can.  Bashar Al-Assad is trying, but, Obama, Clinton, and others don't appear to be capable of sending weapons to the terrorists.  If the United States had a king, the Israeli conflict would end immediately in one of a few ways, the king could declare what are the permanent borders, or declare that there is one state with whatever laws he chooses, but in any case the king would say "this is the permanent policy and no amount of terrorism will change it", and the terrorists would give up as they realize that the king meant it.  But since we have these elections all the time, the terrorists are hoping that if they can break enough stuff then after the next election they will be given more concessions.  And it's a reasonable hope, considering that Israel was pressured diplomatically into giving the Palestinians some concessions ten years ago.  Pressured by who?  The International Community, i.e. the United States and puppets.  If the US is forcing Israel to give concessions, how is the US on Israel's side?  Here's what happens if Israel is allowed to do what it wants to.  It sends in the police to Gaza, permanently, violating everyone's rights and the sovereignty of Palestine, and then they can't make rockets any more than you can.
Name? :D
No Im commenting on the fact that even if a jew brought slaves into america, white people still wanted slaves. 
that's a pretty tenuous reason
lmao. I haven't been on Reddit in a week and the NK threats are exactly the same. 
I don't want anyone to get hurt or killed... but fucking shut up already about it. Just do it. I'm getting sick of hearing of North Korea threatening everyone. NUT UP OR SHUT UP. 
Provide a less biased news source. 
[deleted]
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BHUKBaFetJY  anybody interested in this conflict should watch this...  It really captures the emotional feel of the situation there.
Not today.
The article notes 300 civilian deaths. 300 people. That's everyone you had homeroom with from Kindergarten to Tenth Grade killed in a single week.   But somehow it's not that morally repugnant because the people decided to revolt against an authoritarian mass murderer?  You're pathetic. Especially considering your username. You're much more a Javert, making excuses to cover up atrocities because you think that's just how the world works.  
[deleted]
What is with the 'quotes' around raped?  I would read that as unbelievability or sarcasm like, "Reddit 'hates' cats."  Nothing in the story indicates that she wasn't actually raped.
I was just using your argument, either way this title is way over sensationalized, not true and has many valid arguments.
Meh.   Sometimes the mob ruins your life.  Sometimes the mob buys you pizza.
I read that and almost scrolled past, but then decided to try it.   10/10 would read again my friend. Excellent job. 
but that's japanese writing
North Korea's threats remind me of trying to get off during a bad hand job.
[deleted]
Sorry. I meant that as a question not an argument.
And yet, this won't get national coverage because "only" five lives were lost. How many more lives need to be taken before Washington gets their heads out of their asses and listens to the majority of Americans who support stricter gun laws that would not take away from our second amendment rights? Isn't one life lost one too many?
Can someone explain what's going on in the video? Is he blowing himself up inside of the boat?
They're getting worse and worse. This shit is digusting.
Nah if im unlucky enough for a serial killer to target me, then oh well really lol
Why do you say that?
Yes, of course they do. But you can't just que up a photo and use facial recognition software. It's not that sophisticated yet. Especially with blurry, grainy side shots of people. A computer can only do so much. An analyst actually has to comb through the files. Something has to draw their attention to it. What is the connection with these brothers and terrorism? It was weak at best. We had no correspondence to suggest it. Only the Russians saying he allegedly met with a terrorist at a mosque. No pictures or recordings. And they were requesting further info from us. Because they knew they basically had nothing on this guy. Therefore, neither did we. 
Bullshit. You are a Bashar apologist. My entire family is made of refugees because of Bashar al Assad. He is a mass murderer. He has gone after children, people standing in bread lines, and will destroy Syria to keep his throne.  He deserves a Gaddafi-style ending. 
Agreed. After reading the testimonials and looking at the life of these two that has surfaced, you can hardly blame the FBI for letting them go. How many of us would seriously say that they were a threat from looking at their lives up to this point? One was a pro boxer who was just moderately religious, the other was an average teenager who happened to be Muslim. What were the FBI supposed to find? We don't even know that they had even thought about doing this 6 months ago 
If FBI had only used that intel to apprehend Boston bombers before they started planting more bombs. If MIT guard didn't catch them, they could have exploded more bombs. Police and FBI couldn't even find the second guy who was about to die without outside help. No surprise that questions are being raised.
&gt;not the whole country.  Ever read that story about those Afghan villagers that came to a UK medic asking for medical assistance?  Turns out a significant portion of the male population had penile and anal gonorrhea infections.  The medic treated them and advised them not to have unprotected butt sex if they wanted to avoid this in the future.  They scoffed at him and said "no no no, it was because we mixed our black and green teas this morning."   I mean, you're right, it's not the whole country.  But an unexpectedly huge proportion of the population is backwater, uneducated people.
Also, Russia was probably concerned about a connection to Chechen terrorism. The FBI most likely wasn't assessing a threat against the USA, and when no credible relation to anti-Russian terror was detected they had nowhere to go and moved on to other things. 
Finally a job that is made for me.   Do you feel desentized and or apathetic to the world?  Let me read 4chan for you. *  *service also available in switzerland
I took an Islamic Jurisprudence course in college (I know....sounds lame, "Well sir I took a college class AND....") and I recall being surprised by how peaceful and equitable the Qur'an is.  It's sad that Americans are not better educated about this.  I think it's just like any other religion - you add humans to the equation, and it just becomes a medium through which they can further their personal and often patriarchal/hierarchal agenda. 
yes
Soylent Green is people!
I don't know it may doesn't look bad, but  &gt; The climate of the Gobi is one of great extremes, combined with rapid changes of temperature of as much as 35 °C (63 °F). These can occur not only seasonally but within 24 hours.  Better pack in two pair of socks (one for cold, one for warm weather)
i think you're full of shit. i can hear the whiny white guilt in everything you type.
&gt;you are a hysterical, pseudo-intellectual ass.  Uh huh.  &gt;you are getting ridiculously angry with people who have not wronged you.  Ah. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Guantanamo needs to be shut the fuck down.
Good point and I agree, needing to beg for food shows that the government know there is a big problem. Anyways thanks for the chat :)  Ps sorry for someone going through and down voting you. That is very childish..
Actually, Yemen has previously stated that they didn't want detainees back and this is more of a political jab at the States. It doesn't change the fact that at the very least detainees cleared to be released should be released hastily. 
[deleted]
Groceries don't cost $3000+. Not even in Melbourne, and shit is damn expensive here! 
Reminds me I need to watch this one again:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2BfPgF4DF-Q
That's precisely my point. I'd actually prefer the privacy invading government to not have the kind of power they do have in that regard, but the fact is they do and in this case they didn't use it to the extent which they apparently should have. Why make a mockery of all of us by destroying our rights and then not using it to the extent at which they could when they supposedly are alerted to a potential terrorist.
&gt;horrifying civilian massacre   Why is this propaganda still being repeated? 
Interesting that the top Headline "Breaking News" is still about the Boston Bombers...
NO
Defeatist.
Sup bitch. At least you know your place. Bitch.  Down boy.
That's the thing: It seems like China might be about to call their bluff. I don't know if the current premier is just more steely eyed than his predecessor or if some internal change in China has caused this, but they are certainly letting this run of saber rattling go on for much longer.
Here is the CBC link too http://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/story/2013/04/22/pol-terror-plot-ontario-quebec-arrests.html
Oh, I see.
Quite a lot of people. We're seen as an enemy by many for our support of the USA and Israel.
CISPA what? Who cares
Taking world polithics to another level.
&gt; -Elements of Iranian Al-Qaeda  Wut ? ~~selfi groups~~ ^(sorry mixed that with the Sinai Al-Quadea (the more known is a sunni group)) sunni group from Iran ?.   are you sure they don't mix something up  ?
This is /r/worldnews  I'm surprised they didn't write it off as an American news event and delete the post.
Obama attempted to close Gitmo but was blocked by Congress.  Congress is the real problem here.  Always has been.
not completely ùs centric Canada is heavily affected as data packets are already being collected and viewed down south (USA), infringing on Canadian sovereignty. Further specific websites will also be providing data if cispa continues
He also went to the "22th" conference in Cancun. That's gotta count for something
err this really depends on where you live. i live just outside of Toronto and the only person i know who speaks french more than knowing random words is my friend.. who is from France.
Why doesn't the US understand that we create more enemies by violating the Geneva conventions that we signed and agreed to?    Git-mo made me feel like shit when I was in the military carrying around a Geneva Conventions Identification Card. How are we supposed to have a moral superior voice in the UN when we don't adhere to it ourselves? It was made me feel shameful for my country.
&gt;Nobody but the ignorant and trolls are trying to tell white people they should be ashamed of being white.  Do you have any idea how many times I've been accused of being a White Supremacist, simply because I have feelings that don't match up with SJWs or the SRS crowd? To me, when I get shamed for enjoying my culture and heritage, that IS them trying make me feel guilty for it.
Hey thanks for the pocket change -Haiti 
Why will Turkey want to join now when it's economy is one of the fastest growing compared to any EU country. 
If this was a woman I doubt you would be joking about her getting raped for years. 
I joke!
You've pretty much summed it up; damned if we do, more damned if we don't.
Pretty sure it's on the record somewhere that to the extent they did Islam, Tsarnaevs were Shiite.
Now kiss! 
How do you know that? I'm still trying to figure out where these figures came from. I know politicians are corrupt but they have to at least maintain the *appearance* of somewhat ethical conduct, right?
Its not good for you if you lower yourself to a troll. Both your comment and the one above you is hateful and ignorant. Yours is probably more so because that is the state of their community not a choice.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Says the guy who killed his parents.
He made and produced child porn, and sold it, i have no idea why its not in the article. 
He also said it's not as serious as rape.  As if raping a child doesn't count as real rape?
I missed this story. What's going on?
Work those gluts
The slavery that occurred in the United states was particularly brutal and prolific.
Glad to hear that.  This whole "where are all the moderate Muslims? Why aren't they speaking up" bullshit will probably persist in the media and amongst right wing die hards though.  It's a phenomenally stupid question. Moderates are called moderates because they are just that...they are quiet and keep to themselves. What do you want us to do? Hold daily protests against terrorism? Isn't it enough that, for every Muslim bomber who blows himself up, there are 999.9999 million others who don't.   If we all were homicidal maniacs, things would be a lot more complicated, let's say...
I am curious as to whether you know this first hand though. I'm assuming you've found all this stuff in the Bible yourself. I do remember the Old Testament was pretty hard going but I don't remember reading about killing people for eating shellfish.
It would be worth it. We'd have actual analysis instead of infinite mutations of some joke/pun. We'd have people building proper argumentative technique instead of comments like "OP IS FAGGOT" and "correlation does not imply causation"
If common sense was all people needed or wanted to live, there would be no holy books telling people who to hate and when to kill.
Are you saying that since they're extremists they can't be considered Islamic since they take the teachings of the Quran in a different way?  Sure the ideology is somewhat different, but they still follow the teachings of the Islamic faith. It's like trying to say the bad kid in a class is not really a part of the class because he doesn't pay attention all the time and learn everything, and just causes trouble for the other students.
"Bukhari :: Book 6 :: Volume 60 :: Hadith 79  Narrated 'Abdullah bin Umar:  The Jews brought to the Prophet a man and a woman from among them who had committed illegal sexual intercourse. The Prophet said to them, "How do you usually punish the one amongst you who has committed illegal sexual intercourse?" They replied, "We blacken their faces with coal and beat them," He said, "Don't you find the order of Ar-Rajm (i.e. stoning to death) in the Torah?" They replied, "We do not find anything in it." 'Abdullah bin Salam (after hearing this conversation) said to them. "You have told a lie! Bring here the Torah and recite it if you are truthful." (So the Jews brought the Torah). And the religious teacher who was teaching it to them, put his hand over the Verse of Ar-Rajm and started reading what was written above and below the place hidden with his hand, but he did not read the Verse of Ar-Rajm. 'Abdullah bin Salam removed his (i.e. the teacher's) hand from the Verse of Ar-Rajm and said, "What is this?" So when the Jews saw that Verse, they said, "This is the Verse of Ar-Rajm." So the Prophet ordered the two adulterers to be stoned to death, and they were stoned to death near the place where biers used to be placed near the Mosque. I saw her companion (i.e. the adulterer) bowing over her so as to protect her from the stones."   &gt; The only quote there is stating that if you are forced to disown your faith then it is ok to lie as long as in your heart you are still a believer.   Yes that's the only quote. By by analogy with can make all sorts of assertions as to what you are allowed to lie for. If for instance you are spreading Islam are you allowed to tell disbeliever completely false lies. Some Muslim scholars think so. The seed is there for all sorts of duplicitous behaviour in the name of preserving and spreading their religion.
Nothing...though using "US" instead of "America" was enough to get flak. Also, my extreme dislike of American "cheese." It's not cheese. 
Thats like all religions, vague enough to be taken different ways. 
Deportation of people trying to do this.   The cool Muslims can stay. 
If Germany can stay out of it then we in Europe should be fine.
There is more violence coming out of the Qur'an than the old and new testaments.  "Religion" is like the word "Sports". Some are relatively harmless like Badminton and some are more dangerous like MMA. They are both called sports but they are very different.  You can make comparisons between religions. But t hey are all not equal! Some are far more violent and crazy than others.  
Calm down, nobody was claiming it's a country. Call it a region if it makes you feel better. The place where Kurds live and are a plurality/majority.   Changing borders is always a tricky proposition, better not go there... but treating Kurds better and giving them some rights (instead of gassing them like Saddam did) would be a good start for *all* the countries they happen to live in. 
Alright heres my story. Theres this somewhat known dj in Rio De Janeiro that was turned over to the police by his girlfriend for having a bunch of kiddy porn on his computer. He got sent to bangu which is the super intense prision in rio, aparently he got butt raped so much the judge let him out early.  hes back to djing now and has a twitter and everything. It's kind of fucked up. 
Read this morning, not much to add except that everyone should remember that these cases need to be treated on an *individual basis* no matter how strongly you feel for the subject. Everyone in this thread just wants to blanket "lock'em all up" or "send them all to therapy" and that's the last thing you want to do. I acknowledge that some of these people might just be bad people, but generalizations will either cause insane people to be punished for being insane or sane people being left unpunished, both extremely undesirable.  I agree with everything else, well put.
White Phosphorus isn't even remotely in the same league as Sarin gas. 
What a nice thing to say!
LE LEDDIT xD xD xD  here is the real map  http://i.imgur.com/PpXe6dP.jpg
This is a really terrible article about a really interesting subject. It's a shame he doesn't really try to find any answers and instead writes about anecdotes that never happened and *really* outdated English (British) stereotypes.
Not to mention gentle river otters populating our streams and cheerful beavers building our homes.
did we?
What are you talking about?   Those pallets of cash were stolen; Now shut up and drink your victory gin.
Yeah, AQ has been known to do that as well, you know.
From what I understand NK has a lot of spies acting a pizza delivery drivers, janitors, teachers, etc. who are in South Korea awaiting orders from the NK leadership.  I would not be surprised if this was a propaganda effort by NK agents in South Korea, despite (or maybe because of) the hilariously inept MO.  
I figured. Pedophiles who don't get that being sexually attracted to children is precisely the desire to sexually violate children are not "safe", and any pedo who willfully puts themself in power over children make it abundantly clear they don't actually care about the safety and wellbeing of children.   Edit: looking through his comments, he also thinks child porn is totally ok. Fucking sick piece of shit.
I usually just minimize that thread and move on but hey, each is own.
A whole bunch of Stepford Wives looking church going families in the "protests" with very neat clothes and hairdo's...  All the men in there actually look like they would be happier in a gay bar sitting on the laps of a leather-clad mustachioed man
He may be a son of a bitch but if we help him he will be OUR son of a bitch. Id rather him than Al Qaeda.
Maybe where you live, but that's not the biggest issue in France.
Outstanding.  This is why peer review is so important...
to be honest, China has never faired well against Japan
Sure. Right after I stop eating all of these cows, chicken, and fish.
Challenge accepted.  I'll let you know how it goes.
Exactly, animals can't consent so that doesn't work, but I have to agree with you. I personally see no point in marriage besides the fact that it deals with hospital visitation, but for consistency purposes consenting adults are consenting adults, and should be allowed to marry as they wish.
How? Say I download a brutal Dash Cam video in which a man dies and watch it in the privacy of my own home. Does that act in and of itself create demand for Dash Cam death videos? Does it in any way support the further production of Dash Cam death videos? It does not. All I am doing is downloading a bunch of ones and zeros depicting a crime committed by an unrelated third party. 
Its weird that it same sex marriage was illegal until now. Is there any good reason not to allow same sex marriage??
Well, a man needs to eat for the day while he learns to fish, but welfare programs do need to learn how to follow through with the teaching part, less they are just wasting fish.
wow, just wow
I don't think that I've done that fallacy.  There's a difference between general hypothetical jokes like " Statistically... 9 out of 10 people enjoy gang rape."  And laughing at a specific person for getting raped. 
Negligible refers to amounts so small that they can be ignored. These people are not ignorable, otherwise no one would have asked Obama to produce his birth certificate.
It wouldn't be.  NATO and the EU are two separate entities.  Its a German defense minister saying this crap, so the validity of the statement has me confused as well, but I'm reasonably certain its mostly posturing.
My God, my turn to grammar nazi someone (after countless times I've been corrected in English, hehe):  *à voir  *finit  Le français *standard*, linguistiquement parlant, n'existe pas. Cela impliquerait que le français parlé ailleurs qu'à Paris serait un dérivé, ce qui n'est pas le cas.
Good!
Except for the religion thing.
You're not even good at this.
&gt; Do you or do you not agree Islam is the religion that he founded? So how can the founder of a religion not speak for it? **Regardless of whether you like or dislike what he says?**
[deleted]
Valid point, unknown_poo.
Maybe they haven't heard about the American Navy, The USA gets it's vig, one way or another.
One could wonder how decisive a world-wide nuclear conflict could truly be though.
If Kurds come into power, they will rely on brutal oppression of other Iranian ethnic groups to rule. Kurdish uprising can be in par with Mongol conquest. 
I took a suspicious shit this evening. Should I call the FBI?
Find private tutors in Manchester now. Simply register with LCF Tutors and our Maths and English tutors contact you directly, through our site messaging system! 
it may be immoral, and wrong, but it is wrong direction yes. Why? Like I said not everyone can be habby - this is not Utopia unfortunetaly :/ I mean you can give rights to anyone, but sonner or latr they will suffer in other way. Example, (again, I mean no offence to anyone!) we're giving rights to homosexual people (which in theory is great, since we're now equal and all this) but in practise is not that superb, especially now. There are a lot of people who hate this (gays) and will bash the minority even more at this moment. Again, Why? Oh just because they will think it is not just and will continue hating this group - because the process of education the society was too short and the "hate groups" are still big.   it is the same with every other minority not only homosexuals.   I can not stress this enough - I am not against and please do not take any offence. 
I wondered myself and after some googling, you can [try and see!](http://cookpad.com/recipe/1655580) Cheers
If those stats are correct, and I have no reason to doubt them, then yes, that makes the number a large minority. Don't get me wrong, "radical anything" prone to violence should be addressed. Just be careful what we think about those not supporting terror too.
"A woman reads the Koran on a beach as people in bikinis sunbathe...".  Am I the only one wondering how many times you can read that book? 
I see. So *that's* why we owe so much to the Africans!
Chinese people also fondly remember the Japanese holiday in Nanjing.
Well, it depends on your point of view. They don't see it as a human right, and probably view it as a "real societal problem". They're protesting because they believe they are *right*, and that it's a worthy cause.  Most people will agree with you that one must stand up for what is right. It's just that what is right differs for a lot of people. I think civilisation is, if anything, the struggle to get everyone to agree on what "right" means. :)
&gt;Yay! Let's all run down the rabbit hole of 'tolerate what you get as long as even one person has it worse''  Here's the thing, there's a process set into play where you can go about decreasing it. Just don't go about bitching about it on reddit to seem cool and get upvotes.   The bulk of cops are assholes/pigs stories I hear sound like a bunch of teenagers bitching because 'they didn't let me smoke my weed maaaaan' or pointing at isolated incidents that they heard on the news and have no clear evidence of first person experience of.   Even the ones that can be fucked up to you (racist, corrupt tendency etc.) can't really do it because there are systems set in place and people have the power to make changes in the department by doing something constructive about it.   Bitching on Reddit about this makes this issue downplayed (if it really is a big deal; now that I get people saying a lot of cops are well meaning people especially). It just goes to show how spoiled some redditors are while downplaying any serious issues that might come up in the future.
&gt;"Another reason may be that they lack the confidence or ability to speak a foreign language."  As someone who currently lives in Japan, this drives me nuts. I have never expected my landlady to speak English to me. It's the tenant's responsibility to communicate in a way that the landlord can understand. Using "but we can't speak English!" as an excuse for racial discrimination is common in Japan, and it just doesn't fly when most of these foreigners speak perfectly good Japanese.
Do you know what level of encryption it is using?  128-bit, 256?  I don't trust that small of a cipher as I have seen videos talking about the current standard security experts are working on breaking is 768-bit. Therefore I use a vpn that allows you to connect using a 2048-bit sstp connection. The reason I assumed not all traffic was not encrypted is because some sites that you go to on there redirect back to http when you put in the address.  EDIT: according to wikipedia, tor does not encrypt the traffic   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tor_(anonymity_network)
&gt;but race is a very messy concept which does not reflect genetic truth. Put simply, race is a spectrum and is not 'real' from a genetic standpoint  You have ethnic groups which differ in terms of hereditary traits - isn't that a commensurate with a race.   &gt;You could not take a blood sample from an individual and tell with certainty their 'race' from any parts of the genome that actually code for proteins or otherwise control for behavior.   I thought we were able to determine with a reasonable level of accuracy the ethnic origin of an individual based on their DNA.   &gt;If we take away genetics then, we have culture.   I don't think we should in honest and frank discussions. I can understand why the subjects must be treated with the utmost tact due to its immense sensitivity, and the hurt it can cause certain ethnic groups. But I think it's undoubtedly a factor in the historical and future performance of different societies. 
Syrian rebels = islamic terrorists????
[deleted]
AFAIK there's law like those in most countries, they're just not enforced.
California über alles.
It both amuses and depresses me that you're serious.   You want a definition? Language. The ability to pass along information more complex then "I was here".
[deleted]
Right side is a damn fluid situation. In egypt, what would have been the right side? The secular military or take a risk on the brotherhood? 
Good point, but it's worth a try I suppose to check tgeir primary account at least.
"Good, clean Wi-Fi" is probably the most british thing ever said about technology.   
I'm pretty sure the reasons are not religious. They're political. People did not like Assad's regime. They rebelled. It's taken on religious dimensions but it is fundamentally a political conflict.   If someone killed a family member of mine I would fight for revenge. You sound like a pretty shitty family member. Rationality isn't always the "good" way.
bet madagascar is having a field day with this
Remember the Bamiyan Buddhas? What goes around comes around, and no doubt oil money can rebuild anything.
They wouldn't go there if they were properly integrated, AKA actual Dutchmen. 
So your saying we shouldn't leave a copy of simcity...?
Built by the same migrant Pakistani workers that built most of Saudi Arabia and Kuwait's buildings right??
I am not saying that you arent swedish,  you are.  But you are not an ethnic swede. 
The question is: Did boxing damage play a role in Boston bombings?  Sorry, but this is a dumb question
&gt; Yes, the Taliban were created by Pakistan mainly. Saudi Arabia and Iran **had their own groups** they funded within this.  So basically, Iran did not fund the Talibans, which is contrary to your statement before, which explicitly said "because [...] Iran, [...] helped create the Taliban.   Also, Iran has only ties with the Hazaras in Afghanistan, which, oh lord, had indeed also active democratic parties.  &gt; Iran is funding the Syrian army which it hopes will become radicalized like them in the future.  Let me phrase it this way. Fuck off with trying to bring Iran into this.  Reading your stuff again, you are one of those idiots who prefer anything over Iran, even if it may be a long secretarian conflict. Fuck you
Hmmmm...None? I think there were some protests.
The French in general aren't as religious as you think.  After years and years and years of wars and fighting over protestantism and catholicism they just dont care much anymore.
many people disagree with you.   the most interesting thing they found was a record of people's voices. maybe you don't have much interest in it, which is cool, but others do. 
There are a lot of chugs around where I live. Too bad we didn't finish the job. 
Austraria.
Don't worry, they still use them in the far future too in System Shock!
[Couldn't find the video, but here's the GIF.] (http://i.imgur.com/4cg0t.gif)  I found this in a time capsule from 1000 years in the future.
Pretty sure gettin gay is the only proven way to stop the future from happening.  
&gt;even though this really can't work  i really liked that proof you gave me  &gt;is a good use of taxpayer money  better than using it towards a defense force that is basically israel's lap dog  &gt;Delusional much?  Smug much?
Seems like any anti-intellectual movement always spurs itself from religion.
awww 
Gaddafi was the best thing to happen to [people of the same ethincity as Gaddafi].
[deleted]
Because white countries are for everyone.
They actually ~~teach in school that there was no genocide at all~~ imprison historians who speak unapproved truths about the genocide.  FTFY
Germany, UK, Holland, Belgium, Denmark, Czech, Austria = beer bellies.  Japan = Sumo Wrestlers.  
Look at the history of the time. Religion was still part of all cultures but the driving forces of the time (aside from the usual power politics) were nationalism and racism. 
Fucking op
Can you supply a summary?
Sure thing.  http://www.cs.uml.edu/~xinwenfu/paper/ICC08_Fu.pdf  https://blog.torproject.org/blog/one-cell-enough  How bit torrent compromises Tor http://arstechnica.com/tech-policy/2011/04/not-anonymous-attack-reveals-bittorrent-users-on-tor-network/    Also, do you think the government would want to blow their load regarding their ability to compromise Tor just for some drugs being sold? They have very much incentive to keep this ability discrete. 
If it's any consolation,[ he's very old and will likely die soon.](http://www.theonion.com/articles/when-youre-feeling-low-just-remember-ill-be-dead-i,31008/)
owned so hard
There's cultural backlash against the "always on"-mentality, over here, alongside with concerns over burnout etc, so many people continue to use things like their half an hour on the bus for reflection and staring through windows, instead of partaking in online rat races.   Sure, sometimes having mobile internet would be bloody useful, but those cases are so rare that I just don't see why I should upgrade. My handset did cost me 15 Euros, and either nothing per month or 1.50 Euros per month to only pay 20 cents for an hour-long call, and 20 cents for the first 100 SMS per day.
It is to you but here comes the awkward part, you're not following the same Islam, like all religion this is a matter of interpretation causing fragmentation and division.   &gt;[33:59](http://quran.com/33/59) O Prophet, tell your wives and your daughters and the women of the believers to bring down over themselves [part] of their outer garments. That is more suitable that they will be known **and not be abused.** And ever is Allah Forgiving and Merciful.  Let's not argue about 'bring down over themselves' but it does clearly imply if you don't the consequence is exposing yourself to abuse. I respect anyone who will ignore that for the sake of sanity and convenience or you can even place it in an historical context. But those that don't can't rely on your flexibility.
A rare mushroom from some folk story.
I find stories like this about Iran to be interesting. They have a very young population because (IIRC) the religious leaders pushed the people to have a lot of children after the revolution to create "soldiers for Islam". To get an idea of how young Iran's population is: Their median age is 27. The USA's is 37.   However, now those children are in their late 20s/early 30s and are very educated. They aren't really into the whole radical islam thing or the strange and archaic stuff like this that comes with it. I really wish more people could see these kinds of stories. Maybe people would think twice about bombing Iran if they saw that it's mostly just the government and religious leaders that are fucked up.   
[deleted]
&gt; "This case shows we urgently need to [...] scrap the Human Rights Act and start standing up for British democracy rather than kowtowing to the European court in Strasbourg,"  So mob rule should take preference when it takes a foreign court to tell you that you're attempting to breach human rights?
And yet this doesn't contradict anything I said. Please read my sentences in full.  I don't know what criteria you're using to define an act of Islamic terrorism, so it's hard to compare, but my general point is, that if there are even 300 acts of Jewish terrorism during that time, the rates are comparable.
[deleted]
Wasnt it anounced that there wouldnt be another Dali Llama?  too lazy to read the article
Hate to break the truth to you losers: the soldiers are farming for nuclear bombs for obvious reasons. The unexploded nukes are buried in the soil from the Korean War. You fools won't believe me because I tell the truth about North Korea's bright bright future as a nuclear state!
Sovereignty something something. This is total BS - a Canadian citizen in Canada is subject to Canadian laws and institutions and no one else. I pity the day government would ever try to push this through and survive a legal challenge or an election. Stupid Harper.   I get the distinct impression that Harper is just trying to pave the way to have private companies police our streets 'cause, you know - it'll save some money. Which I'm sure would go right back into the experimental lakes project. amirite? Anyone?
Are they bad? I mean it is bad to identify people as others and language has been used as a tool to dehumanize those with no power/minorities. I think we should steer clear of that kind of language as much as possible. Why are you against that?
It's because the dutch own 99% of all bikes in europe, so in average there are 2 bikes for 1 car. 
When people are that old, they should leave their position for the latter comers......this will save themselves a good reputation...and a feel-good retirement....mho... bazingaaaaa 
You try to make historical accuracy but you make mistake too you call ottomans arabs which make things worse ( just call things right name if you want people don't make historical mistake ).  PS : I just hope you made that mistake because you don't know well this region and the history and not for racist reason. 
&gt;Of course, we all have a right to be skeptical about any bird flu fear mongering. We know that both the WHO and the CDC routinely hype infectious disease for the primary purpose of pushing vaccine sales.  No
*Team North America - World Police!*
&gt;This may start off with good intentions  what good intentions would those be?  
[deleted]
We're not going to fucking take you over dude, we have plenty of maple syrup and moose minus the horns here.  
giffgaff
Do you think kurds should have the northen part of Iraq (without taking Turkey's land)? Or do you think they won't stop at that?  *To claify I didn't want to insult or anger you, I'm honestly interested about your opinion because I don't have friends from Turkey*
And you're not American, so why would you identify like one?
Remember the british aren't at fault at all despite their behavior during the famine, it's totally all America's fault, and the descendants in America totally didn't come from families that came to America because their only other option was be starved to death by the English! Totally shocking that they may have radical and distasteful views regarding the troubles! Fucking hell the anti-Boston circlejerk in this thread is incredible.
People who say they don't want to "waste their vote" on 3rd party candidates are delusional. Your vote is not the deciding factor in the election. Elections are cumulative. By voting third party you do two things:  1) send a message to the other parties that you stand for x principles, because they want your vote back  2) elevate the presence of third party candidates in public debate  The benefits of voting for a third party candidate that actually represents your views outweigh the irrational fear of being the 'cause' of Romney winning. The biggest trick the two-party system ever played was convincing people they were trapped in it.
1) However right he may be, still a dick thing to say.  Too soon, Komrad/Bro.  KomBro.  2) Isn't the Chechnya connection unravelling as they investigate more?  3) Daniel Graig could play Putin in a movie.  That would totally rawk.
JB is definitely talented. I don't think any rational person could argue otherwise.     I think you are arguing that his current music does not adequately showcase his talents. 
Not sure whether to upvote because people want to complain about Putin thinking he is just being a dick or Upvote because I 100% believe that he is correct in everything he said.....  Going for the 100% correct thing.
Yup,  no need for a passport while chained to the floor of  a FEMA facility.
Unlikely- aside from the fact that there's no evidence (or even probability) that he was alive when he was identified (by a police scanner) as a potential suspect, if a couple pissy posts which were up for a couple hours was enough to get this guy to off himself, that's just natural selection.
"...the pope still missing"
That was not terrorism, it was an insurgency. Just like the attack against our troops in Iraq were not terrorism. The attacks against the Iraqi population were terrorism. I think its pretty damn clear.
As high school taught me the Spanish are 3% away from la revolution
Look, I'm not saying it's not complicated and nuanced. It is. What I'm saying is don't pull that out as deflection when Boston and Boston's relation to the Troubles is similarly nuanced but is being treated unjustly black and white. 
k
It makes absolutely no sense to downvote this. Comparing units of distance to units of radiation makes no sense. My comparison is not to be taken as a literal mathematical statement, only as a figure of speech.  Like... What?
Because it wasn't in the original Patriot act, it was in the Patriot act II, which Obama passed.
shhhhh they want to blame obama solely for it all.  Cause apparently we dont attack Obama enough for them.. dont you know he only won cause /r/politics wont let you attack Obama. You do know this right?
[deleted]
Thankfully we have RT.com to report this stuff.  No one in Washington D.C. can influence RT.com.  Hack and leak the records of those who unethically attack the internet.  Then give the leaks to RT.com.
Unless Hagel came along and reported otherwise:  http://www.washingtonpost.com/world/middle_east/hagel-white-house-has-told-congress-that-syrian-regime-has-likely-used-sarin-gas-as-weapon/2013/04/25/26deaa2e-adbd-11e2-b240-9ef3a72c67cc_story.html
&gt;We don't   As in present tense.  You're making yourself look like an idiot. I'm well aware of Irish history. 
Let's not speculate.
oh i didn't realize the whole context. i am sorry.
I think you have a valid point but also underestimate people looking for someone to blame.
It seems reasonable until it starts preventing UK citizens from moving into their own country with a foreign spouse. I have three friends for whom this is true (their spouses are from South Korea) and it may eventually be true for myself and my partner (I'm a US citizen, he's from the UK).   1998 figures should not be admissible in current discussions of immigration. It's fifteen years ago, pre-9/11, pre-David Cameron, pre-global economic crisis, pre-[Amsterdam Treaty](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Amsterdam_Treaty). Furthermore the article you cited gives no sources except random Home Office employees, and actually highlights the tribulations of mixed citizenship couples.   &gt; The team's work includes making late-night calls to homes where it suspects a couple are living a fraudulent life.  What other group of law abiding people has to worry that the government might suddenly break into their house in the middle of the night and question their marital practices? It's a clear breach of privacy if the couple has done nothing wrong, and as far as I understand no warrant or judicial review is neccesary for such actions to be taken.   Claiming that there are 34,000 fraudulent marriages in the UK every year is poor conjecture. What evidence have you that the 1998 numbers are anywhere near what they are now? [At least one 2012 study](http://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/10.1111/imre.12003/abstract) suggests that the newer immigration marriage policies are based on a disproportionate focus on South Asian immigrants, and may be causing other groups to suffer.   It's an actual problem, and throwing out possibly biased numbers from over a decade ago smacks of a desire to "prove" a point regardless of how out of date the ideas behind it may be.  
Care to back up that charge?   Go through all my comments and find one antisemitic comment.
Don't try so hard, you might strain something, particularly, if you are practicing assignments for your remedial English class.   Your bombastic verbiage is merely mental limitation done dressed up like a dog's dinner.    
It's called [mob mentality](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Herd_mentality).
exactly what makes you think there is a link? that body has probably been in the river for a month, i cant imagine being stupid enough to believe there is a link
*Reddit sucks sometimes
[deleted]
am shocked that with so many redditors of indian origin none pointed out that sunil tripathi is a decidedly hindu name? the likelihood of a hindu-american using bombs to dispatch other americans is between nil and zero.  do note - i am not claiming that hindus can't go postal, just that the m.o. in boston was definitely muslim.
So now I'm confused. On 4/19 the Tripathi family mentioned Sunil was missing for "34 days"; I know this doesn't excuse Reddit's recent actions either:  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/04/19/reddit-sunil-tripathi-apologize_n_3117051.html
[deleted]
Does CISPA affect people who are not americans? If so how? How can a country make a law that can be enforced in other countries?
The problem is you consolidate and condense all of reddit, an online social media community, to the same journalistic standards of excellence as "the leader in News" CNN.  I don't think it's fair to think of the multitudes of reddit as ONE journalistic news agency that are held to the same journalistic standards.  It's apples and oranges.  Regardless, this news article makes a strong accusation that reddit is responsible for the missing students death prior to proper forensic analysis on cause and time of death.  This is certainly media sensationalism, unethical, and simply scum!
[deleted]
Has anyone proposed doing anything for this family? Maybe a "random act of reddit" where everyone sends flowers and their condolences or something?
Yeah. Why in the world would a news source try and spread the idea that loose cannons on the internet are bad news and the internet must be controlled and regulated.  That makes no fucking sense at all given the current legislation passing through congress.
Make it a meme, then it will get recycled for the rest of time till it pisses us all off.
[deleted]
It's official.   Reddit is way more dangerous than Infowars.
For how much reddit hates beiber they tall about him a lot
i doubted you would, but figured i would ask.  just being courteous.
Perhaps that is what they're looking to change with the uprising.
Just pointing out prejudice.  Come to Detroit and you'll see that a "foreign" name like Tripathi is very much American.
It's just an opinion.  I'm not saying Reddit is the only medium at fault. 
When it became easy news story to blame a group of people who's slowing dissolving said news organization 
they haven't sold those for years, i thought. the new hotness is deis' feminist shirts
Reddit seems to always have their nose up 4chans ass. They can do no wrong. Just put it in green text and everyone laughs and gives em a pat on the back.
It means NATO bombs falling on Damascus.
This is why I'm absolutely terrified of ever being in front of a jury.  If you think Reddit is bad, wait until you realize that lawyers often specially craft their testimony to seem a little hard for the average person to follow, but actually be easy...then everyone 'figures it out' and thinks they're some kind of super sleuth and that they're right, so the side that lawyer is representing MUST be right.  It'll be shit like, "The accused was actually in another country at the time the crime was committed.  There are multiple witness accounts, video, audio, a fucking live TV performance, and the President himself signed his alibi."  "But what about that shoe found at the scene?  That totally belongs to the defendant because he has a logo on his shirt that matches it, and no rational person would ever just leave a shoe behind, so obviously they're the murderer!"    It's shit like that.  Reddit isn't much different, really.  It's an interesting social experiment really.  Every time someone asks for proof, a subconscious question is asked: What do they want to see that will prove what I'm trying to prove?  Sadly, a lot of times this just ends up a circle jerk of 'what they want to hear' until every negative stereotype reddit can dream up is combined into one slobbering beast of a person, and that's obviously who did it.  I bet this guy that was found dead was shitty at parking, hated cats, and called everyone bro.
Those redditors who made posts about this young man cannot give enough money to wash away their guilt in this situation.  It was a few horrible people who jumped to conclusions based on their ignorance.  If you are going to play online-detective at least get your facts straight.
Apparently burning SUV's in Oregon is an act of terrorism as defined by the FBI  http://www.wired.com/beyond_the_beyond/2005/06/worlds_most_fam/  
You must not know how bad it is in Europe. Being PC doesn't apply when you are dealing with savages with a bronze age worldview.
I'll just quote someone else on this thread since you seem to be in denial. There's a huge difference between it being a possibility and 'almost certainly'. Being care free with words seems to be the 'in' thing around here lately. For example, being able to read has nothing to do with thinking before speaking or typing. You just think it sounds clever.   "Exactly. He went missing from March 15th, we don't know what happened. Missing people have turned up alive more than once. He was pulled out of water and identified through his dentures, which seemed like a normal procedure for someone who was in water, we still don't know much about his death. And yet, people are already so fucking sure that the redditors that witchhunted him aren't at blame because 'hey missing since march 15th and identified by dentures". Those redditors aren't absolved of their mistakes, they are still at fault for the pain that his family had to suffer because of the misguided witchhunt. Do we even see someone with the balls to apologise for their role in this incident?"
Most of us paying attention to the live feed of the police scanners heard it clearly indicated that they meant to burn that cabin down.
[deleted]
Brotha I know I lot more about it then you. Did you know Mon$anto produces deadly chemicals and was the one who created agent orange for the us government to be used in Vietnam? And now they patent practically every crop in America to the point where other countries do not accept our food because of how genetically modified it is and that they are not convinced from the limited amount of testing that it is safe for long term consumption. Tell me more about what you know.
I feel sorry for the girls who will only gain the ability to grow or retract their nails at will. 
People are posting lots of their personal information. If you think the family hasn't been bombarded with trolls you must be... oh wait. I'm sorry. You must be new to the Internet. Welcome.
Thanks mate.
So, it's okay for us to be "Reddit, the collective" when things go right but once things go bad we're "just a group of people."
Thanks for this pertinent info, Ifartdicks.
Talk about missing the point...
So that's what's going on! It happens all the time. 
[deleted]
You need to go look in the mirror, and re evaluate your life.
These people make me sick. If they they forced homo kids to kiss members of the opposite sex there would be a mass outrage right now.  
[deleted]
He was a bus driver.
It sounds scary at first, but couldn't you just crouch into a ball and bring your arms under your feet and then just swim up and grab the edge of the pool?
But he said rescue diver in the Navy... in which I have to assume Navy Seals are the Navy Seals of the Navy.
That was generally funny.  Kinda over there as well but you hit the bull's-eye for the most part.
You know most suicide bombers don't speak english next time say this: أنا أحب الرجال.
["...the Daily Mail reports"](http://www.cracked.com/blog/5-easy-ways-to-spot-b.s.-news-story-internet/)
But they also know exactly how dangerous poverty is.
evil rapist gets triangled. fantastic!
[deleted]
Nope, try another label.
[deleted]
Yes, but that's my point. What is mainline Sunni? What does that even mean? Which sect/school/tradition of Sunni because it subdivides as much as say Protestants. A large part of Christianity are Protestants, but you can't say that Lutherans are the same as Episcopalians who are the same as Anglicans.  
I like how Daily Mail doesn't care about blurring anyone's name or picture and Huffington Post directly linked to his (now deactivated) facebook page. Even Reddit has more decency than that.
You know, it says a lot about the world when "being a good person" is heroic and not just a pat on the back.
Regardless of the degree of truth behind this, it is a serious accusation that needs to be taken before the UN and properly discussed on the World Stage
America is pretty backward too.
and slowly the yanks begin to back away from whatever the hell they call it
I have to do this next week. The difference in the navy or at least my command is we have to fight "the red man" at the end. Basically the biggest guy on the ship decked out in full padding beating the crap out of you
It really baffles me why people don't check every source they read. I don't trust anybody on the internet. 
Silent Hill, anyone?
I would say the pride from knowing I have the ability to do all of those things with a military grade mace face would be completely worth it to me. Where do I sign up for this without actually having to go to war?
[deleted]
and it begun.
No. Terrorism targets the populations as a whole for the purpose of creating "terror" and instability.
The test was loyalty. He was loyal because he was willing to kill his son. God did not want him to kill his son. This happened once. Don't shoot the messenger 
Yes. In simple terms- if you were driving home from work and an IED blew your car up, then yes that's terrorism. But if you were in the military stationed in a country you are at war with and your Humvee is blown up, then that is an act of war. Because both sides are knowingly engaged in war against each other. 
I'm willing to bet that they picked up on that racism from their parents though.  
Just make invincible robots that walk up to people and take away their weapons. Iron Giant that shit.
I think the option of Independence is much more important than the people involved right now.  Many people seem not to like Salmond, not sure what the problem with him is. Sure I dont like Trump spending his money here but how could Salmond not entertain him? How could he take a position against foreign investment?
I have Vinyl of speeches and of the apollo 11 flight, it's not all music.   Edit: Hell I've got George Carlin and Steve martin on Vinyl too! those guys are historic.  
Ah, I'm not even aware of what my great grandfather's name was, I've just been told the story by my uncle. He was a part of "Gutta på skauen", was your grandfather too?
Humans are the only reproducing biological organism on this planet that have the ability to intentionally improve ourselves through technological means. All other organisms are guided by natural selection.   That capability has lead to quite a lot of bad, like war. That's just among humans. Now imagine if you introduce another organism that is able to improve themselves intentionally. That has happened only once in Earth's history that we know of - when homo sapiens ran into the neanderthals, and the neanderthals are now exinct. If we create superior self-replicating intelligent robotic life, we may face our own extinction.
I would pay you so much money to train a gorilla to play Hockey.
/r/MURICA would like a word with you
So this is what the North Koreans feel like...
&gt;Life expectancy is low  How many people have actually died doing this? Because I'm skeptical that it would be enough to drop life expectancy below that of other air force staff.
It's just not a very common word in any language. I doubt there's any country where it's more common than in Norwegian though - I've heard it occasionally there, but never in any of the other countries I've lived in. 
[deleted]
Religion of Peace my ass
This is so awesome!! My grandpa played a big role in the Norwegian underground during WWII and I couldn't be prouder of him.
oh its north korea again... its been a while
Party at Kim's house tonight!! We're gonna party like it's 1959!!
Right, because everyone will follow the book literally, all 1 billion plus muslims in the world. Got it. 
ITT: Brave internet warriors and Brave atheists. It's all one big bravery circlejerk in here.
Enjoy your islam, United Kingdom.
[deleted]
One of the best puns I've read all day =)
[Oh yeah? FUCK YOU, TOO!](http://youtu.be/UUHu_NN1apA)
It was. Historians, and our own generals agreed... Hence 50 years of cold war with 30,000 nuclear weapons pointed at each other. 
[deleted]
I said the end of the war. Read the fucking thread or stfu
[deleted]
Some muslims are fucking animals. Fuck religion, shit's FUBAR.
I respect your opinion. I know many people that feel that way. But in my opinion, he does not deserve to live a happy life after depriving so many of a happy life. This seems like a cultural/perceptual difference that is difficult to bridge. Let's just agree to disagree.
That could be a potentially hairy expedition, especially compared to where the Chinese are coming from.
More like the journalist picked one line from probably a few days (or even weeks) of trial so that it would get posted on social media and get lots of pageviews.   It might be repulsive, but as long as it is permissible, it is an argument that a lawyer is going to have to make at sentencing.
It was the guy with the googley eye wasn't it?
&gt; As I said. The US made it illegal to boycott Israel last time.   They only did that in the end of the seventies. The boycott was from 1948. If it didn't work for 30 years, it wasn't going to work even if the US didn't make it illegal.    &gt; Also this time it is working, every day more people join.  You really think you can gather more people than what the entire Arab world managed to do?   You seem to be a bit delusional, but whatever keeps you happy I suppose.    &gt; Finally if it doesn't work why are you here fighting against it?   If you think posting comments on reddit is "fighting", then I suddenly understand why you are so delusional about your boycott...   Like most people, Im here because thats the most entertaining thing I can do at work, unfortunately.  
I looked that up, all of the FAO's figures for North Korea are just estimates. Not a single one is officially known.
You Can Do it!
Impotent in the sense of powerless, unable to effect change, that sort of thing.    As to the research it would straight up be unethical to use somebody against their will.    After WW2 our parents and grand-parents agreed that it was a singularly vile and horrible thing to treat another human as simply a means to an end.  While I know it is easy to say "what the hell did they know, they hadn't even experienced true evil", the truth is that they had very good reasons to make those decisions and we should (from the comfort of our safety and prosperity) be careful we don't think that we know better than them.
It's not about preference, it's about what is more important from a global point of view.  In the grand scheme of things, more life depends on insects and bacteria.  Nothing really depends on humans except other humans, but humans depend on a lot of things which depend on those insects and bacteria.
Keep all the freedom America will give to NK from spilling over the border. 
How many Jewish births occurred? 
Yes a lot of Muslim immigrants to the UK started asking for certain streets or suburbs to be designated as muslim areas, and the extension of that has been their request to practice Sharia Law with their own Sharia Courts in the UK, which for some insane reason was given approval. To say it is messed up and unacceptable is a massive understatement. They should only be able to practice UK Law within the UK, which has equal and liberal views and ethics towards women, as should always be the case. As we all know, Sharia Law is pretty damn feudal. Check out Pat Condell on Youtube, he's super switched-on and talks about this in one or two of his videos.
Bargaining chip perhaps? However, [here's an interesting read](http://sinonk.com/2013/03/23/the-prisoner-kenneth-bae-questions/) on this case. Few excerpts:  &gt; The opportunity for such negotiations with significant Americans occurred almost immediately when, on January 8, 2013, former Governor Bill Richardson ventured to Pyongyang with Google Chairman Eric Schmidt and “fixer” Tony Namkung. One of the explicitly stated goals of the visit was to extract this new American prisoner from North Korean custody....  &gt; However, not only did Bae not join Richardson on the former Governor’s ride back to Beijing, virtually no news was released in the aftermath of the visit about Bae’s case. The North Korean state media implied that Richardson and Schmidt had raised human rights issues while in Pyongyang that prompted Rodong Sinmun to say that “the American gentlemen” had “prattled” on about morality “like venereal disease patients” and deserved to have their faces spat at....  &gt; Why was the Richardson mission unsuccessful in gaining Kenneth Bae’s release? And what do we really know about why Bae was arrested? Should we in fact expect to see Kenneth Bae used as a North Korean “bargaining chip” in getting the US to agree to talks with Pyongyang?  &gt;An article published in Paris the day after KCNA announced Bae’s arrest provides some answers to the above questions, and can also lay claim to the title of most in-depth public look at the context for the arrest....  &gt;The fact that the article was written by the pro-North Korea group (AAFC/France-North Korea Friendship Association), lends particular interest....  &gt;As to the nature of the offenses committed which [might] qualify as a crime in the criminal legislation of the DPRK, several explanations have been advanced. The AP has obviously been very cautious [in asserting what Bae's crime allegedly was] owing to a lack of confirming sources. According to a South Korean daily paper, North Korean officials reportedly found a hard disk in the possession of Mr. Bae which contained sensitive information about North Korea. According to anti-communist activists in South Korea, Mr. Bae would have taken pictures of orphanage for humanitarian action that would have been regarded as anti-DPRK … [original punctuation]  &gt;The latter explanation, however, presents a contradiction: If Bae’s goal was to help orphanages, doing so in conjunction with the North Korean authorities for the final delivery of aid, as other NGOs present in the country do, such pictures would then have been taken with the full knowledge of Bae’s North Korean guides. Never has such a situation before led to the arrest of a foreign visitor to North Korea. (Indeed, the heaviest sanction is that the pictures are erased at the request of the North Koreans.) However, had the photos been taken in secret [prise en cachette], then they could have had a purpose other than humanitarian action. But a single snapshot usually does not justify taking the [extreme] measure of arresting the photographer: the penalty would be a simple expulsion, after the confiscation of equipment and the offending photos....
&gt;The obvious bias towards China on Reddit disgusts me.  &gt;Typical redditor's anti China and Communist bias + blind weeabooism.  &gt;Stop trying to play the victim. Japan has done horrible deeds in the past. My previous comment doesn't even mention Japan, either - I'm mentioning the massive anti China and Communist bias (I'm willing to bet, mostly Americans)  &gt;Here's just a few (more than "2") politicians who deny it: link A number of serving national-level Japanese politicians came out in support of the film.  &gt;War reparations were waived and apologies are deemed insincere partially due to the fact that many of their politicians deny it (the person who apologizes does not speak for all of Japan) Add on to the fact that right wing Japanese dominate the internet (compared to left wing in America) for example  &gt; I think most Chinese (at least not in China), myself included, dislike Mao. Even students in China sometimes have a neutral view of Mao. This isn't really China bashing  well obviously you are huan ren (ethnically chinese). i am guessing you are chinese-aussi. i could post more but it's clear more than half of what you write is a pro-china statement or at least a defense of china. anyway shrug i guess you aren't 50 cent party but feel free to post stuff aside from 'americans suck, typical americans, china is good, japan is bad'.    
Truly they are our greatest ally
I have infinitely more respect for the person preparing me a delicious meal than the pedophile worshipping shitlord wearing a towel and stoning people.    You're damn right burger flippers are better than Muslims, and **don't you forget it.**
He probably did try to cause trouble. You people can't seem to mind your own damn business and seem to think everyone should follow your way of thinking without any repercussions.  
They have a twitter!
Can you pay the tax in bitcoins?
I was sarcastic
[deleted]
Obama is [already funding](http://www.cbc.ca/news/world/story/2011/04/18/syria-united-states-backing-wikileaks.html) the Syrian opposition (Al Qaeda).
I feel bad for him that his own stupidity led him into this situation, but part of me thinks "serves him right" for funneling money to the NK Regime via these tours. I wonder how many janitors were sent to labor camps because they weren't smiling enough while mopping in front of the foreign tourist from the west.    
What exactly will you be protesting? Regardless of chemical weapons mass people are being murdered there. If that were happening in your country wouldn't you want someone to intervene if you didn't have the means to? Wars for profit are bullshit, but when this kind of stuff is going on it's hard for me to be against it, if it's handled correctly.
What a backwards cesspool.
Sounds like California lol
Good move!
You don't have to understand, just don't challenge China in North Korea, and you don't have to worry about Chinese intervention once again.
Link says  &gt;Continued improvement in donor recruitment practices, donor education, donor screening, and blood testing has resulted in continued decreases in the risk of transfusion transmission of HIV.  so it's not just screening of MSM individuals. In fact, it might be a small component of the improved unit risk (which could be as high as 1 in 1.4 million, a 25% difference from the single figure you cited).   75 million units are donated worldwide every year, so that's several dozen preventable infections. The article cites  &gt;continued improvements  as the driver of in the decline of an infection rate that was in 1990s. So why stop now? Continue improving the criteria. Saying what we have is "good enough" is like saying a few polio or smallpox cases every year is "good enough."   Finally, oral HIV testing is cheap and quick. 
source? or is this in jest
I think that you need to define what sex is.  I'd consider it to be non-oral penetration.  If i get a bj or hj I don't consider that to be sex.
they want the fight they should have it.   i am sure Kurds will very welcome to get own country. 
what moron was stupid enough to even go near NK at any time recently?
Surely the Copts are already having to leave? Speaking from experience, I know many families that have had to come to the UK to get away from the persecution going on in Egyot right now. It has been difficult for Copts in Egyot for years now, it has only come to the attention of the western media because of the revolution. Sad. 
You can tell a good MCSE because he does not sign it on every single email.
And now you are changing subjects in order to avoid discussing the idiotic point you tried to make about Mao being a great hero of china. Glad to see my point was the superior one =)
I sure hope were not gonna start a war to save some bleeding heart moron who couldn't figure out that taking pictures when he was told not to was a bad idea.  He should have known not to go to NK and he sure as hell should have known not to go pissing off the NK guards.  
&gt;Most religions do require some form of membership to a church, just not always an explicit upfront buy-in cost  The payment is what I was trying to imply. It doesn't cost money to save your soul in most religions (yes, some churches like Mormonism have mandatory tithing, but they are usually the exception and not the rule), but if you want to be spiritually clean through Scientology you need to expect to shell out close to half a million dollars.   As far as spiritual functions go, that's a strong point. Is a *belief* in its utility all it takes to actually get utility out of it? I would say that, given Scientology's past treatment of ex-members and dissenters, and even its treatment of current members (in regards to family), it's significantly *more* damaging, spiritually.
Did it wipe out a bunch of crumbling neighbourhoods? 
This is a [neckbeard](http://knowyourmeme.com/memes/neckbeard).    &gt;Neckbeard is a pejorative term referring to unattractive, overweight and **misogynistic** Internet users...  Generally, misogynists are not extreme left wingers,  The stereotypical liberal is different than the stereotypical neckbeard.  
trouble is, Stalin put a hell of a lot of people to death. you not only get to see it in NK, you get to live it. and die it.
Especially given the sheer volume of people in the U.S. compared to most countries, there are more assholes here than in other countries. But there are just as many more nice and normal people.
[deleted]
Better dead than Red!
Also this:   &gt; Mexico was concerned with Canada’s “designated country of origin” system that lists nations, including Mexico, as places that do not typically produce refugees.  This is a MASSIVE problem in our health care system because all Mexican refugees got the rug pulled out from under them on June 1st (Canada Day!) of last year.  Working with Mexican refugees has been difficult since then.  Basically, prior to June 1st Mexican refugees were covered under our interim federal healthcare coverage or "IFH".  But since then, a list has been created of "safe countries" that no longer benefit from IFH.  The two countries affected most by this Mexico and Hungary as we pretty much can no longer provide care to refugees from those countries.    (Note: The above does not apply to government sponsored refugees but those generally do not come from Mexico or Hungary).
I guess we'll finally get to see what's in a safe...
&gt;they're cute  That's hardly the reason. A general freakout about killing wildlife, maybe.
Call it what you will. State, god, master. Either a man owns his own life and property or someone else does and he is merely a slave.
Sadly the nature of the "crime" is such that it do not get as much scrutiny as more violent ones.
No, they'll be obsolete.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xoiCYwoJKrE
yeah they cultivate the hives year round in climates that can support them, then ship the hives in boxes to crop fields all over during the proper season.
;)
I've said this earlier, but I say it again. Luckily EU is so huge, that those motherfucking shortsighted crooks can't persuade (=bribe) everyone. Long live the enormous inefficient bureaucratic instances!
... That already looks like they got unicorns there.
No not really from what i have seen here. Its just bikie and or gang related. We have tit for tat hits and the police can not just run people in with out proper due process.  Their work load has increased I guess now, and they are on the job.  I will say if anything it probably means the increase in guns being stolen more. There has been robberies of the navy by one of the servicemen even. So yeah not a huge increase or anything.   The state of Queensland has gotten a general fire arm and weapons amnesty at the moment and they have had 8223 unregistered weapons handed in so far
It's impossible for the next five administrations to make things any more worse than how Bush Jr. left them. He's made the next 6 presidents look like fucking angels.
I don't get it. Why are there all those paywalled yonhapnews articles, when it is easily possible to find the full link? Why aren't the mods deleting it?
Yeah, wow, it's almost like he was a widely-despised public figure who's back in the news because of his crappy library.  Recognizing the Bush administration's failings does not imply a defense of anything Obama's done. You want to criticize the current administration for continued neocon policies? Acknowledging how shitty those neocon policies were is a *great* place to start a conversation. Whining in apparent defense of torture-loving oil cronies isn't.
War crimes take many forms, authorising torture is one of them. Just because there are other fuckers doing worse things doesn't absolve him.  EDIT: Though you could claim his crimes weren't committed during a war, but that doesn't invalidate the fact that government-level torture is a crime against humanity.
Did they use nukes in that war?   So that Israel didn't get to join the big boy club that Iran and North Korea is trying to join now.   Nukes are unnecessary for all conceivable future unless it's about blowing a asteroid or something in space. 
"So...let me tell you why I brought you up here."
We've attacked lots of places that didn't have oil. 
http://www.abc.net.au/news/2012-04-11/sydney-teen-charged-following-gun-seizure/3942432  http://www.dailytelegraph.com.au/news/sydney-news/gun-violence-plagues-sydneys-streets/story-fn7y9brv-1226333898332   Decade and a half, huh?
What's the matter with you?
you are a fucking idiot. get lost.
This terrorist was not in any way "under the radar".  He had been spotted by an international team looking for suspicious purchases of bomb-making material.   The Norwegian police chose to ignore the warning.  Norway probably have the worst police corps in the world.
Of course you didn't, I extrapolated. But do you really think that pointless headshaking argument is going to give you an advantage? Your intent is clear and your statement of interest is weak.
&gt;The worst thing Hamas does for the Palestinians is exist.  Exactly, almost to the point if Hamas didn't exist the enemies of Palestinians would be smart to create them, or wait, that's what happened. [How Israel Helped to Spawn Hamas](http://online.wsj.com/article/SB123275572295011847.html)   
Any more than Iran, Saudi Arabia or Jordan and Turkey does?  Look, the reality is that even if we weren't trying to meddle in foreign affairs, others would.  At least we can influence the situation in a way that *may* benefit us.  The risks of not doing anything are just as great, if not greater, than not doing anything at all.  We have nothing to lose, because it's not our people dying.  That's what people don't understand, the Syrian people are of little concern to us.  It's a game, and we have to play whether we like it or not.  Non-participation is not an option, isolationism is over.  That's 20th century thinking.  
This is a terrible source and is also a 3 year old story.    Anyway, even if this was true I thought that Muslims must wash their hands before touching the Qur'an and/or praying?  Are those activities now considered more important than potentially saving someone's life?  Especially if you've sworn to it by becoming a member of a medical profession?
[deleted]
As mentioned below, the word you're looking for is probably "cronyism". Which other examples do you have? 
I'm not sure that those are comparable though. Syria and Iraq are both extremely dangerous places to be, so people know the risks. Oslo is definitely not on my list of dangerous places, so people are right to be upset.   Also, this isn't meant to be a dig at Norwegians but I was at the site of the recent Boston bombings and I was amazed at how many emergency workers and police there were blanketing the city. After my friends and I ran from the area, literally every street had cops in them or army reserves directing traffic and getting people on foot clear of the zone. The sky had tons of helicopters just minutes afterwards and the whole city locked down with FBI and out of town resources flooding into the city. Then of course that Friday when the whole city was locked down to catch the fugitives was insane in terms of how many personnel were heavily armed and searching.  It's amazing to me that in Oslo there were only a handful of cops who could respond, and that the whole atrocity was played out over multiple hours. It's obviously tasteless to compare the two situations, but I will say that I was very thankful that Boston had the law enforcement capability to do what they did that week.
[deleted]
[deleted]
There mistake was encouraging games like Farmvile. So much time wasted playing them, so much hatred born from people sending invites on it. Not to mention all the spam and crap you then get.  Facebook has too much advertising on it now I'd say. If they keep it up then a mass exodus will be almost certain.
Pretty sure it's always meant a heart. ThinkGeek's "I less than three you" shirt existed before Facebook did IIRC.
We have to assume it was the UK, it looks like they don't want to release any more information to protect the identities of them, but from the site we have to assume the UK.
Yup, patriarchy hurts men too. Gender roles are horrible, right?
And saying they are like the majority of world. Still with problems.
I'm definetly stopping by this city sometime in the near future to pay my respects.  The killer was pure, pure evil.  
So sad. I don't get how you detach from your babies like that. I get that it happens, but as I sit here nursing as I reddit, I don't fathom that shit. Babies / children are soooooo sweet. To fuck with that sweetness and trust makes you absolute trash. 
This is the second Israeli hit on Assad's government buildings, right?
http://i.imgur.com/LFLq3kr.jpg
Fuck you and fuck your bitching, that capped speed is faster than our internet is at "uncapped" speeds
[deleted]
The media is really grasping at straws and pulling out all the stops to push this chemical thing.
[On Saturday, the Russian investigative newspaper Novaya Gazeta reported that Mr. Tsarnaev had sought to join the Muslim insurgency in Dagestan and had been in contact with several rebels who were killed by Russian authorities in late spring of 2012 while he was staying in Makhachkala, the regional capital. Mr. Tsarnaev left Dagestan in July 2012, just two days after a shootout between militants and the police in which several militants were killed, including William Plotnikov, 23, a Russian-born Canadian. Investigators are trying to determine whether Mr. Tsarnaev and Mr. Plotnikov met, one official said on Sunday.](http://www.nytimes.com/2013/04/29/us/tamerlan-tsarnaevs-contacts-on-russian-trip-draw-scrutiny.html?hp&amp;_r=0)
&gt; One theory I have heard for lower prices of certain medications in Canada is that since each province enters into agreements for drug (socialist medicine and all) they are in a better bargaining position to negotiate a lower price and get a discount for buying in bulk.  Actually, it's not "just a theory". A big "single-payer" organization has more negotiating power than you, an individual, have. If England's NHS won't buy a drug, a company may lose hundreds of millions, so they're willing to accept a smaller profit rate rather than selling them nothing.
It's hard to find a bank that doesn't suck, right? Well, the Sparkasse can be a decent alternative. Other than that I only know of pretty radical concepts of anthroposophist banking.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Most of that cost is educating doctors about advancements that have occurred since they left med school.  You can have the best medicine in the world and you won't save a single life if nobody knows about it.       What's your alternative?  How do you suggest doctors magically obtain knowledge about the newest treatments?
What a sad situation 
Any leader of Afghanistan is between a rock and a hard place.  Everything is so divided that they can't come up with a plurality for ruling.  So they need to buy some votes and deceive others into thinking they aren't completely sell-outs.  So they'll take the money while screaming about the U.S.  It makes them somewhat look like they are resisting while also getting paid.  Frenemies with benefits.
I think we do. The rebels are pissed at Russia for supporting Assad. There is your motive. 
instagram, which Facebook owns. And some video sharing site called twist or something like that.  -- my niece
Most American nondiscrimination statutes prohibit discrimination based on both actual and *perceived* sexual orientation and gender identity -- the Matthew Shepard Hate Crimes bill is one such statute.
It's a troll account. Look at the username.
Did you see a punch line?
fine with me. let economic efficiency win out. when an american snowflake and an indian snowflake earn equal pay for equal work, then we will have equality. 
I think that's oversimplifying a solution. 
It's damaging to the moral fiber of this great country and I will not stand idly by while those god damned Mormons engage in this decadent behavior. 
then why do foreign pharmaceutical drugs cost more in the u.s. than in their own country?   also, http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2008/01/080105140107.htm
Everyone who doesn't support Israel is being downvoted! Yay!
Joking about gang rape is totally fine, but passively threatening someone with gang rape is not. The problem isn't that you aren't allowed to say a gang rape joke in class. The problem is that you would be threatening the instructer.  Threatening someone is illegal, so the joke can only be told in an environment where you are willing to take the risk that no one will be threatened.
How come when israel bulldozes jewish built structures, it isn't news? How come it isn't news when hamas bulldozes illegal structures in gaza?   This is propaganda, plain and simple.
SadoMasoPedoRoboNecroBeastiality
No, because it's only for an American league.
Well the issue is with individualized contracts you have to A) get multiple parties to agree (in this case at least 4 [the lawyer dawg]) and B) you need to make sure it follows all local codes.  That seems really fackin' tough.
[deleted]
Sorry to call off the which hunt guys but the story is made up. Once the real media contacted him to confirm the story he retracted the whole thing and took down the article. 
It's completely illogical to say:  Unless Bob tries to save you from [insert bad thing] then Bob is now at fault for [said bad thing].  Which is completely different from:  Bob causes [insert bad thing], in which case he would be at fault for [said bad thing].  So don't even try it...
is this good or bad? fill me in.
Insulting Christians has nothing to do with the topic, is quite frankly very rude to the Christians who do NOT believe in mutilating children, (the vast majority of us, I assure you) and a very ignorant and biased statement. 
You insist on still eating meat, and eating meat (aka "supporting mechanized animal torture and death") is literally Hitler.   -*Reddit in 2030*
LOL @ the Organ Donor reason!  I agree completely.
Yea it used to be a rite of passage for college students...and then it became MySpace-Lite
I believe the jews deserve a state in their historical homeland, and I find the palestinian argument to be based on emotional manipulation and willful ignorance of history. 
[deleted]
Yes this is what i think will be an issue in the long run. People are now open to gay rights and stuff lik that but it is due to change
Can't wait until the 2 guys are arrested. What will they get? Life in prison? Death?
If it's so obvious as it is, how the hell can we end acting the opposite way and destroying our heritage?  Media manipulation is an awful problem here in Spain, where people rather watch a soccer final or complain about the weather.  The apathy of older generations about what's happening is disheartening. They rather hold into their tiny lives than give away rights that took decades to earn.
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is probably true, but I kinda doubt there are enough people out there who want to be in a polygamous relationship for it to be a big movement or anything like race and sexual orientation have been. Most people have a hard enough time with one marriage.
ohsnap.gif
Sorry bro, wanting to rape children makes you a freak.   Reddit : more sympathy for pedos then women. 
Patton Oswalt has a great bit about this. He goes on about the two generations of people that need to die off, primarily ww2 era conservatives and aging hippies. "we need conservatives that can accept gays, and liberals that shave and bathe." 
[deleted]
Which setting do you play on? I can't play any higher than prince. On the prince setting I usually miss out on a lot of early wonders, but by the mid to late game I have enough of an empire to dominate the wonders.
It's hard to see it from their side, but because I know most of the parents probably aren't crazy psychopaths, I think their reasoning goes something like this.  "I love my child and I love God, I want them to lead a good Christian life and be with me in heaven when we pass from this world. Something confused them in their lives, and now they need help overcoming their sinful thoughts, and they might go to hell if I do not intervene. There's a camp for kids that teaches them that homosexuality is wrong and says (maybe even promises) it can help cure them of this sin. I'm doing this to save their souls."  If they knew what the kids actually can go through in these camps, I'm sure many parents would reconsider it, though realistically I think the best way to fight it is by acceptance. By making gay marriage legal and equal, eventually the religions will follow suit and back down from their "bible passages" the way they've done with many other changes in the past.  And good luck to you. :)
The common theological response would be that lack of ability on their part is forgivable but lack of effort from the faithful to guide them is not.
And nobody is asking for all those information in ONE PLACE.   And nothing prevents you from signing up with a new fake account just for GPlus. 
[Are you all aware that the original "euphoric" submission was overwhelmingly downvoted to oblivion in /r/atheism?](http://i.imgur.com/KGxIc.png)   I find it weird that it continues to colour people's perception of the subreddit when it was immediately downvoted and disregarded by the entire /r/atheism community.
[deleted]
The only difference is atheists don't want to ban things that are none of their business.
You could be Oprah.
NO, the state is a bunch of guys who get to stay in power because of the legitimacy of their authority.   There are basically two ways about this.   * The state can have enough troops, police officers, propagandists, secret police, prisons, in order that the can use force to stay in power, and nobody DARES to question their authority  * They can make themselves useful to their citizens... and gain acceptance by popular mandate.   The more useful they are to their citizens, the fewer troops they'll need to rely on. Even Machiavelli, Confucius, and Locke say this.   In terms of international law, the concept of state sovereignty is about defending the territory and citizens from horrors (like plagues, wars, famines, pirates).   Basic stuff man. 
I guess he hasn't figured out the difference between not comprehending teleology and recognizing false teleology.
[deleted]
I live in Northrine Westfalia. Considered most immigrant friendly part in Germany. I dont have any problems with immigrant, in fact i am the only german at my company and nearly all my friends were not born in germany. However i hate seeing islamic women in burkas. You can tell me it is their free decision as much as you want, it is a symbol of opression. Even if they only wear the headpiece. Still a symbol of opressed women rights. Ok for Pakistan. Not ok for Germany. 
MIT grad here, and my radar picks up a grain of truth in this silly; not sure how, but I see it
As a European New Zealander I would have a problem if it was just a whit man, but would be fine if it was [John Bryce](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/John_Bryce). Jut like I would have had A problem if the piñata was just a Germa, but I'm fine because it is Hitler.
How is that idiotic? It is the very basis of our supposed relationship with Jesus: the original sin of Adam and Eve means we are all cursed because God deals in lineages, not an individual basis. So naturally, we need to be cleansed of this curse.  People actually think like this. It isn't my fault. 
Except that the spouses of Juliana, Wilhelmina, Willem III and Willem I were German too, and the spouse of Willem II was Russian.
Vaccine makes you immune to religions. Makes perfect sense.
Jon*
&gt; Under Dutch law, the monarch has few powers and the role is considered ceremonial.  Why don't they just get rid of the monarchy?  Does taxpayer money go towards any of this?
I'll never understand the monarchies. But if the whole point of keeping them around is just for a reason to drink, I think I'm starting to understand. 
Ready for downvotes if anyone actually sees this, but where's any evidence?  The word of an advisor?  You demand incontrovertable evidence of CW used in Syria before intervention, yet you accept hearsay on any issue that paints 'Murica in a negative light.  Clearly, there's no bias here.
This is supermarket checkout aisle silliness. This isn't news, this is just unimportant gossip. This is one subreddit I like usually. Also, there is no need to be nasty toward me, I think it's absurd this is on the front page.
[Required watching](http://endoftheline.com/film).
He looked kind of sad.
I don't know how much it costs, but we pay so many taxes anyway, I doubt we'd notice if we'd stop paying for them.   As for what I like about it, that's a little more difficult to answer. I guess it gives me a sense of pride, having that one person that embodies the Netherlands, and I think they're doing a great PR-job too. Especially seeing our king does not have any political power. He's just 'there' for us, letting us be ourselves. For everything else, we have the government :)
Still enamored with that 'Palestinians are always the victims' myth? How foolish.  Please explain to me how [this](http://youtu.be/wmgiSdGComI?t=1m9s) is a "peaceful protest." And maybe then you can prove to me that "Israeli soldiers fire indiscriminately." But I won't hold my breath waiting for it.
not everyone smokes weed ffs I'm so sick of this stereotype :/
That is incorrect.  While it may be very difficult for most people to buy 0% made in china, it's easy for most people to reduce the % they purchase significantly.  People who can afford to should buy food locally anyway if they want healthier, better-tasting food.    Plenty of clothing is made in the developing world besides China.   Etc.
&gt; This isn't "a war," it is an occupation  Occupation is what happens after the fighting is stopped but a peace treaty hasn't been signed. It's a war until the treaty is signed.   &gt; So "peace" here means submission to foreign occupation. That is not peace.   Wrong. Peace means a signed peace treaty and an end to the occupation and all hostilities. If you don't want peace, fine. But stop lying about what peace is to make yourself not look like the warmonger and aggressor you are.   &gt;  A state is a political entity, its dissolution can come peacefully, look at the collapse of the Soviet Union or the collapse of dictatorships in Europe or the Arab world  &gt; but so long as a state is expansionist, racist, and aggressive, then it MUST be either dismantled or radically limited in order for peace to be possible  Thank you for admitting the Palestinians do not want peace with Israel. Now stop whining about how Israel is to blame for the lack of peace. 
Did you post that during the Boston bombing thread? 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Only according to some of the population unfortunately.
Interesting that you point this out.  As much as the international community rags on the Untied States, assimilation and integration seems to be the primary focus of many immigrants to the USA.    I wonder if that has to do with the identity of the "typical American".  Most people when asked who they are, they identify with a state rather than a ethnic group.  But my information and experiences is limited to my parents (immigrants from India, I was born here in the USA).    Anyone have any specific studies that explores the "Melting Pot" culture/concept?
There  are newer texts in Islam that add to the Quran. Anything that updates, Sharia law, the law of god, is considered more word. You need to read up on [Al-Kutub al-Sittah](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Al-Kutub_al-Sittah). Research the Zabur, the Suhuf, the Tawrah. These are all holy books of islam.   edit: check out this nice charte of the branches of Islam from wiki [chart](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Islam_branches_and_schools.svg)
I second Ghostery.  I also recommend [Collusion](http://www.mozilla.org/en-US/collusion/) to show you visually how many sites are tracking you and who they are affiliated with.
derp. [Here's](http://i.imgur.com/eKfH5NP.jpg) the sign.
The point of my hypothetical is that it involves two parties that were involved in consentual sex, and one of them decided to be a parent. Now, the child does not share any genetic information with the party that did not make the decision (in this case the woman), so it stands to reason that she should not be on the hook for child support. The fact is that there are men out there that have been ordered to pay support for children that are not theirs, even after it was confirmed by a DNA test. This needs to change, immediately, as it is just as much a violation of human rights as it would be for the man in the hypothetical to demand support from the woman.  &gt; And the father can go claim the child as his.  If he can find it. Also, once he does, if the child is out of state he will have to front the cash to sue the adoptive parents for custody.  &gt; Ok so what if the father wants the child but the mother does not? should he be able to force her to carry a baby to term?  I never said anything about abortions, I was talking about women having *post-birth* options that are denied to men. We can either allow men the option of deferring their monetary responsibility to the state, as we allow women to do, or we can make women support their children monetarily after surrendering them to a Safe Haven.
I treat the Nassau stop as a "explore the ship while it's empty" day.  There's nothing worth buying in Nassau that isn't cheaper in any of the other ports and there's not a whole lot to see unless you want to go to Paradise Island and get your wallet raided while being treated like shit for not being a guest of the hotel. 
[Required.](http://imgur.com/r/TheSimpsons/QXHU54x)
Link to the original source next time and not that horrific bigoted blog.
[deleted]
And the entire South Atlantic.
hahahahahaha. That is thoroughly amusing. :'D
Too sick to breathe, too weak to protest I'm afraid....
The point is that we are destroying our earth/environment that supports us. Humans have only been here for a short time, but we can only exist in a tiny slice of our environment. That is the point.
The point is that they are not learning from any other civilization that destroyed their environment previously. They have only fucked up the places where there are people, yay?
who cares if its fair or unfair? I just want it to stop.
.. No. The aim of conservation should be to minimise the impact of human expansion.
So it is caused by humans then?
I was trying to be gentle in my previous comment but what I was alluding to is the fact that 99.9% of the time the government doesn't misplace the money that they claim has been lost. The people of the upper echelons know exactly where it is but it greatly behooves them to go with the general consensus on the matter.
Actually no, the Article says 2001- 2009, which is almost exclusively Liberal (6 years of Jean Chretien/Paul Martin and 3 Years of Stephen Harper)...  And if you go back to 1993 like the OP stated, its 17 years of Liberal Government and 3 years of Conservative.   Please take said "head" out of said "ass" and educate yourself. 
How do you feel about other immigrants btw?
Al Qaeda can't claim responsibility for a stall. 
It's lip service because of the media fuss. He doesn't appear to be *doing* anything (except asking Congress to play nice.) 
I am genuinely glad to hear that. There is an unbelievable anti-China bias on this subreddit and whenever Chinese environmental practices (or lack thereof) are brought up, the Chinese are pilloried with either thinly veiled racism or just crass generalizations and insults. 
seems about right.
Lol, obviously you would use existing kids. All it would take is some large scale survey questions.
[deleted]
"Because you have this. Didn't realize all doctors, lawyers, and business men (ok maybe the last one) are slaves. "  As many Asians stop their career advancement in mid-management, you people are still dictated by the big boss, who is most likely to be white. Thus, Asian take orders from the white man, do work under the white, follow the white man, and is reliant on the white man, and thus Asians are our bitches. FUCK YEA! 
Whoever controls the spice controls the empire. There are no set boundaries, and no rules of engagement. The spice must flow. 
I see what you're saying: he should bomb Guantanamo Bay!  Brilliant!
&gt; The worst case scenario you point out for banning the insecticide is absolutely not the worst case scenario in reality.  Oh, it's absolutely among the worse-case scenarios for that pesticide manufacturer, and anyone reliant on their profit (like a chemical supplier)
This is the equivalent of Obama stating "I am not black."
If she is 'plus size', then we need more plus size models.....an ex girlfriend[who is size 7] told me one time that the reason for all the malnourished scrawny models comes down to designers laziness and lack of skills.......anyone can rap clothe around a stick and call it fashion, but to design clothes for 'real women' takes talent and skills.............
Remember Roanoke
Oppression of...?
I love how you say those things when you know nothing about me.  I play volleyball half the school year, badminton and golf the other half.  Every single one of my grades is 80%+ and I work my ass off every single fucking day to *save* for college and be able to even get into college.  And, yeah, I am so totally self centered.  The facts that I skip most vacations to take care of my dog, drive people into the city without payment on my own meager amount of money, and do as much as my 16 year old self can to make this town better for everyone totally proves that.  Your ignorant blithering makes me fear for humanity's future.  
Well, if the massive 24/7/365 news fear orgy didn't have these poor folks living in terror, terrorists staging an unnanounced mock execution of a room full of teachers might.  I'm curious what the response would have been if the exact same thing happened except it was a couple of school parents instead of the Sherriff randomly "testing" out the military preparedness of school teachers (spoiler: they aren't special forces).
I just finished my nursing clinicals up on peds/picu and it was nice to see doctors that care so much up there. CHOI is one of the best things OSF has.
Facts! This kills the troll...
The treatment of native Americans is still bad.  
[deleted]
Equatorial rotation speed is 6.5KM/H :P You average car can drive about 30 times that speed.
It's from the comic Planetary. Excellent read.
I agree it's a futile exercise. 
No, I didn't care when I had 10k or 15k either. I just used it as an example because it's my comment karma total and I shouldn't generalize for other people. Even though that's what I'm doing I guess. 
How does cutting mass unemployment fuel unrest? 
[Ayatollah Khameini.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ali_Khamenei)
These are animals we're talking about here, not human children. People hunt animals all over the world, if you were told that killing a certain deer would net you enough money to feed your family for a year would you do it?   
As opposed to say, following them home and then killing them?
Now, top THAT America... Arrest Bush and Cheney for war crimes and show the world how justice is truly done...
Please, someone (mod or OP) put a note about this up top. This is a very worrying rumor to get started. 
I love how we live in a society today that completely ignores the tried and true principle of corroborating sources and confirming truths *before* they facilitate the widespread dissemination of their *news.* 
Sir, i applaud you because you have said the one truthful thing i have read in a long while. Regarding the BBC or CNN   Edit: who the fuck cares about down votes, i stand with my applaud 
&gt; it can't be that hard to notice the huge sums of mysterious foreign cash.  They aren't mysterious.  Tax havens, the places where the money actually is, have deliberately constructed their tax system to attract foreign 'investors' looking to dodge tax in their own country.  As sovereign legal entities they are completely allowed to set their own tax policies, even if that intends to 'beggar thy neighbour' so to speak.    If you want to know why a big country (e.g. France or the US) lets their citizens move large amounts of money to foreign tax shelters at all, it's because their politicians and people who own the politicians have written laws deliberately allowing it.  And that's assuming it's not a deliberate way of funneling money to a friendly strategically important location without officially funneling them money (e.g. Ireland and the EU).  
Wearing a burka is nothing similar to having your clitoris cut off with a rusty razor. It's an example of a [fallacious analogy.](http://www.fallacyfiles.org/wanalogy.html)  Also, the vast majority of arranged marriages with minors (including prepubescent minors) are actually among Hindus in India. And, for most of human history, selling girls for marriage was normal. It's only recently and regionally (the last 200 or so years in Western society) that we've stopped doing that.   It's easy to condemn this when we're now literally the world's 1%, born in the West with the luxury to not work, wait until we are in our 20s or 30s to be married and choose who we marry for love. Arranged marriages and marriages involving children have historically been the norm due to necessity. When a person has multiple children in a poor pastoral or agrarian society the only option for the survival of the female children is marriage. Thus, arranging a marriage as quickly as possible with the wealthiest suitor possible provides the best chance for survival - and quality of life - for your female offspring. It also provides a better chance of survival for you and your immediate family (if the father or family of the bride receives payment to live on).  It's cultural anthropology 101 and it's important to take the context into consideration when evaluating foreign cultures. The rest of the world does not share the values, nor do they have the luxuries, that we do.
As an atheist who lived in Morocco (and as a European who still lives on Morocco's doorstep) I can confirm this. You'll have zero problems in Morocco expressing your beliefs, be they atheistic, Christian, or whatever.  I did notice one thing though with female friends - you get treated differently if you cover your hair. Did you ever experiment with this while you were there?
Great name and I say this as Thor, time heals all wounds.
The sad thing is that this would solve 75% of the world's problems. 
How about a girl named "Holly Wood".
Interesting. I was wondering what Farsi was when a friend of mine said he could speak it. Thanks!
The way I see it, discussing social and economic factors of why people might behave the way they do doesn't abdicate personal responsibility. But it's a way to understand problems and why they continue to happen, regardless of the individuals you plug in. Rather than just venting about how they are evil bastards and calling it a day.
Right, I find that a much more likely option than everyone just watched a guy do it.
Do you understand organizational psychology at all? I do, and I have faith in Mars One.   You think we are getting duped by a capitalist fraud artist and murderer. I think this is a possibility but I attribute a small chance to this by way of rationality but my model may not be the correct model.  
At this rate, all the animals on earth are going to die because of human greed and stupidity. Sad.
Boy that's the kind of slip up that conspiracy theorists thrive off.
changing your name is not as easy as you may think it is. even a woman changing her name after a marriage is multiple trips to different offices because you have to show up in person, bringing multiple forms of old and new ids, and wait periods. an adult just changing their name because they want to actually needs to go to court. a kid named 4Real most of his life probably doesn't have the time, funds, or know how to get through the process. heck they may not even have their birth certificate to prove their name/id. working in social services we get adults all the time who do not have any form of legal id and it is a mess to get this  i discovered the parents of a young child about to enter school never bothered to get their kid a social security number/card and pay for a birth certificate. their excuse - didnt have the 50 bucks at the time so they never thought of it again. getting all this at the age of 5 was a fucking mess. imagine doing it as an adult
That's not how it works.  The poachers who get past the rangers are tooled to the teeth.  Feel sorry for poor farmers forced to starvation etc but poor farmers can't poach anyway cos the actual poachers will kill them too.  Poor farmers don't have NVG's, G36 and Helo support.     
Why would you have to "give up" a bonus during a sales slump? Bonuses aren't supposed to be automatic, but rather a reward for performance. This is deeply revealing about the major problems with corporate culture.   If I don't hit my sales numbers at my job this year I won't have a chance to "give up" my bonus. I won't get it because I didn't earn it. 
I have no clue why people want to get involved.  It is a terrible situation but I don't see how the US blowing stuff up is going to help in this situation.  And the rebels aren't "friendlies" to the US so giving them weapons isn't a great idea either.
I wish they would. When I was on vacation in Belize, the amount of garbage washing up on beaches was disgusting. It ruined what would otherwise be a truly tropical paradise. I asked the owner of the island I was on and he said there was a huge landfill somewhere on the coast of a river in (IIRC) Venezuela? The trash would constantly fall into the river and flow out to the Gulf.  If the Nordics are willing to PAY for garbage, I think it'd be pretty win-win. Though nothing truly disappears. You're just converting it. So garbage that was once in landfills is now in the air we breathe.
Is that more or less stupid than allowing that social context to be the sole reason you can't do something?
Also time.  This is the toughest period, because there still a lot of first generation immigrants, who grew up in the oppressive cultures they left behind.  Their kids though, will be more liberal, and their kids even more so.
Manager still made a random promise to a random person. That individual is not individually required to do that. The condition of being the first person in the store isn't required by a specific individual so it's not a binding contract.  Your. Point. Please.
So, no citation on who that guy was?  No proof to demonstrate that he was a valid threat?  As for the "dangerous lib misconception" (which I think is a phrase trademarked to FOX News), how would we know?  We haven't stopped fucking with them in decades.  As for your Ft. Hood references, prior to 9/11, can you tell me who was responsible for the worst act of terrorism on American soil?  I'll give you a hint: he wasn't Arab or a Muslim.  As for "these types of people," you mean religious or political fanatics who have no sense of compromise and are willing to sacrifice the good of many for an ideology that tends to fuck them over and make them unpopular and even hated?  I wonder where I've heard of these people before...  Long history of minimizing collateral damage?  You mean like nuking civilian cities?  Internment camps full of people who had no real connection to a war beyond their ethnicity?  How about promising help to insurgents and then leaving them hanging on a hook for a dictator to wipe out?  Just wondering where your "long history" comes from.  Citations?  As for "our cowardly enemy hiding," there is an entirely different option: we're hitting them without thought for the people in the near area because, fuck it, they were six and probably going to be a terrorist anyways, right?  &gt;And I seem to recall that a gitmo guy that was released was involved with the murder of some US and/or allies.  Citation?  Proof?  Anything?  &gt;I'm for "due process" but no way should a gitmo prisoner enjoy the exact same process that you and I would.  Okay, let me quote you much wiser people than I.  "We hold these truths to be self-evident, that *all men* are created equal, that they are endowed by their creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the pursuit of Happiness."  All men.  Not just those in our borders, not just those who are citizens.  We as a nation hold that all men have certain rights that are designated to them as simple human beings - among those are life and liberty.  Fuck pursuit of happiness for the moment.  These men are being deprived of their freedom and prevented from living their lives by a government who knowingly accepts their innocence and keeps them in chains anyways.  Fuck everything about that.  Those men deserve to have their cells opened and due process served, and if nothing is found, then put them on a plane and send them home.  So here's my final thought to you, sir, from one of the greatest of our founding fathers: "They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety, deserve neither liberty nor safety."  You're willing to steal the essential rights from another just because you believe you might be safer - you've proven yourself a bigot, I believe you to be a coward.  You're quick to point the finger at those who "could do wrong" but you neglect that we are DOING wrong as a nation.  I'm done here.  Arguing with someone who has no concept of what our national ideal stands for is a waste of my breath.
Essentially this forces a defined land boundary than what they have now. If nobody gets hurt it could be a good thing in the long run.
I link radfems to SRS because SRS display opinions that are almost entirely indistinguishable most radfems.    Why do you keep quoting this stuff? It keeps saying what I say it is, serious.    &gt;*"We ridicule thoughtless, abusive and dehumanizing mindsets by reversing the position of privilege and parroting the standard defenses contrived to excuse them."*    So what they mean by saying what they do is "satire" (to paraphrase) is that they intentionally exaggerate to piss people off and cause a scene because they feel that those they attack deserve it and need to be taught a lesson in their "privilege ", not that they dont actually believe the things they say    Unless their site is the equivalent of [Landover Baptist](http://www.landoverbaptist.org/), which is actual satire, then I really dont care. They really believe the stuff they say, thats the bottom line as far as Im concerned.
[deleted]
What happened to the turtles?
Correct.  Male on male is banned in 5 different places, but female female is never mentioned.  In fact, it's conspicuousness absent from a couple of places that otherwise go into ridiculous detail about who can't bang who.  
But it really depends on who is interpreting it.  Yes, there are horrible brutal interpretations, I'm just saying that this poll is not as bad as it is trying to be. 
Yeah well fuck you buddy. I was born here and I ain't leaving. 
S actually... in fact she just made the largest land purchase ever in Chile, she thinks for some reason it will be a safe place to move too if the hammer ever drops. &gt;.&lt;  EDIT:Is in fact Argentina, not chile
The earth was -26000 years old.
Would a state school be much different? I visited an all-black state school at one point. Religious posters in most hallways and there were numerous "How to feel good about yourself" flyers with the first step being "Put GOD before anything", not to mention a glass protected evolution poster at the entrance that had seen much abuse over the years (mostly washed out sharpie writing flaunting religious propaganda). I obviously can't speak for the education or the curriculum, but the environment was definitely very pro-christianity.
What is white?  Who is pure white ancestry? NOBODY!  We're all from Africa...and I am just a human.  Had my DNA done not long ago, for medical reasons, and I have native American, African, European and Middle-Eastern blood running through my veins.  I am a mutt. Heinz 57.  There is no such thing as a pure white human.  The only thing threads like this do is promote bigotry and hate - as does the article in the Telegraph.    
Are you pretending to be racist as a joke or do you actually believe this? I can't tell anymore
Its all Islam is peaceful and religion is peaceful until 64 PERCENT say you should die because you do not believe their horrible bullshit.  That is a dangerous number and should not be ignored to "respect" dumbfucks and their dangerous idiotic beliefs.  All it takes is a complacent culture and a dumbass excuse for these asshats to turn murder squad.  Its like we took our idiot tea party christian types and gave them their own country, only way worse.
This doesnt necessarily have to do with a NEED for Muslims to speak out against other Muslims.  What it *does* have to do with, is Muslims who are quick to call others Islamaphobes, when they're doing nothing to speak out against the acts that bring those feelings about.   If you're going to get mad about someone grouping you into a group whose regligious interpretation you dont agree with, then speak out against the interpretation, and those who affect others, instead of calling someone an Islamaphobe.   "If I were to remain silent, I'd be guilty of complicity" - Albert Einstein
Do black people have to speak out against other black people that commit crimes? 
Not sure if you're kidding or a crazy person
Those rangers and the poachers should have their noses cut off their faces with dirty, rusty bone saws. 
YEAH, LETS GO TO WAR WITH NK AND POSSIBLY CHINA FOR THIS ONE 44 YEAR OLD TOUR GUIDE. GOOD IDEA.    Are you fucking shitting me? 
Your comment needs to be on the top.
[deleted]
I assume for recognition you'd consider things like extradition if found guilty. If one of our citizens is found guilty of a serious crime in a european country, theyre likely to be extradited, but if its north korea nothing is likely to happen.
Assuming N. Korea has been told many times to not do it and release them by now, I'd send in a seal team or two to pick them up quietly by force, leaving a note saying "do something about it".   Alternatively, we could send in the first marines on the same mission.  I hear they're really good at writing notes. 
[deleted]
Because taking pictures of malnourished kids is totally worth 15 years of hard labor in a North Korean work camp.  Sure, the guy made a really dumb decision, but he does not deserve what he's getting.
"Overweight Americans turn themselves over to North Korean Authorities in droves on promise of 15-year weight loss program." ---someone tell The Onion
Wow, that's actually a pretty good deal for him. 
jesus, how do you guys read so many books.. i mean, there's reddit to tl dr everything  edit: reading the first pages or so on amazon.. holy shit that's gripping
What he did was very brave and he must have been well aware of the danger.  North Korea is the world's largest prison right now and would be better served by an invading army than a journalist.
Korean mentality: go hard or go home
&gt; I think if the US really wanted to, it could easily obtain close-up footage of the supposed atrocities.  If they were that interested in human rights violations, they could start by visiting their own prison camp in Guantanamo, where people are held indefinitely without trial, and often subjected to torture-style interrogation techniques.  For all we know the North Korean camps are worse than Guantanamo, and perhaps beat only by Nazi concentration camps in cruelty (I've read books documenting both, e.g. Escape From Camp 14). But it should be alerting to every US citizen how we're even having discussions about which torturous unlawful prison camp is better here.
I didn't say it had to be the first step, just the solution. Therefore, I see it as perfectly acceptable for India to advise China and more importantly the people that they have 24 hours to skedaddle. After that, they assume the risk. Then you drive some old trucks or what have you and start conducting artillery drills. I understand this flies in the face of pacifism but it's true that some people only understand violence, like my roommate. The only thing that cowers him is (the threat of) physical violence. I leave it in your hands, how else do you propose to resolve such reckless and brazen aggression as setting up shop in another country and not expect to get attacked....oops, I forgot how many of you are Americans. I guess what I'm saying is that pacifism works among pacific people. Being a pacifist in the face of aggression is giving the aggressor what he/she wants, and just plain stupid. No one expects a pacifist to die at the hands of his aggressor, except if you're Christ, and I give him kudos for that but not even J.C. believed his father was going to forsake him.
You need to cool it down on the cheesburgers, playa
is no potato in latvia, only hallucination from malnourish
China literally has a billion man workforce.
saradental: Dental Clinic in Vasundhara-Dentist in Vasundhara Sara Dental Care, the official website for Dr. Rakhi Garg Dental Clinic, Vasundhara, Ghaziabad, India. We offer all types of dental treatment under one roof. for more info visit@ http://www.saradental.in
Fucking idiots!
&gt; It is probably the safest trip you can ever take simply because you are always chaperoned by government "guides".  Tell that to the family of the SK lady who got shot in the back whilst strolling along a beach in their resort during one of their safe tours.  And yes, shot dead.  No apologies.
With the pictures we get from satellites available to the public you've got to be a complete moron if you honestly think the military isn't already capable of doing this.
"nothing in Christianity is against gay people"   This school is. Lots of the members are. They are "in Christianity" 
the church you went to was either a member of [china christian council](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/China_Christian_Council) or [three self patriotic movement](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Three-Self_Patriotic_Movement) if it was a protestant church or [chinese patriotic catholic association](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chinese_Patriotic_Catholic_Association) if it was a catholic church. These are the only churches allowed in china and they are all controlled be the government. They look and act like normal churches just like you describe but their sermons and other activities are strictly controlled by the government. The chinese catholic church is not even recognized by the Vatican and in turn does not recognize the pope.  The big thing that is illegal is to stand in public and tell people to come to your church. There is long history of foreigners coming in to china to covert people to Christianity and become more western and it is considered one of the shames brought to china by foreign powers so foreigners are not allowed to do missionary work in china. On the surface things look normal but actually the churches are censored and the government does not really want Christianity to spread any more in china
Here's some of the apologizing I was talking about.   The rockets CAN be aimed and they ARE aimed at civilian towns. Israel has military outposts along the border with Gaza, far easier to hit with mortars and rockets, but the Palestinians leave those alone. But even if the rockets couldn't be aimed, firing rockets randomly with no care for the consequences is just as much of a war crime as intentionally targeting civilians.   Now explain why Palestinian suicide bombers cannot be sent into military bases the way they are in Iraq. I know the answer, because there are people in military bases that might be able to defend themselves from Palestinian murderers, so let's stay away from them!
It's been alleged that corruption played a part: "75% of the value of the contract went to kickbacks received by [Iraqi] officials"  http://www.popsci.com/technology/article/2013-04/how-millionaire-sold-fake-bomb-detectors-governments-world
He should read the bible, God loves slavery. 
In terms of stick figures and an imagination, it totally does.
So McCain's belief that we should go to war in Syria is ok with you? Cantor's bill to do away with Overtime pay works for you? You don't mind that 45 to 50 million people have no health care in this country? Union busting is alright with you? Shifting the tax burden off the mega-rich to the poor and middle class is ok with you too?  Of the two parties, you consider the GOP the lesser of two evils? What the hell are you thinking?
Back in my day we called those "Scuba Flippers".
Sorry, I believe it was the moops
How did he ever think this was a good idea?  Im surprised it lasted as long as it did.
Pretty sure America is light years ahead of Europe re: racism. Black soccer players still get bananas thrown at them on the field--can u imagine that at an nba game? It's insane. The hypocrisy is mindblowih
do you actually have a rebuttal? all I was saying is that if insecticides are bad, GM crops are a way to reduce their usage.   Take a look at the colorado potato beetle, which can be devastating to potato crops. monsanto developed a GM potato that was resistant to the beetle, but people like you, with a irrational fear of anything genetically modified, forced companies to stop buying the 'new leaf' potato. now to combat the beetle, farmers have to spray large amounts of insecticides on their potato plants. 
Yes, why?
Good luck!  
Literally the next sentence: &gt; But it has since escalated to a larger and nearly camp-wide demonstration against the Obama administration’s failure to close the facility as promised or to free the detainees it has cleared for release.
So they're basically going to make him a regular citizen.  :)
ARRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH  IF ONLY IT WAS THAT SIMPLE
Aren't they in the country without the government's consent?  Downvote away.
/r/yiff  /r/dragonsfuckingcars  /r/beatingwomen
It's not a question of whether it is a smart PR move or not. It is undeniably a clever bit of propaganda. The question is whether we should buy in to the ploy or see through it and loudly condemn them for being cynically manipulative, and to shout them down as loudly as possible. Does this mean the government should just stand idly by? No, of course not. But that doesn't mean we have to aid the Golden Dawn by effectively defending their choices. 
People don't want to realize their europhilia is a result of latent racism. 
Their students would riot. It would be a huge problem for the state.
[deleted]
Lord, grant me the serentiy to accept the people I can not monetize, courage to upsell those I can, and the wisdom to know the difference
Gaza, where the majority of Palestinian casualties have been since 2001, is one of the most densely populated places in the world. If it were a country, it would be the third most densely populated in the world, behind only Monaco and Singapore. But even then, only about half of the land is urban or suburban, meaning the areas that rockets are launched from is about twice as dense as that. Comparing missile strikes in a city as dense as Philadelphia to those in the desert is not an equal comparison.
I'm so [conflicted right now.](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/1b9z7x/)
China actually banned free enterprise once not all that long ago.  Kids certainly weren't being killed by competing schools back then.  Mind you, there were no schools for most kids, but I guess that's beside the point...
I love this type of comment.  Informative and fascinating.  Thank you for sharing your experiences.  I hope things work out for you too and you find a cool group when you get back here.
Nevermind, then.
Really? Because we've had capitalism *AND* slavery here in the US and slavery was generally considered a drag on the southern economy by the time of the civil war. 
[deleted]
ONLY 14 hours a week on the internet? 
Suicide rates will get higher as people die less from disease/safety/health related issues.
I brought up nuclear because it's a huge source of energy with little cost to the environment (yeah yeah, nuclear waste), so China is TRYING to get away from coal.   Many countries in the world could have fields of solar panels up as well, but they don't do it either. Do you have any solar panels on your home?
Makes sense. Look at how much shit Obama is getting for not closing Guantanamo but no one would care if an extra 160 people died. That's about how many people are in gitmo by the way. 
 When a man strikes his male or female slave with a rod so hard that the slave dies under his hand, he shall be punished.  If, however, the slave survives for a day or two, he is not to be punished, since the slave is his own property.  (Exodus 21:20-21 NAB)
[deleted]
No, but they still died from easily preventable diseases left and right. Look up child mortality now vs 70 years ago.
[deleted]
Education has always been important to Randy Hamdan. After earning his college degree, Randy Hamdan decided to continue his education and earned a master's degree in economics from the University of Michigan-Dearborn. The knowledge he learned in the program has helped him a great deal in his professional career. He deals with economics on a daily basis thanks to his investment work and is happy to have the educational background he earned from his master's degree.
Well, it can get a *lot* worse.    Bombs and random killings are nothing compared to roaming death squads taking out absolutely everyone who doesn't meet whatever criteria they set.  Just take a look at large parts of Africa.
But just as you mentioned with a lot of parents being born in the 60s and growing up starving, a lot of younger people are born into somewhat wealthy families and this wealth (along with kids learning from the school stress, particularly kids that are in uni) is creating a more stress free, fun and artistic generation in my opinion. I mean just compare Korea now to about 5 years ago. I personally feel as though people are more care free and are more willing to do things that they enjoy.  I'm not saying that the stress of school is not there. It definitely is. I go to a foreign high school in Seoul and I see the stress of school, grades and SATs make kids break down in the hallways. It's actually quite scary for me growing up with the British mentality of not really caring about grades. There will always be a need for perfection in Asian culture.
Its ok i used to eat rat meat.....in runescape.
See my other response. Surely once the regulation is in place, the law is simply there to be followed, and the only drawback is the potential for corruption. 
Ah. Well money has to be put into the economy somehow, also public works. But The Conservatives would call it Communism.
"The last successful hijacking – on 12 May 2012 – was of the MV Smyrni, a Greek-registered tanker less than two years old and loaded with crude oil worth tens of millions of dollars. It was released after 11 months of negotiations and payment of "a record-breaking ransom nearing $15m", 
Would a comparison to South Africa under apartheid be more fitting?
We do already have cyborgs, Kevin Warwick's [Project Cyborg](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kevin_Warwick#Project_Cyborg) is a pretty good example and that was 15 years ago. 
That's nothing compared to the hog carcasses being sold as pork thing in China. To fill people in:  Something has been  wiping out thousands of hogs, thousands of carcasses floating down the river through Shanghai, and people have been selling the meat from the carcasses for human consumption.  http://m.csmonitor.com/World/Asia-Pacific/2013/0314/China-s-pig-dumping-scandal-puts-spotlight-on-illegal-pork-trade
[deleted]
not sure what you mean by western half, the south has been cleared of Al shabbab forces but that was by kenyan and ethiopean forces, it's hard for a tiny government to have any true diplomatic power with the fierce tribal loyalties of Southern Somalia, and the north is basically autonomous 
Glad she got away. Stay free.
&gt;Religion, by it's very nature, promotes blind faiths over reason  i don't think that's necessarily true.  especially since there are and always have been plenty of religious people involved in the advancement of humanity.  it is a person's approach to religion that determines the results.  Religious fanatics tend to be very uneducated and economically disadvantaged, so you can make a strong case that genes and economic status play a very strong role.  Well off and educated religious people tend to be very non violent and reasonable.  i think economic status and genetic/cultural predispositions are a much more likely cause than a vague ideology that's completely open to interpretation  EDIT: not to mention the fact that the Vatican has plenty of priests with legitimate science degrees, many moderate Rabbis, Priests, Muslim clerics are very highly educated.  if religion promoted blind faith over reason you wouldn't see as many religious people with scientific and cultural contributions
[Search in Kyrgyzstan for crew of crashed U.S. plane to resume on May 4](http://www.interfax.com/newsinf.asp?id=414378)&lt;----latest from Interfax
Reminds me of [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1b3iiz/ecuador_to_auction_off_more_than_3_million/c93f33z?context=3)
Who said conserving the environment was a bad idea?
You are correct.  The fact that news organizations don't employ copy editors anymore is really sad.
Propaganda is powerful.
Supporting a trust fund for military grade weapons and RPGs. Shits bout to get real.
The CDC is much more secure, the chinese did it in a veterinary lab.
No, the GD member tried to punch some guy and the guy swerved out of the way so that the punch hit a little girl. Douche for punching a girl, but the other guy is kinda a douche for dodging a punch so that it would hit a girl. Its like if a homerun ball was coming towards your face and you swerved so it hit the kid behind you. 
Doesn't always work. Actually, it very rarely works, but when it does, there are reasons for it. I gave you the reasons.   I just thought the Star Wars example was funny. Sorry I made you so mad.
[Doesn't get better](http://darwinawards.com/darwin/darwin2004-26.html).
I'm skeptical that any of the above are the "problem" at all. I mean, I'm sure oil drilling isn't *helping*, but it's somewhat negligible compared to the *real* problem of settlement and development.  The *real* "problem" is *poverty.* This submission, on the other hand, is just an irrelevant narrative that sells well to guilt-ridden first-worlders: You know, the kind of "Captain Planet" story that lauds the efforts of the defenders of the planet against evil corporations.  There's a good guy and a bad guy, and we don't have to do anything other than cheer for the good guy. It's not complicated like economics and poverty.
Nice to see some men on this planet still have balls. 
The way the companies are handling it via training their staff is even more pathetic. 
If they die, they die. 
[deleted]
Obviously, if I go their homes deep in the rainforest, I have to abide by their rules. And if they come to the legislature of Brazil, they should abide by the rules of western civilization.
Why the quotation marks?
And MY AXE.
[deleted]
Who they? I just said, *they* are all dead by now. 65 years had passed since 1948. Do you hear Jews claiming the land that they lost during their expulsion from Arab states prior to 1948? There were no reparations as far as i know. Jews were refugees too. They established their state. If Palestinians wanted their state so bad, what stopped them doing so between 1948 and 1967? Nobody stopped them. Would *giving their land back* solve anything? Well it didnt solve anything when Jews retreated from Gaza. Relocating all the settlers there, also no questions asked. It only increased the ferocity of Hamas attacks. Did it not?
In America, the mastermind behind these men would be promoted and the actual cattle ranchers would be laid off.
Reminds me of fighting barbarians in Civ Rev.
I would feel pretty special if anyone spent $900k a year on me. I thought you were supposed to be treated like shit in prison.
God forbid we destroy cultures that practice infanticide, have no concept of history and can't count past three.
&gt;he is slaughtering thousands of innocent people.  Admittedly I know very little about the situation over there.  The article doesn't say that.  Where are you getting your information?  
Trying to use logic against conspiracy theorists? Good luck.
Is it just me, or did they just save our asses from having to go to war?  I have no doubt that the US was involved in this, but unlike Israel, we've got a reputation to protect.  This is a win-win-win.  Chemical weapons destroyed, US stays out of the war, Israel's security is protected.  Geez, do you guys cry this much when you hear that they launched another computer virus against Iran's nuclear facilities?
and that pricks name is obama
It always comes back to the US. There are millions of people living under an Orwellian government over there, and Reddit instantly attacks the US for the few hundred prisoners at Guantanamo Bay. Yes, the US's behavior with that camp is bad, but for fuck sake can we deal with the disaster that is North Korea?
Japan: We care about human rights violations, but comfort women and genocide didn't happen in WW2.
Why cant the muslims(Sunni, and shia) just unite and stabilize the area, rather than have rebellions, and western interference... ?
You're not arguing with *me* - I don't have a pony in that argument, since the Tanakh is so obviously politicized in its origins that I don't put much stock into what it says about God-as-real-estate-agent.  The view that Jews have some special claim over *all* of "Abraham's inheritance" is *an* opinion in Jewry, not *my* opinion.
I don't even...
Why is this news? I don't see the issue here.
Any advice or words of wisdom for an aspiring military doctor?
Actually they do. Its called international law but you know; long as uncle Sam is behind you, you do not really need to obey the speed limits or drive sober.
Iran will probably say something. Iran says a lot of things, like whipping the State of Israel from the pages of history, etc.., but they haven't put words into action so far. 
Where do you think they got the jets they're currently using with this strike?  http://www.haaretz.com/news/diplomacy-defense/israel-to-purchase-20-lockheed-martin-f-35-fighter-jets-1.308177
Technically yes. However technically in this context is a polite way of saying 'not actually in reality'. Thanks to unrepealed laws fromt eh stupid ages, in most countries it's technically illegal/legal to do some very illegal/legal things. 
I dunno why you're being downvoted. Ending drug prohibition would probably cut a lot of the revenue for all of the above, including terrorists.
[deleted]
Evidently, this thing goes to 11.
apartheid. 
Pretty much this.  Harper wants Canada to be "America, Jr."
[deleted]
I believe its translation is roughly something like, "God is great" but they don't always use it literally.  In this case it would be like a christian saying something along the lines of "Jesus save me."
[Oh lawd Jesus!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=J790ViC-RD8)
Seriously, the above comment is +450 in an hour and someone is bitching that isn't enough? That's there's some conspiracy keeping the top comment from being even topper?
[deleted]
True enough, although they probably see that Assad cannot stay in power. So they strike at the teetering power with definable bases of operation rather than the group of spirited if disorganized rebels.
Yes.
Sid Meier's Civilization is the game he's referring to.
Maybe not. I know there's a sub people have mentioned in the past, something like "proisrael" which is private, and they have a picture of a "blacklist" where the mod tells everyone to go downvote everyone on the list, but the post only has 5 upvotes.  I would like to point out though, that if an Israeli propaganda machine exists, they're awful at it, because half the posts on this page, like yours, are all about how Israel downvotes everything and are all heavily upvoted.
So all Muslims are terrorists and have something sinister planned, which means we should treat them as such. K, got it. 
Nigga!
[deleted]
or, "Holy Jesus H. Christ on a cross!"
I downvote all comments that complain about downvotes as a matter of course, even this one.
do you believe that the middle east as a whole would unconditionally accept israel if israel immediately withdrew from all disputed territories and ceased to perform military actions outside of their official borders?
Farming on a large scale necessary. Those committed to some ideological view of subsistence farming are being somewhat irrational. But there's nothing wrong with trying to improve the process, and there is certainly nothing wrong with being critical about it.   We shouldn't let seed companies to Monsanto profit from controlling the supply of GM seeds. This technology should be available to all farmers for free - or at least subsidized. It would create so much more utility for smaller farmers. 
50k+ when the US dropped the first nuke. 
No, it's the Israeli worshipers that live in the US.  It's part of some sort of "conservative/libertarian" Christian political movement.  There's definitely some of it here in Texas.    http://www.lc.org/  this type of stuff.  
I feel like I might be, the parent I replied to said Assad and thought id seen it thrown around before in regards to not just one person but I might just be drunk. I knew what Mossad was though cause of NCIS lol, makes sense though if that's what I'm mixing up.
As sad as it might sound (and actually is), the world isn't sustainable without death.  And it is absolutely not the United States' job to keep people from being killed.  The United States involving ourselves in matters that do not directly effect us is why the majority of the world is fed up with us as it is.  
[Aircraft attitude](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aircraft_attitude)  *^designed ^to ^help ^make ^wikipedia ^links ^more ^readable*
Yes we only see it when it's being used in a very negative way, but it's a normal part of speech for people in that part of the world. They are constantly referencing god when they talk, even just in everyday life. Whether it's "God is great" or "God willing" or "God be with you", that's how they talk.
That's the politest response I have ever had on here, thanks. It's nice to have a discussion about a subject rather than just blaming Muslims. You didn't belittle the situation at all, your contribution was very valuable.  You can draw parallels with Sri Lanka, as the issues are similar. When the British ruled the Hindu Tamils were favoured and the Buddhist majority were treated badly. The Tamil minority held a disproportionate number of jobs in the public services. After independence the Sinhalese Buddhist majority on the island created laws which prevented from working in public services and stoked division based on the same characteristics the Burmese Buddhists are, this was followed by a number of pogroms against the Tamils leading to the 1983 Black July pogrom, Black July was a weekend of burning and looting of homes and businesses belonging to the Tamils, beatings and dozens , tens of thousands of Tails were made refugees in their own land. The background was similar, divisive politics based on ethnicity, religious and national differences and one religious desire to be the homeland for a religious sect at the expense of people who worship other gods. A sense of entitlement to the land for the ruling sect and a lack of entitlement for others. We seem to be seeing a repeat of those events, and they seem to be getting stoked for political reasons in the same way. The Buddhists behaviour in both lands have often been referred to as Neo Nazi and as a description it isn't too far from the truth, both situations merely lack the totalitarianism and ultra-nationalism of fascism. What is true is wherever the politics of division go death and misery soon follow.
Because we leave a power vacuum and likely a civil war will ensue which we would inevitably be dragged into.
Last time was the Iran-contra affair most prob.
The number of defectors is still very low. Two out of three get caught and are returned to North Korea by China. For many, the lower caste (songbun) people, or people who have been caught twice, and its the third time, that's the end, they get executed and ground up and used to fertilize crops.
Ah, that explains it.  Now I just want to know why they make farting noises whenever they talk about the prophet.  "And then Mohamed, 'Pbbbh!', said..." 
If the world operated like that the us would officially be at war with dozens of nations.
Assad is alawite (branch of shia islam). Some of their biggest threats, like hezbollah and the iranian government, are shia.
you're an idiot
Make sense when people invade your country, bomb the shit out of something.
Good luck with that Syria.
I think that this was the same case in Africa or wasn't it?
Again making a declaration of war, is not the same as conducting military strikes. The political ramifications of declaration of war are far greater then conducting a strike on a target in another nation.   Besides National Sovereignty is only valid if you are able to protect it.
Until very recently, anyway.
Its a pretty well known fact.
Should they? If there was a shipment of "game-changing weaponry" headed from the US to israel, they would be upset. Israel has the same right to defend themselves as every other country does.
["What are you doing to do? Bleed on me?"](http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_m643maglvM1rwcc6bo1_500.gif) FIXED
[deleted]
I think Assad kind of has his hands full already.
you´ll probably get to fly the plane yourself though :)
In Iran's ideal situation they would actually have the capability to strike back hard against Israel and America and the Israeli and American officials would know it. They do not live in that world. Thats why you often see such bombastic and over the top rhetoric directed at Israel and America. They are trying create some kind of doubt or ambiguity about their actual capabilities. They know how war weary Americans are and how paranoid Israelis are and they are trying to tap into that. 
Good.  The anti-vax movement is incredibly stupid and not based in scientific realities.  Just a bunch of parents who want to cause trouble by taking up a cause.
I was talking about Hezbollah's actions during the war.
They do have a choice and the result of that choice is that the kids are segregated. 
/r/worldnews, where racist cunts can assume the worst and upvoted for being dumbfucks.
It's called sarcasm but all right then.
Written by someone who has never had influenza.  "Sniff sniff, I've got a flu".   No you don't.  
That had nothing to do with Islam. It was a genocide by ottomans and before that by Armenians themselves against Azeri and Kurdish people. It was a fucking ugly war over property.
Why don't you enlighten us instead of passive aggressively tell us you are leaving reddit because you cannot keep fighting online with us, ignorant people?
Why not look at what is in the vaccines?  Or the complexities of compound vaccines interaction with humans.  They can be improved, and should be.
You're correct, I suppose the key reason for making the Syrian National Coalition illegitimate and not the representative of dominant insurgent forces is also responsible for their 'innocence'.  A blessing in disguise, until insurgents officially unite.
&gt; They do have lots of political influence, and an ambitious imperialist expansionist agenda that aligns with the desires of the majority of the Muslim population that fantasizes about the days when they were an expansionist imperialist empire.  There is also the issue of the fracturing of the secular opposition which explains why the Turkish Islamists were able to get into power - I think it was pointed out how stupid little disagreements result in fracturing to the point that no organised opposition can form to counter balance Islamist parties.
Just convert back later.
Go back to daily mail.
HA! its all about business it is never personal.
[deleted]
http://www.eatright.org/Public/content.aspx?id=6442471029  If they're "pure" enough, nothing can harm them!!!   crazy talk, all of it.
Holiday? There's even a city named after him. 
Fuck, if anyone is killed by small pox we're all fucked. That shit was supposed to have been eradicated, gone from this world except for some labs. No one really outside my parents generation and a select few of the government and military are vaccinated against it these days.
Definitely. Can't wait to start stoning folks for working on the Sabbath.
Don't let Fox news see this.  There next headline will be "Obama is a alien spawn".
Never know when those rascally guns will just jump out and start shooting people.
ye, i watched the Vice doc, and it certainly seem this guy has a bit of right wing perspective on things. whether it was his intention or not, the fact that he is publishing the files forces the issue.  i will be interested to see how soon one of these is used in a crime (i imagine it being made of plastic - with a token bit of metal in there - is a big draw)
Except that they're not.  Consider how large America is. Now consider how many people are killed at gunpoint in a violent crime. I don't have the numbers, they're on google (And to reiterate, number of people per capita killed by firearms in violent crimes) but they're pretty low. There's a big push by the media in general to take pot shots (no pun intended) at gun culture in America.   The truth is, gun culture in the US needs to change, but not nearly as much as the laws that govern gun purchasing in general. The common sense things like the lack of a universal background check needs to be changed. The idea that 'large capacity' (re: standard) magazines somehow enable people to murder others by the thousands is equally as silly.  **tl;dr** Until we, as a nation, can have an intelligent, unemotional conversation about firearms, nobody will be happy.
He might have meant Bashar (as in Bashar al-Assad) and just hit the d accidentally.
I like you. You're my kind of infidel.
[deleted]
Sorry, when I posted this it, the news story from huffington post, it did not show up as being already posted. Since then I have seen different news sources had been posted hours before. Woops.
There is no middle ground. It is either full on frothing at the mouth paranoia or beeing a scheeple.  Tools like scepticism, logic and the scientific method that we might try to employ to seperate what is tur from what isn't are just tools of THEM. 
[deleted]
This is an entire gun, except for the firing pin. It's a complete design.  The gun featured in VICE was the lower of the AR, which was meant to show you can create the parts that would normally require background checks to buy. For legal purposes the lower receiver is what the ATF considers the 'gun' of the AR. Every other part to make the gun can be ordered and delivered online without any background checks. Parts like the grip, barrell, carrier group, etc. can all be ordered and delivered online. The lower receiver cannot.
At least do some research.   [PLA filament for Makerbot: $48](http://store.makerbot.com/filament#pla)  And that kilo of resin will last a good while. One kilo worth of parts actually, and that plastic is lightweight, your average replacement part would weigh what, an ounce or two?  Keep in mind that "$1000 worth" is a variable measure here. Are you talking about retail value, where a small plastic bracket costs $10.00? Or 3D printed cost, where the resin used is $2.00? Yeah, you have to factor in the cost of the machine, but that will even itself out over time.  About whether you will break that many parts; Over the course of a couple years, it's totally possible. Especially if you take into account that you can print other fun things too, if say, you're a hobbyist and need some custom parts.  You can make some pretty strong, useful parts, this article shows that.
but it will HAVE to be regulated, security measures will have to be implemented.  Even if some depressed kid bought a nice 3d printing machine, where is he going to conceal it, things are huge and expensive to run.  Just doesn't seem feasible that some poor kid is gonna be able to "3d print" his own gun and then go off 100s of people.  I'd be more worried about homemade exposive information in the wrong hands. 
War is not based only on who has the better equipment.  There are tons of factors that can determine success, for example the western people's mentality of being against war would really give more pressure in a country like US, than Russia or China.  For that purpose US would have to make a "Pearl Harbor" or 9/11 tactic to induce fear and need of vengeance, and that doesn't seem to work so good nowadays.  Your opinion is the reason you lost Vietnam.
yeah so jews wats the difference, will still like to know why? why was my great-grandfather killed ww2? why have my semi-pyople been considered douchbags and assholes for so long? and have done very little to improve? except generate more bad press and hatred, the govt seems bloodthirsty, and propaganda machine conivingly despicable (downvote patrol included) why cant they shake this off?         
Wait so Big Pharma makes more off a couple doses of vaccine then the multiple medications you would get if you caught the disease and had to b be treated?
You can do that with a regular gun too! 
I'm not going to engage you. I peeked at your comment history. It's all the same. "I'm right. Period."   You pointed out the difference between clip and magazine. Classic reddit kid stuff. Gonna criticize my trigger discipline next?   I'm not gonna engage in stupid. I'd say 'fuck off' and walk away if I were talking to you on the street. So, fuck off. See ya.
Save people from people with guns.
[deleted]
Ok where is it?
That's got to be at least 20% of the parents out there.
If you don't think the US government is trying to do just that, then you haven't been paying attention.
[deleted]
Because those in SRS simply deny that this happens, they ignore and actively deny an entire group of peoples problems because they feel that this group of people is privileged.  Furthermore, at every turn if you even suggest that men in society face problems and that those problems should be addressed you are labeled a hate group a good example of this is the situation regarding the MRM.  People in the MRM are not actively denying that women and minorities face problems in today's society due to their identity.  However, when they bring up the disparity in gendered violence with men being the primary victims of violence, or the disparity in work place accidents in favor of women, or the parody in domestic violence suffered by both men and women yet the suspicious lack of funding to help male victims they are either called a hate group or worse the excuse that it is the patriarchy's fault for these problems like it was a giant plan by all men in western society to cause these problems for themselves and oppress women.
in the future, when you can buy a 3d printer at best buy, and download a template on the internet, this will be much easier.
Please don't make up statistics. Here is a review from Harvard showing correlation between gun ownership and gun violence.  http://www.hsph.harvard.edu/hicrc/firearms-research/guns-and-death/
Different groups focus on different issues, as stated elsewhere. I would same I'm an egalitarian, but I focus on female issues in terms of my activism. Yet I would never argue, for example, that women can't rape men. I firmly believe that men can be (and are) discriminated against. Those just aren't the areas I choose to focus my volunteerism on.
[deleted]
Oh dear, you really are crying out for a pm aren't you, what's this 10 requests for one, man you must be short on friends....there isn't one coming stalker, you'll have to pester someone else to get it.
Source?  People have been unable to make a 3D printed gun due to the tolerances being too large and imprecise. Given this was produced by a high-end professional printer I find it laughable that a Reprap could produce something with these specs.
*freedumbs*  Now **that's** funny LOL. 
Cheetahs.
I'm curious to know too, I've only ever heard preponderance of evidence used in civil cases.  My understanding was criminal cases are always innocent until proven guilty.  Not a lawyer though... Any criminal lawyers/prosecutors/judges out there?
Yeah when American agencies do something like this they're corrupt but when Brits do it they're "planning out something!"   loving every laugh
I bet you could make an automatic weapon with metal slugs and compressed air that could rip people up reasonably well with existing tech.
The rebels aren't one giant group. This isn't star wars.
Consider that a teacher has about 30 students. If there are 6 class changes that they rotate through in a week, that's 180 students. A potential 360 parents, (assuming dual-parent households). Only one of those potential parents needs to google the name and it will spread like wildfire.  My kids aren't in school yet, but at $2000/month, a background check/ google on the lady who watches my kids 40 hours a week, is just proper research.
"Under the Charities Act, registered charities can undertake political activities, such as supporting or opposing legislation in its area of activity, but not as its main purpose."  That's it. Read the fucking article people.
Thank you.  The title does not make it at all easy to figure out where this happened. 
Im pretty sure America has been doing just fine surrounding gun laws for the pas 200 years. Why the sudden need to change them all of a sudden?
Did you read anything from your source, like this:  &gt;Many Muslims see a struggle between groups that want to modernize their countries and Islamic fundamentalists, and in five of the seven countries where the question was asked, more of those who see a struggle identify with the modernizers than with fundamentalists.  or  &gt;With the exception of Pakistan, majorities of Muslims in all of the predominantly Muslim countries surveyed and in Nigeria say that democracy is preferable to any other kind of government.  or   &gt;Islamic extremism continues to be a serious concern in nations with substantial Muslim populations. Large majorities in five of the six predominantly Muslim nations surveyed as well as in Nigeria, where roughly half of the population is Muslim, say they are very or somewhat concerned about the rise of Islamic extremism around the world.  Or did you just try to find the one table that made it easiest to generalize?  The idea of 'mass immigration' is also exaggerated. Those who are able and willing to migrate to countries in, e.g. Western Europe in search of economic opportunities, for instance, are generally more educated muslims from the more progressive muslim countries. I think introducing them to a liberal/progressive nation will do more to further secularize them than stirring up some sort of deterministic culture clash rhetoric and advocating for banning all immigrants.
Thanks for the different perspective, I appreciate it. Again, here in the US, speech is a protected right. Another famous quote is that "the power to tax is the power to destroy", and so speech is not taxed. 
&gt;While the nation of Palestine has always had difficulty, as you say, being recognised by people such as yourself internationally, and has always been ill defined, their culture and ethnicity has not.  Never said they didn't have a culture. I did, however, say that they never had sovereignty or exclusive ownership of the land you claim to be "theirs". And I don't understand why you're leveling accusations of non-recognition at me- I said I support the two state solution. That doesn't mean I support historical inaccuracies though.  &gt;Jerusalem was not under governmental control of Palestinians, but is their homeland regardless.   I didn't ask you that- I specifically mentioned that I wasn't trying to delegitimize their modern claims. I asked what makes it Palestinian *any more* then it is Israeli? Jews have lived in Jerusalem since the city's infancy, it is their spiritual and physical homeland- what makes you say it is a Palestinian, rather then Israeli or international, city?  &gt;As I said earlier, I would view only the full return of Palestinian territory to it's people as acceptable reparations for what those in Israel have done recently. This does not mean that I advocate all of Hamas's methods, any more than I condoned some of the more extreme and damaging actions carried out by militants in Ireland, on both sides of the conflict.  Nice, but again not what I asked- I asked what to you see as Palestinian land? Tel Aviv? Eilat?  &gt;Being accused of hateful ideas by a stranger is both sad and amusing to me, and is brushed off, as they say, like water on a ducks back. The bombings carried out in this country have left a scar in the national psyche that will not be healed in my lifetime. I am not the one making light of the suffering of the world in this situation, nor am I a warmonger.   Except you're labeling Palestinian militant violence against civilians as "legitimate resistance"- by my definition, anyone who condones slitting the throat of a sleeping baby and her family, as happened in Itamar, as a legitimate act of resistance is a warmonger.  &gt;That said, I fully support the armed struggle against the Israeli military. To take any other stance or viewpoint would be abhorrent to me. If people do not stand against such butchers of history as the Hutu's in Rwanda, the Nazis in Europe, and the Israelis in Palestine, they will be judged in history just as severely as they are judged by their peers and critics in modern times if they do.  Are you seriously trying to compare the Israelis to Nazis? Do you even know who the Nazis were? See, this is why I knew it would be pointless to speak to you- you're so convinced of your own convoluted worldview that you would sink so low as to compare *this conflict* to the mass-genocide of the Nazis.  &gt;All it takes for bad men to triumph is for good men to do nothing. This is a simplistic view, and our conversation has been compressed due to online limitations. If I speak strong words, it is only because I feel strongly about this issue. I want to make it clear that I view the civillian casualties on both sides of the conflict in Palestine as tragic, as with anywhere, and I do not personally condone them.  Simplistic indeed. You don't speak strong words; rather, your post is characterized by grand emotional appeals and unsubstantiated rhetoric which would, in an open forum, be swiftly exposed by established facts. That's the real tragedy here, and the reason why this conflict will perpetuate far, *far* into the foreseeable future.  You speak about justice and sympathies, but I don't think you fully comprehend what you're preaching. I only hope that one day, if you really do care about the Palestinians, these great feelings of yours will give way to words and actions that will promote a sustainable peace in the region, rather then bias and hatred.
&gt; Yeah anyone who disagree with ME should get their tax exemptions taken away.  How about this cute idea - if they aren't doing charitable things then they lose their charitable status. Generating bullshit white papers about 'teh gheys' isn't what anyone would consider charitable work no matter how liberal one is going to be with the definition of said word.
Canada has tar sands to be melted down into oil, why the fuck would they want to stick their noses in the midel east Zionist / Islamic bull shit?
&gt; The radicals such as Jezebel, and other places I can't think of.  Goddamn man why are you talking about this if you know so little?
i was wrong.  edit: and stupid
Well said. It is also much more probable that someone would be able to get a small nail and a single bullet through a metal detector undetected than a whole metal gun.  Hell, they could take the battery out of their cell phone and stash a bullet and the pin in there. Phones never go through the detectors anyway.
the whole state of Syria is ridiculous atm. I'd rather have Assad still in control than give it to these rebels.
I'm impressed you know that. Most people I've talked to here seem to think that North Korea just decided to go bonkers one day and take on the biggest military superpower ever to exist.   Regrettably the sanctions are still there, and they are leaving more and more people hungry. North Korea started all this as a result of sanctions and "war games."   The US would have invaded North Korea if it could have achieved success without putting itself at risk of massive protests and internal instability. Due to the public's view on US wars since the invasion of Iraq, the US has shifted strategy to supporting rebels that are hostile to governments it doesn't like, like the way they fought wars in the 80s. There are, however, no large opposition groups in North Korea, and the only way it can impose regime change in North Korea is by either invading it or by tightening sanctions until the government loses enough popular support that the US has rebels to fund and arm.
**Polluted** seawater, *Really*?    I cant think of the the sea life around Japan. dat High Mercury
'What a shock' thinks nobody.
&gt;That is, the tool itself is and can be neutral, if it’s being used to build a false argument then the builder/author is the one that you should be having problems with.  Which is really the problem I have with it since it's become a buzz word.  It's always some innocuous phrase that the person using the "dog whistle" analogy tries to turn into evidence that the peson they're arguing with is some sort of secret racist/bigot/homo-intolerant masquerading as a reasonable person.  &gt;This is also not correct. The hidden message can either be too blatant and thus visible to “outsiders” or be examined through indirect observation.  Or they could be seeing "reds under their beds," and completely off-base.  I'm sorry, but I just see this "dog whistle" bullshit as little more than a version of Godwin for the sort of pseudo-intellectuals who feign objectivity or enlightenment but would just love to scream "OMG UR SO WRONG BECUZ UR A BAD PERSON."  It's always trotted out when the person making the accusation has nothing legitimate to throw at the person/people/argument they're attempting to criticize. 
who?
&gt;even they did not consider themselves as the owners of the land.  Your desperate semantics game is bad and you should feel bad.  &gt;just not in the same way.  So it's different in that you mean you aren't going to give up your land. Figures.
It would be fine to let girls learn that for themselves if they weren't having adverse affects on men in the process. We are only free inasmuch as we do not harm others. There is a huge host of evidence that provocative attire increases testosterone production in men, and that increased testosterone production is positively correlated to increases in risky behavior, aggression and violence. On top of that, testosterone is a very corrosive steroid; it acts like poison in the bloodstream, literally killing cells and reducing the male intellect. We men have a right to stand up for ourselves when the way women dress is adversely affecting our heatlh. This was handled exactly as it should have been. No charges, they just removed the girl from potentially getting harmed and informed her and her parents that she was dressing inappropriately and needs to consider her affect on others before she goes out the door. Good for them. 
NK knows exactly what they're doing.   Step 1: Get a lil' nutty and threaten **the entire world**.   Step 2: Get slapped with sanctions.  Step 3: Get MASSIVE AMOUNTS of Aid once sanctions are removed (due to cooperation).  Step 4: PROFIT (Aka start all over again).
Ah I see, that makes it ok now then.
This is so...civilization.
now, now, now - there is no love from me here.  First of all, shame on the Muslim leaders sending these people out onto the street  you cannot hold free people to Ransom and claim you are fighting for God.  Secondly - this paper is a transparent rouse.  Shut up.  And Bangladesh, stand firm. These people are using Allah like a commodity to be traded and bargained with.
We judge other people by their actions, but we judge ourselves by our intentions - monkey sphere
[deleted]
Oh give me a break!!! North Korea having missiles is like Iran having state of the art jet fighters...  I wish the media would stop creating such fear in the IQ lacking masses...
What's the point? They say they're going to do 1 thing but then they do another. There's so many opposing party's and not to mention I haven't been educated enough in politics to make a meaningful vote.
As in, young pepole should be better parents when they become them? Or youths should attack their parents? Haha. 
&gt;Wot? Benghazi was where it started, not ended.  He probably mixed Benghazi with Tripoli.
I'm getting pretty tired of these faceless internet geeks making threats to do this and that.  What do they ever achieve after all that bluster, they hack a couple facebook pages and get some personal info like where someone likes to buy pizzas. 
&gt; Mao created this monster. China had nothing to do with it.  wat.
 E! had to put a crawl line apologizing for the inconvenience and run it during "Married to Jonas."
I'm surprised nobody sent them Antrhax Letters.  It worked for opening it, and passing the enabling act.  Besides, can't the president simply order it closed?
Good.  saves money on food.  Let em starve out
To be fair the uniform distinction has been around for a while: [Ex parte Quirin](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ex_parte_Quirin#Supreme_Court_decision).     However, unlike WWII (the setting for the above case) in which the US was fighting a war against the uniformed armies of that Axis Nations.  The idea of the unlawful combatant was designed for the handling of spys and saboteurs while fighting a war between nations.      We are now fighting a "war" against a transnational group which by definition does not have a common uniform because they are not members of a National Army.  We are in essence fighting a "war" against an army of unlawful combatants.         Nevertheless they are still supposed to be given a trial by military tribunal. 
"We choose to go to the moon in this decade and do the other things, not because they are easy, but because they are hard, because that goal will serve to organize and measure the best of our energies and skills, because that challenge is one that we are willing to accept, one we are unwilling to postpone, and one which we intend to win, and the others, too."
A note to the downvoters... You have something against Italians? (or maybe you and that Bush admin freak-of-nature/terrorist supporting John Bolton, who thinks the UN should be leveled, just think alike)
Wouldn't this difference in classification also imply that the number of stillborn babies in the US should be a lot lower than that of any other industrialized country - to make up for the shift of numbers?  When I look at [the WHO numbers on stillbirths (PDF)](http://www.who.int/pmnch/media/news/2011/stillbirths_countryrates.pdf), the US is ranked only 17th though - behind the Czech Republic and Portugal. Finland is right on top of that list as well.
&gt; WHARGARBL DERKA DERKA WHARGABL!  FTFY
It would be good if it was uniform.  But the imbalance between birth rates in different regions may mean that the first world nations will simply go extinct. How about that for problem solving?
Pretty sure its Academi now.
How are you equating inmates with troops? What if their countries of origin do not want them, as is the case with some of them?
If you aren't going to take the time to look into it you aren't going to make the effort to listen to me. Believe what you want, it makes no difference. /u/Wetzilla quotes him in a response to your comment. Have a look.
that'sprobablywhyhesaid"incase".fu
What TIL submission?
&gt; Citation needed.  Fair enough, you don't see everything the military/intelligence community sees. Here's a short piece from the NYT explaining [where they get their funding from...](http://www.nytimes.com/2009/10/19/world/asia/19taliban.html?_r=0)  &gt; So, given that the US can't release its intelligence sources, that means it's okay for us to indefinitely detain prisoners without trial?  Yes. They're not American citizens. The practice of detaining POWs until a settlement has been reached is rather established. You don't need charges to hold foreign fighters, and you don't need a trial to prove they're foreign fighters. Perhaps the Taliban ought to have a sort of ID system. Perfidy is a war crime, after all ([Article 37, (c)(d) of the Geneva Conventions](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Perfidy)).  &gt; And that makes our global dominance okay? I disagree.  I can't think of any better reason. Well, it's also made globalization great, and it has largely laid Communism on the trash heap of history. It has raised living standards for the Developing World with economic policies that are repeatedly derided as "evil". Yeah, I think America makes mistakes, but those mistakes are largely minor and ends are worthy.  Fighting the Taliban, and bashing any force which violently rejects our hegemony is no different from taking up arms to fight the Nazis. Our hegemony has brought the world relative stability, security, and prosperity. It's brought increased opportunity to the most destitute reaches of the world. THAT is what you are attacking when you attack America. Our empire is worth it, and it is morally right.
[deleted]
It's doesn't exactly send a message to the world that America respects human rights. There again, when did America ever give a fuck what the international community thinks. 
Nestle can get fucked. They are probably one of the most diabolical corporations out there. 
You can't find it by watching those hearings. People can say anything they want to. Actual verifiable evidence is a totally different thing then listening to a bunch of people drone on about some bullshit for 30 hours. Face it, they didn't bring anything new to the table.
Definitely, this goes to the heart of the matter why pilots and shit don't really get too traumatized in war.  The more detached, the easier it is to objectify the other person.  
Dial up worked in Egypt IIRC
My two cousins work as guards at Guantanamo they go out twice a day for prayer and PT. 
Not really.  The French were just kind of herded into Canada for the mostpart, weren't they?  I remember reading about them being kicked out and shoved into a place that was shit for farming or something after they got all set up.
About time. if I was going to oppress the masses control of their means of communication would have happened months ago. Can't understand why it stayed up for so long.
It's a possibility, but highly unlikely, given that this has happened numerous times before, as stated in the article.
Nowhere in the article does it mention anything about imposing Sharia. The Kurds are a secular people. 
When is it not OK to bomb a target holding a Taliban leader?
My family is telling me, over the phone, they hear tons of airplanes flying overhead at this time. Not sure what that means but I pray for my family in Syria &amp; the people living there.
If I knew who this was, this would make a hell of a /r/retiredgif submission.
I feel as if everyone here is thinking that this means Assad is about to murder his populace. Truth is Assad has not been a terrible leader to his country. He was way better than Mubrarak and Ghaddafi, and more liked by his people. He has been able to keep his country pretty stable. He lives fairly modestly compared to many leaders in the Middle East. The fact is that some people just got tired of him being in power, or because of his religious branch, and they decided to take arms. I doubt he means to kill his own people, he targets the rebels, sure there have been massacres but the rebels are not all dandelions. A UN investigation stated that the rebels were the ones who unleashed chemical weapons on the civilians. Honestly its not as black and white as people think, many have come to this notion that when they hear the word "rebel" or "overthrowing the government" they automatically think that the ruling party is a monster and must be stopped without looking at all perspectives of the situation. We did this in Afghanistan, and look how the Taliban turned out. I doubt Assad is just going to begin killing everyone, what this may lead to will be his way of launching a massive offensive to a threat in his country, and trying to destabilize them by keeping them from communicating. There is a chance that many will die, but in his eyes he is protecting his people and himself, and many others in the country do not side with the rebels either. Just don't everyone jump the gun on a man that has done little atrocities compared to other leaders, who is trying to preserve what he has built.   Edit: I'm not trying to stand up for this man, I'm trying to state that we jump the gun on things we don't truly look deep into. If you disagree please tell me why, I'd love to hear you out. 
I've got a few family members who are still living in Syria.  I haven't been able to get through for a while.  Please pray for my people, this is scary. :(
[deleted]
Yeah, because in the clear majority of countries bombing is a daily occurrence.  BTW what happened in Boston recently?  How are you getting upvoted? LJL
[deleted]
Nah if he is against glorious Israel he must be an anti-Semite nazi.
This isn't actually that surprising. The amount of potential ancestors anyone has rises exponentially and so reaches ridiculous numbers fast. Due to this, it's almost statistically certain that any two people will have a common ancestor without needing to go too far back. Indeed, if you consider a generation to be a period of about 30 years, about 1590 years ago is when you would expect to find a single pair who are the ancestors of every person currently alive today.  But of course, that's just statistics. Human populations tend not to move around and intermix much over time. Asians mostly stay in Asia, Africans mostly stay in Africa, Europeans mostly stayed in Europe. And due to that, the amount of time needed to go back to the Mitochondrial Eve or Y-Chromosomal Adam is much greater. You basically have to track back to before the exodus from Africa, about 125,000 years ago. But for localised populations, you should find a common ancestor between any two people in under 1500 years.  Hell, as long as the common ancestor doesn't show up in under 200 years you're genetically fine. So feel free to fuck the shit out of your 7th cousin, you dog you.
or, the alternate perspective is that you are an racist asshole and think of that as a good and noble thing. Me, I see it as being mildly pathetic.
I don't see any actual article at your link, it just gives me a 404 error.
Can there really be a separation of church and state when the main raison d'etre of the country is jewishness?
TIL NDT is not an atheist, now I hate him euphorically.
Ay now, lads. 
Okay, thought you were talking about socialism as it was something bad. I'm from Europe and I don't understand how people can oppose socialism, well not rich people anyway.
Israelis always turn to sarcasm and personal attacks when they have no arguments; which is most of the time. Sad, really, because if they asked a few questions they might even learn how to make their little colonial project a sustainable and healthy part of the region rather than the pathetic little forward base that it is today. 
I agree with that, but I think the population drifts to more radical groups when they feel that traditional parties/groups may have failed. I am not justifying the actions of certain groups, but I empathise with the people who elected them.   Conflict just breeds further radicalisation on both sides. 
Not sure I understand that. There are a lot of people out there I don't agree with as far as their perceptions of the world, that in no way affects my opinion of their actions. Partially because those views can be so easily changed with a slight shift of perspective or the addition of new information.   I know my views on this subject are based on information that may or may not be true or valid. I figure I should give others the same benefit of the doubt especially in areas like this.   The article made it pretty clear that he's surrounded by people who think this is the right choice "based upon his knowledge of Palestine, and on the **unanimous advice** of his own academic contacts there". As more knowledge is gained and those surrounding us come and go, the views may very well change.
Israel isn't invading Syria either, they are bombing them, the fighting would be in Israel, and Israel would easily hold them back.
[deleted]
&gt; The 1956 war was just Israel fulfilling its designated role of being the imperialist bulldog, following the orders of France and Britain to attack Egypt after Nasser nationalised the French-British-owned canal.  Israel went into to war because of closing the **straights of Tiran** put the Eilat port in unworkable situation and Egypt sending military forces to attack from Gaza and Sinai known as Fadayeen (letter to become form the PLO).   in that war Israel got the Sinai and gaza (first time), and in 1957 Israel make it pretty clear if you close Tiran again that would be a declaration of war **again**.  &gt; I'm not sure where you got the impression Nasser closed the canal  I didn't say it was closing (suetz) rather the straights (Tiran).  &gt; Ironically (?) It was the USA who forced the UK, France and Israel to withdraw.   where is the Irony ? in 1948-9 the UK with the US made Israel withrow (and the UK was making even worse when they train and commanded an invading army).
No,  **Detained** 
I concur that they shouldn't be building settlements but at the same time it's naive to think that simply by giving land back everything will be hunky dory. There was aggression against Israel before 1967, hell before the State was created. What we as Israelis want is peace with security. That means that when we withdraw we have to ensure that there's a stable infrastructure there. We saw in Gaza and Lebanon that when the army withdraws terror groups like Hamas and Hezbollah move in and start firing rockets at our civilians.   I personally think that Bibi and his government missed a chance when Fayyad was PM because he was one of the few Palestinians who was actually working FOR the Palestinians. He was helping to build state institutions. Unfortunately his power was greatly diminished due to the corruption of his own government and people. Poor guy never had a chance. 
Guys, Ecuador warned us about this a year or two ago.  They basically said "Hey, hey bros, we uh, we need some money. We got this nice rainforest and all, apparently there's a bunch of oil under it, we know how much you guys like it just being a rainorest but we need the money. If you wanna just give us some we can leave it alone, otherwise we're gonna have to start selling this shit off to foreign interests".  Obviously the first analogy you'd jump to would be Ecuador basically holding it's environment hostage, but it's sort of the truth of their dilemma, either we give them some monetary aid or they have to start leveraging the resources they have. 
I know right? 
Above you said there is no basis or source for this quote and minutes later you yourself verify the source I gave. Being dishonest there han? Anyway, thanks for pointing out the missing part...I just had the feeling some part of it was missing...I just knew it. I just copied pasted this from my note taking web app..I have another verified collection of quotes on my harddrive...just checked, there I have the full one...Thanks..
ugh faggots. really dont be a loser. weed is fun not cool, they glamorize it.
So pretty much how the last couple elections have been?
SHAME ON YOU LYING GOYIM
Really? Your argument hinges on his Jewish sounding name? Really?
&gt;No, it isn't.   IGU is a very strong supporter of Hammas.  Which unlike Israel has a charter dedicated to removing jews from Israel.  For him to say I won't work with Israeli Academia (and we now know that isn't the case) but not make a peep about a university backed by Hamas is implicit support for them.  If two sets of parents are fighting, A and B, but I only say I won't allow the children of parents A in my house, I am implicitly supporting parents A.  Deosn't matter who approached me abotu not lettingt he kids in my house.  Doesn't matter who else has decided not to let the children of A in the house.   &gt;More importantly, the United States   I am not sure how the US stance comes into play as he is British, and lives in the UK.  &gt;It would just be redundant  If he was american (and he isn't) then it would not be redundant. You are not your nation.  If he was an elected official that would be one thing, but an individual's political statement isn't tempered by what his nation does.
The Christian Science Monitor is a good source. Or at least it was up til a few years ago. I don't read any news outside of reddit anymore. Despite the incorrect frontpage materials, it's pretty good with coming up with proper corrections such as this post.  EDIT: For the anti-theists: They're not whacko-christian-biased despite the name.   EDIT2: For the atheist bashers: Leave your personal agenda out of this.
agreed
Seems they didn't. Seems you did.
[deleted]
What bullshit. 
Oh somehow I missed that. Good, thanks.
You seem fairly knowledgeable about this stuff. I have a question.  Why would China, at this point in time, care about US military bases? We are their largest trading partner (I believe), and war between us would be extremely unpleasant for both sides. Why are we acting as if we are still at war?
True, except that by the time Monsanto got into the seed business, most farmers in the North America and Europe were already relying on seed that they bought every year from seed companies.  Corn farmers have been growing almost exclusively commercial hybrids for more than half a century.  Commercial seed companies started this trend, *not* genetic engineering.  Monsanto simply accelerated it.
Lesson learned to try harder. Lol. 
This story is all about how you people who constantly masterbate verbally about "the blood drinking zionists being", created a fake story, and made all you anti-zionist sheep upvote it. And now you are bitching about jewish conspiracies waging propaganda. Seriously: stop being such a bitch. you see everything in pro or against israel, while you ignore all the REAL horrible shit going on in the world (like syria, africa famine, tibet), unless you can make it seem "those dirty zionists" did it. I laugh at all you people who have to see the world in "bad guys" and "good guys", and that all who just slighty sympathize for a ideology or dosent want israel destroyed are automatically put in a box. You are a disgusting human being. That is all i am saying. Now please have a very bad day.
Aren't they shooting themselves in the knee with that, by drawing way more attention to the topic (Streisand effect) ?
Fucking kidding me? Turks worried about a cross and how it's oppressive? This kind of stuff just makes me so mad. Muslims who have Immigrated to the west and refuse to integrate leech off of honest working taxpayers and cry oppression when they aren't catered to over the most trivial thing. Your fucking flag has a crescent moon on it you shitheads go fuck yourselves with your 3 to 1 mosque to school ratio. People still think that Islam is some kind of religion and that it is remotely peaceful. The West is literally at war with a socio political ideology that has no intention of playing by the rules. These people will come into your countries and perpetuate their own culture with far higher birth rates living off of the natives and eventually gaining strength to take over and rule. Most of you won't realize that your culture and heritage has been destroyed until you are speaking arabic eating halal and going to sharia courts. This has happened in the past and will keep happening. 
Well, now I feel like I've been bullshat by my fortune teller
It's a bit rich of them to start waving the anti-Semite card: when you consider how concentration camps also held/processed massive numbers of physically disabled along with the mentally ill, homosexuals, and political+religious dissidents. Hawking almost definitely would've been sent to a camp if he had been living with his motor neuron disease in Nazi occupied Europe during WW2. No fancy speech synthesizers back then for the SS to realize he's one of the most intelligent people on the planet &amp; subsequently pervert his brilliance.
please cite these statistics. 
Not we.
It's important for all people to condemn injustice when they see it. He is one of the most respected minds alive today, his opinion on this matters.
Ok Varys
Especially when his Tibetans were committing terrorist attacks against the Chinese in the 1960s supported and armed by the CIA.  This is a cracking good read .... http://www.historynet.com/cias-secret-war-in-tibet.htm 
[deleted]
First of all, history may be directional, but it sure as shit is circular. I like to think of it as a spiral. But that's besides the point.  It also has a velocity. Nothing stops on a dime.  Initially sentiment was against Jews, nazis came to power. Sentiment turns against nazis, Jews become victims. Jews start Israel, Palestinians become victims. Sentiment turns agains jews, but doesn't become pro Palestinian. It just becomes neutral and logical. Forever and ever until all the enlightened people turn the world into heaven.  Nope. what happens is that sentiment starts favoring the Palestinians/Arabs/Muslims/whoever, those guys proceed to ride their high horse into heaven (purposefully killing civilians to get in). They will do it for a while, and then sentiment will turn once more. I'm sure all it will take for you is a family member or friend being killed in a senseless attack against civilians. For others, it will take far less. For some, all it will take is an Imam proclaiming that his village is now under sharia law.  Circles, my friend. Not lines. The only line in history is technology. 
So brave.
Learn one of the many differences between Hawking and you: people care about his opinions, not yours.
Same here, although I stopped being religious ages ago.  When I was in college I lived in a Jewish frat house, and quite often I'd here my frat brothers blindly support Israel.  I had to keep quiet for fear that I would be ridiculed for my belief that Israel is just as much to blame if not moreso for the problems going on with Palestine.
I'm voting Rodman 2016!
Seeing how this dominated reddit today and how the "blogosphere" and mainstream media monitor reddit, it will be quite telling how this story will be ignored in corporate media. 
Israel makes the major part of its money from high-tech. And I'm not talking manufacturing, just development. So good luck with that.  And if you think you're going to convince CEOs from getting out of the Silicon Wadi because of ideology... you're not.
Africa, if you are some entertainer.
£650? Sign me up!
Brace yourselves, /r/Shitredditsays is coming
Wrong. You are mixing up nationality and religion. Religion does not grant the right to occupy territory.
The right of return is ludicrous, Arabs themselves understand this, if Arab refugees return to Israel, Israel would cease to exist as a Jewish country. The right of return is a calculted move to stall the peace process, while simultaneously making Israel look like an unreasonable occupier, by making such outrageous demands.  The best solution is a partnership between Israel and Jordan, I wouldnt mind if a million  Palestinian Arabs become citizens of Israel, but I believe that Jordan must take most of the refugees.  &gt;Because fuck the Jews thats why. Everyone hated them.  I do not understand why the Jewish people should condemn themselves to live surrounded by people who feel that way.   I do not care what European motivations were for the founding of Israel, the only motivations that matter to me are the motivations of the Jews (when concerning the founding of Israel).  &gt;At some point Arabs will out populate the Jews in their own country and the matter will be over anyway.  I certainly hope your wrong about that friend.   
No not at all. Bizzare goalpost shift there from yourself. Stopping the constant blatant colonisation of Palestine and the completely discriminatory and apartheid judicial practices of Israel would be a start.    When I checked your post history I grew sleepy looking through page after page after page of your posts on this subject so I guess you're very tired at this stage. I understand. I'm off to bed, sleep well.
Sigh, that makes me so sad. Fear and ignorance. 
So you're a Nordic female?  Reddit loves you.
itshappening.gif
Both of ya'll are being silly  Stephen Hawking is justified. He can go to whatever conference he wants for whatever reasons he wants. You can go kick rocks if you don't like his reasons,   But that is no reason to insult this poster and tell him to "go cry to a wall". That wall is sacred to an entire ethnic group and of emence historical value. 
I think I have work tomorrow... may have to head to bed............................ and die
surprise surprise
i know that, I just was looking for more, but I guess there isnt
debkafile is like the onion
Well it is not the Cold War so I do not understand why the stigma if any. We really should consider them and China to be stronger allies.
Still not white though.
Imagine having brothels with 13 year olds, would be pretty sweet! They would make a lot of money judging from all the comments here.  
Sure, expect a genius to ignore history. Dude's wise, smart and, it seems, principled.
From what I understand a communist party still exists within Bangladesh, though the extent to which their operations lie I am not aware of.
http://24.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_mdtigotPUS1qdf43eo1_500.gif
Well technically you are right,  but News Corp does own 39.1% of BSkyB so his type of argument still has some validity.    Murdock tried to unsuccessfully wrestle control in 2010-11
It's almost like it's... a symbol.  Seriously reddit's collective IQ is plummetting off of a sheer rock face.
The Jews must have been taking notes during the Holocaust.
I've seen no people in this thread say that Israel haters are anti-semitic, but I've seen tonnes of people saying that Zionists are evil incarnate.
I've seen them for as cheap as $500, but that's the absolute lowest cost I've come across.
The authors name comes up with zero results in Google. Sounds like the author is extremely obscure. So why should anyone care what Vanlookenvald has to say?
It tastes just like raisins!
Hang on, are you saying people are killing each other in Syria because Israel built settlements?
"I can't build there, something's in the way."
[deleted]
Anyone talking loudly to seemingly no one in particular will be considered a douche (or crazy!) That's been the case well before bluetooth.
During the period of civil unrest prior to the war, there were no reports of violent protest outside of blatant Baath party propaganda. And no, an opposition group receiving financial aid from the US does not give the government the right to gun down peaceful protesters.
It is designed to deal with the stress, ONCE. Only once. The problem will be those that do not understand that, they will get hurt.
[deleted]
Yes but Yusuf al-Qaradawi is an Egyptian Radical Islamist, he thinks Hitler was a great guy and advocates for Muslim apostates to be executed.  He's the filth moderate Muslims are fighting against or are in the very least embarrassed about. Hamas will provide a platform to anyone willing to piss on Israel, that's not news so what's the news here, crazy guy says crazy things?  You could argue he has more legitimacy now that the Muslim Brotherhood rules Egypt but let's not forget who contributed to that disaster.
Its been known he was right wing since his friendship with Thatcher. There is a difference between right wing British and right wing American though.
And yet the Paki intelligence agency was behind the Mumbai massacre. 
http://usatoday30.usatoday.com/news/world/2008-02-21-israel-palestinians_N.htm?csp=34  This is the sauciest sauce of all
&gt;**Each State shall appoint**, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives to which the State may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit under the United States, shall be appointed an Elector.  This is hardly a democratic process where the people are voting on the electors.  You are reaching.  
[deleted]
China needed allies after the revolution. It's not like western powers would ally with communists. They allied with any nation they could and as a result got some bad ones. However, NK has served strategic purposes that have been quite effective for china.  As dumb as the leadership of NK is, they have proven to be a great distraction and threat for china. Whenever crazy stuff starts happening in the government, china gets NK to steal the international spotlight. When America aids Taiwan, NK shells SK. It was a good relationship for china, but as years have passed china has increasingly lost control of the Kim family and the country is a total wildcard.    Anyways, don't blame a country that was essentially on its own for taking up shady allies. Also, the US kinda almost invaded china and considered nuking them so they have a pretty sound reason to ally up.
That says a lot about the central government.
Out of curiosity what type of 3D file is it?
Total garbage. This isn't a "we care about people issue" it's a purely political issue focusing on 1 event among hundreds of similar events that have happened throughout history.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_attacks_on_diplomatic_missions  Happens all the time. These guys know the risks of their job. And many embassies are really US staging points for background control of the country.  It's not shocking that this occurred, it's not surprising, and it'll happen again because Americans like to stick their faces in everyones shit, and are shocked to ever find a gun pointed back at them.  If that Ambassador wanted to stay perfectly safe, he should have stayed the fuck home in the USA.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Annexation#International_law_after_1948  That's pretty much it...the occupied territory cannot be considered part of Israel by the standards of international law.  see also from the same page:  &gt;No countries recognized Israel's annexation of East Jerusalem, except Costa Rica  &gt;In 1981, Israel passed the Golan Heights Law, which extended Israeli "law, jurisdiction, and administration" to the area, including the Shebaa farms area. This declaration was declared "null and void and without international legal effect" by United Nations Security Council Resolution 497. The only state that recognized the annexation is the Federated States of Micronesia.  &gt;The General Assembly then voted by majority, 110 in favour to 6 against (Canada, Israel, Marshall Islands, Federated States of Micronesia, Palau, United States), with 59 abstentions, to demand a full Israeli withdrawal from the Syrian Golan Heights.   Permanent occupation is a war crime. Simple as that.
[deleted]
I can't think of one instance of humanitarian intervention, but if you have an example please share. As per both aligning for Kuwait, it was not the case, it was pure self interest, the fact that lives were saved is accidental.
[Circular logic/reasoning is a logical fallacy.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Circular_reasoning)
Even if they are not innocent we shouldn't torture people.  And if they are not innocent try them in a court like anyone else, so they can be punished after being proven guilty.
&gt;Why the hell are they like this??  nationwide brainwashing over 60 years. 
Damn humans you scary.
As a foreigner in the US I would draw a distinction between the actions of three letter agencies and the general public. The majority of Americans I deal with, in the South, are friendly, hospitable people.
Which is why there are Muslims in the Israeli government, right?
want some cheese?
I don't believe he is talking about corruption that would exist in greece or central africa, bribing your way out of speeding fines, or paying of a local council offical to build a pool or knock down an orphanage.  If the someone has nefarious purposes, and can influence the policy and desicions of a country or governemt, then the government may not technically be legally corupt at all, but very much morrally courupt,
I'm fully aware of all this. I'm not calling them a bad idea. I'm confused, what was your motivation for this reply? I was saying that the US isnt a MurderState. We have background checks, which isnt perfect, but that doesnt make the US a murderstate.
Aw shit
&gt; Wrong, according to the 4th Geneva Convention transferring people into occupied land is a war crime.   The convention says "The Occupying Power shall not deport or transfer parts of its own civilian population into the territory it occupies."  You are arguing semantics.   The issue is moving another people into an occupied land, whether they do so on their own, with encouragement, or by force.  What is 'transfer'?  Does it cease to be 'transfer' just because the settlers want to go?  Do subsidies, encouragement, or low taxes amount to transfer?   What level of carrot and stick turns migration into transfer?  Quite clearly, 'transfer' means 'move' by any method, because 'deport' already covers coercive movement.  &gt; A French Court just ruled that Israel is not doing that.  cite?  [wikipedia says](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Israeli_settlement)  &gt; The consensus [76] view in the international community is that the existence of Israeli settlements in the West Bank including East Jerusalem and the Golan Heights is in violation of international law.[77] The Fourth Geneva Convention includes statements such as "the Occupying Power shall not deport or transfer parts of its own civilian population into the territory it occupies".[78]  And [this article, with references](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/International_law_and_Israeli_settlements):  &gt; The international community considers the establishment of Israeli settlements in the Israeli-occupied territories illegal under international law,[1][2][3][4][5] but Israel maintains that they are consistent with international law[6] because it does not agree that the Fourth Geneva Convention applies to the territories occupied in the 1967 Six-Day War, due to lack of a legal sovereign of these territories.[7] The United Nations Security Council, the United Nations General Assembly, the International Committee of the Red Cross, the International Court of Justice and the High Contracting Parties to the Convention have all affirmed that the Fourth Geneva Convention does apply.[8][9] Numerous UN resolutions have stated that the building and existence of Israeli settlements in the West Bank, East Jerusalem and the Golan Heights are a violation of international law, including UN Security Council resolutions in 1979 and 1980.[10][11][12] UN Security Council Resolution 446 refers to the Fourth Geneva Convention as the applicable international legal instrument, and calls upon Israel to desist from transferring its own population into the territories or changing their demographic makeup. The reconvened Conference of the High Contracting Parties to the Geneva Conventions has declared the settlements illegal[13] as has the primary judicial organ of the UN, the International Court of Justice[14] and the International Committee of the Red Cross. The position of successive Israeli governments is that all authorized settlements are entirely legal and consistent with international law,[15] despite Israel's armistice agreements having all being with High Contracting Parties.[16] In practice, Israel does not accept that the Fourth Geneva Convention applies de jure, but has stated that on humanitarian issues it will govern itself de facto by its provisions, without specifying which these are.[17][18] The majority of legal scholars hold the settlements to violate international law, while others have offered dissenting views supporting the Israeli position.[2]  You're expressing a minority, somewhat kooky, pro-Israel view, shared by few others.    
I'm not going to reconsider it because it was never considered in the 1st place. I will consider it now....  I am done and am displeased with the results of my synopsis.
Obviously it's not for everyone, but there are plenty of technical jobs that require very basic math skills and basic knowledge of hand tools that kids don't even know about. While the lower level factory jobs are being phased out by technology and outsourcing, there are higher level tech jobs opening up to maintain and operate modern manufacturing equipment. The jobs pay well and are far from assembly line type labor. Theres just a stigma around it because people don't understand it. Believe me, I get that we can't all be a society of engineers. But we import a lot of doctors and engineers, and complain about American kids not having jobs. My point is, qualify us for what's there. I recently read that there are 2-3 people getting degrees in law for every one job opening there is. We're obviously barking up the wrong tree
My problem is that the poisons they are spraying on food are cancerous. 
[deleted]
&gt;the United States government claims control of the information  &gt;Control  &gt;Information  Pick one.
It is still a juxtaposition.
Especially considering the fact that there are no GM tomatoes.
Even then its guaranteed it will misfire or jam. 
Which makes me wonder how this has any upvotes at all.
Country and millions of people of one ethnicity=/=a church. That is sad, this is tragic. This is not about the temple, this is about Tibet and the Tibetian people who are either living in exile or under extreme identity suppression.
The brainwash is treating you well.
I'm sorry but this story is complete bullshit.   The oldest Tibetan Monastery was constructed in the [year 776](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Samye), it's a little over 1000 years old, a far cry from 5000.  You probably made this story up for karma.
I agree with you, but I doubt it's easy to convince Hamas of this.
Since when? The way Reddit absolves Obama of any type of responsibility for anything negative you would think Cheney, Rove, Rumsfeld are still at the helm.
Selective breeding and inserting bacterial genes or genes of other species with a gene gun or using a vector bacteria and antibiotic resistant gene markers are not the same thing.  Hence the use of the word transgenics. 
You mean there are immature idiots on Twitter? To the front page!
There is no legal justification, the entire thing is hell.
Long have I waited for the chance to finally use the word shitheel
[Here](http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2012/12/121203081621.htm) is a general article on pesticides leading to allergies.  [Here](http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2013/04/130429164630.htm) is a study of how children in the United States develop more food allergies than in any other country around the world. Children from foreign countries are still at risk to developing food allergies in the United States, especially if they live in the country for a decade.  [I hate to use this site](http://gmo-awareness.com/all-about-gmos/gmo-risks/) because it is obviously biased, but it shows data of an obvious correlation between increased GMOs in food and increased allergies in ten years (there's a chart about half-way down the page).  [Here](http://calorielab.com/news/2011/01/01/big-8-food-allergies/) is a site that shows how babies typically grow out of their food allergies. Most babies actually have allergies when they are born, but grow out of it rather quickly due to continuous exposure to those foods. Soy is a big one: I remember reading somewhere that most babies are allergic to soy, but because it is basically used in *everything*, most grow out of it. That rate of these retained allergies past childhood, however, has increased dramatically in the last ten years alone.  [Here](http://www.monsanto.com/newsviews/Pages/food-safety.aspx) is Monsanto's response to accusations of increased allergies due to GMOs. They say that there isn't an increase in allergies, but rather an increase in *awareness* of allergies. They say soy is such a big allergy now because it is a severely foreign substance - even though soy is found in most baby lotions, clothes, soaps, foods, etc. They then say there is no way to test to see if food will lead to allergies, and *then* go on to say they've done extensive testing. They also accuse American babies of being to clean, thus increased allergies.
so is misinformation, unfortunately 
Consensus is not science, it just means a bunch of people agree on something that is in their own best interest.  To answer your question, I don't know what to believe.  I just know what I believe......and Im fine with that.
&gt;That doesn't change how there is a lack of research.  Actually, it calls your whole claim that there is a lack of research into question.  If you were unaware of the fact that BT is actually a very common organic pesticide, why would your claim that there is a lack of research have any validity? 
When will people stop fucking repeating this myth? Do you have a single source? No, because this is a convenient lie dreamt up by people who have paintbrushes bigger than the truth.
The bitter truth is that we don't live in a free society.   We can stuff our fingers in our ears and sing lalalala all we want but if you look at your daily life with reality goggles you know the truth. 
Not they're not. Googling some of the sources brings up nothing. The point you just made also applied the other way. If these quotes are used out of context or have been altered or plucked from thin air but taken for fact non the less, that is propaganda and out right lied.  The first one I searched for had no replies. 'A Solution to the Refugee Problem' also sourced from 'Israeli documents'...  come on now. 
I posted it elsewhere in this thread but I'll post it again. If you have the time to watch a documentary discussing the issues of GMOs, make the time to make sure you understand the science behind the basic biotechnology processes. If you don't understand the science, it's very easy to see negligence and arrogance in Monsanto's stance and the stance of the regulatory agencies when their positions are actually quite sensible.  A short list of Biotechnology science videos to provide an understanding of the most essential biology information needed to understand the issue.  -------   [Documentary clip describing Transcription and Protein Synthesis](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lpb5s2F1pyM)  Transcription and Protein Synthesis by TEA Biotechnology &gt;[DNA Transcription](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YJZIvGl7Jnc&amp;list=UU7w8FGPEZXF1LQX3B-IvE8A&amp;index=3)  &gt;[Protein synthesis from RNA](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZDmqvuI56PM)  &gt;[Protein Structure and Function](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uqfflg5zjC0&amp;list=UU7w8FGPEZXF1LQX3B-IvE8A&amp;index=1)  [Overview of Gene Vectors for Transgenic Plants](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8OI3HaSXN4k)  Lecture: [Overview of Recombinant DNA Technology - MIT Open Source](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uDXH6Uu0ghc)  [A More Detailed Overview of rDNA Technology - MIT Open Source](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=htYyCEdc8B4)  [PCR/DNA Amplification - if you are confused by references to amplification](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OK7_ReXhVaQ)
on top of that; do you eat anything sterile?
[deleted]
I encourage the neo-nazism that is coming from Greece atm.
Tell you what. You win. Obama did it.
Want to hear some shady shit?  I downloaded a book and printed it once.  I didn't even pay for it.  We should ban ALL printers.
&gt;Your morals are an illusion.  for some reason i now imagine you wear a fedora. 
I've noticed that some of the pro-GMO guys get targeted with having every post they make downvoted... so it makes sense to have a separate account for it.
This is probably the 4th or 5th time I've seen this stupid subject with the exact same figure on the front page.      we fucking get it.
Cause problems in the Matrix.   (make it difficult to download the real deal, get updates, etc)
I wonder how many Israelis upvoted you without catching on the sarcasm.
&gt;I still disagree. I said "Jewish friends," again, to show how that doesn't go with Israel. Not all my Jewish friends support Israel. But even for those that do, my lack of support of Israel has nothing to do with our friendship. It's separating the person from the issue.  Again, this is confusing. I think that an Israeli technology *does* go with Israel. Furthermore, why is an Israeli technology separate from the issue, but an Israeli science conference is not separate from the issue?  &gt;Similarly, boycotting a country's politics or actions  You cannot simply say "I'm boycotting your actions." It actually has to go along with some refusal. In fact, you admit this point later when you say:  &gt;If... I was boycotting America (I don't know what that might look like) I would still have to buy products. It would be stupid to not eat simply because I'm mad at America.   Exactly. You don't know what it would look like because you are excluding the most plausible means of boycott. I can tell you exactly what a boycott of the US would look like - not buying American products.  &gt;And even if I'm creating new variables, and my logic is a bit less rigorous than what you say, it's not fucking anti-semitism.  In my mind, there are two common issues of antisemitism relating to this debate:  1) When someone conflates all Jews with the actions of the Israeli government; and  2) When someone applies a different standard to Israel than they do to any other country when there is no other logical explanation to explain the differing standards.
Good goy, keep making it seem Obama and Democrats can't do anything because of conservative hatemonger Republicans.
Not at all. I preach nothing. What I am saying is that if we try to intellectualize, we remain attached and therefore, make no progress. Why relearn what exists within everyone already? It's more about accessing the true nature of yourself. I appreciate people wanting to preserve, but I think that is a razors edge if we are talking about the real value of Buddhism. Consider for a moment that you likely never had heard and never would have heard of an likely haven't heard of a great deal of ancient sites with buildings. But now, this object is in your consciousness and it's material form is of import to you. Access the buddha within and what is said? Opinions may vary. :-)
Are you my new mommy and daddy ? http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KQTWFb7kVSI
Raccoons eat meat so I'm pretty sure they'd be haram, even thought they aren't strictly speaking carnivorous.
IANAL, but patents don't prevent people from copying or using the same patented design for personal use.  Patents only prevent people from copying or using the same design and then selling them.
A whole room dedicated to 3 1/2" floppies 
&gt;The Japanese knew the Soviets couldn't transport an army capable of invading Japan. Not in the latter half of 1945. They didn't have the shipping or the supply chain.  This post gives you a general idea of what was to happen.   ["As late as August 22, 1945 the Soviets had serious plans in the works to invade Hokkaido, Japans north island. The job was to have fallen on the 87th Rifle Corps and was to commence on 8/21. There was unexpectedly heavy resistance on the Russian take over of Sakhalin however and the Hokkaido operation was moved to August 24 or 25. The landings would occur at Rumoi, and though the assault fleet could be considered rag tag in comparison to the American fleet, there was less resistance expected and the Russians were confident they could carry it out. This invasion of the Japanese homeland would be coming a full 2 months earlier than the planned Operation Olympic invasion of Kyushu. Even though the Russians were prohibited by the Potsdam agreement from moving into Hokkaido, the fact that they continued to fight the Japanese even after the Emperors August 15th surrender announcement would give the Russians an excuse to keep fighting and move into Hokkaido, Potsdam allowing for "contingency planning." Imagine the geo-political fallout from the Russians occupying Hokkaido and a divided postwar Japan. The threat of Russian occupation of Japan may have also influenced Trumans decision to use the A-bomb and thus hasten the wars end. Stalin canceled the Hokkaido invasion when he saw that Japans surrender was inevitable and further Russian advance would damage relations with the allies and possible lead to U.S. naval action, and possible conflict. Trumans firm stand with Stalin regarding Soviet incursion into Japan ranks as one of the most important decisions ever made by Truman."](http://forum.axishistory.com/viewtopic.php?t=20999)  
Yes, I think they are inherently evil objects as they are designed to kill things.  Arguing that it's been legal to create firearms in USA as a counterpoint is redundant, we're talking about the whole world here.
The NorthKo regime must be so weak 1 American of korean descent can take it down, it seems.
The difference is the people in gaza are being fed, clothed, given food, water, electricity... all by Israel. How do the repay israel for trying to do right by them? They fire rockets. 
These blueprints are specifically designed to print a working gun.  The only way Home Depot could be considered an arms dealer is if they sold those things specifically under a banner that said **Deal of the week! Build your own gun at home! Buy one piece of PVC pipe, get these nails free!**
Do you have the one for a pressure cooker bomb too? I can't find it 
And then China will probably follow the precedent of the US.
"A gun in every home, peace on every street." - Frank Fontaine
They would use hydrophonics to grow plants. If you have the plants, you have food and oxygen.
/u/happy-time-harry  
Yeah that is all it takes, maybe you should read the source I provided. I'm sure you won't because you are convinced you are right. Fuck off and have a great day.
If you don't understand the specifics of guns, please do not post in a thread about guns. You're talking about stuff you obviously don't understand and you're spreading incorrect information. People who might not be familiar with the subject material are reading your posts and becoming dumber.
My point was that The Jebus was a tight fisted twat who stole someone's liver and gave nothing back.
I don't know a whole lot about terraforming but I think since Mars is similar to Earth in size and distance from the sun that we could eventually create an ozone layer. The plants couldn't survive outside until that was already in place though, so you'd have to have some sort of one way vents to let the oxygen out. I suspect the process would take centuries though, so by itself it wouldn't be very helpful. Combining it with other methods like releasing the oxygen locked up in the water in the icecaps would be more likely to get noticeable results, but it still looks like any martian colonists will be living in bubbles for a long time.
&gt; who in their right mind would give up the chance to not only go to space but live on another planet?   Me.  Because as cool as it sounds, the novelty will wear off after day 6,046 on a boring rock.  I like internet access, bars, cities, societies, new videogame releases, going to the cinema, and generally interacting with the other 7 billion people on the planet.  I even love replying to your post and discussing this with you.  None of that on Mars.  
This gives me hope. It also gave me a bit of frisson ( /r/frisson )
Well that depends on how you look at it, the Cold war was a direct extension of WWII and lasted until the 80's and the U.S. won. That might sound patriotic but it isn't it is just fact.  The allies won a victory over the Axis but the U.S. came out of the war on top both economically and militarily. Very few people dispute that.
&gt; but you expect me to believe the people buying off the government      I didn't say anything about Monsanto or the Government. I just said that NN is an absolute joke when it comes to journalism. If you want to promote anti-GMO you can at least use some more credible sources: try academic articles, not a website that is selling the same products as the ideology it's trying to promote.    &gt;Just because you are a corporatist      What the fuck does anything have to do with corporatism? What I have said that leads to me necessarily being a corporatist? I'm not here to pick a fight, I haven't even shown my support for one side or the other. If you want to have an impact at least don't assume that every person that has a problem with your method is on the complete opposite side of the ideology table.    
Nevermind magnet links.  Anyone could post one here.  Like this:   magnet:?xt=urn:btih:nraitldmcnhrwlp7dbezmwfsfdm6wjsx&amp;dn=Liberator.zip  Is that string of characters going to become illegal too?
EFFICIENCY AND EASE OF ACCESS AND PAPER TRAIL.   you can buy guns directly too. Thats not the point. 
You're forgetting their air force, which is the third largest in the world, behind only the UK and US.
And the next thing you know, Pirate Bay HQ becomes a crater to the sound of a drone buzzing above.
"Mom, if you were in a German ball eating movie, you would tell me, right?"
Still waiting for 4 more negatives.... c'mon Bitcoin bro.
Before the antisemite thing gets dropped, Mr Chomsky is Jewish.
The plural is Lego!
[deleted]
Many things are facts and not relevant to an argument.  I can't have a discussion with you if you don't understand a basic tenet of rhetoric.  Stormfront please go  &gt;  It's really sad because you are a reason for antisemitism.  Oooh and we have a winner!
I think you are full of shit. (a) you admit that there are far worse human rights violators around the world, and even in that region, and yet the only one you think we should focus on is Israel (b) like a lot of morons on /r/worldnews you claim that you will be accused of being an anti-Semite just because you disagreed with Israel, even though this almost never occurs and (c) you claim America is a Jewish homeland? WTF is up with that? 
Daily reminder: Chomsky is the premier public intellectual of our generation.
I'm glad I gave you this chance to be such a martyr, bro.
Could you image what it would feel like to find out you're the ugliest dude on the whole planet?
Glad to shed some light! And you make an excellent point about corn being an issue mainly for *processed* foods. Edited the above comment to reflect that change.  Right, there are all kinds of opinions about GMO's, but the most qualified lawyer in the world can't make sound defense of Monsanto's business practice. I have yet to meet anyone who thinks that what they do is okay.
A sad reality in the past. 
That's not all you have...
Nazi Germany may have been defeated, but whatever evil it is that can seize the hearts of men and give birth to such horror is alive and well in Israel.
i took a course on this conflict at my university in first year. It tackled both sides arguments of who is right, and who may not be right. We weren't supposed to pick sides on the conflict however study evidence of the conflict from both sides throught first hand accounts, historical events, documentaries, sympathizers for both sides. Had the Gaza Dr. come to talk to our class and visited a Rabbi. Regardless in the end the whole class felt like Israel was and is still bullying the Palestinians around with no regard for any law or well being of life. Fuck Israel, the only reason there even there is because Britain promised them some land if they would help fight with the allies, which they already promised the land to the Palestinians. Its actually Britain fault i guess....
I think I've already mentioned in a previous post that nobody wants to see him in a bad way, and certainly nobody wants him to freeze to death.  At no point did I suggest anyone throw him to the wolves.  Everyone here is so concerned with the little details that they're missing the larger picture.  If you want to live on the street nobody is going to stop you from doing that.  If you don't want to live on the street, you have to make an effort to get out of your rut.  The generosity of people can only get you so far before you have to take a little responsibility yourself.
[deleted]
[deleted]
What I express is backed up by quotes, facts etc. The fact is, Israel is a terrorist state. If that makes me a ''Palestinian shill'' then I am!   The people who disagree with me ignore the facts of the matter. They just spew out Zionist propaganda and support apartheid against an entity of oppressed civilians 
[deleted]
Store fixtures :-http://www.bethelfixtures.com/Bethel_Store_Fixtures/Policy.asp?Sub=SF         
well what the fuck does Nepal know right?
Jews these days: Bombing palestine, taking palestine land, bombing syria. Claiming that god gave them some lands. Wtf are they eating???
Are these Jews persecuted in those places by Arabs? Or the general population? Are they being persecuted because they are Jews or because of a percieved link between Jews and Israel?
I know that it is only the smart thing to do in space flight, but I am still amazed that they have such detailed plans for just about every contingency, down to "okay, now be careful not to snag the mirror on that random component."
It also has to do with all the hyper religious bastards thinking the end is nigh and the apocolypse and the second coming of christ is near and all that retarded, nutball bullshit. They want the world to end and in fact wish it would speed up because for some retarded reasoning they think they'll be saved. They get their cronies into government positions in order to get their way. Jokes on them, they'll burn up like the rest of us.
You're an idiot. Value cannot be eternally created. Valuable services are sometimes not serviceable by a profit motive. 
[deleted]
See the TURTLE of enormous girth!   On his shell he holds the Earth.
No, we are most definitely in the present.
It's still hydrocarbons.
At very least you could say "sub-Saharan Africa" or "some parts of Africa". It isn't that difficult.  It's like calling Asia poor, yes there are many poor Asians, but it seems ridiculous to lump Japan, Taiwan, South Korea, Singapore, etc in there.
**The lack of police response to allegations against Sir Jimmy Savile, is a far more serious matter than "West Yorkshire police failing to join up the dots..”**  &gt;[According to David Icke,](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BUSmc5Tiuto) the entire British Royal House including Lord Mountbatten, Prince Philip, Lady Diana Spencer and Prince Charles, is compromised re child murder on a massive scale, and that all legislation and all Royal assent, is at the behest of Jews ^Edit and blackmail.  **[Aquarius Channelings](http://aquariuschannelings.com/)**   * The Queen Mother pushed a knife into the rectum of two sacrificed boys, aged 13 and 18.   * The Queen cut the victim’s throat from left to right .. went crazy, stabbing and ripping at the flesh.   * Prince Charles sacrificed children .. Andrew, Prince Philip, and Anne, were at the rituals.  **Icke says [Satanism﻿ &amp; Human Sacrifice](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CW7-UskI3To), goes on at the Royal residences of Sandringham and Balmoral, that Sir Jimmy Savile went to morgues across England to access the bodies of dead children, and was up to his neck in the Haut de la Garenne affair.**  &gt;[Prinzowhales @ cbsnews.com](http://www.cbsnews.com/8601-202_162-3168637-2.html?assetTypeId=30&amp;blogId=) says, re an allegedly spurious beheading in Iraq, "the blood?--I've been soaked by geysers from femorals--whatever they cut, it wasn't the carotid of a living human being."  &gt;[Guardian.co.uk says](http://www.guardian.co.uk/media/2012/oct/29/jimmy-savile-behaviour-prince-charles) .. a spokesman confirmed, the Prince of Wales [had] a relationship with Savile from the late 1970's onward, after both met thru their work with wheelchair sports charities.  &gt;Postulate Savile brought the wheelchair kids to Sandringham and Balmoral, according to Icke's testimony, where after they were slaughtered in rituals presided over by HRH, as per Prinzowhales @ CBS News!  **Edit:** You have to read between the lines on a David Icke post .. some ppl are reluctant to call a Jew a Jew, Alex Jones calls 'em Globalists, David Brooks calls 'em NeoCons, Icke says they are lizard ppl, I calls 'em by their right name .. Jews!  **Edit:** Moreover Jolly Prince Harry should provide a complete timeline for all of his movements, around the time of the last confirmed sighting of 17 yo [Alisa Dmitrijeva,](http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/uk-england-norfolk-16460141) whose body was found on the Queen’s estate at Sandringham January 1, 2012, and re whether he knows anything about a green [Lexus GS300,](http://s41.radikal.ru/i094/1212/d0/139c3773b2d8.jpg) police say is associated with the crime!
It makes lots of sense.  My understanding is that  Israel has a trade treaty with the EU, but this treaty does not cover non-Israel (settlements).  The EU has always looked the other way, and certain folks scream when the treaty is taken literally.  "An attack on the settlements is an attack on Israel .... blah blah."  So Gilmore just supported a labeling program for settlement goods, not even banning them.  That's pretty mild, and probably the most that could get passed.  Yet's it's enough to make Netanyahu have a fit.
Yup.
[This source](http://www.indexmundi.com/blog/index.php/2012/12/19/rape-statistics-by-country/) actually does indicate higher rates of rape in Ireland than in India, per capita.  Of course, it only counts *reported* rape.  Who knows the real figures.  For the record, I'm not taking sides.  I just thought I could insert some numbers to inform this very stimulating verbal exchange.
[deleted]
Sob, to bad Challenger will not be. 
[deleted]
Greed is the reason things like the plow exist.
Then we can't hold Israeli's responsible for the actions of their government, or punish innocent Israeli businessmen by boycotting their goods....
Unrelated but was that any good?
Because the development of a Thorium reactor would not result in any gain in profit for the company developing it. Even if they could patent EVERY part on the reactor as their own, it would be all too easy to make a similar design. A billion dollars is a large investment for a test reactor. The US government decided they didn't want to foot the bill (yet threw 25 Billion at Plutonium fast breeders) and no one has since. China will build one, it's a matter of time. 
Thanks for the intellectual discussion, moron.
Need dem short term profits! Buy buy buy, spend spend spend, consume consume consume! Shut the fuck up and stop questioning the order.
It's not that they don't give a shit, but that the standards to actually punish somebody for cheating are so high that it's basically impossible.
And I just learned a new word... Rort.
&gt; they're not saying that's their point of view, rather that it's one that's pervasive in their society/culture.  ...and yet they did nothing to separate their view from a particularly disturbing trend that they recognize in their culture? Sorry, you're wrong here, but nice try.
Just not the right to not be arbitrarily deprived of any other right.
Maybe they don't want to be discriminated, maybe they want to be able to show love publicly without being harassed. Maybe they want to be able to marry, adopt a kid and share room in the family grave in the church yard. You know, basic hetro stuff. I actually don't know but have always assumed its these things.
[deleted]
You talking about Guantanamo? Or is detention without trial, torture and inhumane incarceration not signs of a police state when its the US?
[deleted]
That is a ridiculously biased and inaccurate account of history you have there.  But props to you, you've used it pretty well to create a fabulous Islamophobic post .
People generally misinterpret counterrevolutionaries as simple dissidents.
Most other non-Western cultures aren't nearly as horrible and backwards as Muslim cultures. 
Sadly, they often get ahead in the business world also.  I've always been an honest person, in school and in work, and it has really hurt my career because I'm unwilling to fake my results, to cover my errors, or to point the finger at someone else.  It really does suck.
Her colleagues are at fault too.  But she should have researched this important tidbit from the article:  "What Alicia didn’t know is that under the UAE’s strict sharia laws, if the perpetrator does not confess, a rape cannot be convicted without four adult Muslim male witnesses."  Why take the risk? She is an educated person from a western society, she had the means to look into Dubai before taking the trip. If you really want to feel bad for foreigners in Dubai, go feel bad for the exploited Bangladeshis who were lured there on false promises, had no way of knowing otherwise, and are stuck as slaves.
Ur kidding, right? I have never seen people go through more effort defending a country on this  site than those who defend Israel. Meanwhile negative comments on Muslims and the Roma are voted to the top
HAHAHAHAHA that's hilarious. 
LEAST SHOCKING NEWS EVER...        they were peacocking....  china is their ONLY financial friend...   OH LOOK IT'S A BULLSHIT CHESS MATCH PREDETERMINED...        educate yourself and stop being a fucking retard
&gt; This includes forensic evidence (medical evidence like a rape kit) or witness testimony (less than 4 for example).      Well obviously this wasn't the case here....         &gt; As for lashes, those haven't been in vogue except in Southeast Asia where they depart from Islamic standards of punishment. Lashings are supposed to be humiliating, but don't cut the skin or leave marks:      http://rawjustice.com/2010/11/23/foreign-couple-in-the-uae-sentenced-to-100-lashes-for-having-sex/       http://rawjustice.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/11/whipping.jpg      No marks, huh?
Speaking as someone who hasn't been a teenager for a long time, I feel your pain.
---Redacted due to me not wanting to improve the intelligence of others--- 
Hey guys, let's ignore the learned professor because this internet guy know better.  
If Europe doesn't do anything with its immigration policy, it will happen in Europe given enough time.
Yea, r/politics and r/atheism are full of so much shit it make me see red.   I'm beginning to think the same about r/worldnews, except I like to keep up with current events, which, come to think of it r/worldnews isn't too good at either.  Reddit is becoming more of a disappointment each day I come on it. 
fucking same here  thankfully in Algeria we don't have such bullshit laws , but shit like this is what makes the west look more and more badly of our countries 
Confucianism - I guess not technically a religion - but few people would argue that Confucianism isn't a huge part of Chinese life.
&gt;it's a "~~most~~ all cultures are actually shit" thing.  FTFY  To be honest I feel the issue at hand here isn't the (admittedly blatant) hypocrisy of shari-a law, but more the suppression by the UAE and starwood management of the issue. I find it more disturbing that hotel management had an employee with trauma, broken ribs and bruises and decided now was the time to remind her she had to repay her travel expenses and to keep silent.   It's overseas law meets authoritarian management trying to hide a long chain of screwups.
[deleted]
[deleted]
/r/news  
It happened in the US on the same day      http://www.liveleak.com/view?i=2d7_1368313995
They are stoned to death in some Islamic parts of the world.
[deleted]
All true but I wouldn't make the link between the culprit here (and I'm of course only speculating this is his issue, I really shouldn't) and people who embrace apathy out of opportunism, often it involves some self-deception or at least compartmentalization, I suspect most of them do actually believe they are helping the world in a convoluted way despite that 99.9% can't even begin to grasp that assessment. 
You ask too much.
I know it's a misquoted Churchill, that's why I didn't attribute it to him. My gov/civ teacher in high school said that, he was quoting one of his professors.
The kind of nations where you have issues like that generally are **NOT** economically free. Take a look at the link I posted before, look where nations like Bangladesh, South Africa and Pakistan fall.
Well people in the States love their guns. I don't mind people owning guns but there should be a line somewhere. What is the purpose of owning an AR-15 military style weapon? Or a 50 cal sniper rifle? What the hell are they hunting with a 50 cal rifle? Fucking armored buffaloes?
yes.
Right, because consumable contraband that can be profitable by the gram, has no serial number and is sought by everyday people as oppose to exclusively by violent criminals is the same thing. Drug dealers *do* have to worry that the illegal products they sell will be traced back to them and thus have less incentive to sell. They also have to worry about losing the legal pharmaceutical businesses they run as a result of their questionable transactions. The illegal drug market is *exactly* like the illegal firearm market, right down to putting guns in condoms and swallowing them to smuggle them into the country. Maybe we could treat both like a health problem, the same method that has been proven effective at reducing drug abuse in Europe - oh wait, they block that, too. No pediatrician is going to ask ME if I own a firearm and then hand me a pamphlet on safe practices. The nerve!
I really do hate New Orleans.  Source: I live there.
Or, you know, [an hour](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Atrax_robustus#Venom).  Fortunately, where funnel webs live, you're rarely more than fifteen minutes from a dose of antivenin.
Are you the only white people who live there?
So all the sudden now you are using common sense to support your position? Where was it 5 posts ago?
&gt;“Today, any job in a concentration camp can be sufficient evidence towards a conviction as accessory to murder."  That doesn't seem like justice to me. 
Weed, psych drugs and a pain med. I'm bi-polar and have several sets of PTSD. (sets= parts of my life.) I've learned to laugh at everything.
Bravery Level X is a stupid meme. Just like electric_zebra said, say something that is popular opinion on reddit and somebody is going to make a snarky comment about you being "so brave" for saying it. Basically, ignore that guy, he thinks he's being clever. 
That's not what a "fundamentalist" is.  Someone who follows the "fundamentals" of any belief system is a fundamentalist.  The problem is that Islam (like most religions) has fundamentals set in opposition to each other.  Every heinous act justified by Al Qaeda or Taliban or KKK or whatever can mine the text for whatever they need to support it.
A debate that could literally continue for eternity, because language is an imprecise method of describing actual things. Whether we choose to define viruses as living or not living is fairly uninteresting.
Oh man when you do some reading you are going to lose your shit. Hospitals are the most common place you can get sick man. Think about it. A bunch of sick people in one building. Anything click in your head? 
Thank you, sure :)
It's easy to talk like a know-it-all with hindsight on your side.
Always start first in Madagascar you fool!
Shazzam
[deleted]
Please read carefully. "Virtually non-existent" does not mean "not one single person has ever been hit/stabbed/etc [...] ever". It just means that it happens so rarely that it's statistically irrelevant. And your first statement is equally nonsensical. How exactly do you quantify "ability for violent crime"? You can only measure incidence.  I was saying that violent crime is extremely low and correlating it with the lack of access to firearms. Of course that doesn't imply causation, but at the very least I think it does mandate a discussion on the link between guns and violent crime.
Well, Turkey is a NATO member. If a NATO member gets attacked, NATO must protect it. Just like how all the NATO countries fight together with the US in Afghanistan 
I guess you wouldn't recognize black humor if it bit your wedding tackle..
Plagueinc for iphones and androids. PC equilvalent would be Pandemic
Source is not credible ("Starting from a personal blog in 2011, it developed into a daily newspaper in 2013") and quoted science is [unreliable](http://scienceblogs.com/insolence/2012/10/31/and-now-death-by-gardasil-again-not-so-fast/) to say the least.  Even for Reddit, this is a lame post.  BTW - it is possible to read the 'article' in 1 minute if you're a fast reader.
Keep in mind that a large portion of reddit's users are literally children. 
That also includes that, because those who do the government are also people.
for most of them
I haven't seen any concrete evidence to support a human is inherently valuable, it seems the only value we have is when one of us fixes problems that for the most part we created and only affect us. Humans are more or less just parasites, sustaining our existence at the expense of the planet.
but that doesnt mean that its not a hungry kenyan villager trying to feed his family 
The thing about stone soup is that you really need to get the flavour just right.
Then how will you feed yourself without producing food? If you don't create a state that can provide a rule of law over trade, then why would people *ever* do anything but work in some sort of agriculture? It's the single most important commodity that is bartered for. The only other option is to start reaping what others sow by means of violence.  There would be little to no reason to urbanize meaning no industrialization, feeble R&amp;D, no creative economy, no finance, and no service sector.  You **need** a legally-binding place where fellow humans with divergent concerns can conduct transactions over mutual concerns. Such a place is a market, and it doesn't work when there's no trust you'll be treated fairly. That trust is established through wrongdoers being punished, and the only capable entity that keeps this from descending to vigilantism is law laid down by a government.  Marx was a whining journalist who saw the world changing into a more urban place where people traded wages for goods (instead of making your own), and longed for the days of a polite German prince benevolently ruling. He wasn't an economist, and even his moral pleas weren't convincing.
Yea they know, but you are missing the point. They know it is wrong but they have to do it to survive.  It is doing evil for the greater good (the survival of their family)in their mind that makes them do this. Every animal do would this, if you put a hungry lion next to an extinct animal, the lion wont think twice before eating it. Humans are the same.
It has everything to do with communism, because it isn't economically feasible. ESPECIALLY not for a large society with high degrees of economic specialization.
Not really. Some are downvoting every post. There isn't a lot of karmacollecting going on.
Yes, for they are full of desperation which most of us can't understand.
The main reason for UN involvement is to reduce the appearance of a conflict of interest.  The US and ROK have long decried the horrors of the Kim regime, but the more conspiracy-minded see only self-interest in these declarations.  Getting the UN involved, even symbolically, adds moral authority (even though the UN hardly has any).
When we invent personal flying apparatuses down the line, this law is going to come out of nowhere and ruin everybody's fun.
I would rather have elephants alive so I can take my kids to see them in the wild.  The ivory buyers and the poachers can fuck off and die.  
Who?  99 Percent of the customers are rich Chinese businessmen. Oh, and they're the same guys who take pleasure in killing the tiger for their penises and kill rhinos for their horns. They also like to eat animals on the verge of extinction - on purpose, just so...they can; it's bragging rights to say that they ate that last animal. Please go to China and hunt them down. I am with you...in spirit of course :D
I would love to see what Reddit's demographic is these days... I wonder if it's the influx of younger users or the influx of (treading carefully here) less educated visitors that is causing this influx of "fuckwits". Perhaps both? Or something else? 
back to Pork, the other white meat.
You're welcome. Now I'm sure you've some inbreeding or lynching to do so I'll let you get back to it.
Fuck it. &lt;ZAP&gt;   Enjoy frog life, sucker! 
Adult crickets can provide upwards of (EDIT: 13g of protein in 100g of crickets). IIRC, they are considered a superfood.
Donald Black has plenty to say about these phenomenons. Read up on his 'Behaviour of Law', very interesting. 
Aren't you the creative type? 
For those of you who did not read the article, the subline was:  &gt;French Jews are quietly moving to New York, London, and Israel  So not only is he excluding immigration to the US and UK in his stupid comment, he is also calling a greater than 25% increase unremarkable.
Well, that may be fine for you, but I don't want a doctor who cheated their way through med school opening me up for a surgery.
Thats stupid everyone knows the only way to stop supernatural occurences is with a video recorder
Bah, anything below well into the 7 figures anually does not impress me.  Below that, all I care about is whatever the living wage is where I currently am.  Trust me, I really do dislike them; I live in boom town
This isn't as ironic as it first sounds... It's kinda like: "Boxer defeated by the guy he was trying to defeat himself!"
[deleted]
[deleted]
Japan was a samurai society. It does not accept defeat from the weak. But it was an honor losing to the Americans. Its a funny truth.
&gt; the Taliban leadership issued a statement offering its support for polio eradication campaigns as long as foreigners were not involved and that all volunteers respected local Islamic culture.  Like, for example, not shooting people?
Audi A4? A $30-40k car is obliterating a $50-80k car in sales? This is not news.
Its a little late for that.  I bought several thousand shares at $17/share after IPO. Its currently trading at $90/share in after hours trading. The easy money has already been made.
It costs between 2-3K/year in fuel to run an ICE car. After 5 years, that's about $10K-15K in fuel. Your battery replacement cost + electricity over that time will be cheaper than that.
As someone who speaks Mandarin there are definitely such words with negative connotations. There are people all over the world who have no qualms about lying, but I highly doubt any of it is due to the language unless it happens to be newspeak.
Jesus Christ doesn't have a broomstick.  Take that Atheists!
I work in Law Admissions and let me say, every LLM program in the country has this on their radar. 
&gt;This sounds sort of dumb  It doesn't just sound dumb.
I think we have to accept that cheating on certain assessment formats will happen, if you let students take the task home THEY WILL find a way to cheat, nothing short of constantly tailing them will actually work. My solution is to stop take home tasks and have other forms of assessment such as having multiple tests administered during the year.
[deleted]
I'm waiting for someone to play the moral reletivist card. Or the race card.  "You don't like the Afghans because they're brown!"  Which is amusing. My branch of service has been nicknamed (especially on the West Coast) the *United States Mexican Corps*, and I even have a brown wife. I don't like the Afghans because they wipe their ass with rocks and then pile shitrocks next to the dining facility. Or that they try to stuff condoms down the showers. Or that they're known for making sex slaves out of small children and responding to incoming fire by switching sides.
[deleted]
I do sympathize for the Syrian people and don't believe Assad to be a good leader for the country or representative of it's people. But there are numerous and growing accounts that the rebellion has been hijacked by opportunistic extremist groups from outside the country. In addition to that there are also growing reports of crimes against humanity being committed by these so called rebels.  As bad as Assad may have been and continue to be, I'm more and more believing that his control over the country is by far the lesser of evils compared to if the foreign extremists were to take control. The rebellion is no longer being fought by the Syrian people for the Syrian people. I think this is why Russia and China have had the stance they have had concerning Syria, as they see it this way as well.
Pretty standard stuff. Now we'll swap captured spies and wait till the next round.
Instead of playing at keyboard warrior why don't you angry tough guys actually do something like form a historical monument buying group. Stop waiting for The Man to make every thing better.
Because POL values.
Wow. This is a tragedy.
Pretty sick. Is that guy aspiring to becoming the next [General Butt Naked](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/General_Butt_Naked)?
Fortify your hovels,gather all your supplies.......get your spears ready,sharpen your swords,shine your pitchforks(with spit)........Its finally happening. MEN TO ARMS!!!!!!     It may help to watch a few seasons of the walking dead,lets just hope its not anything like the World War Z trailer!
That may be true as well but we'll likely never know. They may be brown/islamic and have some radicals amongst them but nearly all cultures and societies frown upon mass murder. In Libya, they voted in a secular government with a former Geneva human-rights lawyer as their PM. The people had zero appetite for anything remotely extremist.
See that big patch of stone right there? Well were gonna demolish this ancient structure right next to it. Good? Good. 
I'm confused. Wouldn't it also be "the Maya language" if the only thing that is called "Mayan" is the *actual* language (as in, the language is called "English")?
This made my day thank you.
Its servers probably had some trouble handling the load.  It's back up now.
I have published some software applications, how much do I get to tax computer and smartphone sales?
&gt;Just wow...the law needs to make an example of this construction company.   That may very well be possible:  &gt;Belizean police said they are conducting an investigation and criminal charges are possible. The Nohmul complex sits on private land, but Belizean law says that any pre-Hispanic ruins are under government protection.  But you know, with per capita income being so low, corruption and bribery is probably an easy thing to use to get out of trouble.  Furthermore is the company liable or the individuals who did it?  
The wig was a dead giveaway...dead giveaway.
But can we somehow blame Israel for this?
I'll take the dictator, atleast he does not murder religious minorities.
my ass? I'm the one who lives in Turkey.
I dunno about that. I'm only 30, but I'm probably more progressive now then I have ever been. But I don't define my morality or my social views with arbitrary lines in the sand where A is okay but B is wrong, even though they are not really any different.   I don't think it's really some inevitable cycle where yesterday's social progressive is tomorrow's social conservative. The internet and globalization in general have caused a shift and opened up new ways of thinking that were very rare before. People used to live very small lives, never leaving their hometown, never hearing about anything outside their region. It would prevent them from ever truly accepting "outside" ideas because of their insular upbringing. But today people can get a big picture view of the world very easily, and it acclimates people from a very young age to the idea that it's okay to be different, and it's okay to have new ideas.
Yeah, it sounds crazy, but here is the source.  [Source](http://www.radiolab.org/blogs/radiolab-blog/2013/jan/15/bitter-end/)  edit: I think what happens is, lack of oxygen to the brain, even though they come back, there is a very high chance that they come back with mental retardation. 
I know..sorry didn't mean to come off strong.  as a taxpayer its painful to see the province spiral towards bankruptcy, and lining the pockets of their friends.  who makes a deal like that!
So apparently the Russian Mafia manages some prostitution rings - I mean, who knew?!  Yeah, I guess that totally negates my point.
but they might say, "i need the money, might as well marry a woman"   
Cross posted to r/shitmuslimsdo
So, what are chances I can grab one of these shots before heading into Chipotle?
No, Canada hosted the Olympics in 2010.  Same-sex marriage had been legal in some parts of Canada, including the jurisdiction where the Olympics were held, British Columbia, for almost seven years at that time.  Same-sex marriage had been legal nationwide in Canada for almost five years then.
I need to switch providers when I goto Mars I guess
[I'm well aware of recent events in the news.](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/05/06/syria-chemical-weapons-un_n_3223056.html)  Given that the UN war crimes investigators repudiated del Ponte's claim almost immediately after she made the claim, I figured I'd probe /u/remainobjective and their claim a little more deeply--given that they didn't provide a source.  
While being detained by  Russian authorities he yelled, "I AM MCLOVIN!"
I'm so glad you didn't post this on /r/atheism!  Btw really good we finally moved forward.
what is your source of information that most Syrians support him. 75% of the country are Sunni who have under the heel of the Assad family for decades.
Where does it say 2million, I can't find it.
[deleted]
So you're saying that if somebody offered you enough money that your children, and your childrens children, would never be in need of money, but only if you licked somebodies dirty, hairy butthole, that you wouldn't do it? Everybody has a buy out point, just because you think you're better, does not mean that you are. I hope you have a helmet, because when you fall off that high horse of yours, it's going to be quite a fall. 
Oh, well the point I was making, was not that I didn't make stuff, but I would have never used those stuff to throw and with with the intention of hurting anybody in the process, and I'm sure you can concur with this.
My reactions  [First](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HhTv2kSBMhc)  [American Response](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WDgq-K2oYLo)
Probably because if you aren't part of hamas you are a traitor to your people, who is willing to sell their land to the Israelis for their own comfort.   I can respect hamas for fighting for their territory. I can respect the jews for pushing on them, for more land.   But really I think Hamas is more right in what they are doing. They actually have good reason to attack Israel, what with the invasions and occupations and all. 
Scorpions will outlive Humans on this planet.
This I agree. However, maybe it takes a lot longer for the US because our legislative system is more complex than other countries like France or Brazil? (I'm not stating a claim; I'm just guessing that may be ONE of the reasons why US is behind others)
The drone program is similar to it because they both target small groups of people, but have large amounts of collateral damage on civilians.  [I'm not exaggerating](http://www.policymic.com/articles/16949/predator-drone-strikes-50-civilians-are-killed-for-every-1-terrorist-and-the-cia-only-wants-to-up-drone-warfare). [Really.](http://web.law.columbia.edu/sites/default/files/microsites/human-rights-institute/CountingDroneDeathsPresserFINAL.pdf) [Yeah.](http://www.cnn.com/2012/09/25/world/asia/pakistan-us-drone-strikes)
This is a though one. It can safe millions of lives, yet the rhino's got to pay for it.   Imagin your daughter has cancer. Who would you choose to live, your daughter or a rhino? or 10 rhino's? or 100 rhino's? At what point would you say the amount of rhino's is too high that you'd let your daughter die.   Imagin this for milions of people that die of cancer each year. They all have family, people they love. Today's counter is at 3 million already. I'd gladly sacrifice any rhino in the world to save them all, because yes, I'm a human, and if i get to chose between rhino's or humans I don't have to think all that long about it.  Killing rhino's to cure hangovers is disgusting ofcourse.  (This is written with the mindset that it can actualy cure cancer)
You would especially if that was more money than you'd ever make in your lifetime otherwise. A lot of poachers are not rich men.
Increase demand of rhinos and thereby force an artificially increased supply. Increased supply would mean the 300k price would start dropping as rhinos become more and more rare, so no one really wants to start rhino farms yet. 
[deleted]
Noooooot really, I use your arguements and then apply them elsewhere to see different perspectives and replies.  Just how I roll, don't like it? I don't give a fuck, I like educating myself.
Oh, man. The sarcasm almost flew over my head on that one. 
[deleted]
This article is amusing to anyone who has even the smallest idea of how foreign policy works.    A huge part of why we have presence all over the world is to help our citizens and our industry.  And it's not just for Monsanto.  It is for our oil firms, solar panel companies, car makers, banks, etc.  And there are also programs that help small US businesses get into exports as well.  
Look at the comments of his children [HERE](https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=258154810994762&amp;set=a.223330474477196.1073741825.216652338478343&amp;type=1). Really heartbreaking...  Devin Swanson: &gt;We love you dad..with all our hearts! You are a inspiration to all to continue doing what you love! One day..I will continue your journey in your name!   Raven Swanson: &gt;I love you dad...  It would be just awesome if one of them will continue his journey.
*Football  It even says so in the title...
"Scientists Savage Study Purportedly Showing Health Dangers of Monsanto's Genetically Modified Corn". Did you even read the article? It nearly completely refutes what you've been arguing the entire time. Or are you too stoned on "organic" weed to even comprehend this?
People ~~with~~ who received the money.  fixered that for you. You can thank me later.
File this one under 'no shit'
Is outsourcing considered a social issue? I can see why it would be, I just generally thought it was considered an economic issue.
Of course, and the particularly significant Punjabi Indian communities in London. You'll also find that very few complaints are levied at the Indian, Pakistani, East Asian immigrant communities. It's literally a Muslim thing in many cases and the reasons for their being demonised are many, be they reasonable or hyperbole. There are many reasons for this - in no particular order:  - Vilification on behalf of the media of Muslim groups since 9/11 - The unwillingness, or inability, of 'some' Muslim groups to incorporate themselves into British society - Some Muslim communities still adhere to Sharia Law over state law as administered by the CPS - linked to the above about not incorporating.  - The opinion held by many that they're attempting to reshape British Culture, acting against what has been built up over centuries and then hiding behind prejudicial clichés to protect themselves from open debate.   Some of the above I agree with, some I don't.   As for issues with Poles, Romanians etc. I think it's just bullshit. The reason that the Polish etc. find jobs over here is that they're often more willing to take on work that many British citizens figure themselves too good for - thanks to a focus in the 80s on office based work and the demonisation of manufacturing and industry. If they can get over here and fairly get a job that others won't want, let them. 
First we lose the empire, then our wealth.... 
Yeah, once they get rid of the Jews, the Hamas fundamentalists, the Fatah seculars, the Christian Palestinians, the Druze, the Bedouins, and the former Israeli Arabs will all live in peace. Like in Syria, you know.
ITT: It's all a lie.
V for Vendetta. It's happening people. 
Who is the true authority of Islam? You? The nine Imams who said that it was right? The one that said that it was wrong? The Shiites? The Sunnis? The Quranists? Hamas? The Muslim Brotherhood? The Sufi? The Salafi? Who is the one true Scotsman?  Even if there is one true version it becomes irrelevant since nobody will ever agree upon it ever anyways. So what we have is a lot of people with very different views and ideas who still are 100% convinced that they have God behind them and that their actions are justified. This is not only a problem for Islam, but due to the Quran being the word of God and perfect, it makes many believers extremey confident that they are right and justified in their belives.  Good night my friend it was nice talking to you!
I think the U.S. needs to bring some "democracy" to this country.
That still leaves the question of what exports the UK can meaningfully increase in order to generate more growth. They're not going to compete with developing world sweatshop labor in the consumer goods or mass-market electronics markets, and there's massive competition from other European countries in luxury goods and industrial machinery, so that does limit the options.
Their competitive advantage comes from the lower cost of living the economic problems have brought. Because of that lower cost of living, labor costs have more room to fall, which accomplishes the same end to export prices that currency manipulation would.
Reason number 2,083,313,531,985 for not ever wanting to live in the Middle East.
Indian here, who is really concerned with China's recent territorial aggression (China recently pitched tents in essentially disputed part of the border and refused to leave unless India caved in and removed its fortifications in that zone). [I wrote an analysis on /india about Sun Tzu's Art of War and how China could be utilizing it](http://www.reddit.com/r/india/comments/1e9hqc/sun_tzus_art_of_war_and_chinas_recent_territorial/)
But there's plenty of people who agree with Dershowitz's stated position that criticism of the Israeli state basically always stems from a hatred of Jews.  And therefore would agree Hawking is an anti-Semite because he slighted Israel.  Their logic is the only possible motive for slighting Israel is anti-Semitism.  
To be fair they are called Arab Israelis.  They are of Palestinian descent but most of them want to stay in Israel because of the reasons you mentioned even if an independent Palestine is created.
Men see it from their perspective. If we suggested imposing a curfew on men because they can't be trusted not to rape, there would be an outcry, but it's just as crazy of an idea as telling 50% of the population they're not entitled to enjoy drinking because they need to be on their toes in case the people telling you you can't drink want to rape you. It's silly and cruel and don't worry too much. Most people not on Reddit know it's never the victim's fault :)
STOP ANNOYING ME!!
Good for you!
You wouldn't download a politician
You're crazy, haha. Tibet was under China since 1950. The terrorist attacks happened in mid 1950 in Tibet and Sichuan.
[deleted]
Do you have any studies to show that this is an exceedingly rare occurrence or that it happens a lot (That_Science_Guy)? I think one of the biggest issues for That_Science_Guy is simply where is the line between a woman drinking but still being able to give consent vs a woman drinking and no longer being able to legally give consent.
Because they made their bed with America!!
&gt; How is it not ridiculous that people are told to stop or cut back on what they enjoy (example: leaving their doors unlocked and their windows open) because it makes them easier targets for robbers?
We just have had very different curriculums. I spent 3 years learning about the horrible things the US government and US settlers did during the 19th/early 20th century. 
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XDphyrGiaJE
Actually, a brainwashing victim could be considered a good person. A rapist generally is just a dick though.
So he actually holds a patent for this? How is it that this has never been brought up before? And why don't we use it to regenerate organs. Or help amputees like the one's affected by the Boston bombers?
That's perfectly correct.  It is your first amendment right.  This is more a comment about how such a thing might be viewed in China, and I am trying to put it in a perspective that an American might react with in a similar manner.  Food for thought!  
Al Jazeera. The Iranian new organization. Says nice things about Iran. Go figure.
"Hold still while I beat you up"
truereddit is no better than world news  sort by top and every single thread is just amerikkka bashing
You could have anything smuggled in and you choose freaking KFC? Most of the food KFC serves is crap aside from the biscuits. 
1. do you mean rape of women? most men can't do a whole lot, as most men don't rape. 2.  i don't know, plenty is being done. its illegal for starters, and theres a strong consensus about it being one of the very worst things you can do to another human being. 3. how common is sexual violence? probably a lot less common than you believe 4. a really biased questions, boys shouldn't respect women because they're women, but because they're humans. just everybody should respect everybody because we're all humans. 
Since this turned out true, maybe NFL GMs actually bathe in hot tubs full of KFC gravy.  http://youtu.be/S1qNsD8kPyE
what? God choosing not to murder you because you smeared blood all over your house is perfectly logical. Anti-Semite
I've heard before that many of those types of outfits will refuse service to those not ethnically Japanese anyway.
But what he advocates, even if that is what believes, is intrinsically flawed.  Even if he does place higher value on other species, which I can accept because many do think this way (and I can definitely understand why), what he is proposing borders on insanity.  Unless he believes that rhinos have some kind of vast superiority over other animals, there would (under his ideology) be a massive slaughter of many humans related to the animal farming industry (chickens, cows, pigs, fish are all often under poor to horrendous conditions).  ---  If you are willing to kill an Asian to save a rhino, why are you unwilling to kill an American or European to save a cow or a pig?  One cannot simply respond "Because they're not endangered" because then he is not protecting it because he protests killing animals/intelligent life, but because he just likes having a species around. He ignores the cows and pigs horrible suffering because "Meh, there are a lot of them" (this should actually be a greater reason to save them...). And that's just stupid
This is sort of true. After I saw the episode about the microwaving your balls to get them big, all of a sudden I saw pictures with big balls roaming around the Internet everywhere. 
No, but you do have to go back half a century.  It's also worth pointing out that McCarthyism represents a national embarrassment; most any child taught about it learns it as such.   Look...If you really want to believe that the United States suppresses political speech/opposition in an equivalent manner as the Chinese, you're free to believe that.  While I get that this type of relativism is very chic, it's seriously disconnected from reality.  Free expression in political discourse is one of the *very few* areas of "liberty" where America actually lives up to its own ideals.  I assure you, and a 5 minute search of google (which may or may not be possible in China) would confirm, the Chinese and American governments are not equivalent in this regard.
Unbasted*
Kentucky Fried Salt
Appreciate it OP. The previous link didn't work for me because the file was missing apparently.
As an Australian citizen, can I have our woman back. Because fuck this?
No sure why you're getting downvoted, this is true. It doesn't make what happened to this woman any less horrible, but it's true.  The Muslim world is just going through the cultural changes that the West went through in the last 500 years, but super condensed. Globalization and modern technology are forcing change upon them (and the entire world, for that matter) whether or not they want it - radical Islam is the reactionary movement against that change.  Remember that 500 years ago, westerners wouldn't have thought it was weird to jail women for sex outside marriage.  Give the Muslim world the next 50-100 years and they will catch up to us. It just sucks in the meantime and horrible injustices like this occur.  And honestly does anyone expect any different from a country so fucking backwards that they are ruled by a king (the Emir) who has absolute power?
"Downvote me more rapists"  Enjoy your downvote. 
TYL : In the West it's known as al Qaeda flag.
&gt;he's saying that THIS JUDGEMENT is not correct under Sharia Law  If that was a claim he made, it's one I'll gladly give.  He could be right; I don't know Sharia law that well.  However, he *was* in fact making the claim I mentioned, what with the "it's a monarchy, so it can't be real sharia" bits.  I'm going to vanish in a minute, but thanks for the correspondence. 
The partnership is the only reason why this "news" that occurred 5 years ago is being reported again. So they can get this exact reaction. Congratulations, you've let the media win.   
That was for freedom though.  If this woman was freedom raped it would be all cool.
[deleted]
if i hire someone to do a job for me, and they hire someone else to do the job, am i liable for that third person if he fucks up? honest question.
Got any sources to back that claim?  With the exception of the poorer regions of Eastern Europe, I'm not really aware of it happening on any significant scale past the early twentieth century in the West.  Midcentury for a few places, like Sicily.
Not really, it's both religion and the state. People on reddit are generally very quick to point to religion as the root cause of all evil,  but this is rarely accompanied by a critique of the state and the way it uses law as an instrument of coercion.
This is retardis
How can you even call yourself a free country.
"You're putting words in my mouth."  "if you are keen on assigning blame where it lies, start with the hotbeds where it's standard practice. Not where lone nuts propose mad reforms."  In other (but semantically equivalent) words, 'start by assigning blame in other places, don't assign blame in countries where there are only 'a few nuts' at fault'. Which is basically what I was accusing you of saying, which was to suggest that Americas problems are less worth considering because of the larger problems faced elsewhere.  "[...] to hold a small example, such as this, up as a valid comparison of the state of things in the West being anything like as bad as in the West is idiotic."  I don't remember anyone *was* saying it was a reasonable quantitative comparison. The original claim being refuted by steakmeout was simply that: "In any civilized country, this women wouldn't have been punished in any way whatsoever."  Steakmeout was just trying to provide evidence that there is precedent in America for laws which are weighed heavily against the victim. No claim was made that these laws were equivalent in magnitude and scope to the laws being discussed in the UAE.  "Criticise the wWest all you want. But don't do it purely in an effort to stifle criticism of the Middle East."  I wasn't. The laws there are fucked up beyond belief in some ways, and this case provides an example of that.  "People like you constantly try to deflect any and all criticism of the WIDESPREAD abuse that occurs in that region by highlighting these isolated instances."  I'm not trying to deflect criticism at all. I'm all for such criticism.  I do understand that derailment and deflection can be problems, and are generally not constructive contributions to these discussions, but don't think steakmeout was trying to deflect here since it wasn't actually them who brought the issue up. Fhwqhgads made a specific claim and steakmeout disagreed and attempted to refute it, that's all.
[deleted]
Maybe because being murdered or being raped is way more harmful than being stolen of something? Let's take the "you were drunk and somebody stole your wallet? haha, you deserved it, stupid" as granted for argument's sake. Ok now losing a wallet is a fitting punishment for being real drunk. What about being raped or being killed? Is that a fitting punishment? Punishments should be proportionate to the gravity of the crime.
Yes, please look at the definition of the crime "apartheid" and you will see that it doesn't apply to Israel at all.
Would you like to take a guess at that 20 year old's nationality?
Yeah! The Declaration of Independence is such a decadent item!
An Israeli peace group is trying to stop the Israeli government from legalizing 4 illegal settlements in the west bank.....and the top comment is about how Muslims are taking everything over?  wtf.  IDF web patrol is working hard today.  
[deleted]
Dear Church: get your own funding from your club members, not from the nation's taxes. Thanks.
This is probably the only reason these "people" didn't execute her. I have never been to Australia, but it doesn't seem like the place that would handle the murder of one of its citizens in any other way than a major ass kicking.
This guy, I really hope he said &amp; believes this. If so, color me surprised for once.
Do something great and without selfish motivation and it may happen. 
For all intents and purposes, The Vatican is a modern living museum.   Papacy and catholic church aside, the actual structure and its collections have historical merit and are well curated. In many ways, its superior to even what the best museums have to offer. 
I am surprised at the software piracy support given that many people here make their living writing code. If no one pays for it then how are you supposed to get paid? I am not completely sympathetic to big software companies and their pricing, many of it is pretty ridiculous, but copy right is not in and of itself a bad thing. 
The contract is written in their favor.  Always remember that if you didn't write the contract then your probably screwed.  
Fancy Pope mobiles prevent assassinations of a world leader. Is it a crime for the US to protect the president with caravans of armored vehicles? No, nor is it a sin to protect the pope in a similar way. I'll also remind you that chalices aren't used for meals, but for the mass. Since the church believes the blood of Christ is present in the chalice at mass, the gold serves in the same way a throne would. It's not like the pope uses a gold chalice at meals. And you'd be an ignortant fool to think that there's no charity within the church. 
Godfather III
It is obviously history and should be a giant museum.  Nobody ever suggested all that gold and marble crap be melted down, chopped up, and fed to starving children in africa but people also dont normally live in a museum and proclaim themselves the King of History either.  It's all priceless; especially all that stuff they stole from the romans. "Christian history" indeed.  But please, resume your circle jerk about "double standards" and how redditors are all manchildren who know nothing about history or how the real world works.
I'm not a kid, and this isn't r/athiesm. I don't know if it makes you feel good to talk down to people on the internet, but you're embarrassing yourself.  You miss the point still, and think for some reason you can talk down to me. We should NOT celebrate institutions like the church in any capacity, attention is what gives them power, and they need power to exert influence with their ideology.    
That's another discussion altogether. The point is that your original comment was about the amount of land the Palestinians got, as if they got a better "deal" it would've mattered. While actually, as you just put it:  &gt; The amount of land is irrelevant
That's what they were trying to do in Canada too.  The governments claim they are democracies...but they want communist type powers.  Why millions of people have allowed just a few men to decide and call the shots is beyond me.
[deleted]
Uhhh, nb?
how is money supposed to serve? we throw away precious time working, for what? Money. Money rules the world be cause it is, in essence, time. Time that cant be used but it still has value. This time has to be of some value, so we trade our used time for objects.  If money = time, is time supposed to serve us?
Actually I imagine a distant future where having borders around landmasses would seem like some kind of berlin wall on ecstasy, I just think for all practical purposes we aren't even nearly there so borders are still needed.
[deleted]
[deleted]
There's TF1.
The Vatican bank is one of the largest financial institutions in the world.  We have to go deeper...
If all you are saying is that we dont have proof she was raped you could have said it in one sentence. If you would like to trust the UAE courts than be my guest. 
Congregational checking in (UCC), did this to my pastor on Easter.  She laughed
Yay science!  I love how most of the idols in Britain are people like Hawking and Dawkins.   
The legal and technological hurdles required to take down a computer in what used to be Turkmenistan and which is accessible only within the TOR network are beyond any reasonable scope.  I can connect to and exchange information with any computer in the world that will let me (or at least doesn't stop me). I can encrypt this in any way that both ends can work with. Unless we control what everyone has on their computer, removing stuff from "the internet" simply doesn't work.
I'm talking about detection instead of poison itself, I assume that poisoning hasn't advanced so much as the ability to find it in autopsies/tests after the fact.
Where do you live?    Have you ever lived in an Islamist theocracy?   
Utterly flawed logic. The Arab land owners sold their land legally and there are no moral consequences to selling land. They didn't expect that the Jews would evict thousands and in doing so destabilize the entire region. 
Do something about it instead of just talking about it.
Those same types are ALWAYS waiting in the wings.
This pope might actually have his priorities in order. Now he just needs to realize that state control of economies will only make the situation worse. 
I saw some once on 4chan before mods pillaged the posters anus with bans. But its not as prevelant(i think i spelled that wrong) as 4chan makes it seem. Except on motherless... Theres a lot on motherless
I can't speak for all of the money the church has - but many of the investments yield yearly dividends which go towards charity.  They ARE the most charitable organization in the entire world, and they do supply healthcare to the largest number of people.  Much of what they do is long term as well, so an influx of cash from selling every single asset and piece of property would ruin much of the church's work, given that in the following years the long term projects would crumble.  As for the riches in "gold and property", would you have them sell off the priceless artifacts of history for temporary gain?  The church has wealth, yes, but in that wealth is *history* and I for one would rather have works of art displayed throughout the Vatican than in rich collector's homes.  The church maintains the Sistine Chapel well enough, I see no need for it to exchange hands.  If "financial rule" came to an end, I don't think that the pope would be too unhappy about that.  Perhaps some of those in the Vatican who enjoy quite a bit of money would be, but those who stick by the precepts of Christianity would likely be pleased with the new era.
yay! now everyone forgets how they like to rape the children of their followers!!!!  he really has done allot to re-brand the catholic image in such a short time.
The guy who wants you to give him your money says that money is bad.   It's best if you just believe him and don't question anything.
Why should we listen to the financial advice of a religious leader?
This is a really weird site. The design, the multilingual stuff, just everything about it.
Pff. More room in heaven for me!
And what if he works to change that? Good influence on millions of people and you're discounting it because the past is the past and effort to change should be ignored because wrong is already done. Man,
[deleted]
Interesting, I don't think I have ever met an atheist extremist. Who is the atheist Anders Breivik? You know, actual extremists who do extreme things for their cause?  Because being angry on the internet is as extreme as a beige wall.  
 [CITATION](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Transubstantiation)
&gt;You're god's not even real anyways.  Are you being funny? Because: you are god is not even real anyway(s) ...
Historically he was already banging different chicks during his marriage. IIRC because she was European royalty, Henry VIII needed a religious reason to break away from her to not cause war. It's also very, VERY funny that the Church of England says homosexuality is corrupting the sanctity of marriage... perhaps their history is a little shrouded methinks.
[deleted]
&gt;I still don't understand how the followers think it's cool that their church splintered from the main religion because a few hundred years ago their King wanted to bang a different chick.  Protestant ideas were already circulating in England, and the split from Rome gave reformers a golden opportunity.
I don't understand how the Japanese could consider anything they did during WWII necessary. They did have to sign an unconditional surrender at the end of it no? So what exactly did they have to do during WWII that was so vital for them now?
On a much more firm point, I have to point out that going to Africa, a country riddled with AIDS, and crusading against the use if condoms as Pope Benedict did was incredibly irresponsible and insensitive of the church.  It's situations like that, among others that I won't even begin to bring up, that make it very very very difficult for many of us to forgive the church or practice our Catholicisim in good faith.  I can not be firm enough about this point, what the pope did by any ethical system given te context in Africa was wrong, very very wrong.  
Yeah, I suppose if you're from an strong tradition of Irish or Hispanic Catholic family you would have to do that. We were/are Lutherans though. Although I guess Lutheran is just basically Catholic Lite. 
I love it when people act like they are not part of the website and bitch about it non-stop.  It's like people on /r/4chan who actually have the audacity to complain about this website.  
"Adapt or die."  -Charles Darwin
hopefully, the educated there with de-convert some of those mistaken folks with reason.
oh my god between rob ford and this comment I just had a reallllllly fun 5 minutes
Natural disaster happens, Golden Dawn blames the undesirables for it, lots of innocent people die from neighbors.
It is not a bug, it is a feature...
They were all dead by the time Russia arrived
sounds good to me. 
I think this speaks more about you who obviously assumes that Australian = white.
A quick death is far less immoral than a life of forced prostitution and brutal rape; not sure I agree with your moral compass that saying murder of a few thousand is on the same level with the systematic ravaging of tens of thousands, even if over half a century ago. 
It's a propaganda article aiming to spread fear.
yea sure m8
Why? We have advanced much too in our own tech, yet we still have stuff malfunction. The land rover on Mars I believe recently had a malfunction and that thing had brilliant people working on it. Why would anyone think that tech gets soo advanced that they never break down. Also, we do not know how many of them are out there, so a few crashes out of many is a pretty reliable piece of equipment.
Just a matter of time until Feyd Rautha starts snapping necks.
That's just because people like to get married in nice and/or traditional places. Plus this is England so outdoor weddings are rarely a viable option.  I'm not at all religious but given the choice between ceremony in a church, ceremony in the function room of a hotel, or ceremony in the rain, I'd go for option A every time.
You asked: "Is it true that certain areas are so bad that even the police will not enter." It's not true. Not at all. Not even remotely.   &gt;Thirdly, a lot of people consider that the EU experiment is a failure so it wouldn't surprise me if the capital of the EU couldn't handle issues such as this.  You are confusing opinion with fact.  Anyway, if you asked: 'is it true there are areas with high poverty, crime and intolerance, with high immigrant populations' I would've said  yes. But that's not what you asked.
To believe we are the only planet that harbours life in the entire Universe, is borderline insanity.
Syria is a colonialist construction that never really came together in the first place.  None of these groups ever got along very well together.
&gt;People often forget that morals and commandments coming from the big religions were the kind of things that kept the world and its societies somewhat civil in times where most people were not educated, and a secular sense of ethics was simply impossible to achieve (oh, and also when there weren't very effective governments with a judiciary branch enforcing laws)  Why was a secular sense of ethics impossible?
not really...
[deleted]
Racy. I don't remember Trivial Pursuit being that chucklesome. 
It's the way historical findings describe thing. What do you trust more, history written with the goal of finding out what happened, or a constitution written with political incentive?   And by the way, even the constitution describes Jews settling in Canaan before Egyptian slavery. That's why they conquered Canaan and not any other land after slavery. Canaan was their homeland.  I don't have an apartheid state. http://elderofziyon.blogspot.ca/p/eoz-posters-for-apartheid-week.html
Let Greece die.  These chauvinist pricks had it coming.
Why don't they just use the LBRP to get rid of the immigrants?
If that's true then I'm deeply sad for the american people
You know you are intellectually challenged when you hail a dictator that died before the middle of the last century. Golden Dawn members of the Greek parliament are destroying their case with argumentum ad follis.
Yipee! An excuse to mock Irish people and gingers!! 
*There
In a related story, a parallel scandal breaking in Calgary...from Twitter:  "Calgary mayor Naheed Nenshi caught on video reading book on urban planning @nenshi”
[deleted]
If they break the law in doing so, then yes. The committee is investigating whether Google's claims that they make no sales in the UK are true, or if they have been lying to HMRC, which is a criminal offence.
Don't be surprised when you wake up in Hell next to one of them
I suppose Mexico is the only place that is savage with all their power and wealth? Lol 
The British, Americans, French etc have sold plenty of weapons to plenty of dictators as well, your point being?
Because homosexual marriage is as categorically different than monogamous heterosexuality as polygamous heterosexuality. They probably cited studies that reinforced the Freudian connection between homosexuality and narcissism, as well as studies on the ostensibly non-monogamous nature of homosexuality. They probably *also* brought up the fact that there is an absence of objective studies on the affects of two homosexual parents on a child. All of these would be very good reasons to declare homosexual marriage unconstitutional.  
Sorry mate but that's complete bullshit. He reportedly gave his chief of the secret police absolute hell for not telling him how the test went.  The Russians knew about the bomb, yes - but they were pretty afraid by it. It's why they kept such a large army after the war and developed their own bomb by 1949.  Truman was short sighted, racist and arrogant enough to tell Oppenheimer that he KNEW the Russians would "never" create their own bomb. The US completely abused its atomic monopoly in its arrogance and dropped the bomb on a nation that had already been utterly destroyed by fire bombings and conventional bombings long before they dropped the bomb on Hiroshima.  The Russians steamrolled into Manchuria and that's the reason the Japanese surrendered - not the bomb.  It was to show the Russians who was "boss" and America started an arms race that nearly ended in our complete destruction.
&gt; the percentage of Haredim that make up the popular vote is rapidly increasing, as more and more immigrate from eastern Europe, especially Russia.  This is wrong. Their percentage in the population (and thereby in the vote) increases, but not because of immigration, but because of huge birth rates. Orthodox women often have more than 7 children. They have the highest birth rate of any group in Israel by far.  Immigration, especially from Russia, is what primarily decreases their percentage in society. The Jews coming from Russia and the ex-soviet world are overwhelmingly secular, probably because they lived in an atheist society.
[deleted]
Both. At first it was just because it was cheaper than buying it legally locally, but then it was like having an entire pharmacy open to me.
&gt; There are many areas of Syria, Weiss notes, that seem lost to Assad—such as Aleppo and the northwestern province of Idlib, which borders Turkey and has been a crucial rebel supply route. “The regime can’t ‘win’ all of Syria,” Weiss says. “But it can and will retake that vital corridor from Damascus to Homs to the coast […] to keep a supply-chain running between the capital and [Hezbollah in] Lebanon, and to keep the ports and regional airports operational for resupplies from Russia and Iran.”  Alternate title:  Assad No Longer Getting His Shit Tossed
forced starvation diet? LOL  &gt; The Palestinians are listed at the 8th place in world overweight population rankings.[15] This is due to decreased physical activity and greater than necessary food consumption,[16] particularly with an increase in energy coming from fat. Two other factors are smoking and urbanization. In addition, "leisure-time physical activity is not a common concept in the Palestinian context, especially for rural women, where lack of sex-segregated facilities and cultural norms are prohibitive factors." Women in urban areas face similar cultural restrictions.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Obesity_in_the_Middle_East_and_North_Africa#Palestinian_territories  
The fact he was in there at all is long enough. This story is over.
[deleted]
Really. Well you might want to turn on a TV because that's exactly what the controversy is about. Just to catch you up, an abortion doctor just got life in prison last week for murdering babies, another from Houston is likely going to be next.   The nurse witnesses from Houston saw viable babies being murdered "multiple times per day". The lowest estimate admits there are 300 per day in the US.   So you can bark at peanuts if you want to but they're literally [twisting the heads off live babies](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2325786/Douglas-Karpen-Second-house-horrors-abortion-clinic-investigated-Texas.html) and if you're okay with that you've got problems I don't even want to hear about anymore.
It's better than Fox . 
Problem is that these people in Syria are not freedom fighters, they are terrorists brought to Syria from other Arab countries. They are wahabis and salafis and kill anything that is not sunni. They will destroy Syria and then tear Iraq apart if they win.
[deleted]
Not sure what you meant, but you made me laugh so upvoting :)
You have got to be kidding me.
don't get me wrong, I love child porn as much as the next guy, but are you whoring out your son?  edit: I see we're not in the nude modeling thread anymore.  oh well. so it goes.
This.
Except for the fact that different cultures impose differing responsibilities at different ages.  Objectively, the brains and bodies of different age groups is fairly consistent.  Objectively your post has nothing to do with a story about some sick pedo cunt and has little relevance to anything other than observations of cultural differences around the world.  Objectively, basing decisions on cultural reasons or observations is fucking retarded.  edit : I'm not interested in an argument with 'clever' cunts who want to try to be pedantic.  Your attempts at being clever betray the seriousness of the topic of the thread.
Aww man :/  Was really hoping we could have another war.
[deleted]
It's a trap! The moon is under attack!
Good question, since the earth's gravity is much stronger. But because the earth also has an atmosphere it probably would have disintegrated. 
Eeeexcellent. Now if we could only destroy the sun...
impossible, the money is offshore, so what are the baliffs going to take, office furniture?
I'm not deflecting anything. I'm not taking responsibility for things I don't support; industrial farming, the industrial meat industry and large scale water pollution. **Vegans and vegetarians cannot live without agro-biz. They cannot live without unsustainable agricultural practices.** That's why they live in such denial of the environmental impact of modern methods of corn, grains and soy production. Humans have lived for pretty much all of human history eating meat and saturated fat. There is a reason for that. **It is incredibly nutrient dense, tastes amazing and is incredibly satisfying.**   Cry over the poor cows but when you poison the entire environment to save them there are going to be a lot more animals hurt.     
Obviously this is the beginning of Transformers.
maybe nextime, champ
[deleted]
Go back and read the prior posts for why you're full of BS.  You did not merely say they committed a criminal offense.  You said a lot more than that.
Indeed, and Canadians may be learning this [the hard way](http://www.slate.com/blogs/bad_astronomy/2010/09/17/canadian_government_censoring_scientists_from_media.html).
The 'religion of peace'
And Jupiter.
&gt; It does get funding from George Soros, as you've pointed out. I didn't say all of it's funding.   you called it a George Soros funded group - this implies that it is primarily funded by him.
He's gonna have an AMA when he comes back so you can ask him.
thank you for clearing that up for me 
They named that motherfucker Jihad.. smh
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's disappointing that this was the outcome, but, honestly, other parts of the story were encouraging.   &gt; The Law on Elimination of Violence Against Women has been in effect since 2009, but only by presidential decree. It is being brought before parliament now because lawmaker Fawzia Kofi, a women’s rights activist, wants to cement it with a parliamentary vote to prevent its potential reversal by any future president who might be tempted to repeal it to satisfy hard-line religious parties.  &gt;Kofi, who plans to run for president in next year’s elections, said she was disappointed because **among those who oppose upgrading the law from presidential decree to legislation passed by parliament are women**.  &gt;Afghanistan’s parliament has more than 60 female lawmakers, mostly due to constitutional provisions reserving certain seats for women.  Considering how slow we moved on universal suffrage and the civil rights act here in the US, I think it's positive that there is at least a voice for women in Afghanistan. Democracy does not always equate to swift progress.
Never said that they did it in the name of their religion just that that people of faith or of no faith commit attrocities. It has nothing to do with ones religion. Hitler was a catholic, the Middle East has muslim extremists and stalin was an atheist. Stalin didn't do what he did "in the name of atheism", he did it because he was insane and a ruthless dictator.
Sweden is DOMINATED by feminist thinking.  hell, there is even one kindergarten in Stockholm that REFUSES to use him and her as it "reinforces gender stereotypes or some other Bullshit.
you're not listening: saying it the way you did implies that Soros is the main funder of the thing. This isn't about wings, it's about your poor communication.
You will be even more disappointed if you read [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/LGBT_rights_in_Poland#Social_attitudes_and_public_opinion):  &gt; A 2008 study revealed that 66% of Poles believe that gay people should not have the right to organize public demonstrations, with 27% taking the opposite view. According to the same study, 69% of Poles believe that gay people should not have the right to be openly gay, with 25% of Poles disagreeing.
*[Citation needed]*
ah, I knew it.  You worship Richard dawkins and his r/atheism cult
There's already a Christian version.  It's called Diablo.
[deleted]
no, they really aren't. kebabalicious, while tasty enough, is not even remotely close to a proper kebab. vert's is close but they don't cut the meat fresh for you and that is some bullshit.   and two fairly popular chains do not make them popular enough to be "all over" the city. 
Can people please stop saying humanist? It's as if this is the only secular philosophy there is out there. Try Epicurus instead. He wasn't the first philosopher to tackle how society works (Democritus and co.), but Epicurus consolidated much of Western philosophical thinking of his era. These philosophical schools are what a lot of libertarian thinking is founded upon - and Epicureanism specifically saw a resurgence after 1783 (and during the early 1500s Rennaisance to the lesser extent, though it was suppressed in the Counter-Rennaisance due its ideas being perceived to be dangerous) for obvious reasons.
EVERY CULTURE IS UNIQUE AND BEAUTIFUL.  YOU CANNOT JUDGE.
The book was in a luggage...come on.
Thanks for that.
Yes, cagar
[deleted]
Where did I say Israel has done no wrong? Can you find it? Go ahead, I'll wait.
I didn't want to be a downer.   EDIT: Oh well. In the US I think it was 94% of homeless are male. 
Most modern explosives are fairly inert without the right primer or detonator. 
Or   #10 going down on your mother-in-law  #9 birthing sextuplets without an epidural  #8 being raped by an elephant  #7... You get the point
&gt; will become America-hating Islamists   That will such a change for them, coming from the America-loving secular background from which they were kidnapped for no reason.
I can't take any website seriously with links to articles titled "My boyfriend finds my vagina repulsive"
That does not conform to the definition of ad hominem. 
who buys imported beer? lol
Is anyone else having trouble taking The Guardian seriously today?  Every time I go there I see the "My boyfriend says my vagina is repulsive" article advertised on the sidebar.
Wow...are you feeling a bit...euphoric?
or en mass conversions
I can't wait to see how this rolls out in court. I feel like it's going to make some real ripples in the regenerative science community.
I think that's naive. Olive oil may come from a variety of sources, and change hands many times as it goes from farmers to local distributors to to exporters to shipping companies to importers to wholesalers to bottlers... Often, it comes from somewhat lawless places, and even within the EU there is plenty of shady dealing with it, since there is lots of money to be made by bribing inspectors or officials, cutting expensive oil with cheap stuff or soybean oil, etc.  Just because there's a 'paper trail' doesn't mean something is legit. Just a few years ago just about all the major supermarket brands were found to be selling non-extra virgin as extra-virgin, and it's not clear that much has changed. Certainly the general public is still unaware.
alas, i have no idea what your beliefs are about the world. how do you propose me countering such a capacious statement?
I am actually swedish, I just feel bad for Bonnie not getting more votes
Well, how balanced is it if you avoid cholesterol? 
&gt;in such a huge contest  What? Eurovision is hardly taken seriously in Denmark? It's a fucking pisstake. 
But is he doing anything about it? Don't get me wrong, I like the message, but so far hasn't it just been a lot of hot air? Oh, so he switched chairs... hell he probably just wanted it in his parlor.
Yeah that's the ONLY conclusion to draw from this, NOT that many restaurants are cutting the olive oil with lower quality oils and/or reusing oil that some other punter with filthy hands may have used. No way it could also be about that to some degree. right?
Yeah, what scum, if only he would do something good like donate $28,000,000,000 to people in need!  Oh...oh wait.
This is the kind of thing that gives the EU a bad name and fuels the fire of the anti-government crowd. Bureaucrats sitting on committees need to have their heads checked and their power restricted.
How will they create better standards of living if they cannot provide for the population they have. Much less for the increased population.  It's time we/they start working more on the infrastructure, education and the like or the increased population will be just an unbearable burden on the already poor societies.
I'm an atheists, but I really like this dude. If he pulls through I would be more than happy to donate for support.
Some people feel that if they're paying for it then it IS their business what it's being used for.
So the disengagement plan is no longer in effect and no longer covers the west bank.  As far as the west bank is concerned the disengagement plan does not exits.  Which begs the question why did DrBoomkin bring it up?
Sadly, yes.
Good.
How is the top comment not [Congo?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Congo_\(novel\))
What happened when the europeans arrived in the new world?  we shoved the bible right down their throat.  I'm pretty sure the aliens wouldn't hide their existence and risk millions of souls from falling to false gods because we were to 'immature' to come to the correct conclusion about the nature of the one true god.  They'd settle the argument for us.  
[deleted]
Wizard.  There was a wizard, hired by Dr. Jones, he was in a car three miles away.   End of argument. Next topic.
hi
Did you mean Anthropologists? 
British spelling.  They don't like z's.
And a lot if them still don't. 
To be fair, the two have a lot in common. Really hard to exterminate, present wherever there are humans, quick to multiply.....
&gt; We won't settle for refillable ketchup bottles in restaurants. Why should we use refillable olive oil bottles?  You are free to "not settle" for whatever you want, you are in a desperate need of learning the difference between personal preferences and **the fucking law**. What you should ask yourself is if restaurant X gladly serving olive oil in manner Y to customer Z who happily pays for it is **any of your business**.  People like you. My god.
You provided neat information. And I provided a link to a song in a movie about cockroaches in New York. I was sharing.
Little known fact: the white powder is actually a form of reproduction for the donuts wherein they are released when contact is made with another surface or animal, similar to the spores of certain plants or pollination by bees.
Yes, but the principle is the same.  How somehow now that the internet is here, simply by upvoting an article, and if we feel really courageous signing a petition on change.org we have done our part, and we can scoff and say 'well I'm not a part of that' And this article has 119 upvotes, and from what I've heard most congressmen will change their vote if they get 6 emails on a subject and propose legislation is they get 20 emails.  So if congress got flooded with emails about this problem maybe they would work on some sort of legislation to work with Brasil or one of the other nations facing mass deforestation (Madagascar, Indonesia).  And remember to end your emails with "and if nothing gets done you won't get my vote, and I will campaign against you"
I guess we could call it a spin-off.
I'm in Canada, and have been following the Dutch news for 2 weeks, like everybody in Holland.  This afternoon, a passerby discovered 1 body in the water, and notified police.  They soon discovered the 2nd body.  Press conference was given tonight at 23:00 hrs local time, and announced the brothers had been found.    Not was everybody was waiting to hear.  Hope had still been there to find them alive.  Hundreds of local people had helped the search.  I may be far away, but this news had touched me like nothing before. I shed some tears at the news the boys' tiny bodies had been found.  Ruben and Julian were just 7 and 9 years old.  May they rest in peace
are u a spammer or are u someone who puts links up here that ur interested in ?
Notice the article is careful to avoid mentioning any possible ethnic or religious affiliations... 
After hearing about the Wessel Islands I read the entire thing in Checkov's voice
Modern day Goonies adventure?...I hope so!
With the lack of history prior to the 16th century it must be relatively simple for an Australian citizen to join-the-dots on an informal conspiracy on how they are ruled by Freemasons.   Inexplicably, ancient aliens. Vis a vis Castlemaine, ergo 'bread &amp; circus', 'g'day cunts' concordantly.   
Sleep... that's where *I'm* a viking!
Is there a chance that some coin collector could have just had a lot of old coins and hid them somewhere?
No contest at all, Vegemite with butter and toast wins every time :p  If you hadn't noticed I'm just being a fool, while syrup is delicious. It's much to much for a weak ol' me. Vegemite is tasty in small doses and has never over powered me, is all.
There's a difference between logging, and deforestation. 
that was a dangerous click
The USA blows away the European average. Only a handful of European countries are even comparable to them; but you're right. In fact; Australia &amp; New Zealand were more tolerant.
Amazing that you view drone strikes as a question of efficacy:  "Do they create more terrorism for America, or less?"  You fail to note that drones are a form of terrorism, themselves.  The USA is terrorizing those villagers, the vast majority of whom have nothing to do with violence against the US.  Many of our victims are small children, as has been documented many times.  That you can only see this from your own perspective ("If they reduce 'terrorism' then it's all good.") is unbelievably callous and, quite frankly, immoral.  You must believe the lives of Yemenis are irrelevant to think this way.  
[deleted]
The viking words are "We do not sue."
Why are the comments here always so predictable.  Top comment is almost always hurr durr, no this is wrong, I'm so smart hurrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrr.
"blunder" ... wth ... given what happened on 9-11, this seems to have bee a perfectly executed plan.    .  Had there been a hijacking, I'm not sure what would have happened but there would have been no crashing into buildings.
&gt;"Oh, so you acknowledge that shitty living conditions can lead to a life of crime, and that it is in fact a problem that a disproportionately large percentage of the underclass is Muslim, and even that overt racism in France makes it difficult for many people to "integrate"? Well then, you obviously think that criminals are the true victims here, because logic."  The French gov't the French people are in no way responsible for the shitty conditions in which they choose to live. They live in ghettos they built, not us, the gov't doesn't force them in there, they create these zones for themselves. The shitty conditions were not always there. They made these places shitty; these banlieux used to be clean and sanitary.   Second, they refuse to integrate. Quite simply. They knew that France was a liberal country where women are free, people are allowed to make fun of whomever (including your prophet) and they still came. The integration failed because they wanted us to comply to their way of life. No way, this is our country and we are proud of our culture, it is a free and secular culture and we weren't going to import restrictions for anyone. They are immigrants in a foreign country, **it is their responsibility to integrate.** Immigration is a privilege not a right. Nobody forces them to live here, their home countries are an hour plane ride away. There is no analog here to the African-American situation.  They came here and we spent billions bringing them here, helping them and giving them an education. But they refused. They clustered themselves in suburbs, turned them to shit and taught their children to hate everything and anything French turning them into delinquents incapable of integrating. Those who didn't do that integrated well succeeded and so did their children.  Is there racism? Yeah but that's after decades of seeing hatred and crimes committed by this group. But obviously, it's not as extreme as you portray it. Education and jobs are still available. The gov't doesn't exclude them from social security. They're free to do and go wherever they want to. No one abuses them on the streets. Don't exaggerate. But people got sick and tired because they are always involved in crimes (60-70% of inmates are Muslim) and they have deep hatred for France and French culture, the country that took them in, treated them like equal citizens and gave them plenty of opportunities which they refused.  &gt;what do you think France should do about this problem?  1. Raise the standards for immigration.  2. Deport criminals who are foreign-born.
Terrorist organization &amp; terrorist state I don't see the difference between the two. Journalists are journalists and must be respected. 
The incident was on May 5, not yesterday. It was revealed yesterday which in itself is interesting.
Huh, maybe 20% of the population are actually just misunderstood geniuses.
Pirate Bay makes a ton of money off of those ads on its website.  They make money off of other people's creative works and don't have to pay them a cent.  
Can you imagine if our gold stocks are affected? How many millions would that deprive our heirs of their inheritance? How many companies will they not be able to acquire? This is horrible! Perhaps we should return to a model where we could insist the british provincial troops put down such tomfoolery
[what?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poe's_law)
Leibniz had some great ideas, unfortunatelly not really that practical implementation wise. Especially not in his age. By the way, are you a fan of Neil Stephenson by any chance?
&gt; Can you tell me how we know whether someone killed in a drone strike is innocent or not?   Would a supersonic bomber or a cruise missile have a better chance of knowing? 
terrible
It's more that people are sickened there are those out there who would fly an unmanned aircraft to do their dirty work. The people are aldo shocked at how U.S. drones are killing as many innocents as an actual military intervention would.  We're just replacing harsh invasions with drone invasions. Saying that "people are just complaining" when this is our world shows how ignorant some people are.  We could get rid of military drone strikes (and replace them with surveillance) quite easily and it would look a lot better than unmanned Vietnam.
http://i.imgur.com/8GF8SoI.gif
This doesn't really depict Fredrik in a very positive light. He's kind of an asshole and a coward.
I would rather [This](http://i.imgur.com/DjGkbp8.jpg) be their response
I think we got 1 week (beginning start of the semester) to return them for full price.
I've got something sensitive that Chinese hackers can breach, if you know what I mean.
Turn back now, nothing but shit in these comments.
So there I was trying to put together a lesson plan for tomorrow when the police kicked in my door with guns drawn. I had no idea what I had done, I asked the officer what the problem was and he said I pirated a text book and would have to pay. Well I asked him how much it cost and he responded," About tree fiddy." Well it was at that moment that I noticed this police officer was eight stories tall and was a crustacean from the Paleozoic era. I said "Dammit monsta I ain't givin' you no tree fiddy." So he arrested me and I might go to jail for two years.
They ought be fucking embarrassed as shit for apologising inappropriately.
Maybe you should go and read up on this big mighty word, bias, mkay
a nazi flag near a mosque... is that like a confederate flag near a church?   
The fact the Libertarians that hate claim to hate government are willing to give the government the power to do this and use the death penalty has convinced me libertarians don't hate government, they support whatever fits their cruel selfish world view.
Simply: the used a lot of electricity to release hydrogen from urine. They then put the hydrogen into a generator and got a much smaller amount of electricity out. 
You mean your tuition includes the costs for the licenses. You are still paying for them. 
It passed just a couple miles to the south of me. [This is the only picture I could get of it.](http://i.imgur.com/S2hPPhE.jpg)
I thought the Electronic Intifada was the Pally version, no? 
OK.  So let's talk about the US murder statistics broken down by race.  Citation:  http://bjs.gov/content/pub/pdf/htius.pdf  Quoting page 11:  &gt;The demographic characteristics of homicide victims and offenders differ from the general population &gt; &gt;Based on data for the years 1976-2005 - &gt; &gt;Blacks are disproportionately represented as both homicide victims and offenders. The victimization rates for blacks were 6 times higher than those for whites. *The offending rates for blacks were more than 7 times higher the rates for whites.*  Elsewhere in that report you'll learn that roughly 55% of all murders in the US are committed by blacks, at least among the roughly 2/3rd in which the race of the killer is known (mostly the "solved homicides" stats but not entirely).  Blacks (African-Americans) make up about 15% of the US population.  Put another way: if you take the murders by blacks and exclude them from the US murder totals, and take black demographics out too in terms of population, the remaining population (of all other races) will have a per-capita murder rate of roughly middle of the pack among European murder rates...well, at least as of 2005 ago when I last looked.  (European murder rates are now being affected by Islamic-world immigration, esp. if you include the Algerian-origin folk in France.)  Now.  Back to the US numbers.  There are only two possible reasons for that kind of disparity (7:1):  * Blacks are genetically screwed up, which I don't believe for a second.  * Something has gone badly wrong with the "inner city hip-hop culture" if you want to call it that.  This is my view.  It's also Bill Cosby's view, and truth be told he's no more a member of that subculture than I am and certainly less than, say, Marshal Mathers (aka "Eminem").  What happened to that culture is a brutal mix of past racism: police abuse that led them to hate police interaction, economic disparity, slavery breaking up families, joblessness doing the same, welfare laws rigged against family doing the same, the "War On (Some) Drugs" being rigged in a racist direction and a shit-ton more.  Took us 200+ years but we trashed their culture systematically over generations.  Now.  If one culture can be fundamentally more violent, it doesn't take a genius to see that other cultures can be more violent.  And Arab culture...holy shit.  Muhammed himself was a critic of some of the crap they were doing back in his day, like killing female daughters pre-puberty so that they would be a virgin pure sacrifice for the family...he put a stop to that shit that was, at it's core, built up around a messed up view of female sexuality.  And so on.  So.  The "youth" in Sweden who are all pissy have Arabic-origin names.    Gee, who'd have thunk it?
Too*  If you wanna be a hardass.  Capitols exist.
Wow, I ruined that joke. Sorry.
Well if you weren't so blind you'd see that it's all Muslims who wear disguises to look like White Supremacists, Irishmen and Greeks!!!
this man shares my values
Joe Rogan.
Yeah, been there. As a speed reader, this was hugely annoying. We had a similar (local) system back in college, and after I got locked out 3 times I went to Admin to complain and proved that I *actually did* read that fast. So they removed the limit for me... and I promptly did the whole screenshot-then-save-in-paint thing.  Afterwards I had to login occasionally to pretend I was using it because after the first month of inactivity I got called up (lol wtf).
Rioting for civil rights is one thing, rioting because a machete wielding psychopath was taken down is another thing. Social unrest in poor neighbourhoods can be understandable, but in the case of Sweden where social welfare is really good, there is NO justification for that kind of crap.
Copyright infringement =/= theft.
Tom Green tried to warn us.
That brand of liberal is kind of self sustaining and self fulfilling in their quest to destroy well... themselves. They only contribute to that environment within the media, not ordered by the media itself to do it.
Omg her tits.....  and her stomach line!!...  *fapfapfapfap*....  Oh her waist!...  I'm about to cu...  *sees her penis*  Well......  
&gt; Be a little bit realistic, the people that analyze this stuff work hard and go over all the options before making recommendations and analyze all the risks and possible consequences (in most cases).  Ooohhh okay, so it's not just completely arbitrary, senseless violence? That makes me feel better.  That means that when the drones slaughter the people that are coming to collect the bodies of the children that were just murdered, **someone analyzed a lot of data to decide it was important to kill that father digging his child's corpse out of the rubble.**  Did you know that, though? Did you know that [America deliberately targets people coming to help the victims of its attacks](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2208307/Americas-deadly-double-tap-drone-attacks-killing-49-people-known-terrorist-Pakistan.html)?  If you knew that, and you still support this... I don't even want to know where I'm going with that thought. I do know that if I was a terrorist, though, at this point I wouldn't feel a lot of guilt blowing up Americans when I know there are so many like you... so many people who know the terror you cause and still want to kill brown people.  Just to clarify what I mean by that:  **There is nowhere in the entire world where it is not understood that America is not only the greatest cause of terrorism by massive, massive margins, but also the most dangerous, brutal, callous and violent terrorist threat that looms over the planet.**  I'm saying this because you need to get a perspective from somewhere that isn't Fox News, and this might be a painful revelation: at this point it really feels like the international community has a great deal more sympathy for America's victims than it does for Americans who suffer the inevitable consequences of supporting the brutal slaughter of innocent people in their homes. Please think about that while you watch your military hegemony slip away as your economy crumbles, leaving you defenceless against the millions of people in the dozens of countries whose homes, families and lives you destroyed. When the Iraqi army is invading and your family is dead in your bombed out home, while you can be killed at any moment for being an insurgent, remember that a lot of recommendations and analysis led to this point, so it's all good.
I am unsure whether you are a bearded terrorist or a stubble -  faced hipster.   It's hard to tell, on this issue. 
lets see the source for 100,000, and then I can start to pick it apart.
*immediately removes lap-top from lap*
good guy china
&gt;Mistakes are made in military operations and people die. That's an uncomfortable reality in certain parts of the world. You know what the alternative is? A poorly-trained Pakistani military dealing with the situation.  Oh so it's only one thing or the other now is it? Sorry I don't buy such simple mindedness.   &gt;You think a few innocents dying in drone strikes is bad?  It is more than a few innocents. What you have skipped over entirely is  how these mistakes you mention come about - how  these drones are employed, what kind of oversight there is and what kind of accountability there is, what kind of analysis there is regarding whether the victims are innocents or not.   &gt;You clearly have no idea how many innocents die when a poorly trained military goes in to handle the operation. It's a game of averages. Do you want many to die to placate your pathetic sense of Western "justice"? How many would have to die before you said "maybe drones were the way to go". One thousand? Two? Three? Four? Ten? What's your arbitrary value on a human life? Do you even have a concept of what 10,000 deaths is even like? What does that do to a region? What does that do to a country? Is it worth feeling like you can pat yourself on the back for taking your illusory high-ground?  This is utter garbage. So you are either for drone strikes or you are for slaughter, oh and you are ignorant or smug if you opt for the latter.  &gt;You completely missed my point.  Your point completely missed the target. In the real world, real drones strikes killing real people has a real affect. To deny all that is pure lunacy.   &gt;Again, you completely missed my point.     Excuse me, but your point was that they hate us for our way of life and they need to invest in building xyz instead of be concerened about a foreign power bombing their families. That was your point, a facile and wrongheaded as any, and unsurprisingly sounds idealogical rather than substantive.   &gt;The drone strikes are about protecting stability in regions such as Yemen and Pakistan because the only alternative is either the experienced boots of the USA on the ground or the inexperienced boots of the respective military of these countries.   Again I reject such a simplistic approach to things. Incidentialy drone strikes are employed against those from the other two parties you mention anyway.  You still haven't dealt with how the drone strikes campaign is being used. You argument reduces down to this. Drones are better than a bad army. Well drones are a weapon, just like the army is a weapon, it can be deployed in a smart way with strict oversight and accountability or in a dumb way. You have failed to address how it is being employed at all. Furthermore dismissing the blowback from the programme and how it is run is a downright insult. Something you yourself are not shy of throwing at others, be it people who challenged your views or entire regions of the world.
CHINA STRONK, CHINA CRUSH AMERIKKKA PIG.
I have a morbid theory that the main reason breast cancer gets so much attention is that it has to do with breasts. Guys like thinking about breasts, and cancer is just the excuse to bring them up.
The police has already talked to him. And he was too busy calming his mother than taping all of this.   It's tricky situation. With my experience of the police, I think the police could have acted diffirent. But I understand what your point is.
Yeah there's a delayed schedule. You're right, vaccines don't have to be given all at once, it's just that it's hard enough to get people to make appointments once every 2-3 months.  Imagine having them come in every month.  
having fun and ruling with iron fist are not mutually exclusive :)
Trust me, no animal would expend the amount of energy dolphins expend for the types of communication they have, if their language was simple like, say birds, then we would have been easily able to translate it as we have for birds.  Also dolphins are most similar to a nomadic creature, in which most individuals do the same job of either taking care of the young, or feeding.  
You're all a pack of cunts. Go fuck yourselves.
[deleted]
Wow reddit.   rapes per 100,000   India- 1.8  USA- 27.3   So, yea. Also the caste system was made illegal after independence. It may still exist unoffically, but lets not act like the US or any other western nation doesn't have a stratified social structure. 
You haven't understood the answer.
not abysmal? its fucking great, seriously some of the best meals Ive had in India were at temples that made Indian food in the states look like crap. Yeah they were vegetarian, but it sure beats the hell out of "soup" in the US.
You haven't questioned the understanding.
I've scrolled all the way down to you so far and have seen no hate. Just positive comments and complaints about hate. Calm your tits. 
So long and thanks for all the fish!
Yet there is always a post church rush at restaurants and stores on Sunday.
Fascism got a bad rap because of Hitler and his Lebensraum delusion. There were a lot of good fascist or nationalist regimes in History, Józef Piłsudski in Poland is a good example, nationalism was also a core value of Mustafa Kemal Atatürk.
Just hook it to my veins!!
But women deserve to get raped? The logic used by the government of India baffles me.
&gt;Imposing one's religious beliefs on others through law is just plain wrong.   Imposing any religious beliefs on others is wrong. 
I believe they dropped that (the Loughton ammendment) and will debate it immediately after the bill passes. That was the Labour fix to prevent the bill failing because of civil partnerships issue.
&gt; The idea is the House of Lords is there to more closely examine bills and look at it from their expert viewpoints.   Because the entire country is incapable of making decisions and is therefor deferred to the House of Lords.
&gt; I hate all the people who try to push their agenda on others.  Can you hear yourself pushing your agenda on everybody else?
Well *techincally* the monarchy has power in places like Aus or Canada, given that she is in fact their head of state.
I used to want to get rid of the Lords.  During the Blair years the Lords (and the EU) saved our liberties on numerous occasions.   They could be reactionary and bitter about this though.
Meet me in the golan heights... Its going dooooowwwwnnn!
Oh yeah I forgot about the whole 'Civil Partnerships' thing.
Is that why most Christian countries in the world are becoming more and more secular?
But if you don't read it you don't discover that Lord Feldman describes all activists against the bill as **"mad, swivel-eyed loons"**(allegedly). You could count the number of times I have agreed with a Tory senior politician on the fingers of one Simpson.    Lord Feldman = Conservative co-chairman
Not sure why you were downvoted for bringing up a valid point, but to add to what the others have said, the less people you have vaccinated, the more people you have that end up spreading the disease.  So each additional unvaccinated person can turn an isolated case into a widespread outbreak.  This is what we have seen in the past few years.  With the recent drop in vaccination rates in the UK due to autism fears, outbreaks of well controlled diseases like measles have occurred.  I can't find the exact epidemiological study that this article is based on which I read a while back but this will have to do :p  http://vitals.nbcnews.com/_news/2013/05/20/18376320-measles-surges-in-uk-years-after-vaccine-scare?lite  edit: and another one that's a bit more graphical and easier to digest http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/health-22277186
Most of the elite.   The white, oxbridge educated, private school boys that run all three of our majors parties. 
I'll have to find the link. I read a few weeks back when reddit was on the "rape in India" binge, that some judge declared that it's okay for women to be raped because they make it hard for men to get them. And if a man likes a woman he shouldn't have to work so hard to be with her. Something along those lines. I'll look for the link.
If India wants to do a better job with 'Rights', then it should probably get the whole rape thing under control before it gets all fancy and Greenpeace/Peta-like. 
I got my "stats" from another comment on reddit, in this same thread. And the guy even posted a source too.  Maybe he changed his source... I lost his comment =/  
[deleted]
It's a whole different story for female dolphins. The rape and abuse will continue to flow.
Send them to the artic to start their own backward country
The six day war was started by Egypt. Egypt started massing troops on Israel's border, and told UN peacekeepers to leave. UN peacekeepers left. Israel said that if Egypt blockades Eilat, Israel will consider it an act of war. Then Egypt blockaded Eilat, and then Israel attacked Egypt. Then Jordan and Syria attacked Israel, and then Israel attacked them too. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Six-Day_War  2008 Gaza crisis was started by Hamas. They broke an existing cease-fire by attacking Israel with rockets for months without Israel responding, then offered Israel another cease-fire. Israel had no reason to trust Hamas, since Hamas broke the last cease-fire, plus Hamas had already attacked Israel, so Israel returned fire against Hamas. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gaza_War  Please, give a better analogy if you don't like mine.   Here's a fun fact: Berbers, Kurds, South Sudanese, Darfur, Black Africans in West Africa. What do these groups have in common? They are natives to lands that the Arabs Empire one controlled, and today the Arabs are attacking them. Just like the Jews. These conflicts are not because the Jews, Berbers, Kurds, South Sudanese, Darfur blacks, or west African blacks happen to all disenfranchise the Arabs at the same time. It's because the Arabs are suppressing other populations in the former Arab empire, in order to gain back control. Israel is just one piece of the puzzle. Or can you give me citations for how Berbers, Kurds, and Blacks from different parts of north Africa all disenfranchised the Arabs at the same time, and that's why Arabs are attacking all of them?
Whenever something unbelievably great is discovered or is posted on reddit, the comments will always refute them, place caveats on them, and obliterate the sensationalist titles with realism and facts, leaving only a somewhat impressive achievement that does not excite me behind.  But when it comes to things like these, that enlightening of the issue, those revealing facts are nowhere to be found. The titles are always to be taken as is, for they usually tell nothing but facts.
And what will Indians do about it? What have they done about it historically?
[A street gang kidnapped Channon and Chistopher, mutilated his genitals and shot him while forcing his girlfriend to watch. Then the brutally raped, murdered, and dismembered her.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Murders_of_Channon_Christian_and_Christopher_Newsom)  [And it all happened in the good old USA](http://www.seraphicpress.com/the-rape-torture-and-murder-of-christopher-newsom-and-channon-christian/)
[deleted]
Humans are so fucked up FTFY
IDC Garage Door offers the best prices on garage doors Alpharetta GA, garage door repair, openers, springs and parts.  We our Marietta &amp; Alpharetta residents Overhead Door Company of choice. 
Bad troll. 2/10
Oh, it's you again.
[deleted]
There is no Al Qaeda. At least his father had a half-way realistic understanding of foreign policy.
What did they charge those guys with, have they been convicted?
A racist policeman?  Who ever heard of such a thing?
another Obama scandal brewing?
After checking this sub today and seeing all the war/criminal stuff, this article made me smile. Thank you.
&gt;Where there is money, all is possible  Where do you think that money is going? The people?    China has a high-tech economy because FOREIGN companies ship their high tech jobs over to them.
She's their queen. It's nothing to do with Britain. Our government has no power there. But our queen happens to be in charge there too. It would be like if Mexico elected Obama as president. It doesn't make them part of the US, they would just happen to have the same president as you.
I wish I could agree with your assessment. In my country, politicians also fostered forced multiculturalism. Behind the scenes, some admitted that they did this for two purposes:  -A genuine wish to see them integrate and become part of society  -A massive influx of new voters (especially for the left-leaning parties) since foreigners get voting rights here.  The result is that, as more and more people flock here, some of these parties have blatantly abandoned their traditional voters in favor of these new demographics.  The results are... skewed, shall we say.   EDIT:I'd like to elaborate on one point. The reason politicians thought (and were truly convinced) that these people would integrate over the course of two-three decades was because *it worked with EVERY other group before or after them*. There are *no* reports of specific problems with Hindus. *No* reports of problems with Sikhs. *No* problems with Buddhists. Plenty of problems with Christians, but not of this sort. There was a deluge of articles on this problem about 20 years ago, when it first started becoming apparent. The only thing politicians did was smother any dissent with the guarantee that, in time, this problem would sort itself out. The radicals would see how much better life was here and de-radicalize.  Not. So that never happened.  So in effect, I wonder to what level these people saw this as a worthwile experiment and to what level they just wanted to sweep the problems under the rug until their term in office was over...
The great, honorable, and pure North Korean people would never allow forced labor. This is insulting American Propaganda! And... THIS MEANS WAR!
That's really strange - especially since in my experience working in China , society really isn't that patriarchal at all. I know plenty of female CEO's and bosses, and see men and women interact on an equal footing in the workplace. Also - Shanghaignese guys are henpecks. 
LOL...that's a great one.  Upvote for the citation.
Yes it is :D
It'll be an interesting one to keep an eye on. This would have come under the Northern Ireland offences bill that would have dealt with on the runs before it was withdrawn. The accused will likely inhabit some sort of legal grey area and receive a short sentence if convicted.
Which ones aren't shit?
It didn't, in their part of the world. Europe advanced by abandomning religious tradition.
I'm probably making assumptions by equating Sweden closely with the USA, forgive my ignorance, I'm honestly not sure. Trash where I'm from are definitely pretty mild - I'm from Wisconsin, and even most conservative folks are still pretty reasonable on social issues. At least from my region.  As for native trash, yes, better native trash than outsider trash - native trash you at least have some responsibility for as you're fellow countrymen, in my opinion. Difference of opinion or not we're loyal to the land in the end. I simply can't imagine a second civil war in America, or any sort of civil war in Sweden.  Drunk on Chinese beer...oy...
Yeah, let's make a hurtful generalized statement that will offend all normal Indians reading this post. Oh no, it's okay! It's not like America or whatever country you're in perfect.
why is this so downvoted?
[deleted]
As we have all learned, if we ignore, or continue to not learn about the mistakes made in the past, we will never repeat them. Mao did a lot of things that, may not have been intentionally bad, but a lot policies and actions killed millions of Chinese. I hope that never gets repeated. 
Live life without being a complete ass and you're already ahead of the game.
In closing, he finished with "As long as you aren't gay!"
allies? who? the brits?
That's an extreme oversimplification of a highly complex situation.  Pakistan has asked the US to continue the drone strikes because they are unable to deal with their own domestic issues.  The US has gone along with it, because it coincides with our own regional interests.  It's in the interest of both countries to continue the attacks.  Keep in mind Pakistan has nukes, the stabilization of the country is very important for regional security.    Of course, asking for that level of nuanced viewpoints is far beyond what some people like to entertain.  Much better to just write off every situation as gun happy 'muricans, right?    Fyi, international business contracts are not awarded based on levels of "niceness" or how much people like you.  if that was true, Australia and Sweden would be getting all the business.   
Well, that's awfully nice of him. 
"I want to wear this pasta colander on my head" - Atheists
So, do you think maybe you'd want to offer the source of the article you are quoting with  &gt;and did nothing other than "appear aggressive."  Because upon realizing those words aren't in the article the thread is directly linked to, one might begin to suspect that you could potentially be pulling random facts out of your ass.  Just something to consider.....
Reddit clearly is, which is impressive enough considering who we're talking about.
[China is simply taking back their market, post western industrialization](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2163610/Fascinating-new-graph-shows-economic-history-world-Jesus.html)
[deleted]
&gt;I think that heaven will be filled with Christians, atheists, Muslims, Jews, Hindus, etc.  If your really a Christian surely you don't believe that. If you don't accept salvation and acknowledge that Christ died on the cross for your and mankinds sins, you aren't holding up your side of the bargain. From what I understand the only thing required for salvation is the acceptance that we are imperfect and that Christ died for our sins to bridge that gap between humanity and the divine.
He's gonna be a good pope
Those that would ask that question I think. 
We should never punish people for having other languages and cultures, thats against humanity in general. But we need to have people who want to integrate know the language of the country they want to reside in. Its essential for proper integration.  Students who speak in different languages in class, should of course pay attention to the class, if they choose to speak different language in recess, that is their choice. The class is the teachers time, not theirs. (I mean this for children and people who know the native language).  If people want to reside in a country, they have to learn the native language. In the same sense i think the Scandinavians that move to Spain to retire, should learn Spanish, in the same sense the Mexicans and south Americans that go to the US, should learn English. The same way if i want to move to Japan and live there, i should be forced and Want to learn Japanese either before or during my first year.
I don't put much stock in religion either.  Sins against God just seem whacky to me.  Did God give us a concept which when spoken aloud will offend God?  Why would he do that?  Maybe I need to copy this somewhere else to see if I can find some believers who are worried about blaspheming against the Holy Spirit.
Yeah and who dismantled our state run mental programs? Ronald Reagan. 
[deleted]
Well damn. This pope is awesome.  //athiest.
well keep fighting the good fight... reddit would be an unintelligible place without the grammar nazis
Video NSFW http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-ggX9nyUfZI
&gt;Let's look at how horrible the other Muslim majority Stan's turned out because of Soviet influence; Uzbekistan, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan,Tajikistan, Turkmenistan.  Their resistance to Russian rule was crushed before the USSR was even created (with the exception of the Basmachi rebellion). As far as the "civilizing through colonialism" goes, those countries were actually living in the Russian sphere of influence for 150 years. Compare and contrast with the invasion of Afghanistan in 1979, to prop up a failing communist government and convert an ultraconservative country famous for successfully repelling imperial invaders into a communist satellite.  &gt;Yeh, perhaps the Soviet Union wasn't the bad influence on the region after all  Again, you're expanding this debate into some sort of a "region" which includes countries with vastly different histories (why not lump Iran into it as well, purely on the basis of proximity, or maybe because Farsi is similar to Tajik/Dari language, or just for the lulz?) Afghanistan is a separate case. So, when it comes to Afghanistan, the answer to your question is: it depends on how many millions of people you're willing to sacrifice trying to convince people to send their own daughters to school.  &gt;the people there know who ruined their countries, and it ain't Russia.  Sure, let's take a poll in Afghanistan and see what they think of the USSR invading them.
[deleted]
If I took the time to actually read all the posts before posting myself, I could get by just by upvoting everyone who is writing what I'm thinking.
I also went to a Catholic HS. As I remember it, there was serious disagreement on this issue. Maybe that just means some folks are/were uninformed as to the Church's official position. But the fact that the pope said it explicitly is really cool.   I forwarded this article to my parents, who thought they were failures for having atheistic children. I mean this was a major deal, with some accompanying depression and the whole shebang. They really thought their kids would go  to hell, and therefore their entire lives basically resulted in failure.   The fact that it was the pope who explicitly said this is important, being the personal PR rep for god on Earth and all.
The text from the AUMF:  "That the President is authorized to use all necessary and appropriate force against those nations, organizations, or persons he determines planned, authorized, committed, or aided the terrorist attacks that occurred on September 11, 2001, or harbored such organizations or persons, in order to prevent any future acts of international terrorism against the United States by such nations, organizations or persons."
Its been working for us for 380000 years, we're not going to stop procastinating now.
They are now being treated in hospital at the British taxpayers expense.
Something that the "soak the rich crowd" never seems to figure out.  Rich people are mobile and can hire good tax lawyers.  Raise taxes too high and they will just move someplace else or shelter their money off shore.  It is interesting how may of the New York and Los Angeles liberal elites have residences in states like Tennessee, Florida, New Hampshire, Texas or  Nevada that have no personal income tax.  They know exactly how many days they can spend in California or New York before they have to pay taxes there as a resident.  It is also why most "Hollywood" TV shows are actually filmed in Canada.  Lower taxes and no unions.  Then there is Apple Computer hiding literally tens of billions of dollars off shore.   Keep the taxes low enough and you will get everything you are owed because it isn't worth dodging.  Raise them too high and you get nothing.
have fun with your shitty life. 
I can't disagree with you there, but history shows that Christianity has done it's fair share of brutality over the centuries... it just appears that Islam is where Christianity was 600 years ago... IMHO...
Political correctness and multiculturalism illustrated. Your rights end where my feelings begin.
&gt;  I am hoping to any god that will listen it isnt him.  Just not, you know, *that* god.  No, that would be hypocritical.
Oh yes, israel's the rational one and the Arabs have been distorted by their "evil Islam" and how they "don't understand democracy". Why don't you peddle your bullshit somewhere else?  Also, I'd bet that you've made that whole "I've lived with Arabs" up. The "right wing israelis treat Arabs decently" is for sure made up.
Sure, I'll just spend next few hours teaching you what you should've learned at school... tell you what - $20 per hour and private tutoring is yours.
Why should he have to change, he's free to believe in what he likes? It's the idiots that have to change, not him.
[Bitch ain't shit!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K76c1yPRzug)
[deleted]
Redeemed what? There's no place for this well-intended bullshit in my realm.
[Thread Music](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qsm7U53M1IA&amp;noredirect=1)
I wonder how many times I can reply to this and continue to get downvotes? Well so far im at 3, let's keep it going guys! 
Lol you clearly value your time. You write a whole paragraph with nothing but wild claims and insults. time well used.
Frankly if you murder people on the streets of Britain you deserve to get life in prison in my books.   I don't care about motive if it's Irish independence, sharia law or in this case foreign policy. Killing, harming or attacking innocents is never morally justifiable in my books. 
Westboro Baptist Church. 
[deleted]
It was okay to begin with.
Before I address you rebuttal.  &gt; Do you think that was because of a racial purity and superiority theory, barely two years after the liberation of nazi death camps, or was it because Arabs have, out of their own volition, became a mortal threat to the Jewish population?  I don't think it was either, I think it was out of the need to build a state with a clear Jewish majority. Since we're using logic here, tell me why would *thousands* of Arabs leave their worldly possessions, turning themselves into refugees, simply because of a perceived threat.  &gt; Yes, liberation from the Jews. First by neutralizing Jewish claims over the loosely held West Bank, and then establishing a combatant state on these "liberated" territories that is separate from all other Arab states and doesn't force Arab leaders to admit they're behind it, enabling to continue the struggle until the elimination of Israel. It is, in fact, the official policy of the PLO, which is at the core of Palestinian Authority.  Or maybe they were fighting back oppression?  &gt; liberal society provides a far better quality of life than the rest of regional nations possibly could.  And you think Israel provides just that? Israel may be secular within its own borders but when it comes to foreign policy they are aggressive and sectarian.    
That ghost wasn't the only thing that busted.
If one comment on Reddit is changing your whole perspective of a cultural group then I am much more worried about your extremist attitudes...
But none for Gretchen Wieners. 
He's not a terrorist and this wasn't terrorism, it was a hate crime and a murder.
It still offers better protection than a window. More importantly, you wouldn't stop and wait giving them ample opportunity to take shots more or less perpendicular into the side of the card.
Now, now, that's just conspiracy talk.  Open your eyes and ears!  Things are as they are. (Unless you can provide me some evidence other than 'the study of history')
i heard a load of you guys are trying to stick up for these 2 guys   top lel
They are a street march movement against radical islam and what they see is muslims trying to impose Sharia law in the UK.
Everything else has been said on this thread. He was sharing how it affects him. This isn't facebook where all we do is repeat condolences.
They clearly didn't fear being shot, they ran at an armed police officer with nothing but a meat cleaver.
[deleted]
Possibly no one. Most information now is dodgy witness reports from people who didn't necessarily see much and don't know enough to provide much information. Especially for things like whether a person who was shot is dead or not. Most people have no experience with that beyond TV and video games, which are rarely realistic (especially not the "realistic" ones).
Im working on him. Slowly exposing what Islam represents today. He is amazing in every other way.
Are you telling me you're going to take on 2 large black guys with knives and guns after witnessing them chop someone up, while unarmed? I really don't like it when people sit in front of their pc and act as if they would have been any different, that would have been a terrifying situation to have been in. People were actually pretty brave in this situation, a lot of people rushed to help the man while the two guys were still standing around talking, too late of course sadly.
People like you are almost more dangerous than Islam/Muslims themselves and must be get rid of as well.
no thanks, i wanna keep my head.
My fayher is ex RUC (Royal Ulster Constabulary) and can confirm that they all carry firearms in northern Ireland
Agreed, but then switch to renewables. Problem solved.   Let the Chinese deal with them :-) sooner or later..
I think you misunderstood my comment, my only intention was to provide the historical context of this tragic period for all sides, and one of the main reason for why such terrible things took place in Lithuania.  Nothing justifies murder, but we can't and shouldn't ignore the actions and environment that led to it, if we really wish to never repeat it again.
I know what you mean this whole thing is so surreal.
[deleted]
SNAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAKE!
well there's allegedly  and then there is being deeply entrenched in al qaeda and releasing dozens of videos evangelizing for recruits to kill civilians 
My conceptions of God come from revelation, i.e. the Bible and the Tradition of the apostles passed down through the ages in the Church.   A person is not a concept; every concept fails to grasp God, in the same way that every definition of human being fails to grasp any actual person. There is a huge gap between the concept and the reality, no matter how faithful the concept may be in pointing to that reality.  My concepts serve as pointers toward mystery. In day to day life, I have a working conception of God that helps me feel close to God. But if pressed, I have to say that my conceptions falter, and even my experiences can be doubted.   As a catholic, faith and reason are not intrinsically opposed. The current state of faith, and the current state of reason certainly contradict each other in several ways. But since I believe both reason and faith have their source in God, they cannot ultimately contradict each other. 
[deleted]
&lt;Ron Burgundy&gt;Wow, I'm not even mad, I'm impressed!&lt;/Ron Burgundy&gt;
[deleted]
Also private military contractors and the defense industry
Dalai Llama was doing this before it was cool.   Still this Pope is pretty dope. 
&gt;Personally I think anyone capable of doing anything like this has serious mental issues...  People have killed each-other brutally and in the most disgusting ways as long as humans have existed.  I know it's hard for us with nice cushy lives to imagine the motivations but you don't have to be crazy to kill someone.
I don't think there are any reasonable Scientologists... 
I'm begining to like this new "pope".
The killer said: &gt;"The only reasons we have done this is because Muslims are dying every day."    Yes.  The ones that act like you just did are the ones dying and occasionally some of the innocent human shields you surround yourselves with.  You dishonor an ancient religion with your barbarism and behavior like this will only drive people further away from your beliefs.
That's completely irrelevant to my point though. People are jizzing themselves in this thread, and in others, about the popes view on Atheists as if its a radical or new one. It's not, that's the way it's been for hundreds of years.  So to clarify:  * The Church has always stated Atheists can go to heaven if they are good people. If they genuinely don't believe in a God they won't be punished for it. The entire point of the Catholic religion is Jesus wiped the slate clean for **everyone**. * "You must accept Jesus Christ as your lord and savior" to get into heaven is an **American Evangelist** belief.  Not a catholic one. * That solid gold throne is actually bronze, not gold. But again it's the above two comments I'm talking about.  Therefor this is not news, this is not a new pope going rogue. It's a pope repeating what hundreds of popes have said. In Catholicism you get to heaven by not being a prick, how quickly you get to heaven depends on how much of a prick you are. If you are a true atheist you can commit as many mortal sins as you like as long as in your heart you didn't believe them to be wrong, and you probably have a higher chance of getting into heaven than some, stick-by-the-rules, but still an asshole, believer.  Next the pope is going to reiterate that Genesis is a fable and not actually catholic belief, and reddit will again shit themselves even though the Roman Catholic Church have not been creationists long before even Darwin. It's just mindbogglingly ignorant.   
...and to let us eat those aborted babies. I mean, come on. *So tender.*
This guy is the Church's Gorbichov. 
I'm a big fan of this guy.  As a person raised Catholic, this sort of attitude could even bring me back to Church.  Let's see where this goes.
Most. He said if I raised a child, it would be abuse. Because, you know, the people who I date trump every other aspect of my personality and life achievements. 
Temple Grandin: The world needs all kinds of minds - YouTube  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fn_9f5x0f1Q
Pope John Paul II was loved by everyone of all categories. Once he died things went a little downhill and now things are finally picking up with Pope Francis.  This makes me proud to call myself Catholic which is something I was contemplating giving up for a long time because of how the church was acting.
Priest told me I could fuck my girlfriend if I planned on marrying her. So I did. It was great.
yes, the country wholly responsible for helping legitimise modern-day Israel is anti-semitic.
Pics or it didn't happen.
From this, I think he's on the right track.
So what? Good for him. The only ones I need to acknowledge my "goodness" is me and the people I know.
Thank you for that last paragraph. It disturbs me that people are willing to lower the bar for what makes a decent human being just for the pope, when we wouldn't tolerate this kind of stuff from anyone else.
honey*
What the fuck? You are OK with police getting an order to shoot people on sight?
ITT: Racists.  Edit: And downvotes. Lots of downvotes.
I'm more thinking someone would pull out their concealed piece and put some lead into them.
That will never happen, Muslims seem to have integrated into Scottish society a lot better than a lot of other places, and see themselves as Scots also, rather than just Muslims.
Killers wanted a riot and the EDL are only happy to help speed it along from thier side. To people complaining, you can condemn all the acts of violence yesterday. 
We just wanted to promote equality and multiculturalism. Nothing to do with invasions. As to invade is to violate and attack.   England is the most liberal country in Europe. If people abuse that then what can you do?  
Jesus everythings a competition for some Americans.
&gt; with $36.5bn coming due next year only  Can someone explain this sentence to me. Does it have to all be paid during the next 12 months?
 That would reduce crime, and slash profits - and deadly violence -  at every level of the black market chain. What in heaven's name are they thinking?
And forestry, fishing, tourism, education, and research. Say thank you for the Wifi world.
I think the issue is saying "we're going to make recreational drugs legal so there's no black market" and them discussing all the restrictions were going to place on those recreational drugs.   That sorry of thing works to a point,  but only if jumping through your hoops is less of a hassle than breaking the law.  Make them too onerous,  and a new black market will spring up.     A good example is cigarettes - people will beat some degree of increased taxes,  but eventually if the government keeps raising them, people start buying on the black market,  from Indian reservations,  etc.    I'd just hate to see us go through the turmoil of  legalizing drug use, only to restrict it so much that we still are locking people up for breaking the rules. 
We're not Americans so we don't need to have a bit of metal to have balls of steel.
When was the last time a non islamist beheaded a muslim in broad daylight while conveying a message to the public of how they will never stop fighting you?  If anyone did that shit, there would be chaos! The muslim community would be demanded so many apologies you would lose track!  Don't spout your Islamaphobia shit, you are sounding as stupid as the Jews who cry about anti semitism anytime someone calls out Israel for their shit.  
This article makes you admire the US market, they have something, they want to figure out how to make money from it.  And they will.  In China this would be dumped and kill fish, but the americans will figure out how to make money.  Got to love them.  
That is because no news is good news. To the casual observer that does not strive to think about the infornation he receives he builds such an image as you described. The casual observer as you have described does not realize because he cannot see or in your case does not want to see that their are psychos in every community. And there is a reason for everything.   Also what kind of name is mohamedeans did u just leave an 1850 kkk convention ?
and the graffiti reads "he who kills a policeman goes to paradise".   What the fuck?!
Thank you for clarifying. I have no doubt that none of these initiatives will happen under the current government, but I'm sure many people scanning worldnews might think otherwise. 
Bail is a weird concept to me, isn't it basically buying your freedom until the trial. So if you are really poor you can't set bail, but rich people are free to get out until their trial? 
A-a-a-a-re explosive devices, regardless of what the law says, sheep.
Swedish kids are brats.  All I see is destruction in their wake half the time, it's not on the scale of the Riots in Stockholm but I have to deal with multiple thefts, arson, and vandalism on an annual basis and it isn't in areas where second generation immigrants are common.  When I go the south of Sweden I see schools smashed in with graffiti all over. It's really sad.  Most of the kids have one of those shitty two seater cars, motorcycle, quad bike, flat screen in their rooms, decent clothes etc Still destruction.
&gt;pat condell  lolno, that fucking xenophobe? You expect anyone to respect your opinion? No clearly you don't respect yourself enough.
And how many utterly random be-headings motivated by the teachings of a warlord who once invaded a city, beheaded all the males of sexual maturity, and then sold all the women and children into slavery.  I'm not even being rude. You can just say this things neutrally and be branded an Islamophobe.
It's actually a really fast slideshow. Biiiiig difference. I move to adjourn.
How does decriminalizing it reduce use? Is it natural selection where the druggies are overdosing and ridding society of the burden that they are, or are people saying, 'It's legal, so I don't want to do it anymore'?
That's a little bit too 4th Reich for me
wreaking sweden, one the best places ever... talk about looking a gift horse in the mouth.
It would be socially unacceptable for most "perfectly normal Korean women" to do that. People there are racist as shit. 
[deleted]
Yesterday he was showing stacks of frozen horsemeat and beef still in his warehouse. All perfectly seperated and labeled. Now the recall of his meat is impossible there is very little evidence against him. They will now try to prosecute him for bad book keeping. 
[deleted]
&gt; the repressed racism needs to get out  It might do more than that.   Let the economy get bad enough and Western Europe could be looking at being The Balkans 2.0.
[deleted]
As in there aren't enough anti-alcohol campaigns? 
No, please repeat your long story four times during your dying breath.
Stop feeding the trolls.
&gt;insane until proven guilty  and  &gt;Brevik had already been proven guilty but not sane.  Anyway murder is a strict liability crime in most countries. Intent does not need to be proven. I'm not that I'm not that informed on Norwegian law.  
Please see my edit - apologies if there's been a misunderstanding.
But the repoort also doesn't - it refers to other reports, and makes vague assertions. They say that it's hard to quantify, and then simply say "Totaled, it is safe to say that dollar losses from IP theft are hundreds of billions per year, which is at least in the range of total exports to Asia in 2012 (valued at $320 billion)."  For instance, the calculations assume that if China steals a blueprint that is worth $100b to Apple, since it's the blueprint to a new device, that the theft cost $100b - whether or not the blueprint contains enough detail to allow another company to manufacture the device or not, whether or not it would matter, since patents would prevent the company from actually stealing most of the revenue, and whether or not the device still makes $100b for Apple. This is all aside from the fact that the way it actually works is that 6 months after apple comes out with the device, many competitors internationally will have copied much of it - whether or not they pirate the IP! That's competition, and it doesn't require IP theft.  Do the Chinese infiltrate US networks? Yes. Do they download data that we try to keep secret? Yes. Does it cost the US money? Yes. Is the estimate used here worth considering? Yes. Is it useful when viewed as an approximation within an order of magnitude? Yes. Is it "correct"? No!
It seems you already checked your privilege! The Thundercunt Council is proud of you.
"the same amount if they actually raped somebody- since we all know lying is literally as bad, or worse, than actual rape"  Um absolutely it's just as bad.
Accusing someone of murder or possession of child porn are serious crimes 
Of course, but it's ridiculous to claim they deserve the exact same punishment as murderers or pedophiles.
 thats the mother of my children you're talking about!
You forgot to say "away".
Unless you're gay, then your still not a good person in his eyes.
Do you not see how society can in some ways try and eliminate rape and in others encourage it? It's not binary.
Yes, and its pretty great.
Good luck to him.  I hope this gets more coverage.
The horse slaughterhouses were just recertified in the U.S. It turned out to be even more cruel to ban slaughtering horses, since it meant the horses had to take a long harsh truck ride to Canada or Mexico.
If you are referring to the recent case of [Novartis vs Union of India](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Novartis_v._Union_of_India_%26_Others) regarding the cancer drug Glivec (Imatinib), then we are within our rights to ignore the flawed US IP laws. Our law does not allow evergreening of patents. The US patent on  the free base of imatinib was issued in 1996. India began allowing patents on products in 2005. So, Novartis applied for a patent for imatinib mesylate in beta crystalline form instead to regain a monopoly on the drug. But, the patent was rejected for trying to evergreen. The court was rejected the application on the ground that the drug is not a new substance but an amended version of a known compound and that Novartis was unable to show any significant increase in the efficacy of the drug.
yes i will watch that live ...
There was a debate?  And questions?   I was making a point, if you grew up in America (and likely other developed nations) you have been eating GM food for pretty much your entire life; and without any negative effects to your health.  Where did i say I was the definitive authority?  &gt; And the over 800 scientists, many, it seems, are directly involved in biology, medicine or health - they are all fear mongerers, right? I just want to get that straight.  No, the ones that aren't are just morons...  I don't know about you but I've spent a lot of time in bio departments, and there are a lot of idiots in the field.  For fucks sake the field is centered entirely around the theory of evolution (meaning everything in bio can be related in some way or another to the theory) and they still give bio degrees to people who say they "don't believe in evolution."
[deleted]
I bet you he even rips the tags off mattresses..
Why not both?
That's perfectly fine... and it's what any reasonable person would expect.  Sadly, people who subscribe to any ideology are very likely to take criticism of the beliefs and judgements in that ideology as personal insult.  Some beliefs and judgmeents can and should be reasonably discussed, some require rather vocal opposition (beliefs mandating violence/oppression/persecution), others deserve ridicule ('the earth is flat').  There are versions of religious beliefs that fall in the first category, there are those fall in the second category, and those that fall in the third.  Yes, what you consider worthy of discussion and what you consider worthy of derision is quite subjective, but not entirely. I've studied philosophy of religion for about 15 years now, and gotten an MPhil degree in philosophy, and I could make a pretty good case that any form of theism (deism less so), and especially many particular whole religious worldviews involve beliefs that are so arbitrary and contrary to everything we know that, like the belief that the universe was created 5 minutes ago or a belief in a flat earth, derision and mocking are not entirely unjustified.  That is not a personal attack, and it's not something I'm going to simply shove in anyone's face, but it's an honest, rational assessment.
Did I make myself a victim? No, I didn't? Really? Then why the fuck are you still talking to little old me?
Oh yeah, you aren't Asian to Americans if you don't have slanty eyes, yeah?   India, Pakistan, etc... are clearly not in Asia. The people are too brown.
What is it called when a group fixates on every event that is female wronging males and uses it to demonstrate that the world is unfair to them while ignoring the fact that male on female crimes outnumber the opposite a hundred to one?
What about anarcho-capitalism?  Is that left wing?  I personally think that the one dimensional left/right scale is bullshit.  There are a lot of ideologies that don't fit.  I think [Political Compass](http://www.politicalcompass.org/ireland2011) has a more accurate scale, with an additional axis for authoritarian/libertarian alignments, although I don't agree with their determinations of where certain people and parties actually reside on that scale.
I don't know man. I know several 2nd generation muslims and 90% of them doesn't let Islam interfere with their daily life or their interactions with other people. However. Of the people i know that are constantly up to no good, a great majority of them are muslims.
He's young and thinks like me. I'm so voting for him. Fuck you old farts. New times new rules.
Whatever, American Micro-brews have been decimating german beers in quality for well over a decade (in general) now.
ITT: the darker, generalizing, racist side of reddit.  Seriously, get your shit together. More than a billion people are muslim. You don't just throw 'em all on the same pile.   Edit:  Ok DISCRIMINATING instead of racist. "Woah that guy used a word wrongly, better correct the shit out of him to disprove his point."   It breaks my heart to see a post like "fuck islam!! religion of pedos and murderers." have 71 upvotes (by the way, the media's been filled with reports of tons of people being raped/violated by priests a couple of decades ago, to give a counter example). And to think these people are allowed to vote IRL. Do they watch the news and draw the same type of conclusions if they want to choose a new governing body?No wonder the world goes to shit.  Some of you guys are so hateful, almost as zealous/short fused as those radical muslims, the sole difference being that you don't use physical violence. All I'm doing is pleading to not generalize a large amount of people, which is almost imperative for anyone having the least bit of reason in them . I've experienced this multiple times in my life, where I choose my disposition towards certain people using very few criteria/experiences, and it's idiotic thing to do, because you can be very wrong. It's a dumb high school attitude.    You don't know these people, you don't know how each and every one of them practices their religion and how they present their beliefs to other non-believers, yet you believe it's justified to have *hatred* towards something that is a big part of their life. It's not that simple. Nothing is that simple. Not every republican wants to take away abortion, not every socialist is a Stalinist. You'd all make horrible, *horrible* statisticians if you look at the way you draw conclusions from limited information. Stop being naive and thinking you can classify &amp; judge people by a single aspect of their lives. It's not fair, it's not right and it does not contribute to the dialogue (I'm silly, this isn't a dialogue at all) in any way! 
&gt;worried that you'll have to treat people as equals?  We can treat them as equals when they aren't murdering soldiers in their own home countries.  &gt;Start shooting brown people. We're waiting.  Heard of this thing called the War on Terror?  That's where terrorist muslims get their entire extended families killed, and get abducted away to permanent torture camps.  A gun can dust off a few.  My weapon is the pen and is far deadlier.  
I apologize. I misread your post as sarcasm. The Ottomans themselves were an imperialist force, but it was different due to several factors. Once again, my apologies :)
Centuries? It's borders moved about all the time during the Napoleonic Wars, and the end of that was less than 200 years ago. 
Boy, gee golly gosh, why can't they be a member of the European Union?  
Oh come on, mostly the anti-Japanese remarks are made towards their government and revisionist elements in it. Most Koreans really like Japanese people. Throughout my years of education in the UK I saw Korean hanging out with Japanese very often. Only Asian animosities I saw was when Chinese students berated Taiwanese and called them rebels, but still that was an isolated incident. Luckily younger Asian generations get along with each other just fine. It's not as bad as it seems.
ooohhhh, i see what you're doing...and holy fucking shit, look at the upvotes you're getting with this rhetoric.  This is reddit..
No, that's in "the gang solves the gas crisis"...  Please try to keep up.
People this is great news, more need to do the same and come together
WTF, LIZZARD COP!!!  Look at the video on that page, skip to 0:25 look at him creping a look in at the top right of the shot!
It isn't a blatant lie.  Reinheitsgebot permits the use of wheat in beers as long as it is top-fermenting.  So ales like weizens are allowed to use wheat while lagers are not.
what an asshole
The whole western definitions of "atheism" and "believers" really don't fit with the Chinese culture.  In a sense, everyone in China is an atheist; no one in China really buys into the notion that there is a divine being looking out for them.  On the other hand, almost everyone in China is a believer; most people believe there is one way or another they could bargain with a supernatural entity for fortune.    Even western monotheistic religions in China took on a decidedly Chinese favor.  Take Christianity, for example: in many places, the local sects of Christianity has became indistinguishable from native superstitions.  Jesus Christ became just another supernatural bigwig that you worship so he casts favors on you; priests and preachers act more like local shamans and witchdoctors, dispensing vials of holy water like they are miracle remedies.  So this kind of poll really makes no sense.
Using China as a garbage dump and using slave labor as you so eloquently put it took China from being a backwater in the 1970s to being a powerhouse in the 00's. 
Your argument falls apart when you assume that OMouse has ever produced anything of value
Except there is no clip, only one bullet.
[deleted]
Yes, instead of putting them all in one place, spread them out everywhere, I live in Örebro and ofcourse we have sort of a ghetto here, a place where "they" live, some schools have 90% immigrants and some schools have 90% natives, it's the worst idea ever and because of that it is now "we" and "them" not "us"
The Liberator includes a metal bar to make it legal.
[deleted]
People report UFOs (as in *Unidentified Flying Objects*) all the time.  There's a lot of stuff in the air, and if it can't be identified it needs to be reported so that someone else can figure out what it was and if someone's up to mischief (flying where they shouldn't be, setting off weather ballooons etc).  It's only in popular culture that UFO = alien.
http://media.theage.com.au/news/national-news/homemade-guns-only-35-4299267.html
u wot m8? May I ask, how many practising muslims do you personally know?
&gt;morals  Comes from old books, I hear. An eye for an eye, and all that rot.
Sorry, I yawned after I read "white people". I love it when people use "White People" as an explanation or target for blame in a given situation, especially in the third world. I'll just leave this here:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Distribution_of_wealth#World_distribution_of_wealth
How about 30 years of stereotypes and fellow Australians playing up to them because they enjoy looking like Paul Hogan?  Yeah, that would do it.
He wasn't saying blacks commit more crime simply because they are black. He is just giving us statistics and making valid statements. 
Sounds rad. Any links to De exorcismis et supplicationibus quibusdam?
No you don't. That sentence is a dead giveaway you don't know "plenty of Malays."
Germany, Austria, Switzerland, Czech Republic, Greece, Spain, France, Poland, Estonia, Finland, Denmark....   
6\. Drone, obviously.
Next time you want to make a point for your propaganda religion feel free to do so, im sure they get their own breivik in uk too and for things that have been going down lately ill say go for it, Like it or not breivik has made his name down to history and more the shit like this goes down, the more people wonder "maybe he was rigth".
[deleted]
You are crazy. The shining path. Eta. The IRA.  The Lords Resistance Army. All Christian. The fact is that the vast majority of terrorism is carried out by separatists.
[deleted]
Get this superstitious bullshit off world news. Stories like this contribute nothing to this sub and you should feel bad.
It was called "duck tape" before it was called duct tape, the brand came after.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Duct_tape#History_and_etymology
This Pope is batshit. In a different ay to the previous ones.
Hm, quite interesting :)
[deleted]
A slide whistle. 
We can but dream
That's too kind.
Then you recall badly. Firstly, local administration being overthrown is not the same as the central government, otherwise the Civil War would count against the US. Secondly, by no stretch of the imagination could you get to dozens. Most British colonies were granted their independence without a war...
http://i.imgur.com/IXU12.png  Take a look at the graph.  It depends on the country, or if an immigrant, origin country.  I wouldn't say it is a majority---but I would say it is definitely a significant plurality.  It's not so hard to jump from a belief of harsh violent hacking of limbs as religious-punishment after a sharia court, to hacking of limbs of someone in the street due to your beliefs about the person or their people.  If they are willing to go that far to punish a mere thief--how far do you think they are willing to go to punish a politician who made a decision that affects millions?
[deleted]
Here's the real problem though, 'blowback' isn't  one way thing.  This action has already caused those people in the UK who now feel attacked by Muslims to lash out.  See how that works?  You could say 9/11 was because of US foreign policy, but the blowback of 9/11 is the resultant death of over a million muslims.  Didn't work out so well when you think about it that way eh?
&gt; Muslim leaders from around the world have taken part in an unprecedented trip to Germany and Poland to **take notes**  Probably a comment for r/imgoingtohellforthis, but I couldn't help myself.
I don't know man. Maybe not riots...but the blacks have taken this whole case **way** too seriously/ personally. All I'm saying is watch your back when he gets out.
You are mixing up history. This riot is in Sweden, so continental European history is not directly transferable to your argument. Gothic, Viking and later the Swedish kingdom had good relations with the arabic world in the form of trade. Karl XII even lived in modern day Turkey while trying to build an alliance against the Russians. Just by reading your comments in this thread, it's obvious you are terribly biased against Arabic people. There is no purpose in making races into villains.
Can you really not imagine any reason for rioting beyond economics?
Stop sleeping at Holiday Inns.
[deleted]
TSA now invading Pakistan and England.
But if they only represent 0.0000001% it shouldn't be hard to outnumber them vastly.
[deleted]
How do you determine which country they belong to? Do you think that once they have a British citizenship, Britain is "their" country?  Because I have a Swedish citizenship even though I've only lived in Sweden for one year. I also don't speak Swedish and I don't consider Sweden "my" country.   The guy in the video of the beheading also said "In our country thing like this happen every day." It seems like he himself doesn't feel a connection to Britain, even though he was born there.   But I digress... How do *you* determine which country a person belongs to?   
[deleted]
As someone who lives in Canada, marijuana isn't treated very seriously here.  Go to B.C. and most cops will turn a blind eye if they see you smoking it.  Most other provinces will give you a slap on the wrist.  Almost nowhere will you get a serious penalty if you are caught with it for personal use. While two states have legalized marijuana, it is still legal federally and you could still see the FBI rolling through town shutting down state legalized growers, distributors, and personal users. Medical marijuana is completely legal here.  My understanding is that it is legalized on a state by state basis while still being illegal federally in the U.S.  I remember seeing medical marijuana dispensaries being raided in California.  That does not happen here.  Nor do we have cops going undercover in high schools throwing kids in jail for having medical marijuana.  
&gt; 'middle east' pretty much covers anything ending in 'istan'.  There is no country in the Middle East with a name ending in "istan".  &gt; for the purpose of the comment, Pakistan is generally a middle-eastern country.  That makes about as much sense as saying "for the purpose of this comment, the sun rises in the west." Basically you're invalidating your own comment. Even if it's a common misconception ("for the purpose of this comment, the earth is flat") that doesn't make any more sense.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Because it is a hugely defining moment, and 70 years ago isn't that long ago... the entire older generation of my family has the concentration camp tattoos still on their arms. 
I actually said YEAH out loud.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Tell yourself what you want to think, since it doesn't make a difference? I mean, of course you want to believe I have no friends and that I'm some kind of loser. It would make you feel better if you thought it were true. :(
So I got 141....high score means "good" right?
muh sixtrillion
...right, that's my point. After 9/11, we were more afraid of terrorism than we were concerned with rights so we just ignored it.  This will welcome **new** ways to take away our privacy. 
it never did and who ever told you that was fucking with you.
&gt;In that case you can just go and murder soldiers and justify it because they are 'combatants'.  You're finally catching on. This is how US "foreign policy" operates.  &gt;There are reasons to be in Afghanistan which you might no agree with but they are not just to murder for the pleasure of it.  AQ had reasons for 9/11 which you may not agree with (I don't).  The *really* big lie here is that any soldier has no choice but to kill.  I'm not siding with these killers. I am saying that the British state is just as bad.
Not right now it isn't.
Unless something big happens, it won't change. By the time something big happens it will already be too late.
No.   Just easier to read at a glance. 
[deleted]
It just seems like that because there is a disproportionate amount of wrong 
Those breweries only have the names of the monasteries but have nothing in common with what they have originated from.   Augustiner is pretty good though. They have not yet sold their souls to one of the big corporations like Franziskaner did for example. 
assimilate to society?  apparently step one requires being white and having a Swedish name. many studies have shown heavily ingrained racism when applying for jobs etc etc.  i'll admit that the Muslims are hurting their cause if YOU admit that there are underlying systemic problems with how Sweden handles immigrants.
Nice link.  Thank you.  And I must say the article points out the Illinois Department of Agriculture does have what I believe are Redditor-approved tactics in dealing with pests:   &gt;The notice stated that yes, Ingram’s apiary was infected with foulbrood, and that treatment by burning is ordered in accordance with Sec. 60.50(b) of the Bees and Apiaries Act.
Both of your points are very true, but in the US (where the case of these missing bees took place) CPS is notoriously lax and toothless.
Hi!  I'm here, this hasn't actually happened today, instead happening yesterday evening (NZ time).  There has not been another 8.3 event.  Stay Safe! :)
Protip: everything he says in highly-upvoted threads is reasonable.  Read his full record.
Our problem is corruption. Honestly. And general idiocy.
True, and Sweden has extremely generous programs for immigrants. The government will pay 80 % of the salary for any company which hires a newly arrived immigrant.
Lol no offense taken. It's only a minor inconvenience at most.
"Do you believe people so violently opposed to the status quo wouldn't spend every hour of their lives in prison thinking of ways to fuck shit up?"  If they are batman villains then yes I would believe this.   
Kafir is more commonly used as a derogatory term towards non-Muslims.  There is support for the etymology of the word 'kafir' from the Arab slave trade in Africa.  'By the 15th century, the word Kaffir was used by Muslims in Africa to refer to the non-Muslim African natives. Many of those kufari were enslaved and sold by their Muslims captors to European and Asian merchants, mainly from Portugal, who by that time had established trading outposts along the coast of West Africa. These European traders adopted that Arabic word and its derivatives'
how do herbicide and insect resistant crops save lives? considering those are the only GM crops grown anywhere. Cut the rhetoric bullshit. I'm pro GMO but the rhetoric HAS to stop.
Well in the case you mention, I think the second shot would be the determining factor. One shotgun blast at point blank is plenty to disable *any* attacker, a second is not required and shows a motive of malice rather than defense.
from pm to dishwasher
Randy Allen is a real estate and community infrastructure developer in Charlotte, North Carolina. He got into real estate, right after attending the University of North Carolina at Charlotte, UNCC. He gained a solid liberal arts educational foundation for his work. Like many UNCC students, Randy Allen has enjoyed great success in business, and reflects fondly on his time at UNCC. Randy Allen would recommend the University of North Carolina at Charlotte to most young undergrads.
* The ideas of enlightenment, freedom, rationalism, empiricism, science, and other intellectual movements are simply better then this bronze age ideology.   * The problem is in western rational ideology we do not force or prevent people from doing what they want, nor should we..  * What we need to do is simply show these people that out way of life is superior by example.   * This is a war of ideas, it is time we start showing why ours are better. 
Free-range.
&gt;[CHICAGO -Three teenagers accused of raping a 12-year-old girl at gunpoint](http://www.cbsnews.com/8301-504083_162-57585326-504083/three-chicago-teens-accused-of-raping-a-12-year-old-girl-and-putting-the-video-on-facebook-charged-as-adults/)  This is conclusive, undeniable and unequivocal proof that all guns sold everywhere to anyone in history ever is the cause of multiple rapes ever anywhere always infinity to oblivion.
Agent Orange which was meant as a defoliator not a herbicide, Lasso is linked to ["number of neurological problems, including memory loss, stammering and headaches"] (http://rt.com/news/monsanto-french-farmer-health-239/) in at least one farmer, likely many more, and their current Roundup that [could lead to Parkinson's, cancer, infertility, and various other health problems] (http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/04/25/roundup-herbicide-health-issues-disease_n_3156575.html).  
Seeing as I'm not an industrial titan or frontier governor, I'm not sure why I ought to consider people mainly for their labor potential. I don't really see the problem here - as the economy has slowed, so has immigration from some of the main areas people are worried about (speaking for the US here).  &gt;Not only that but the country back in the 1800's was truly a melting pot.  I don't know what this means. "Melting pot" in my experience is mostly used as propaganda and rarely a particularly accurate or precise description of society. Again, immigration always brings these sorts of issues. That's why it should be obvious to anyone with the barest sense of history that a sentence like "The Irish and Italians didn't riot" is absurd, before even having to look it up.  I'm a second generation American. My grandmother forbade Italian in the house, so my dad never learned it, of course. He always regretted that she felt like she had to do that. So do I. I don't think that's a choice we should force people into making. The Swedish commenter above who said he "didn't know any racists" is deluded or extremely sheltered. When it comes to issues of integration, the things you're saying are *exactly* analogous to complaints about immigrants to any other nation anywhere. To act like integration is the wholly responsibility of the immigrating group rather than the country emigrated to is just another way to show your ignorance of history.
A molecule isn't an organism.
How is retaliation = justice, and how can you be so sure that every " civilized person would call it, justice" ?
Shit, I want the ability to take trips cheaper/better than flying.  I would welcome a car to drive me to Florida so I could spend the 18 hours in the car doing something else.  I would go visit a lot of friends more across state if I didn't have to worry about driving on the interstate for 3 hours and being bored out of my mind.  I could just pop in Return of the King and when it's over, I will have arrived at my destination.
&gt; I'm hung  ---  &gt; I'm .. starving .. to .. fuck you guys
It's all about statistics, my friend. Statistics and motivation.  
You might want to get checked out - your finger kinda got stuck there and that's not a good sign, especially since you later submitted the comment without correcting the mistake, like you were confused.  You might have just had a mini-stroke.
It's a tiny suburb with 11 000 people that already had a bad reputation and barely any businesses to begin with (they've already moved away little by little since the 70s when most of the area was built), so it's not really going to change much.
What most of us are missing is that underneath there is an international well-funded Islamist movement that is only gaining traction among those *exluded* from society, and specially abroad among liberals in Europe and US.  There is a clear agenda, and it finds fertile ground among the already self-excluded minorities, that in search for a *meaning* are willing to kill, destroy, and self-sacrifice.
100% of them will stop if you shoot them in the head.
Religion of the left?   As an American I can assure you that the most fervent anti-GMO activists come from the radical left, and also somewhat from the decentralist right. If anything, fear of GMOs is the left's answer to the global warming skepticism on the right.   
This whole event reminds me of this- http://www.cracked.com/blog/5-sci-fi-dystopias-weve-actually-created-for-animals/
Fuck Islam.
Or you cannot.
[deleted]
No, this is important. We have to know iluvucorgi's view of casual racism.
It's not racist to condemn a person who stabs another person in the neck, you fucking moron. Stop pretending you're oppressed. 
You just made a lot of Swedish Neo-Nazis very sad. 
Without any proof.  Seriously, I can't believe that this bullshit of 'the media are doing it' is even taken as credible.  Prove it.
... So Google can sell  more advertising.  You know that saying, where  if something is free that means *you* are the product?  Google is going to Africa to get more "product".  It's a good business move though, it is much cheaper than shipping them all over here like we used to.
Reverse those things and in the southern US you'd have schools and highways named after you.
Fuck off, christfag.
Yeah, because violent destruction of property is okay and not savage as long as, God forbid, PEOPLE are around, right?
And they're hated, essentially universally. 
There was a lunatic radical islamist who killed/ injured a couple cops/ soldiers last spring (hit and run on moped in Toulouse?). I don't really have the time to find a sources, but I did write a paper at the time. The french took him down after locating his hideout.
When Islam is primarily a religion of people of color and people characterize it as a "barbaric culture," you better bet your ass that is racist as it gets this side of colonialism.
Odd, didn't have any problems viewing it when I opened it. Must be the area you're in.
Everyone knows exactly where this is going.
Thank you for speaking out. The hatred being spread here is sickening.
Dead dove, do not eat.
I wonder if this has any connection to the muslim extremist display, where a man was beheaded in London.
Well then it's right up this subs ally! 
'Milk it' would be a more apt analogy.  Unless things in America have deteriorated beyond my realization.
Interesting. Can I have some sources that I can read up on so that I can educate myself about this party? 
It's not what I want it to mean at all mate, just what I read.  "Racism and racial discrimination are often used to describe discrimination on an ethnic or cultural basis, independent of whether these differences are described as racial."  Not a very pleasant person are ya?
Those are two groups, they don't need to be equivalent.  It could be christians vs kilt-wearers. It could be football fans vs vegetarians. Diet coke drinkers vs PETA activists.  Don't go fishing just to bring your own agenda, worthwhile or otherwise to the front. It's not always a meaningful tangent.
We can say we killed anything we made up.
I don't see anything wrong with criticizing black muslims for being barbaric.
Here's a tough lesson for tough people.  Everybody deserves understanding. Everybody deserves to have their perspective known. Regardless of the badness of the act, you should want to know why he did it. We should want to know why he has this sickness that drove him to hatred and violence, so we can stop other people from doing the same thing.  Honestly, what am I supposed to do? Ignore that? That's a terrible way of thinking, in my opinion. And frankly, I don't think you have a complete enough understanding *or* perspective of what Islam is to be making a statement like it's entirely "barbaric and intolerant" - I very very much doubt that, and I think that if you had a question regarding the seemingly barbaracy or intolerancy of islam, you should try to seek the perspective of someone who knows better of islam than you -- you absolutely should not say that they do not deserve your understanding, because your lack of understanding is causing you to hate them. In truth, if we have a question to ask of islam's involvement in the growing tense relationships between whites and arabs in europe, we should be going to /r/Islam, because I'm not arrogant enough to assume that I know more about Islam than they do. This is a lesson I learned from a christian, who learned from jesus. heh.
If you pretend a problem doesn't exist it goes away.
Its not a fully supported argument, he does not cite sources or list references.   However, you also have to cede that he would be rather qualified to make *some* sweeping statements. He was the Prime Minster of England and the architect of the downfall of the Third Reich. In terms of world politics of his time, you'd be very hard pressed to find a more persuasive expert. 
You were saying it was a clever strategy.
I don't see how that's ridiculous. You enacted to be tough on crime. So you think treating immigrants like second class citizens, punishing family members for crimes that someone committed, and harsh punishments for the sake of SECURITY. You're the one that is ridiculous 
Look at the majority of the/top comments here. The "fundamentalist" distinction got lost rather quickly and there are *many* people suggesting that non-fundamentalists are acceptable collateral damage.  That's what I was speaking to.
Wow cool you opened my eyes man, you're so cool and clever did you write that yourself? Wow racists are so smart I'm going to be one too.
I'm not. It's a fact. Do your research.
So...the extremist muslims are upholding the oldest european traditions of kicking out the neighbours and racism? ^^^I'm ^^^sorry ^^^&gt;_&gt;
Deport them all back, this is a daily occurrence. 
That's a good point. It doesn't excuse Islam extremism but we can also see this in ourselves in our culture of military worship. We say they're defending us, that they're fighting for our country, and that we should be thankful for their service, even those who don't think that they support anything listed in your post.
[deleted]
They make up the difference with  goats
my girlfriend was born in colombia, then got adopted to sweden... :P  She's beatiful, definitely, but in sweden that's pretty normal. :P
Ugh, "The Muslims" all killed the guy at once? "The British" are all racist and attacking and killing brown people? Isn't overgeneralizing what led to these hate crimes in the first place?
[deleted]
[deleted]
'I will gag the ~~hate~~ clerics'  ...that might actually make some change
Thats rubbish. Ever been to Southall in London? How many white people do you see there, or parts or Leicester. How does that mean they're better integrated? Or is your sense of who is and isn't better intergrated derived from what you read in the Daily Mail or the Star?
OK, I guess I must just mix with the low life then :)
I would even go as far to say Western culture is the dominant culture of the world. They have Christmas in China now (a Christian holiday in a mostly non religious country!) and the current generation is consuming a lot of Hollywood blockbusters/western pop. I'm sure the situation is similar in Japan, Korea, Mexico etc because western musicians have enough fans there to go on tour. 
Oh, sorry, I thought you were just pissed at the recent events.  I now realise that fuck yous are in order.  Fuck You.  Racism has been and gone in this world.  It doesn't stand up to scientific scrutiny.
[deleted]
At least the non religious can make up their own minds who to vote for.  Even if they are morons.
[deleted]
Thank you for sharing your insight and wisdom, I plan to take on board what you have said and use it to learn and grow and really develop as a person.
&gt;People are apparently using the phrase 'religion of peace' unironically these days.  Like where? The only way I've seen it used is as a means to kick off an Islamophobic circlejerk.
Hey man, that seems kinda cold. The article is about an Israeli who murdered Palestinians, and your first reaction is to say that Israel is better than Palestine?
Font size of 1000% made me laugh a little harder!
Does this world involve laws that ban violence on women and children, forced marriages and rape?  They won't have it.
You missed a "not" 
Listing countries with percentage population numbers isn't proving anything. It's intellectually lazy. It would be like me looking at [the list of the world's most violent cities](http://translate.google.com/translate?sl=auto&amp;tl=en&amp;js=n&amp;prev=_t&amp;hl=en&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;layout=2&amp;eotf=1&amp;u=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.seguridadjusticiaypaz.org.mx%2Fsala-de-prensa%2F541-san-pedro-sula-la-ciudad-mas-violenta-del-mundo-juarez-la-segunda), noticing that most of the cities are in heavily Catholic countries, and concluding that Catholic faith is the cause of all this violence. The rational thing to do is say no that's ridiculous, what other factors am I overlooking that could contribute to all this violence, and you arrive at factors like the drug trade, poverty, and a weak/corrupt public security apparatus. You really do have to correct for all the usual suspects when doing a quantitative study in social science if you want to be taken seriously, and the two biggest usual suspects are income and education. If the OP wanted to prove his thesis it would take a ton of work with a ton of survey data and a ton of parsing. 
I'm pretty sure that it would have been contained by No. 10 by now if it was unverified. And I'm unsure that the Daily Mail would go so far to actively fabricate an entire task force when it would be so easy to dispute.
I don't think you realise how proof works.   You actually need it to relate in someway to what you are trying to prove.   Shall we use the quaran as proof that god wants sharia law?  I'm assuming your blunt unwillingness to provide 'actual' proof means that you have no real reference to where someone has been prosecuted for talking bad about a religion
I don't think that is helping your cause much. Your sacred prophet is acknowledging that bloodying oneself in the name of religion is kind of a thing in the culture. Kind of the thing everyone hates about it.   It is like saying in the west, "don't worry kid, the world needs ditch diggers too" (to any scholastic failure) but it sounds like "don't worry kid, we need martyrs too!" which is insane.
Woah, Brits are batshit insane for allowing this.
It could have been a foiled alien abduction for all we know 
7 July 2005 Bombings. [Mohammad Sidique Khan](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mohammad_Sidique_Khan), [Shezad Tanweer](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shehzad_Tanweer), [Germaine Lindsay](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Germaine_Lindsay), [Hasib Hussain](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hasib_Hussain),  2007 Glasgow Airport attack [Bilal Abdullah](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bilal_Abdullah)  2008 Exeter bombing [Nicky Reilly](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/22_May_2008_Exeter_bombing)  2013 Woolwich attack.  Michael Olumide Adebolajo,  Michael Oluwatobi Adebowale  All of the above are British and succeeded. The 2008 Exeter bombing resulted in only one injury - the perpetrator.  The 2007 letter bombs were carried out by a non-Muslim.   
&gt;There would be nothing better for your entire "peaceful" religion to fall by the wayside so that humanity can actually progress.  You sound just as hateful as the extremists.
I think some people have been watching too many movies. It's like, UYBKU URAS YBBQYF AESD genetic modification, if I eat this i'm going to mutate and shit. That's what I hear when people are against GM crops. Just uneducated, ignorant people ruining things for the rest of us.
dont worry guys 'dailymail.co.uk' means that most of it is bollocks
It's funny the amount of arrogance it must have taken for you to write this comment.
Because people have a right to live or die as they choose, and can make a rational choice for themselves what level of discomfort they can deal with to continue living.  Its not for bureaucrats, lobbyists, religious figures, or anyone else to decide.
Islam is not a race.
Well my dad had aHUS but it went into remission.  He is very lucky. He was on Medicaid when he got sick and was originally prescribed Ciclosporin.  I'm not sure what's he's on now.  But he wasn't on Medicaid for too long after that when he found a better job than being a house painter.
&gt;What do you think will happen if Germany would elect another fascist chancellor and that dude would put people in jail for not taking his shit?  Probably about the same thing that happened last time, providing they've been whipped into a frenzy over some troublesome minority group. But hey, it's not like anti-muslim sentiment is on the rise across Europe the way antisemitism was.  I'm sure it could never happen again. Certainly not here, right?
Agree for most parts, but some of the things you say are circumlocutions. Assad is not just "one guy": the leaders poised to replace him are quite bad. Libya and Egypt are already struggling (to take a post-revolution example.)  Also, the "it's all political" line at the end makes it look like you are trying to evade/pre-empt the underlying cause of growing fundamentalism. If you simply removed the need for middle eastern states to conform to the shariah, you will see improvement by leaps and bounds. Outside of religious constraints, I believe, everyone is a good human being. So, no, politics here is affected by religion, not vice versa.
Ok let's take like this like the Simple English Wikipedia. The post you are highlighting is not sincere. The subsequent posts telling faggots what they are (promiscuous culture-destroying disease-vectors) is actually how I feel ('realtalk').
Weird. I was always under the impression that France was very non-religious, and that the people who practice aren't as...extreme I guess.
No, Hafez Al assad made sure that Hezbollah are what they are today. He provided weapons and training for them and as such is the reason as to why they operate as they do. Hezbollah has their own agenda but are closely allied to the Syrian government and would at points be used as proxies. 
I'm a British guy that's lived in the USA and Africa. You are wrong. Pull your head out of your ass and take a look at the world before you waste your existence with moronic, prejudiced beliefs.
The precentage numbers of muslims in those country's are really small 1-3% Swe Uk ect but people tend to focus on the area where they settle a wast majority of those are moderate to [This kind of liberal muslims like in Bosnia] (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NucWYjkf_kc), but its the wahabis who are well financed and the loudest among those who where sent to spread wahabism and hatred they are those who are trying to enforce sharia law's (Bosnia Albania Turkey are country with a wast majoirty of muslims but no sharia but with few wahabis trying to enforce it, in turkey everything related to sharia and wahabism is banned), the UK knows that the Wahabi's are extremist's but they have to integrate few just to please the Oil masters Saudi and Qatar, whom'd you rather have around you ? those people on the video or wahabis just google images Wahabi, also The SAUDI Wahabis are US biggest allied side to side with Israel, all thanks to the oil so tell me whos fault is it but its the way the US runs the guy with the most cash runs the show. Here is another video to show you difference between Muslim and Wahabi the SWAT officers in this video are Muslim the wounded police officer is a Muslim the guy shoot at the US embassy is a WAHABI Video Here: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FWqeh7s4wLs i feel honestly embaresed by having to show you this because our special forces did not make it in 10-15 minutes to the embasy but i just want to make a point i hope you get me.
Bullshit. No-one is gonna give you the credit in the first place.
Unless it's the FARC  http://pazfarc-ep.blogspot.ca/
Plus, is the government really that dumb that they think that terrorists communicate over facebook, other social media, unencrypted emails and use their real ip address?
&gt;I was voicing a philosophical disagreement with worrying about the human rights of someone like this.  How is that not exactly what I was doing?
[deleted]
You're evil...
&gt;which doesn't necessarily entail violence  Lol, you fucking moron. You didn't even read the article before linking it.
The daily circle jerk is to demonize anyone wanting fresh food.  McDonalds get plenty of criticism; and there is no crazy backlash that you see with the Monsanto crowd.  If you're so disinterested in Monsanto, why are you posting all of these pro-Monsanto disinfo?  Also, seems like you some kind of govt shill, which is backing Monsanto.
Apart from intellectual curiosity, would it matter?
[deleted]
Sorry for your condition. Trust me, we don't wish. 60% of the population want the joke of Obamacare repelled. Every situation is different but nothing too complex that the private market, with oversight, can't figure out.  We are all preparing for the worst as no one knows how high taxes will be going.Good luck to you.
what did he said?
Why should any that is not a muslim have to follow sharia?  Frankly I think combining law and religion is extremely dangerous.  Frankly treating women and men differently under the law is disgraceful. 
Look at some of the researchers, their opinion seem far more reliable than random info from popsci magazines who makes money by advertizing. 
If this isn't sarcasm, then it's extremely clear from this why england is fucked.
why?
That's just it, the organization I'm with helps me fulfill goals to help others, I've never been undermined by it.
Even the most abhorrent racist Nazis have the right to protest.  We have the right to condemn it, and should exercise that right.
Zionist detected
If the vatican says this everyone knows how to take it - relaxed. and not a bit afraid at all.  if some muslim would say the same. i.e. "british soldier will burn in hell" many will turn into some highly unreleaxed islamophobic idiots.
Please remove the KKK mask from your butt while talking, kind sir.
[deleted]
The Reach will will help us with our food shortage..  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=N5R4MNsbUoI
Sky cake only tastes good if only people like me get to eat it!
I won't be going to heaven... Besides I,  like you, believe in neither. But *if* we went to hell, I don't think there'd be time to strike up conversation with anyone, or do anything but regret,  between all the supposed suffering :) 
Up vote every post of yours I find for name :)
[deleted]
why should we mark your words you sound like a hysterical, blathering idiot.
Since you missed it:  &gt; **There are plenty of non-violent shitholes**
If I was a parent who had just lost a child because of this and someone told me to "just get over it", holy shit, I would lose my fucking mind. These people shouldn't be allowed to reproduce.
[deleted]
Something about not buying the cow when you can get the milk for free. 
Fuck, Shimon Peres. He's been in office for like fifty years and to what end, to what fucking end? He's as useless as Nutty-yahu.
It depends on the context. I believe in them when watching Peter Pan.
I think they were suggesting the consumers in asia, not the poachers themselves, will die.  Personally I think it should be lethal if that will help, but that's how I understood JediExile's comment.
Certain rebels have committed many abuses but reports from human rights groups are clear, the assad forces are the main cause of distress in the region.  Hopefully such forces will be overthrown.
and if you leave loopholes, which you will with our lobbying, we will find them, and exploit the heck out of them, democratically of course...
All of these quotes assert the adherence to societal norms for the sake of stability. They do not endorse slavery.  lrn2context pls.
What a dick.
You cant gag someone now we have the internet, see the '[Streisand Effect](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Streisand_effect)'
[deleted]
The 4th World? You mean Mars?
I'm guessing Central Business District.
First world is a pretty obsolete term. It's not really used anymore by people who know what they're talking about (eg development economists, international affairs experts, etc).
Even the so-called "mainstream" schools who believe in the existence of God, do not place God at the highest position (the order goes: *Mata*-*Pita*-*Guru*-*Devam* i.e. First Mother, then Father, then Teacher and then God). Also the concept of "worship me and me alone" is pretty much absent in Hinduism (The Bhagavad Gita IX.23 says: "Even those who in faith worship other gods, because of their love they worship me").  To elaborate a bit on the religious aspect, Hinduism accepts that one may take different paths to achieving one-ness with the ultimate truth. Worship/love/devotion (*bakti*) is only one of them. Other most commonly accepted paths include the path of right action (*karma*) and the path of knowledge (*jnana*).  Hindusim is also not an organised religion - it does not have a founder, it does not have a supreme authority, it does not have one single source - it does not take a uniform view on God or on the methods of worship and several schools do not place restrictions, or a defined path and instead lets the follower seek and discover answers and his own path to achieving one-ness with the ultimate truth.  The restriction regarding prohibition on non-vegetarian food (particularly beef) arises from the concept of ahimsa (non-violence) - it is not uniformly followed across all Hindu communities. Different communities have different practices and interpretations. My community has historically always eaten non-vegetarian food (including beef).  EDIT: typo
Ding Ding! We have a winner
Fuck you. 
Except it should be a citizens right to insult the religion or its followers however they wish, so long as it doesn't follow to threats or personal attacks.  Or at least that would be the case in a country with free speech laws.
[deleted]
Well, they are russian. 
[**Definition of murder**](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Murder) &gt;Murder is the unlawful killing, with **malice aforethought**, of another human, and generally this premeditated state of mind distinguishes murder from other forms of unlawful homicide (such as manslaughter)  Under [**Exclusions**](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Murder#Exclusions) of the label of murder:  &gt;Capital punishment ordered by a legitimate court of law as the result of a conviction in a criminal trial with due process for a serious crime.  Sorry, but you are wrong  as capital punishment does not fit the definition of murder, i.e., it is not murder.   And this man is not even being locked up. He is not facing any consequences **at all**.
Funnily enough, the temples at Luxor / Karnak (I can't remember which) has a massive wall of writing which is actually an enemies list made up by one of the kings. 
I looked at the report, and did not find a single example of a farmer being sued because stuff blew into their fields.  The document simply documents farmers who have been sued.  Of course Monsanto sues farmers that purposefully steal their crop.  Try giving me even a single example of an innocent farmer being sued just because seeds blew into his fields.
Why are "prison" and "jail" used interchangeably here?
Please, read up on what [the Vienna Declaration has to say about this.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vienna_Declaration_and_Programme_of_Action#Against_Racism.2C_Xenophobia_and_Intolerance)  Just because the USA blindly defends unconditional free speech doesn't mean that the whole world must function this way.
You said:  &gt;I don't have a problem with this. I don't see how me being racist to someone on Facebook should be treated any differently from being racist to someone's face. At the end of the day you are putting the same illegal and disgusting message across to the same person/people. Perhaps I am missing something?  It's not at all a separate discussion. If I say that I want all "gooberjangas" to die, it makes sense to ask me what the hell a gooberjanga is in the first place. Deflecting criticism by saying that it's a separate argument is just silly. It simply isn't. Saying that 'racism' is "illegal and disgusting" (your exact words), but then stubbornly refusing to define or even acknowledge ambiguity about what racism is, that's completely dishonest argumentation.
good job whoever do it
Send em all to Alaska to be housed in an outdoor prison. 
You're right, it's so much better for everyone now.
Doubtful, when so many have fought so long and so hard for the right. And gay people will continue to be born as well, therefore opening marriage up so future generations can marry can only be a good thing (both morally and economically).
&gt;No, actually I really don't know that much about the 1980's China and Tibet.  How do you judge that Israel isn't really that bad and is being mistreated by the world if you don't know stuff like that?
how many 400lb crackheads do you know?
Random, but they have these ceremonies in Iran where charitable people pay off the cheques of people who are languishing in debtors prison (sometimes because they've been condemned to pay bloodmoney for an accident). Don't know about you, but sure as hell beats having your name on a park-bench.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nPZed8af9RI
We don't need twats like you in the UK, can you leave please?
....I smell butthurt!
She's one person.
Has the government blamed the opposition or the US yet?
Yup - Italians don't queue.
Except crime emanating from high concentrations of Muslim immigrants around the world, Australia, UK, France - everywhere is absolutely out of control and stretching resources beyond breaking point.  Australian secret services known as ASIO and ASIS have gone public several times in the last year about how dangerously out of control the situation has become with Jihadists in Australia flying out and returning back after having engaged in war all over the middle east - its so, so fucked.  On top of this is the wave of organised crime - Muslims have taken over the bikie gangs, are running the heroin trade and imposing themselves on every single area of violent militant area of society - and our secret services, federal police are so exasperated they are finally speaking out about it publicly and asking for a halt in the levels of immigration to stem the tidal wave of crime and violence = but of course our federal agencies are all NeoNazis arent they ??!!   You're so full of shit. 
There are queues in a lot of places, but people just don't follow strict queuing rules and pushing and shoving is considered acceptable.  Especially in those lines where there's the temporary cloth rail things making you zigzag, people will shove their way past you.    I remember I was in one of those once and this old lady was dragging her grandson through the thing.  She got to my dad and I and we stood side by side with our hands on hips and elbows out effectively blocking her.  When we got to the trolley thing that we were waiting for, I was about to sit down next to my sister on a small two person bench when she scurries past me and sits in the seat, then dragged her grandson into the seat with her, squashing my sister against the wall.  So for the whole scenic ride, I stood in front of her and casually put my rather large purse a few inches from her face so she couldn't see a fucking thing.
Actually you raise an interesting point.  I certainly don't like people calling for violence, though I have undoubtedly done it in personal conversation in rasher moments, but I wonder what evidence there is that allowing this sort of talk on either side increases the likelihood of actual violence occurring and that its banning decreases it.  IMO, you can't ban it to impose civil dialogue, there has to be a physical danger that is prevented.
Are you ok buddy? I'd like to hear the rest of your statement. 
I doubt there are even half that many prisons in the world.
Why is this the top comment?  You're comparing two outliers - India's terrible justice system to America's slightly-less-terrible-but-still-terrible justice system... completely useless comparison. Maybe compare US to another country with a more functional justice system, or india to the same country, then you would have useful data.  Oh, and it's a UK publication, so why would the US be mentioned at all?
Who just defecates in the street...
Just got back from HK. My friend who lives there said a mainlander did a poo in the middle of a hotel lobby/foyer somewhere. Ew!!
That's how they grew up to be, so it's not embarrassing for them and it's pretty much normal.
You should stay out of Detroit.
[First it was libraries, now this...](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FNuyDZevKrU)
There are *a lot* of culturally ignorant people worldwide. 
So their logic is that by shitting on the ground in public they are actually fertilizing the earth for growing crops?
&gt;  When is the last time you saw Christians setting off 13 car bombs...?  Why insist on car bombs?   [How about Christians hauling off 8000 men and boys and shooting them in 1998?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Srebrenica_massacre)  [How about 500,000 to 1,000,000 mostly-Christian Tutsis getting macheted to death by mostly Christian Hutus?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rwandan_Genocide)?  &gt;  Let's keep it modern.  Why? How modern?  How about "15 minutes ago" so that the car bombings don't count? Why do you get to set arbitrary rules, to get the outcome you want?
Im Chinese and Im travelling in China right now and completely right, its shit. I hear people spitting as I eat in a restaurant. Many of them are a selfish bunch...
this fact is going to be downvoted by every isreali on reddit. plus every JIDF member.  plus every american born isreal firster.    bet on it.
Fair enough. I haven't seen it in the west or north though.
You may be insulted by it but in America we pay for both Goods and Services. If someone has been a service to you, they get payed directly. 
'Red Indian' is an incorrect term; it is definitely a term that would offend. Using 'Indian', however, might confuse the listener but he will not think you a racist, only someone uneducated.  
oh i meant with regards to the peoples' manners. i don't know enough about the current state of governance in hk to judge.  honestly though, i vacationed in china and hk last year, and i have to say i wasn't terribly impressed with hk. i found hkers prone to yelling while the people from the mainland were much more friendly. sure there was spitting on the streets but the people were infinitely more helpful when i got lost, and the immigration officers smile and ask you how you're doing instead of shouting at you for no reason. in 40 years, i would hate for the mainland to acquire manners and lose the intentions behind those manners.  i dunno, maybe i'm just more lenient towards china because it's still developing whereas with hk, i'm comparing it to what i'm used to in the US
Because "Chinese" is not one person, it is billions of people in different places, with different minds.
They do this weird bird squat thing when they shit and it apparently it makes less of a mess.
For kids, yes. They don't use diapers, they have pants with holes in them so the kids can just shit on the street. It's entirely normal. I'd pretend to be outraged but I'd just come from India where adults shit in the street so it was an improvement to only have the kids doing it. 
In Richmond I got to the point where I scolded people.   It was always old people. Cutting in line, spitting, blowing their nose on the ground, not washing their hands after using the washroom...
Aherm. It seems you have not gotten a sufficient dose of freedom today. What you must realize is that the holy Murican empire lifted the False indians from their ditch, to make them mighty casino owners. Thus, the holy Murica has made the universe a better place, and we give all the "dark" people's a job befitting them. America, fuck yeah!
Every culture is obnoxious outside their own cultural region.  The only difference is the volume of tourists.  The more travellers you have, the more visible your obnoxiousness.
Anyone will sound irrational if you poke at them 24 hours a day as these reporters seem to do on stories like this.
Today, I learned that native American genocide doesn't count
Probably. 
I sincerely hope so, I'm really stunned by this, but I'm afraid it's not just this organized fringe group. When I made this post, the submission has over 30 upvotes, over 80% liked it and there was not a single comment even remotely sceptical about this article, it was just the standard islamophobic circle jerk reddit has been infested with these last months.   And it's on the second page the subreddit. For shame.
The original article already has a comment to that effect, I'm sorry to say.  &gt; 3 ) albertine harris / usa 26/05/2013 21:57 sorry..show me facts..how do i know that she was not abused by israelis''...? they seem vicious and cruel to children? what makes me to think otherwise.
Pretty much, yeah. Politicians play a big role, so they don't go to jail much.
People who are even mentioned with the same sentence as "rape", "convicted" or "prison" are shunned by society. It's horrifying.   These people haven't even been tried yet, and they're not gonna receive any help from their friends and family at *all*.   It's the main reason why girls don't report rape to the police right away. They're scared. Not only are they faced with facing the rapist, they have to live with being shunned by society, because of something *someone else forced them to do*.   It's terrible, I tell you.
Did they ever find all the rats that should have drowned in the subways of NYC after hurricane Sandy?
This is just the fringe of whats happening.  Alot more Mosques have been firebombed and vandalized along with Muslim businesses.  Not to mention anyone "Muslim looking" (Read non white) being attacked. 
There are still mosques and other muslims in the UK that are encouraging these attacks. go after them instead.
well... If im not mistaken... back in 2000, during the run-up to the fialed camp david accords... the settlements were growing like crazy.   I remember both Clinton and the Palestinians saying things like "this will sink the negotiations". The 2nd antifada only broke out later that year.    So back in early 2000 (and I guess the late 1990s)... there was a stable PA, attacks were at a minimum (fatah didn't have enough manpower to control the entire area though), and the WB settlements were still expanding.   
On an individual person basis, vaccination does not work 100% of the time. There are also some legitimate reasons why individual people cannot be vaccinated, such as allergies to the medium in which vaccines are delivered.  So, the theory behind vaccination is that, as long as **almost all** of the people are vaccinated, **most** people will be immune, and therefore **almost no one** (whether personally immune or not) will become infected. This is sometimes called "herd immunity" or "community immunity". This is how we made smallpox extinct in the wild.  When a large enough number of people who could be vaccinated (and therefore would have probably become immune) choose not to be for no good reason, the herd immunity principle falls apart, and we are left only with personal immunity. When this happens, only the people who are actually immune avoid infection. To put it more bluntly, people who opt out of vaccines for stupid reasons are directly and wrongfully hurting: themselves, people with *bona fide* vaccine allergies, and anyone for whom the vaccine did not happen to be effective due to bad luck.
[deleted]
Pretty sure there are lots of Ding Jinhaos in China's 1.3b population though! 
And you keep 90% of them along the border. We're watching you, Canada. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
I don't think that's a real issue.  The whole point of mandating vaccines is so that enough people get vaccinated such that herd immunity isn't compromised.  From there, if a few nitwits don't want to get vaccinated, they're only putting themselves in harm's way.  I'm not saying that their doing so is without consequence -- I'm just saying the consequences are *relatively* minor.  Laws don't have to work perfectly, they just have to be good enough.  This is one case where the law is good enough.  Mandating vaccines should ensure that the overwhelming majority of people get vaccinated.  Those who don't are fuckwits, but they'll generally be harmless from a purely epidemiological point of view.
God. 
Thanks for the reply.  I guess I need to travel outside Europe
Nobody gives a shit what you do, welcome to the world.
There are many vaccines for which the risk benefit ratio favors not vaccinating your child. Ie, if one doesn't plan on leaving the US, then, as far as maximizing personal health, it makes no sense to get the polio vaccine - there are more risks than benefits.  Why are they hypocrites?
[deleted]
Malaysia is a Muslim supremacist government with reeducation camp for Islamic apostates. All non Malay-Muslims are heavily discriminated against. 
i seriously cant wait for drones to get in the hands of everyone. it will be great to see how america reacts when some of their own people get killed by these killer robots. 
yea, because everyone knows buying drugs on a nurses salary is difficult. 
As I understand it, local gravity field will vary with the density and types of rock formations. I know it's used with other geological surveys to predict certain things about geology some success. 
So basically, Russians will now send an armed envoy to escort the shipment. Probably. Or not send anything. Or send nukes. Or not send nukes. Or the stock market will crash. Or it will not. Or there will be another world war. Or not. Or anything could happen. Or nothing could. Or I will get downvoted. Or upvoted. Politics are tricky. Any number of things could occur. Or not.
Yeah, he seems like a real pacifist.
Dosent change the present situation
I want to get off of Mr. Bones' wild ride.
How is human error/ typo a computer glitch...
No one cares.
Some of those Russian Jews went to Israel to escape Russia.
MANPADS in Syria have little risk to Israeli civilian aircraft.  Unless those MANPADS got to within a few kilometers of Israeli airports.
Thanks for that, I get the feeling you understand where I'm coming from here.
Let me jab you with some polio, assuming you haven't be vaxxed, and then we will talk.
indeed, absence of empathy is one of the main characteristics of sociopathic people.
Hey you know what else I saw on youtube, the actual attacker telling us why he did it - an eye for an eye.   That is a justification  that might not be appealing or pass muster, but it is reasoning something pretty much anyone can understand.   Incidentally, the UK just pushed the EU to end it's arm embargo on the Syrian Rebels so they can go and attack Syrian soldiers.
Like they always do: They just expand their borders to reach them. 
&gt; You don't understand how it works.  No I actually do,   &gt; You can't lose your Russian citizenship, but if the person was a citizen of the Russian SSR,  any immigrant leaving the FSU lost his citizenship when [left](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Visa_%28document%29).   &gt; , he would be a citizen of modern Russia automatically  please cite the related law that would make that, beacuse when I googled that the information it said a person had to iniate a process by going to the embassy.  the wiki [page](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Russian_nationality_law#Citizenship_act_of_1991) state that only people who went back to russia got an automatic citizenship.    
All they want to do is defend themselves. 
Sometimes I really wish the US weren't allies with Israel
What are you talking about? People complain about shit all the time in America. 
USSR at the height of its power - just like Russia right now - has enough resources to make sure no one ever lives in this place ever again.
I think you are vastly overestimating Russia's capabilities if you think that they can destroy the Israeli air force in 1 day.
It's about the peace of mind that comes with knowing you're not being monitored in places you expect privacy, like your home. 
I love fucking them
[deleted]
Yugoslavia being a perfect example. Yes I know it had just come out of a dictatorship, but religion was the main driving factor behind the wars there in recent times.
In theory the U.S. does, but that's only in certain regions and the level of effectiveness of the systems is highly debatable (which is to say that they don't actually work that well even in testing situations but nobody wants to admit it).
Anti-vax is, at its heart, not based on scientific facts or theories but on "gut feelings" and emotions.  As it is not actually concerned with the facts or scientific correctness, it does not die when shown to be wrong.  In order to kill it, we would have to somehow make the "gut feelings" and emotions swing against it; research papers, statistics, and scientific concensus are not well suited to doing that.
Seriously.  I'm only microscopic, but let me mulitply in the billions, and I'll make you shit your pants!
To be fair, DPRK has some [beautiful mountains](http://i.imgur.com/fBVHMEH.jpg)
Nice rant, but again you have failed to address anything I have said. I think I was fair and gave you a chance, I'm sad you were not up to the task.
are you a fucking retard? just curious.   http://today.agrilife.org/2012/03/26/transgenic-citrus-trees/  also... since when did gmo-compass become the authoritative database on GMO ?   idiots like you pisse me off.   http://today.agrilife.org/2013/05/24/biotechnology-conference-slated/  http://www.biomedcentral.com/1472-6750/12/41  ... also... the page you cited says it was DATED 2010... i think you are a fucktard.  There was an article just several weeks ago on bloomberg talking about five differen research teams using genetics from several other sources.   Seriously I hope you haven't reproduced, or if you have its not too late for an abortion. That goes for the rest of you that upvoted him to. Stupid fucking reddit cunts all of you. 
Depends on altitude, but typically it would not be possible.   Sometimes we get called out to an aircraft (mechanic) and the door can't be opened because the ground air cart (provides conditioned air to the cabin while on the ground) was left on, and all the doors were closed. It pressurizes the plane, but not as much as the aircraft pressurization system. And even that light amount is enough to keep the door firmly shut. We have to shut off the cart and wait until the pressure bleeds off before it will open. A door that's 24"X48" (which is fairly small for a main door, but close to many emergency exits) has a little over 1,100 square inches of surface area. At only 2 PSI, there's 2,200 lbs of force holding that door closed. At cruise altitude the pressure differential is more like 8 PSI, so you'd be looking at close to 10,000 lbs of pressure.   TL;DR- you're HIGHLY unlikely to ever get a door open in flight. 
[deleted]
Nickelback made a song about her. if that's not punishment, i don't know what is.
Or, instead of that dichotomy, we help the rest of the world not be suck.
[Welcome to Detroit](http://detroit.craigslist.org/wyn/apa/3811185676.html)
His point is that, generally speaking, to get rich you have to have money to start with. 
According to the last line, this is considered accountability nowadays? Fines?
This comment has been linked to in 2 subreddits (at the time of comment generation):  * /r/conspiracy: [How to destroy a Monsanto shill's argument.](/r/conspiracy/comments/1f95i9/how_to_destroy_a_monsanto_shills_argument/) * /r/fringediscussion: [How to destroy a Monsanto shill's argument. [auto-x-post 1f95i9 - OP was cpkdoc]](/r/fringediscussion/comments/1f95v2/how_to_destroy_a_monsanto_shills_argument/)  ---- This comment was posted by a bot, see /r/Meta_Bot for more info.
[deleted]
&gt; Your list of the fattest countries is laughable. Samoa and Kuwait are the only countries on that list I've ever even heard of, and I'm sure not even one of those countries has more than a couple million people, compared to the US which has what, 300 million.  I wasn't aware that it was 'my' list. Apparently, statistics *supplied by the WHO are laughable*. I'll remember that.  Since you are apparently arbitrarily deciding that 'smaller' countries don't count, then keep in mind that the United States is only 6 points 'ahead' of the United Kingdom, 8 points 'ahead' of Australia... pot calling the kettle black.  &gt; Your second stupid retort leaves out the context of my first two sentences--if you're not fat, then you've got nothing to worry about.  Strike 1.  &gt; Being from the south has nothing to do with it--you have no more to do with slavery than a German guy today had to do with concentration camps.  Except that my family never resided anywhere where slavery was legal, and indeed fought against slavery in the Civil War. We are not from Dixie. It is likely, on the other hand, that his ancestors were most certainly in Germany during that time and are unlikely to have fought against Germany during the war.  &gt; All I'm saying is you shouldn't use the holocaust as a trump card  No, you're saying a lot of other things as well. Inane things.  &gt; because it happened a long time ago, and America is a fucking laughing stock today.  Which is relevant to me *how*? If it's justified that a German randomly insults *me* for something that isn't even *applicable to me*, why is it not justified that I insult him for something that isn't applicable *to him*? Why the double standard? At the moment, you are making me depressed that you only live about 10 minutes from me.
You're seriously awesome
Global income equality would be great. I think we would go back to producing locally then. We are literally leeching the mining resources in Africa, and cheap labor in Asia, and using the oil of the middle east to ship material, intermediates and goods back and forth around the world with DOZENS of middle hands everywhere, yet we still manage to produce cheap shit which is skewing everyone's perception of the actual value of a product.
Interesting... I'm in Thailand now and I love it but certainly the public squat toilets can be quite dirty... and there's water everywhere... but toilets at most places are exceptionally clean and have western toilet options.
:) indeed but others might find that usefull.
Muslims and their teachings are literally the scum of the Earth. FUCK muslims and their 12th Century shit. They have no respect for women (or anyone who isn't 'slum) and do not fit in with any other society. Their holy book calls for a caliphate and the forced conversion (or execution) of non muslims. There are no 'normal' muslims. Their book does not allow that. I'll be glad to see you (a lowly dhimmi) be the first to taste their swords.
Europeans are smarter than you give them credit for. They are able to understand that someone posting selected quotes on a web site to serve an agenda is quite an unreliable way to learn about a religion.  
I don't think he forgot, he just doesn't care.
You seem to be confusing WikiLeaks with Assange. Assange most certainly took credit for much of the information released via his site. He reveled in the attention. Additionally, he proceeded to look and act like a semi-celebrity. I don't have any respect for the man and neither do many of the people who worked directly with him as a part of WikiLeaks.
[Here's a crapton ... with your name right up there.](http://www.reddit.com/r/NolibsWatch/)
Nick Davies,who used to work with him, described him like this:  "I think most people who know him go through this process: you start off trusting and liking him, then suddenly this kind of monster appears from behind the scenes and you kind of think 'where on earth did that come from?''  "You suddenly discover this extraordinarily dishonest man. I don't know that I've ever met a human being as dishonest as Julian."
No I always say exactly what I mean. See my previous comment to unkleman. You can't change the truth with social shaming. Calling me a bigot does not change the truth: that in any species, females are more valuable than males. They carry babies thus are the limiting factor in determining the population of the next generation. (ie. If you 10 chickens and 1 rooster you get the same number of chicks as when you have 10 chickens and 10 roosters.)
And when tens of millions of people disperse into ravaging hordes, annihilating all the wildlife they can quickly and rapidly to feed a society of such a titanic size as ours, what will you do when the food runs out? Who will become the first meal?   Also at the rate we're going, there won't be many fish left in the ocean in the next decade anyway. 
You're not giving answers at all.  'Banning cups is not the answer'.  Why not?  Explain why it's more important to be able to drink from certain types of glasses at all times and at all places, than it is to save billions of pounds and prevent dozens of blindings.  
I don't know why I'm downvoted, what I said was factual and important.
Same subset as a vegan zombie. 
&gt; obviously inadvertently killed  The soldiers were definitely trying to kill those people, they were just mistaken for soldiers/terrorists instead of journalists.  I don't really blame the soldiers in this case (even though I strongly support wikileaks).  I do blame the policies/politicians that got us into Iraq in the first place.  The more the public is exposed to the realities of the war on terror, the better, IMO, because the public can only make informed decisions if they are getting good information. 
Your story makes you sound like a retard too. Using severe violence to respond to rude speech is a bad choice.
[deleted]
&gt;So take your Politically correct persecution attitude elsewhere  First, as a self-professed secular progressive, I thought you would have values a dissenting opinion. Telling me to fuck off isn't very liberal.  And second - persecution complex? You bet. When random tweets from idiot nobodies are used for whipping up anti-Muslim fervour, then I have a right to call out OP for a what he is: a bigot  &gt;it is just right now muslims are leading the charge in saying something stupid  Muslims are *not* taking the charge. Literally every minute, someone is writing something equally stupid. But it seems at Worldnews, only those from 'Muslims' are highlighted.   Threads like this are conducive to the many comments here which call for genocide against Muslims. There's alway at least half a dozen in every thread. And if every time a Muslim farts, worldnews starts bitching about Islamic explosions, can you blame them?
Your point being..? Civil wars are always extremely messy and violent. This has been mentioned in countless threads. I didn't watch it because fuck gore, I've already seen enough of that in my life, but the jest I'm getting is that this is no more religiously motivated than cartel members doing the same.
during war times, they have redirected flights, probably to keep them further from Gaza.  I dunno if there was any threat of shoulder rockets at civilian stuff, probably not. I'm not sure what they were concerned about, when choosing to redirect the flights.  the west bank is not going to end up with stuff like that at the moment (it's relatively peaceful compared with either Syria or Gaza), but yes, civilian airplanes fly very close to it or even above it.
Everyone is capable of violence. Every country has assholes.  If you go to a Buddhist majority country you will find  Buddhist assholes who are capable of violence.  Just like not all Muslims are violent (although I am sure this subreddit will disagree)  not all Buddhists are peaceful.
&gt;You're retarded.  That's a slur against mentally disabled people.  &gt;You seriously think they're all killers?  When they are murdering soldiers in broad daylight it's time for them to go.  They have disrespected the hospitality of their host nations long enough.  &gt;And how exactly do you "get them out"?  First, paid repatriation.  Then sweep and clear.  FWIW I am primarily referring to white homeland nations.
Like the New Day Co-op in The Wire. If you want to be successful, get organized, no matter what it is you do.  
If you could go ahead and fill out your expense reports, that'd be great.
[deleted]
[deleted]
So typical of Israel supporters, wanting a pat on the back for not committing genocide.
What counts as harassment? That seems like it could be anything. 
It's a perfectly viable answer. Wherever the ignorant zealots with piss-poor understandings of basic human biology manage to get abortion outlawed the number of people dying in childbirth and dying attempting their own back alley abortion invariably rises.
H1Bs are a bad deal to foreigners too. You may make close to your counterparts, but you can't quit your job risk being fired else you could end up taking a trip back.
[deleted]
As has been said countless times, no farmer has been sued and found guilty who didn't willfully attempt to use the patented seed.  Even then, the GMO-modified strain in the resultant seed is not at 100% efficacy; it would be far more economical for the farmer to simply purchase the GMO seed.  EDIT: [Here's a megapost that covers this issue.](http://www.reddit.com/r/Permaculture/comments/1e3wfz/why_are_people_agaimst_gmos/c9wkwxh)
It's not faux outrage. This absurd ideological movement is now actively harming people.
Aren't those called rapeseed?
That was superlatively insane.
Ok here's the idea then.  I'll walk up and turn around with you in a large sack on my back like that guy from Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls.  We'll be unstoppable. 
&gt;"...around 500 hectares of corn crops were burned this week - equivalent to five million square meters."  That's a significant amount of corn! What makes it even worse is how many people die per year due to starvation.
We do need them to help stop world hunger, and they are not shown to be unhealthy.
It depends on what you are talking about. The thing about organic pesticides is that they are very dated technology, there probably be few if any advancements in the specific tools used in organic farming.  That being said, the funny thing about this debate is that the popular GMO pesticide Bt **IS** the same one being used as an organic pesticide. The difference being that the GMO produces it by itself and the organic has to be sprayed on. The environmental implications are that plants that produce Bt are safer because it is contained within the plant itself.  http://www.bt.ucsd.edu/bt_crop.html  http://www.bt.ucsd.edu/organic_farming.html
Thats the law in canada, no doubt partially thanks to this man. Until a fetus is born it has no rights under Canadian law. Yes, even a 9 month old fetus can be aborted. 
You don't seem to be aware that China, India, and Bolivia aren't in southeast Asia. I know your liberal arts education has taught you to believe X, but I'd suggest having an open mind--and, yes, traveling--to consider the possibility that the world is a bit more complex.
Read this. Testimony from an abortion assistant  http://mobile.philly.com/news/?wss=/philly/news&amp;id=202629311&amp;viewAll=y#more
I guess they weren't that hungary.
OK... but does it kill every other seed in existence? 
It may not be bad at all.  I'm just saying that we haven't been eating large amounts of transgenic foods, or animals that eat those crops, until the last ten years or so.
I'm Irish and I was confirmed at 11. It's ridiculous.
It is indeed genetic modification.    I'm interested in what you think the mechanism of evolution is.
Even tubal ligation and vasectomies are not 100% effective.  Freak accidents happen.  And what of couples who want children in the future, but not until they are ready?  What of families who already have children but cannot afford another?  There are so many variables that it cannot be pinned down to one reason or circumstance.  
My favorite part about this argument is that, as a Jew, we've got about a fifteen point bump in terms of average IQ. How 'bout those statistics?
I want them gone because of the war crimes and outright genocide they have committed. The people of Israel had even chance to move their country in the right direction but they willingly starting taking pleasure in the suffering of others, to the point where its part of their culture now.
Yup, you're right that there is a difference... but I still would but them both together. *Not illegal* doesn't make it all right. Why? Because many of the 'voluntary' ones have a huge amount of family/peer pressure attached to them. It's not always the "You have to marry this person- or we'll kill you" type of situation.  If the approach was to introduce two people to one another and let them go ahead and get to know one another, it wouldn't be a problem. Unfortunately that quickly becomes a one way street with the parents/matchmakers having full control over who they choose to introduce, and of course, the final say. It becomes a dog and pony show to show themselves off as being "modern" while still ultimately manipulating the life choices and future of another person.  In my opinion, the entire concept of arranged marriages needs to be scrapped.
Also, I'm well informed but I don't have as much time on my hands to throughly explain why, there are people on reddit who can give you essay comments on exactly why gmo's are better, there was a link in this thread somewhere to a post a redditor made about GMO's, it was a good read.
Why do you think women choose to have abortions?
I'm not an American, I'm a Canadian. I'm also not a catholic. I will however try to answer your questions. Here's one answer from a personal philosophical perspective:  Pope Francis said (as the Catholic Church has said since the Middle Ages) that all people (atheists included) are "redeemed" by Christ's sacrifice. That doesn't mean all atheists go to heaven. It just means anyone *can* go to heaven. Which is obvious, and always has been. Why it became news I have no idea. And the Vatican didn't correct the Pope, the Vatican corrected the *media* who had erroneously reported that the pope said everyone gets to go to heaven.  I'll try to explain my understanding of Christian salvation:  In the Christian tradition, first, there is one idea: That God wanted everything to be perfect. He wanted *us* to be perfect. But, more importantly, he wanted us to be *like him* ("made in his image") in the sense of being free beings who can create of ourselves and make our own creative choices. So he made use as we are.   Next their follows two further ideas:   The first is that because of the Fall (Original Sin: Adam's choice to disobey God and discover morality) mankind is aware of evil, and therefor capable of committing evil consciously. In a sense, this was like an unintended (or perhaps merely early) suffrage: We chose to emancipate ourselves as infants, and were suddenly subject to the Law, even though we were still foolish children. We only punish people for crimes when they know what they are doing - and for good reason! Before there was knowledge of good and evil, there was no sin, and therefor, no guilt. But we chose to emancipate ourselves in our infancy - before evolution had fitted us with the biological capacity to resist baser instincts in deference to our newly discovered consciences. Therefor, we cannot help but sin (i.e. "commit evil acts")  The second (and related) idea is that, in consequence of original sin: everyone is unavoidably guilty. Which is simply a way of saying that "nobody's perfect," and furthermore, that nobody *can* be perfect.  The next idea is that there will be "Justice". That is to say that every wrong will be righted, and every right rewarded in the end. That the universe is fair, and all will partake of an equal measure: That we will reap what we sow, and in the end we will lie in the bed that we made. When you combine this idea with the previous ideas (of sin being unavoidable,) you get the idea of an unavoidable punishment: We must pay for our sins, somehow.  The idea of "Redemption" is that God chose, as a solution to the problem mankind had created by his choice of early emancipation, to become man himself so that he could personally stand (under his own Law) in the place of all humanity as the guilty party. But with this important difference: That he was, in his life as a man, guilty of no evil whatsoever. Still, he stood in everyone's place, and took the blame for every wrong deed ever done ever before or since. And in the same way that our law would never convict two different men for the same crime, God's Justice would not permit us to be found subsequently guilty of the crimes for which Christ had already accepted penalty.  That is what is meant by redemption.  But there are three final ideas which are, to Catholics, the most important: 1) That you have to admit your guilt, at the very least, to the Man who paid the price; 2) That you have to accept the offer of forgiveness, and; 3) That you have to at least try to do better.  For the most part, Protestants are big on the first two, less so on the third.  "God, I know I'm not perfect. I know I've done bad things. I know that you forgive me, and I accept your forgiveness."  As far as most Protestants (evangelicals aside) are concerned, that's about all it takes to get into heaven.  If you want to be a Catholic it's a good idea to say that, and then try to do something good. Better still if you say the prayer and do the good every day. It's easier to remember to pray than it is to remember to be a better person. But praying can help you to remember to be a better person.  In any case, Catholics (but not all Protestants) believe that the salvation of souls and the forgiveness of sins is ultimately up to God - he's not, at the end of the day, bound by his own Law. If he wants to, he can decide that everyone gets to go to heaven in the end. Fuck, why not, right? If he's as awesome as he says he is, maybe he will. And I think Francis was subtly suggesting that.  But if God wants us to be nicer to each other while we're here experiencing the wonderful but strange (and often distressing) thing called existence, I'd think that rather than telling us all is well and we can go about our own course - when we are really in danger! God might instead choose to encourage us along the right path with promises of reward and punishment. It works with people as well as animals. If God is really all knowing he certainly knows as much as psychologist. Maybe if we were better (or differently) developed we wouldn't need such crude moral implements, but atheists as well as Christians are all quite ready to admit that man is still, in many ways: a brute: Prone to superstition, prone to violence, prone to evil. Christopher Hitchens perhaps said it best:  "Our problem is this: our prefrontal lobes are too small. And our adrenaline glands are too big. And our thumb/ finger opposition isn’t all that it might be. And we’re afraid of the dark, and we’re afraid to die, and we believe in the truths of holy books..."  Or in the words of Chesterton: "Christianity is not a religion for good men, but for men."  Maybe God originally intended for us to evolve differently, but our free choices as individuals altered the course of the plan. Maybe the mechanisms of natural selection made the process inherently prone to chance and error. Maybe God's plan was intended to be something of a surprise - for Him, as well as everyone else.  Might not God simply want to make something both beautiful, and alive? And alive as in Free? And when the free and living art got lost, and wandered into perilous avenues of chance darkness, might not he then choose to lead it back to the light, not merely by rules and a voice from the sky, but by some living, human example?  I believe in Hell, but I don't believe anyone is going there unless they want to, and I believe they can leave whenever they choose to: As any man can choose to leave a room rather than speak a heated word, or come clean to himself or his loved ones about a wrong he has done to them.  We are not what we have thought, said, or done. We are what we think, say, and do. But in order to think, say, and do right, we need to recognize that we are capable of wrong, that we have done wrong, that God (or even the merely the universe) forgives us, and that we should try to do better. And you can remind yourself every day with a prayer if you want to.   That's my religion.  
No, it is not. Granted there are several versions of the story, but in every one that I have heard Aisha was an adult, and also a consented to the marriage. In fact there are some that say that she might have been older than Muhammad. She was certainly old enough to have been a widow, since Muhammad was her second husband.
&gt;We're all expected to act a certain way depending on where we are, it doesn't mean that we're all being oppressed all the time.  Actually, that's one of the most insidious forms of oppression. And that applies wherever we happen to live.
Your dick would be in for some competition with the current cocks and schlongs in the government
Ah yes Ecuador.  That shining beacon of human rights and free speech.  http://www.amnesty.org.au/news/comments/26279/
Bullshit. It's been known for decades that there is natural gas under there.  Also note that you didn't address any of my other points. 
Just because a particular question ("Is [blank] a human/person?") has been abused in the past does not mean that it is not a valid question.
I'm surprised nobody got killed. That's a start right?
Finally a topless protest with participants that I actually want to se protest...
the fuck are you guys on about?
[Except...](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Witchcraft#New_Testament)  So while it's true that it's not possible to separate out "She's a witch, may we burn her?" from the religious doctrine, it's quite possible for the adherents to simply ignore it, as most christians do today.  The sad fact is that for a person to be a decent human being, they have to be a very poor follower of their religion.  Islam is not by any stretch unique in this regard.
What's he doing in China?
Covering your ass doesn't work if it's for less than a day. "Three law enforcement officials, speaking on condition of anonymity, said initially that Todashev had lunged at the FBI agent with a knife. However, two of those officials said later in the day it was no longer clear what had happened. The third official had not received any new information."  News outlets need to stop trying to get the jump on one another by using anonymous sources. There's a place for them in journalism and it's not to get information that's going to be released anyway.
&gt; Really? Even if the farmer signed on to do it as part of your contract for the seeds?  It is an illegitimate contract.  Equivalent to an IVF clinic telling someone that their children are forbidden from having kids of their own without paying royalties.  Monsanto doesn't own the rights to second generation plants just because it sells you the first generation seeds.  &gt;&gt; Seeds copy themselves. That property is inherent in the product.  &gt; And so do computer comics, but that doesn't mean you can do so for any purpose without running across intellectual property rights.  Computer comics are (a) durable goods, not consumables.  And (b) free to be legally resold on the secondary market.  If I buy a PDF, I can trade that PDF on to a 3rd party.  If 7-up sold you a soda-making kit, it wouldn't have license to all the soda you made with it.
True, true.
The FBI really did a number on his nose
you realize one shot to the chest can be deadly or it can also leave the target with the ability to continue to fire his weapon.
Protecting Syrian Airspace from Israeli warplanes. Are you really that fucking stupid?
Does that mean they believe in magic, and are actively trying to surprise the use of magic?
Because 'Murica only cares about their oil and doesn't give a shit about human rights of other people. 
Head down running, or head turned down to avoid a face shot,  you decide. 
I'm not sure who exactly was under the impression that this wasn't the case.
Sorry, friends. I forgot I was in a "serious" subreddit. 
That wouldn't get any attention. It's about the shock value. By taking their clothes off, they garner a wider audience and more attention to their cause. Bad publicity is good publicity, no? 
And a brain.
"Comedian sentenced to death by torture in Nigerian aid debacle."
[deleted]
Are we supposed to have one? Where's yours? There's lots of people in here without points... If I have to have one, I guess it would be that saying a person being convicted of murder in Saudi Arabia might be innocent is irrelevant (in regards to the comment I first replied to), because the same can occur anywhere else. You know, the same thing I've said repeatedly, in case you just didn't read anything I posted before... 
FUCK RELIGION, fuck it, I am so fucking sick of it. Every goddamn day I read about horrible stories like this where some ridiculous and ignorant religious beliefs are harming people or animals around the world and it's beginning to make me so depressed that I am on the verge of putting my fingers in my ears and ignoring it for my own sanity if it weren't for the realization that doing so won't help anything.  I feel like I live in a cage inhabited 90% by insane violent malevolent apes and I am powerless to do anything about their barbarism and the suffering they cause the rest of us.  We have to begin to realize that IGNORANCE is HARMFUL. It might be the primary cause of human suffering that exists today and it is so widespread around the world but so out of sight for most of us posting here that it can seem almost like a bad nightmare to those of us in developed countries.  We have to fight against ignorance with the same vigor that we fight against the violence that it causes.
Wat
This is a blatant violation of human rights and we must immediately sanction and isolate the barbaric Saudi regime...  ...wait, what am I saying. We shouldn't do that at all; we should sell them F-15s and Abrams and give them all the diplomatic cover they could want instead. 
Alternative source, with video:  **Turkey finds sarin gas in homes of suspected Syrian Islamists – reports**  http://rt.com/news/sarin-gas-turkey-al-nusra-021/ 
well, thats every country. I've had way more issues with US customs than any other country. I'm the whitest white man i've ever met. never lived overseas and a vet. yet i still am "randomly" singled out for extra security every fucking time i fly (once a month or so)
LGBT is a demonic movement, most don't even know they're possessed. You should read Genesis - its amazing, its nothing like /r/atheism makes it out to be. 
Where's all the anti-abortion folks from the Dr. Morgantaler thread? Y'know reddit's new pro-life down vote brigade? We need their ethical expertise to figure this situation out. I guess this is just another woman trying to shirk her responsibility, right? Fuck, that shit pissed me off. 
Call for a global ban on all medicine/therapies? Because that's some scientists in a lab messing with chemicals in that case too.  There's zero evidence that GMO food is bad for you, so if you tout banning it based on no evidence, then yes, conspiracy nut fits the bill.
Better. I give it a B-. Well this has been fun. I leave you with this:  I'd call you a cunt but you lack both depth and warmth. 
you don't understand what the word terrorism means.
More sick, evil, Islamic retards at work. There should be a complete travel ban for all Saudi Royalty and government officials throughout the Western World. Saudi Ambassadors should be expelled from the US and all other countries that believe in human rights.
Just another in an endless string of coincidences involving US complicity in Sunni terrorism
Killed off the program, but five years later it's back... and with a vengeance. Doesn't that disturb you even more?
You're demonstrating a general misunderstanding of politics and theology. No religion is monolithic. There is always discourse. In everything, not just religion. It is true that religion is driving politics in a lot of ways. However, that does not mean religion is the root of the problem.  My interpretation is that in the middle east, extremism is rooted in economic issues. The people with no stake in the system, the dispossed, the poor, have an interest in destroying it. Religion provides a convenient vernacular to express the conflict in much the same way that we see in other conflicts.   And by the way, when a Muslim expresses that he/she does not agree with another Muslim, he/she is not excusing it. He/she is not responsible for their actions. Try and be more nuanced in your analysis.
I suppose my wording was bad. I didn't mean to sound hostile
&gt;We are moving to a global society whether we like it or not and fundamentalist muslims, right wing nationalists, and left wing utopians alike are all just going to have to deal with it. I don't think multiculturalism is even really a choice in a world with 7 billion people. How can you expect a global population that huge to stay neatly within the government created lines?  Any such world will have to be completely awash in money and jobs and distractions forever, or it will crumble.   &gt;Such as Toronto. Yes it is a city that is economically alright (for now) and yeah that is one of the reasons it doesn't have the tensions that other cities have. Will it turn into a "powderkeg" when the economy collapses here? Perhaps, conflicts will occur and so will racism but I think that people's lives and families are too mixed at this point for there to be the kind of ghetto riots we see in Europe. And even if we get those, I'm pretty sure we'll survive.  Grander scope, canada has such a problem with multiculturalism, which it has had for its whole lifetime, that the french and english population utterly refuse to merge or co-exist and regularly the french part tries to leave the country. Even in a well off rich country like canada, the end result is tribalism and self-enforced segregation, even among two groups that are visibly identical. In America, enforced mixing leads to racially segregated cities, and vast inequalities that are frankly impossible to meaningfully fix.   &gt;I don't think that unsustainable economic growth is a "shield against racism" though.  The most tolerant time periods are generally the most affluent. And the clinical signs of historical decline in empires is decadence, sexual freedom, and immigration. Greek, roman, Egyptian, Assyrian and Babylonian all went through these stages, when their empires looked quite strong, and collapsed soon after. Its common that empires gaining a lot of wealth take on different social views, that inevitably lead to their own destruction. 
What box?
&gt;"The expenses for the Winter Olympics in Sochi turned out to be more than all expenses for all the sports structures at the previous 21 Winter Olympics put together," the report says  &gt;It says that "between $25bn and $30bn have been stolen", and this has benefited "only oligarchs and companies close to Mr Putin".  That the graft wouldn't be quite *that* blatant and obvious?
Wow, what a deep and thourough exploration of the vagina you two have made here.
History repeating itself
The first article is from Virginia Tech and although it's not a scientific paper that shows methods and results, it *does* advocate increased use of GMOs as part of an overall pest control strategy.  The second link cites no sources and the third is behind a paywall so the the methods and results can't be examined.  Overall not the best argument against GMOs.
have fun with that. i doubt i'll be convinced that food shortage currently exists though, seeing as how the people claimed to suffer from it themselves claim they'd rather have sustainable than gmo. even if gmo is solving a problem, it can't be considered a sustainable long term solution because it's completely reliant on fossil fuels, at some point those will end. whether or not that's 20 years or 200 years is moot. the danger with gmo here is that it infects other crops. so once the threshold is back we won't be controlling gmo, it will be controlling us.  the single easiest way to solve hunger is to teach self reliance. it's easier and more responsible to teach poor people who to grow their own food and clean their own water than it is tell them they have to pay a company for seeds and import their goods.  http://agris.fao.org/agris-search/search/display.do?f=1982/US/US82111.xml;US8043862  **from your own sources**:  http://www.un.org/News/Press/docs/2009/gaef3242.doc.htm &gt;Decision makers were recognizing that sustainable agriculture could make families net food sellers, instead of net buyers at the mercy of price shocks and shrinking food supplies.  ________ http://www.livescience.com/14447-global-food-shortage-urgent-climate-global-warming.html &gt;"Food security" has emerged as a political buzzword in conversations about stability in the developing world. Three-fourths of the people in the least developed countries live on $2 per day. "Recent global food price hikes threatened to create a new food crisis in those nations, where the poorest people often spent three-quarters of their income on food," according to a recent statement from the United Nations. "Only through greater investment in sustainable agriculture — a long-neglected area — could those nations ensure both food security and competitiveness on the international markets."   ______ http://www.worldhunger.org/articles/Learn/world%20hunger%20facts%202002.htm &gt;Poverty is the principal cause of hunger. The causes of poverty include poor people's lack of resources, an extremely unequal income distribution in the world and within specific countries, conflict, and hunger itself. As of 2008 (2005 statistics), the World Bank has estimated that there were an estimated 1,345 million poor people in developing countries who live on $1.25 a day or less.3 This compares to the later FAO estimate of  1.02 billion undernourished people.  Extreme poverty remains an alarming problem in the world’s developing regions, despite some progress that reduced "dollar--now $1.25-- a day" poverty from (an estimated) 1900 million people in 1981, a reduction of 29 percent over the period. Progress in poverty reduction has been concentrated in Asia, and especially, East Asia, with the major improvement occurring in China. In Sub-Saharan Africa, the number of people in extreme poverty has increased.  The statement that 'poverty is the principal cause of hunger'  is, though correct, unsatisfying.  Why then are (so many) people poor?  The next section summarizes Hunger Notes  answer. Harmful economic systems are the principal cause of poverty and hunger. Hunger Notes believes that the principal underlying cause of poverty and hunger is the ordinary operation of the economic and political systems in the world. Essentially control over resources and income is based on military, political and economic power that typically ends up in the hands of a minority, who live well, while those at the bottom barely survive, if they do. We have described the operation of this system in more detail in our special section on   _____  so what we've learned from your sources is that the consensus is that sustainable agriculture and the abandonment of harmful economic systems are the solutions to world hunger. both of those things are the opposite of GMO. GMO is neither sustainable nor economically beneficial due to the demand of cost from namely one centralized supply of seed.
Must have regular medical check ups, and a district representative to check out the places regularly. 
[deleted]
ts a stupid comparison.   You know exactly why its seen in such a bigger light. Israel is treated as a quasi western block nation. They participate in many Euro based events.   They are in the guise of the media a western state. So when a western state does something seen as bad it gets a lot more attention then Africans butchering each other.  You are being insanely ignorant of the realities of the media.
Sure if you don't value your hair. That's an industry that lures me, but at the same time I'd like to live with less stress. It's essentially a game you can't *absolutely* win and when shit goes down, everyone wants you dead.
I actually am aware and my other posts in this thread were calling out religion as being the driving force to these clearly immoral laws.   Morality exists outside of religion and clearly this religion, or people in this area who choose to practice it in such a way, don't understand this.   Abrahamic religions have done more damage to man kind as a whole than nearly any other force. It has retarded scientific advancement, it has endorsed and exacerbated slavery, it has kept women oppressed for thousands of years. Millions of people over the course of history have died because of these religions. They are not a thing of beauty and these laws in El Salvador demon straight that point perfectly. 
&gt; Clones of hard-drives already sent to the United States must also be returned if they contain personal information, while any further copies must be destroyed, the court ruled.   yeah, fat chance of that happening.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Fuck you. It's news. Now shut the fuck up and google the sources yourself if you're gonna be a whiny bitch about it.
How is this anti-american?  You do know the FBI isn't limited to the United States, right?  You do know the man who was killed was Chechen, and had a flight scheduled to his homeland for the following day, right?  The Boston Bombers(who attacked a marathon that hosted runners from over 20 nations aka the WORLD) were said to be radicalized by foreign Jihadists, and possibly funded.  The deceased was a friend of one of the Boston bombers, and was being questioned about said bombers which in return makes this world news.
That just makes it sound like you're anti-death. Nobody wants to see their son dead, but using that in a discussion about *why* the son is dead is out of place and just feels like someone trying to invoke emotion. 
You appear to be a major fucking douchebag.
Get over the daily mail link... The story is on other news sources. 
It's also a massive insult to the families and friends of the Afghans killed that an American would not face the death penalty. I'm pretty sure they were promised it in the first place.
They would remove the "links" but the file was certainly still there. I once uploaded a file for my brother to use. The filename was the same as something else someone had uploaded. My browser froze for a min or two and then the file was uploaded. At the time my internet speed was shit and the file was massive. They checksum'd the file (hashed it with MD5 or SHA) and determined that the file already existed on the site. Rather than having me upload the actual file they gave me a unique link. But there were more than one unique links for the same file. In other words, if someone reported my link, the file would still exist. It's actually a brilliant bandwidth saving measure when you want to host piracy. If people upload lots of pirated shit you only have to download it once. Just propagate different links for each time someone else attempts it. If the copyright holders say "This link is invalidating my copyright" you still have the other dozens of links linking the same file. They failed to actually delete the file itself and blacklist it.
[deleted]
I'm an atheist and I don't really condone Islamic radicalism, but it seems with the absence of a strong Left in the world these are the only guys willing to fight back anymore, even if for misguided reasons, so: God fucking bless this man and what he did. Remember, each dead Western troop is another step toward global democracy! 
Because I clearly said that Islamophobia is just dandy, right?  I was objecting to the fact that you were (seriously, to use your word) condemning millions of people based on what you yourself admitted was an irrational reaction. 
I hate that people kill dogs for food. Then I remember that chickens, pigs, cows, rabbits, deer, lobsters, turkey and sheep go through the same thing over here.   Best not to think about it and give your pets extra treats if you can.
A little off topic, but why did he choose megaupload and not Kim.com?
Who is 'they'?
Come back here and update us? I hope that everyone makes it through safely. I wish the government weren't so tyrannical and our journalists such cowards. Be careful.
[deleted]
Morals rarely have anything to do with politics.
Not water, propylene glycol -- which is 100% safe since it's authorized as a food additive and used in medications.
You don't know much about languages, do you?
That's ridiculous. Obviously doctors make mistakes like everyone else but there's less room for error in that field, and eleven times is way too many, but I guess it does say she had a rare form of the disease.
I'm all for impugning sources of information without examining the information, but in this case, is anything in the article factually incorrect?  The article does refer to an inquest so something must be amiss....what's your take...or do you just plan to remain dismissive regardless?    
MiGs are useless without experienced pilots.
[deleted]
My own mother had a similar experience, she was having issues all throughout my high school years.  She was under the care of our family doctor who was a huge HMO whore of a doctor, he was constantly treating symptoms but not the root cause.  Finally after I graduated and she keep not following through with various promises because "she didn't feel good"  I couldn't take it anymore.  I put my foot down and said "If you don't feel good and go to the doctor", she replied she had been going to the doctor.  I then yelled "Go to a different doctor because this one isn't treating your problem",  later that day after talking her sister (a nurse) she went to the emergency room at my Aunt's hospital.  After a couple of scans, they did exploratory surgery where they found she had lymphoma and it had spread to nearly every organ in her belly.  She survived the surgery, lived through chemo, and is still alive today. All because I got pissed off about how she constantly broke promises to go places with me and refused to not take it anymore. 
&gt;It has also been used against people wanting to discuss the Armenian genocide, something Turkey is trying desperately to hide and bury.  Until, *Oops, the Internet!*
People from other countries should call the Turkish embassy claiming they have tickets to Istanbul and they are worried about police using excessive force. The whole motive is economic in the first place, the government missing out tourism would make a statement.
What was the joke?! 'How many anti-depressants does it take to kill a dwarf'? What an idiot! 
Anyone remember the episode of Futarama when they go on the internet and they all fly off to go to the porn area, those kids sneaking in. Yeh, like kids won't lie they're 18 and figure out hey I need to register with email like the fucking Hello kitty island Adventure game. Kids arn't as dumb as we think.
This [stream](http://www.livestream.com/revoltistanbul) allows you to hear the rumble of the chanting crowd, at least right now.  Also police launching things and using water cannon.  edit: looks like they cut the feed to the camera with sound, now it's a different camera without sound.
WTF I see nothing in the ways of policebrutality. Some old dude in a wheelchair who most likely got something thrown at this head. This doesn't prove shit.
[deleted]
The danger is not proven but mainly do to some corporate shenanigans, people feel its hard to actually get objective tests for safety and lack of spreading into other crops.  people feel  can't rust the results and when in doubt, its better to assume danger. Why? Well the  US is moving fast into a low trust society and a lot of people assume that given the costs involved, bribery or other less savory methods would be used to stop information from coming out anyway.  And no its not conspiracy theories in play  , its simple math. Loss of a multi  billion dollar product and mass public trust  vs 100 million in dirty money for bribes, legal political buyouts, TV adds  or less savory acts n a country run like the 3rd world  (i.e the US) is an easy call.  Look at this article here on Agricultural Gag Laws on Reddit   http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1fej8m/aggag_battle_moves_on_to_north_carolina_under_the/  Its in the shareholder and CEO's best interest and do to well a lot of reasons, a lot  of people especially at the top simply don't care about others. Not everyone of course, many Americans are still decent but the rot is deep.   
The planned location is a green hill, far from most residential areas. He basically wants to build a giant mosque in the middle of nowhere but can be seen from everywhere. 
Your comment makes no sense. Being prepared for a non-lethal takedown is as easy as carrying a taser along with your gun. Instead of reaching for a gun when the "suspect" started acting in a threatening manner, they could have reached for the taser. Or the mace. Or any number of other non-lethal measures.   A non-lethal takedown does not require the FBI to just barge in and arrest people willy nilly.  And let me get this straight: between the option of a non-lethal takedown and shooting the kid to death, the *non-lethal option* is the one that makes them look like Gestapo?
[Live stream!](http://newmedia.pivol.com/dhafeed.htm)
[deleted]
There's just one question I have.  Is there any data whatsoever that points to the idea that blacks are as smart as whites?  Waiting.
They dont stamp *American* passports.  No one else has any reason to not have their passport stamped.
Except that it's on the front page of CNN international http://imgur.com/jKMirmE
Its not just that. I have even seen that in a TV program about airplanes years ago as a potential idea - although there, they had the flaps in rubber on the tire and not in metal on the rim.
01010010101
Bleed your heart out with tears of internet militarism....   You are truly doing God's work. PBUWWJD?    Is there any news on what happened to the one eyed man that Jesus was coming to slay?    Shouldn't that be kind of a priority?
It's currently a second, ongoing storm system.  There are at least 3 confirmed tornadoes at the moment.
[deleted]
I don't think this is good news. Erdogen is democratically elected and heads one of the most popular and--until now--stable governments in the region. I also don't think its fair to characterize this government as fully "Islamist". They have a good deal of backing from islamist groups and have introduced comparatively mild, religiously influenced policies. AKP is more like the American republican party than the Iranian islamist regime.  This isn't a Hosni Mubarak or Bashir Al-Assad we're talking about. This government was democratically elected and it if it is overthrown, it would be a tragic destabilization of the region. 
Anyone got an English stream of what's going on?
Checks and balances.  Right now the government is in check by the military and vice versa.  But if they take over then who would oust them in the future?
Turkey sounds like a relative gem in the shithole that is the middle east.
Dude_Im_Godly has a point. As an American, American lives are more important to me. Tornados in OKC are more important than a revolution in Turkey... To us Americans. That being said, be safe over Turkey.  Who is opposing the Islamist government btw?
It's not just in Turkey where religious people are like that, man. Check out the Republicans in the States. Are you saying that America should deal with religious people the way Turkey does?
THE FIST THAT BROKE THE CAMEL'S CERVIX
While Turkey is much more secular than Egypt, it still has thousands and thousands of muslim extremists:  http://www.pewglobal.org/files/2010/12/2010-muslim-01-13.png
Tobacco has pretty much the same restrictions, with alcohol being a far more dangerous substance, and yet you guys bitch about this? 
It might be the cynic in me but the first thing that popped in my head when I read your comment was, "Too bad you guys don't have any oil, because we'd totally help you out."  But seriously, best wishes. 
Waco? Kent state? Mining strikes?
An intern for a US congressman, who had to "read" all the mail, commented a while back. He said its not about the well reasoned letters - the congressmen understand all the reasoning - getting 10000 copy/paste emails signals that the public is aware of and cares about an issue; getting a dozen well written letters is statistical noise.  r/TOMT can probably dig up the comment if y'all are inclined to ask.
Then you have never meet an actual soldier from a Western nation. I can't speak for European soldiers, but I was in the US military and putting the principals of democracy and the Constitution and protecting the citizenry itself over the actual government is very much part of the culture.  It is literally the oath of soldiers in the US Army to "support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic."
Supression...  http://www.rightnow.io/breaking-news/turkey_bn_1369752659185.html
Respect for Carsi! 
I dont think anyone does yet.  It can literally be squashed tonight or turn into the next Egypt.
Come back to this post in a week if not a month and see for yourself. 
Thanks man, that is exactly what I wanted to say
[deleted]
Very relevant. Similar to [the Florida Man](http://www.reddit.com/r/FloridaMan).
The use of chemical weapons by Syrian government has already been proven. Obama backtracked on his words because he is scared of going down in history as the president who got US tangled up in a new war.
Attention! Turkish democracy needs you!  After a series of peaceful demonstrations for preserving a recreational area in Istanbul city center which is planned to demolished for the construction of a shopping mall, Turkish police attacked the protesters violently with tear gas and water cannon, directly targeting their faces and bodies. Dozens of protesters are hospitalized and access to the park is blocked without any legal basis. Turkish media, directly controlled by the government or have business and political ties with it, refuse to cover the incidents. Press agencies also blocked the information flow. Please share this message for the world to become aware of the police state created by AKP of Recep Tayyip Erdoğan, which is often considered to be a model for other Middle Eastern countries. Turkish democracy expects your help. Thank you!  [ResistAksim.tumblr.com](http://resistaksim.tumblr.com/): videos, photos, information.
Isn't the banning of the masks actually a plot-point in V for Vendetta?
[deleted]
&gt;Of course there are some places in Turkey where it's extremely conservative but it's the same in America and we don't call America a 'Christian' country.  There are plenty of people who call America a Christian country.
http://www.plosone.org/article/info%3Adoi%2F10.1371%2Fjournal.pone.0036076  http://www.livescience.com/14728-dog-smile-facial-expression-communication.html  http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/nature/dogs-decoded.html  =======================   http://blogs.smithsonianmag.com/smartnews/2013/03/people-can-accurately-read-dogs-facial-expressions/  http://now.msn.com/dogs-facial-expressions-can-be-read-by-humans-study-says  
You should look at the move toward islamic fundamentalism by the government in law, and shut the fuck up. People like you are so stupid you think this shit comes out of nowhere. lol. 
&gt;He has grown a beard because he doesn't want to be recognized,  Yeah, no one is going to notice the fake feet. 
No, I'm not saying it's ok. I'm just backing up Beneneb's point that nothing really indicative of revolution is happening. He used the term "particularly appalling." BillTheCommunistCat latched onto the word "appalling" and pointed out something appalling that's happening. But that was beside the point, since the whole topic was whether a revolution is happening.
[www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1feacn/police_try_to_break_up_peaceful_istanbul_project/ca9gcve](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/1feacn/police_try_to_break_up_peaceful_istanbul_project/ca9gcve)
OP - could you please edit your post to warn people to turn the volume down? FUCK!
It's also hard to do what's necessary for those chances. It need a long-term plan and sticking to it. (Getting into politics, getting as many good people as possible into local offices, and building a power/support base. Oh, and keeping the bad people out.)
Thanks for the info.
Yeah, they work through TOR or if you are using Superonline instead of TTNET.
Wikipedia says otherwise:  "A coup d'état (/ˌkuːdeɪˈtɑː/; plural: coups d'état), also known as a coup, a putsch, or an overthrow, is the sudden deposition of a government,[1][2][3][4] usually by a small group of the existing state establishment—typically the military—to depose the extant government and replace it with another body, civil or military."  But neither french nor english is my native tongue, so I could be wrong.
Well, to be fair Obama did send 100 Military advisers to Uganda train their armed forces to better counter guerrilla groups a la the LRA, which admittedly may or may not have happened due to the Kony movement (but did occur after the video blew up). Omar Al Bashir has been charged in international court with war crimes (again, may or may not have to do with the 'activism', but records of the killings in Darfur would've been much harder to provide without it), and while Darfur was certainly a tragedy it wasn't enough to necessitate an intervention in the largest country in Africa. I'll give you OWS, but it did represent a coalescence of at least a small bloc of new liberal political activists which is visible in candidates like Sen. Elizabeth Warren.
Not to mention the fact that Tayyip has been trying to destroy the arts such as music and theatre, creating more institutions where you can become imams .. how do you say (like a pastor of a church only its a mosque), and attacking others who do not believe in the islamic views he has. Ataturk fought hard for all the rights our country has earned and now he is stripping them away, women are getting beat to death and are forced to cover themselves most of the time, if you dont you get looked at. Musicians and theater performance have lost a lot of hope and a LOT of other religions in turkey are being attacked...  Stop this madness!!
Says someone who's username is TheTurkishSpring, who's been a redditor for 1 day. You're just a shit stirrer. 
[deleted]
reporting news/recording.
I'm a Saiyan and I support sensu beans
You are then easily entertained, if you consider me redditing a spectacle. Or do you want me to fly over to Istanbul to participate? Would that be good enough for you?  And thanks for the "correction" and since it is of such importance to you: it was actually done by mistake while creating my account and I only saw it after it was too late.
Well, if they're conscripts, they aren't exactly there for their own reasons.
Sounds like more fun than just flickering the lights.
Point taken.
"At risk of turning into yet another Islamic republic."  Ridiculous hyperbole. Turkey is and will remain for the foreseeable future a very secular state. Whether you agree with Erdogan or not, keep to the facts.
Huh?
Propaganda sites...
Good way to show your support even though you have no spine.
That's what he said.
Why break the circlejerk bruh? you a fundie or something?
You may want to unsubscribe from r/worldnews then.
Shit, there goes my vacation plans...
You run faster when you're not carrying money to give to disaster victims.
It's pretty stupid they need to hide behind plastic masks and a stolen identity to feel like they matter. Even if they take their Halloween costumes away they should have enough confidence in their "message" to continue protesting. If it's all about protecting their identities ski masks and pantyhose work too. 
Can't tell if this is/r/circlejerk or /r/atheism
No they won't.
So, ~~slave labor~~ *unpaid internship* basically?
Oh man, why'd you have to go there..
&gt; Hard to interpret that as pro-torture.  Well of course it is, you've just arbitrarily plucked a single, decontextualised paragraph.  Here's the post-interview he done on Newsnight,   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ogLmlo-n7hs  'if this doesn't count as torture than nothing does'
Dude we all had it, we either grow out of it or mature into it and become anti-theists. 
Yeah, I mean, just thought I'd bring it up. Information is always dubious in these types of situations, and although you might not think you're the one "spreading" the rumors, this is exactly how misinformation spreads. 
It even says "It is dangerous to use after expiration date"
I think Universal does. Or Disney. Yeah, probably Disney.
Today the police backed from Taksim and let the protesters have the Gezi Parkı back. While this seemed like a triumph, during daytime hundreds of thousands of people went to Taksim and celebrated. As they left for home a much smaller amount of people stayed there for guard. But the police who has a personal vendetta against Çarşı (Beşiktaş football club's supporters/hooligans) They started a much fiercer attack on the Beşiktaş neighbourhood, which is only about 2-3 km away from Taksim.   They were so brutal that the rumour of police bombing people with chemical weapon agent orange, istead of pepper spray was out everywhere. The pepper spray they threw at us was coloured orange.  To be honest there is no way of knowing how many people are injured seriously or died. But if you call being poisoned with pepper spray injury the number must be tens of thousands in Istanbul alone. And the protests are going on in about 30 other cities in Turkey. And almost every city is living the same nightmare.  I think the only thing that's keeping the PM from ordering the police to shoot everybody is the international backlash he fears. And the only thing that will make him stop is the international pressure.   So we need your help internet. And sadly you might be our only ally. over and out.
Ah, fixed it now, thak you.
Okay, that's it, I quit this sorry ass attempt you're making at trolling. You failed at every level, grasped at straws in the end, failed there as well. See, you tried to correct me, and said xenophobe, kiddo. A xenophobe is one who is afraid of outsiders, not other religions. Then you check mated yourself by implying you meant religion all along. You can offer nothing more, as you're clearly running in circles now. Fuck you, and good night, you racist schmuck.
My bad
If nothing else, the standing precedent might act as a deterrent 
So if I wanted to go visit Spain on the cheap, would now be a good or bad time?
Sort of like a "Let them eat cake" moment there it seems.  Marie Antoinette was credited with saying this though it's doubtful she did but she sort of had the same attitude.  If i recall, things ended abruptly with her.
who you're kidding. They had to pay huge sums to France and Britain for the damages done during the war, had to hand over their ships to the Brits and reduce the size of their army to a marginal 100.000 so the Allies made sure they wouldn't attack again.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aftermath_of_World_War_I#Germany  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Inflation_in_the_Weimar_Republic 
[deleted]
This is false. The barracks was torn down by the mayor Lütfi Kırdar, for a city development project, in 1940. Atatürk had died then, so the trees there cannot possibly be planted by him. The project failed for the most part, so they put up the park.  Source: http://tr.wikipedia.org/wiki/Taksim_K%C4%B1%C5%9Flas%C4%B1
Yeah, saw the first, at that time it seemed just one idiots comment. Funny thing is that I haven't heard of the second one, yep that pretty much points to that direction. Thanks for taking the time to find the article.
falling rocks from earthquake  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jaqGBZKkeho
Don't worry, tourist areas are always safe. We'll be glad to help you out.
[deleted]
Ah right, because we should worry about immigrants more than the people from here.  Get your head out of your ass.
I don't think that's how it works. I don't think it is have the banks control and run everything with little to no regulation or accountability to no banks at all.   Banks went to countries like Ireland, Italy, and Greece and basically did what they did to homeowners here, only to small towns as well (in fact, small towns here have undergone similar things "let us service your city's pensions through the stock market instead of solid investments- you'll make double!" then when things didn't pan out, whoops now there is no money, better cut pensions! Oh and we are also the bank that services your debt now too...)  They gave them incredibly unrealistic loans with variable rates that became very very difficult to pay back when the rate went up. Matt Taibbi, PBS, and other journalistic outlets have written about this. 
Right. I worry for the average Muslim's safety.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Right-to-work_law  Although I think you might have confused the term, we do have a right to work legislation, our politicians respect it as much as yours respect the constitution.  Edit: We cant have foxcon-type factories because since we are in the European union and part of the 16 most developed countries in the world, our employes expect a decent salary and acceptable work conditions.  
And a nuke would sink on also, but how many of those have you seen on a "modern" battlefield? The Navy has to plan and build for the real-world.
Or a submarine carrier. 
[deleted]
You have some reading to do. And by some, I mean a lot.
Reminds me of the Reverend Horton Heat song, "You've Got a Friend in Jimbo."
I read yesterday that police asked military to assist, no decision yet.
Mortality from measles is extremely rare in Western countries - such as Britain, since that is the country being discussed. [Recent figures](http://www.nytimes.com/2009/01/13/health/13glob.html?_r=1&amp;):   &gt;**For 2006 and 2007**, there were **12,132 cases of measles** in Europe. Most were in five countries: Britain, Germany, Italy, Romania and Switzerland. **Seven deaths were recorded**.   Potentially fatal? Yeah, sure. Pretty much any ailment has a 0.05% annual fatality rate on small children though. Is refusing to reduce that 0.05% rate for your kids to 0% scandalous? Swimming pools kill many more kids every year, and yet no-one slanders parents who build home pools, afaik. 
I agree, regardless of understanding their feelings, those actions do not help our cause. I wouldn't classify those poster being taken down as violence however.  **EDIT** I think characterizing the whole protest as violent is far from the truth.
That's because tear gas is not water soluble and a particulate.  People keep repeating the rumor that this is some illegal and dangerous gas called 'agent orange' (a herbicide, which is nonsense) or 'orange gas' but I haven't seen a single source to back it up.  I don't know anything about tear gas effects becoming worse after repeated exposure (or 'addiction' as you misnamed it)
"Ancient?" I wouldn't call the recoilless rifle ancient, maybe old. When I saw the headline , I thought "Gatling gun?" 
Who are the people trying to pass these laws, is it the muslim brotherhood that was in Egypt and Libia?
[deleted]
Kony 2012!
Are. How brutally violent the police *are*.
the sad state of Canada since Harper is in charge....
Atatürk didn't destroy it, it was destroyed in 1940 (two years after Atatürk died) by the mayor and because Henri Prost (famous European city planner) adviced him to do so.
&gt; You will see how big the protest is  I saw much bigger protest in 1989.    &gt;  You will also see how brutally violent the police is  My cousin saw much more brutal military action against citizen in 1989.   In China that is.   
There was also coverage yesterday on TV and on their website  For example http://www.cnnturk.com/2013/dunya/06/01/gezi.parki.direnisi.dunyanin.gundeminde/710294.0/index.html  Or 2 days ago http://www.cnnturk.com/2013/guncel/05/31/taksimde.turistler.de.gozaltina.alindi/710246.0/
[deleted]
I couldn't care less about /r/leagueoflegends , doesn't mean I'm gonna go there and say "I really couldn't care less" on their posts.
http://occupygezipics.tumblr.com/ Instant mobile uploads.
There always two sides to a coin. And I personally am on the other side.   People like to pretend like Turkey was a paradise before Erdogan came up. This is far from the truth. Turkey was in shambles, being passed from one incompetent leader to another, constantly under threat of a coup. All political leaders who all looked to their own interests, rode the waves of popularism until the army removed them or their shine faded and they disappeared.  People like to pretend that Erdogan is only an islamist, that he threatens secularism. During the arab spring, when Erdogan visited Egypt he claimed he was a muslim, he said to the people in Egypt that he was the president of a secuar state and that he wished for Egypt to become a secular state also. This was just in 2011. Erdogan has always firmly stood by the secular nature of Turkey, as he should.  People like to pretend that only they know what's best for Turkey. They pretend to think that Erdogan's followers, the massive majority who voted him into office are ignorant peasants and rural folk. They obviously don't matter because they don't know better. They like to pretend that there is only one side, their side. It's easy to protest from a privildged place. Does it not make sense that rural people will vote for whoever is best for them? Isn't that the nature of democracy? You vote for your own interests.   Fact of the matter is, these people who protest don't know who should lead the country. Will you? Will you continue making Turkey a regional indepent power? Will you be prime minister? No? Who will then? Which political party do you see doing a better job then AKP? CHP? You think CHP is still the party that Ataturk created? All CHP does is fill their own pockets. They haven't done anything but bring Turkey into more problems. Or maybe MHP can take over the steer, nevermind that they're nationalistic to the point where they only have ethnic policies.  People like to pretend that Erdogan hasn't done incredible, yes incredible things for Turkey. Of course, Erdogan and AKP have some questionable policies. Some of their policies are too extreme. And yes, the police should never have handled the demonstrations that brutally. But in my opinion, there are no adequate alternatives. CHP, MHP or any other party has never achieved the success that AKP has shown here. Turkey and the majority of its people have not prospered this much. It's not the best, but it's better than anything else we have.   You are a minority group. This isn't an opinion, it's a fact. People largely support Erdogan and have done so for the past ten years. Don't count them out, don't count me out. Do NOT think you're the only person that can represent turkey and its interests. There are other voices as well.
40+ confirmed now. Biggest ones are in Istanbul, Ankara, Izmir, Eskisehir.
Holy fucking shit, we already know what is happening in Turkey! We don't need 21 thousand posts to remind us!
Russia = Denial  America = Access  You did not need to write a paragraph.
I hated him before it was cool /s  He was in Germany in 2011 and had the guts to hold a speech to some gathering turkish people living here that they "should not assimilate" into the German culture, Children should learn turkish at home before German and shit like that. Effectively hurting the attempts of integration that were going on and still go on. If Merkel pulled that shit in Turkey, she'd be thrown out. I'm not saying he should be treated like Gaddafi and killed, but he should step down in favour of a REAL secular politician who knows how to handle foreign affairs.  Source: http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2011/feb/28/turkish-pm-addresses-immigrants-germany
You are correct.  There are strong underlying currents of resentment across the world.  Social media is connecting these ideas as opposed to the main stream media.  The entire world is basically at unsustainable debt levels, where governments are going to have to seriously raise taxes and cut spending.  A lot.  Japan has extremely high debt that they are trying to inflate away, however it is only a matter of time before their bond market tanks.  Then the Euro will break up in some fashion or another.  After that is the US.  The next few years are going to see something big.  Really big.  A lot of people will get hurt and lose everything they've worked for.  One of the best sources of information to see what is really going on behind the scenes in the financial markets is zerohedge.com.  For example their latest post states:  The bottom line: 29 million, or 0.6% of those with any actual assets under their name, own $87.4 trillion, or 39.3% of all global assets.  Zerohedge is great because they actually show you the data, not just some sound byte.  Best source of financial news ever, though it can be a little difficult to understand though as I am not a trader.  I also suggest researching the basic schools of economic thought.  In my opinion we are basically in a Keynesian vs Austrian environment.  We are living the biggest Keynesian experiment ever created where governments around the world are basically printing as much money as they can.  History has shown us that this does not end well.  Ever.  Look at Argentina in 2001 for what I think is likely to come to the US.  Except we have 300,000,000 guns.  I think that will be stabilizing, but one can see how it could also be very very bad.  And you are correct.  Main stream media is about the worst source of information now.  The events in Turkey are showing a lot of people around the world that mainstream media is overshadowing governements and mainstream media which are losing control of the narrative.  I don't know how old you are, but I firmly believe we are going to be living some major major historical events within the next 5 years.  The world is essentially at the Keynesian end point with too much debt, which is leveraged an extreme amount.  Lehman brothers back in 2008 was a walk in the park for what's coming.  I urge everyone, learn as much about economics as you can. By being informed, you can protect yourself, your friends, and your family.  The global tension is classist, generational, religious, etc.
To enslave the internet with jackbooted corporate fascisti, duh. Didn't you read his Livejournal post?
This kid should be encouraged not reprimanded... It's incredible to me how absolutely oblivious and sleepy the system has become... What exactly would the teach have done? The bully (criminal more like) has a knife and the teacher has a stern tone of voice... Fuck the system... 
Well excuuuuuuse me
Upon research, you're right. I'm trying to find the removal links.
I was alarmed until I saw it was Canada. You're supposed to apologize to the bully for the inconvenience of pulling out his knife.
very helpful :)
[... the truth is that Assad was never as politically or militarily weak as portrayed in the international media or, until a few months ago, by foreign leaders.](http://www.independent.co.uk/voices/comment/just-who-has-the-most-to-gain-if-the-killing-in-syria-goes-on-8640745.html)  - Patrick Cockburn
If they are asking you for money, they're not volunteering. They are part of Greenpeace's Front Line team. 
this article is from november 2012 btw
Problem is, the people do not have weapons like in the other islamic spring countries. So a civil war cant happen.
Well there's good evidence that, globally overall, human beings are currently living through the least violent period in history.  [This book](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Better_Angels_of_Our_Nature) seems to be pretty well received by historians, though I can't vouch for it myself. I've merely heard interviews with the author explaining his thesis.  So that's kind of encouraging, if true. The U.S. is doing its part to fuck shit up though, amongst many other violent actors.
That's clearly not sean_incali's point. His point is that people aren't made aware of the motivation. It's called "honor killing" by these people.
At least they paid for your reddit gold. ;) 
Last bit of the article, "Police left the vehicle and ran away safely."
My question about Turkey is this: If the government is overthrown, who will take the place of it?   As someone who opposes large-scale government but is a realist, you're going to have to fill that vacuum if something happens to the government suddenly. It doesn't seem like there's any viable candidates or anyone stepping forward and I worry it might end up like Egypt (candidates that many [and yes, by many I mean different countries, etc] would find "bad").
Ehh, no, you fucking dumb fuck. There is a Muslim prosecutor, but the gang rapes were performed by the migrant community, mostly Muslim.  Why don't you read the article, retard boy?
Thank you for your kind words and support. I'll try to find something but honestly I haven't seen many good reports in English. I'll also try to produce what I can, altho not quite sure where to put it. I came across this one with an ok treatment of things if you scroll through the noise: [OccupyTurkey](https://www.facebook.com/groups/337621663033339/) 
A lot of pharmaceuticals are made in the Occupied Territories and labeled as "Made in Israel".  [Stolen mud.](http://www.whoprofits.org/content/ahavas-stolen-mud-occupied-palestinian-territories)  [List of Products from Settlements in the Occupied Territories](http://www.sadaka.ie/Files/List_of_Settlement_Products.pdf)
They follow the tweets. Also lots of Turkish anons on the streets
Here's a summary:  "In most cities, there are protests around the clock" "It's amazing how enemy soccer teams team up to protest" "the police are assholes."  I hope you guys all get through your turmoil without getting hurt.
Its just a anarchistic fantasy yes your life would suck if it happened. But that's not what you focus on, you think about all to store you can go into too just grab stuff and leave. And about the absolute freedom you would have to only be driven by survival needs instead of having this social ladder to climb.
"Yesterday things in Ankara took a serious turn for the worse. Police are now not shooting tear gas (from shotguns) at the floor, but at people's upper bodies. They have started gassing hospitals and ambulances, and preventing medical help from reaching the wounded. They are shooting rubber bullets, causing people to lose eyes and get brain damage. But most of all, they are attacking the vast majority of people who are non-violently resisting, dropping gas from helicopters on whole neighbourhoods, and putting large crowds in situations where they crush each other in the rush to escape"
Yeah, I'm sorry, but as an outsider, you have approximately zero idea of what you're talking about right now.  It's a completely wrong assertion that 95% of the population is happy with the state of the country. AKP hasn't ever had majority popular vote support in over 10 years in power (although they've gotten very close in 2011), let alone ever approaching 95% approval ratings. Prior to the latest incidents, their approval rating was hovering around 40%. It has sunk quite a bit since then due to the smug, authoritarian and ridiculous way in which Erdogan has chosen to react to the peaceful protests. By the way, it's also completely wrong that the protesters in general are violent. There have been some isolated clashes, but for the most part these are some of the most peaceful protests that most anyone can remember in recent memory in *any* country.  But perhaps most importantly, I couldn't give a rat's ass about what awards Erdogan as received. His actions in the last decade when his party was in power are rarely ever fully reported in the international community, but they show without a shadow of doubt that he's nothing but an autocrat tolerating democracy in the short-term for the purpose of attaining and keeping absolute power.  Take the Ergenekon investigation that I described above, for instance. Is that the democracy that Erdogan represents? Blatant media censorship? Jailing more journalists than any other country in the whole goddamn world? If so, we Turks want no part of it, thank you.  Not convinced? Consider the fact that his party has been tampering with history books for quite some time now. They're trying to rewrite history and pose Turkey as a direct successor to the Ottoman Empire. The truth they want to obscure is that Turkey is a distinctly different secular democracy founded by people who fought, bled and died *against* the Ottoman Empire and its post-WWI occupants. Simply sharing the same geography and religion does not constitute a continuation. Of course, it's in his and AKP's best interest to poison young minds with a revised history, and peddle the false notion that Turkey is an offspring of the Islamic Ottoman Empire, in an effort to gradually make it "acceptable" for Turkey to become just another Islamic republic.  Still need more? Don't forget the fact that Erdogan and his party recently rammed religiously-motivated legislation through the parliament, restricting alcohol sales and attempting to ban public displays of affection across the nation. This is explicitly in violation of the secularist founding principles of Turkey. Erdogan, on the other hand, considers himself above the law simply because he has a parliamentary super-majority (which can be attained with as little as 34% of the popular vote, just as AKP did in 2002). Erdogan, Gul and all of their cronies have well-known and well-documented ties to Fettulah Gulen and prior ousted Islamic governments in Turkey. When Erdogan founded AKP, people got antsy but he assured the public that AKP had no religious motivation. Fast forward to a decade later, he's ramming Islamist social engineering through the parliament. Not the first time he lied, and won't be the last. He campaigned heavily on repealing the parliamentary immunity laws, but backed out of it very rapidly after winning because both he and his lot benefit from the immunity, as there are open cases incriminating them in everything from tax evasion to white collar fraud.  What more could you possibly need to judge his character? He's a despicable Islamist autocrat who neither has respect for, nor any understanding of the essence of democracy. He thinks that he can trot around the parliamentary super-majority as a golden ticket to do whatever the fuck he damn well pleases, with zero accountability and zero transparency. People have had enough. Frustrations have been building up for some time now, but the recent state sanctioned police brutality has been the straw that broke the camel's back. Even some of Erdogan's former supporters are starting to jump ship. I hope that the people can affect some real change through peaceful, civil means this time. It would be a great step in the right direction for the maturity of our democracy.  In the meantime, people like you continue to consider a single Wikipedia article as "sufficient research" and come to Reddit to post ridiculous things about things you know absolutely nothing about. The level of ignorance is remarkable, really.  
i mean he best guy
It's much easier to recognize something from another religion as stupid bullshit, and drawing the comparison seems like it would support a less literal reading of s holy text. But maybe that's not how religious people work. 
Those weren't killed by Tony Blair or the coalition forces. Those were killed by insurgents from Iraq and surrounding nations.
&gt;Imagine the number of times tasers are deployed each week.  Given that in the UK they are generally supposed to be used in situations as an alternative to a firearm and some forces only deploy them with firearms officers (so lots of police don't carry them) and so on I wouldn't be that sure.  It looks like across the UK, tasers are discharged on average 40 times a week so..  Taking the Avon and Somerset count of 10 discharges in a year, and comparing it to their average number of discharges of 50 a year it does become somewhat more problematic...  However the point that needs to be made is that whether it's 1 use or 100, it has to be justifiable and appropriate, that is something that the police and CQC should look at.
They don't have to. Network news companies are businesses that make money. 
This story is from April 3rd and seems rather similar to another story which was later retracted:  http://www.alternet.org/world/exhibit-how-islamophobic-meme-can-spread-wildfire-across-internet
Not at all. They got legal autonomy, and de facto independence out of the second iraq war. In thirty years, when there is an independent kurdistan over most of historical kurdistan, the kurds will point to that war as the biggest reason why it came into existence.   Not that this makes the war anything but the destructive clusterfuck it was, but it did have positive effects. 
The Civil Rights act would disagree.
Indonesia is getting more extreme? You're kidding right?  Or did you just conveniently forget 'our guy' Suharto who murdered a million peasants?
I'm not so well versed in this but I've seen people say that this time the government slandered powereful generals and put them in jail and replaced them with pro-government ones, know anything about that?
[deleted]
Let the light of Hypocrisy shine! 
I spent some time in 2011 as a volunteer at the beach just north of this one, just across the Pacuare river. The Caribbean coast of Costa Rica is very lawless, and police protection and enforcement is extremely lax.  Poachers can habitually get away with their illegal activities, volunteer groups and locals work together to protect turtles and take their eggs to small beach structures where they grow and hatch and are kept watch at 24/7 to protect from poachers.  Poachers are very poor, and they probably took him at knife point or threatened him with a machete. Generally the poachers were considered non-violent and non-confrontational, and sometimes were friends with locals in the area. I'm not sure how this will change the whole conservationist movement, or improve police presence, but it very well might.
[deleted]
I'm aware of that, but this was over the course of nearly six months. As I said, it was not only cash withdrawals that were halted, but also money transfers, account transfers, everything.
I once was then i woke up to the fact that it was all bullshit and superstition .. In the core message of the bible you should be OK with killing your child .. you need to be OK with slavery ... you need not to be ok of a rape of a man but you should offer up your daughters for rape ... you should kill all men and women who and keep all virgian women as bounty of doing gods work ... SO yes i was .. Now i know all it is is a special way of calling HATE LOVE and tells you are not at all responsible for your actions in life due to a human blood sacrifice as long as you ask some sky daddy into your heart that created you broken in the first place  ... 
[deleted]
I was going to post something similar. This is probably not a good idea, as much as reddit would like it to be.
Wow, being from Toledo, I am struck by how many fucks are given in this article.
Most posts on /r/atheism seem to be about LGBT rights. I see the relation, but its still confusing.
Now why would I use an untraceable currency to buy traceable gift cards?
The problem is, not everyone knows what or how bitcoins work. I consider myself fairly tech/computer savvy, but I still have no idea how bitcoins work. I've never looked it up because I've never seen it around for use. It's just not out there for people to understand easily and that's one of the major problems. 
Exactly. Someone needs to tell Turkey about it en mass. 
Other Turks will get angry at me saying this but I'm an atheist and don't give a shit.  Our rednecks our women that wear hijabs and men that wear button up shirts with dark pants, pointy black shoes, and walk around with prayer beads in their hands.  They are often uneducated and uncultured and don't speak proper Turkish.  I have always had a dislike for these people and today it got to a new level.  Today at a protest everyone stood up for the national anthem and but a group of the people I described sat down in the middle of all the protestors.  I'd kick their backwards asses but that is not the message I want to send.  These people just don't understand the value of our country and Ataturk.  They do shit like litter in beautiful places too.  I could go on and on but I'll stop.
HA HA! You mad banksters?
Or let him in and then hold him until he pays off his debt to society.
mal hat man glück mal hat man pech mal hat man garanti
Those images are the "news". Did you watch it?
It doesn't really show they are civillians. Actually it doesn't show the police is actually police. I mean it's tough. You never know in these protests. It's a conspiracy against peaceful police force of Turkey.
Actually, considering how the Arab Spring started and ended, you have the right to be skeptical. But please do not use that language again. (that language: "if some loonies began protesting", "I'd want the police to have an aggressive response", "don't pretend like they are simply peaceful protesters", " Use your brain instead of simply believing every account you read in the media." ) As you said, without being intimately involved in the country at issue, how can you be so sure of what you are saying? Its best to have a questioning tone in your posts, not an accusing one.  You have no idea how hard the police attacked the protests that started so peacefully. Of course, things are not that peaceful anymore, but how can it be? Also, you are talking about using the brain instead of simply believing every account you read in the media, and that's exactly why there are a lot of posts in the internet trying to show police brutality. It's because the local media has been completely silent about the riots in the past few days. They just started to talk about whats going on today. That's another issue that bothers the protesters, a media that is not free.
[deleted]
You seem to be missing the point , either in genuine ignorance or in an intentional effort at obfuscation.  I'm not excusing rape in one area of the globe by pointing out it exists elsewhere. I'm just trying to show the double standard in peoples attitude towards Islam.  I'm asking you what you think may be the cause for the rape endemic in Brazil. You won't give a definitive answer like so many can when talking about 'Islamic' countries because you know it will expose your double standards.   You will never attribute sexual crimes in a catholic country to religion, unless somehow you can blame that on Islam as well.  
You say the government is trying to divide your people based on heritage, but didn't your government just make peace with the kurds after decades of civil war?
I meant because Israel said it would go to war to prevent S-300s from getting to Syria.  I doubt they would try to physically stop the missiles if is was "escorted" by a Russian carrier.
thongs = cocks out?  I don't think so. 
Well they don't have jobs so they have to find something to keep them from getting bored. Why not start brawling with each other over stupid ancient history?
Do you have a few hours to spare? If you you really want to get into the sordid details, google for "paypal horror stories" or "paypal stole my money". For a prime example of their dickish behavior you could read up on [Regretsy's saga](http://www.regretsy.com/2011/12/06/sooner-or-later-youll-pay-pal)
yep, but all in Turkish   vote sacks found in Istanbul : http://www.haber365.com/Haber/TEMde_Cuval_Cuval_Oy_Pusulasi_Bulundu/  10 million "new" voters: http://www.gazeteport.com.tr/yazar/18/ahu-ozyurt/932/on-milyon-yeni-secmen  70 seperate reports of fake voter records  http://haber.gazetevatan.com/chpden-hayali-secmen-iddiasi/382150/9/siyaset  A simple google search yields hundreds of such newspaper articles. 
My friend, you are absolutely spot on with your analysis here. These elements are all present in Erdogan's, the AKP's and their supporters' rhetoric, hell, even some of my 'friends' who are AKP supporters basically dig their head in the sand when presented with evidence against their dogmatic ways of thinking.
"....and the problems will be solved....automagically."
Let us stand with our Turkish brothers and sisters against religious oppression, and let them FINALLY join the EU when they overthrow these shackles.  If they were an EU state already, they'd benefit from much greater legal protections.
No, no, you don't get it.  They've uncovered our deepest secret: there is only one IDF soldier of each gender.  Just one.  They do *all* the things.
[deleted]
Hudood is more 'inspired by Sharia' rather then Sharia.    It only covers adultery, rape, thieving and drinking alcohol anyways.    Even Pakistan, back when they had these laws never actually gave the death penalty for adultery due to the '4 witnesses' part, and I think most of us are against rape and thieving.  Anyways, even the most strict of the Islamic countries don't really use this.  Even Pakistan, the most famous for the hudood laws tried rape under the civil laws and eventually repealed the hudood.  To put it another way, congress in the US could pass a law making rape punishable by death, or 80 lashes for drinking alcohol.    But just because the Muslims are in agreement doesn't mean that the US would instantly becomes a state governed by Sharia.  The US, from Common Law also tends to pass laws that enforce social norms as well (see prohibition...) and none of these laws are that far outside what the US has passed already (other then the cruel and unusual punishment part.)  Or did you have another example other then Pakistan that this applies to?
I've seen too many fake pics and stories related to the protests that has been going on since last friday.  Someone makes up a story like "the police are now using agent orange on protesters"; and immediately gets shared and retweeted by these people. I got many downvotes saying thats not true.  Fake stories of how police are killing people, misleading titles, irrelevant pictures being attributed to the protests were all over social media here in Turkey. In the heat of the events, many people assumed they were true and got outraged even more.
Is it just me or does this scream bs to everyone else? I mean....it literally makes no sense other than as a pr move by the opposition that took as much thought as..."oh, the west hates n korea? That's who we're fighting now...so give us money and guns..."
I've repeatedly asked for and never gotten a convincing secular argument against homosexual marriage. (Edit: to clarify, not here, but in other subreddits and discussions. The only thing I ever got was [this](http://www.freerepublic.com/focus/f-news/1082190/posts), which is really not strong at all)  "Natural law standpoint" is one of the more ridiculous things invoked in this context.  There are countless unnatural things (medicine, health care, societies with more than 100 individuals, marriage(!), ...) that are undoubtedly an achievement. Well I'm not so sure about marriage, but it is generally seen as something positive.  And there are numerous natural things (sickness, disease, murder, right of might, ...) that we should and do try to overcome.  And second, homosexual persons are perfectly natural. They are useful from an evolutionary standpoint, as the likelihood for homosexual offspring increases with the offspring number (and gender), so the non procreating offspring can and will help raising very closely related relatives and thus their own genes.  &gt;Religions do have something to do with marriage, as many religions do place large significance on married life.  I should have worded it better. There is no inherent connection of government-approved marriage (the one we are debating about!) and the church-approved marriage (the one I don't care about). They are not the same thing but are claimed to be the same by religious people, probably because of the name. Maybe that is why we should change all of it to "civil union" and "marriage" will become purely religious. I think this point is very important.
And more worse than Amsterdam. Your point being?
They just don't get it do they?
single male and masturbator is fairly redundant
[deleted]
[deleted]
If this sort of things keep happening, people are gonna have more trouble tolerating their continuous shit.
He made a mistake, not a curse, a blessing
The higher ups probably told something like: "try to focus first on those with cameras so they runaway before they can film you smashing the others". The dumbfucks interpreted literally. 
Oh...Finnish *babies*. Ha. I had something completely different on my mind when I clicked that link.
Pretty much, close enough, and straw man.
So much for Cameron cracking down on extremists.
Yes, I'm sure the differences in brain structure in LGBT peoples from their straight counterparts has absolutely no genetic basis whatsoever. /s
The Western narrative is that any protestors or rioters ever are "hippies, ethnic minorities, scallywags, losers that should be working, morons, criminals" etc.. even the occupy protestors were insulted and called "anti-capitalists" etc.. I bet if the American civil rights movement occured today everyone would be bitching about how "troublesome" those African Americans are.  But any time there are protestors in other countries they are "freedom fighters fighting for justice"  It really is funny how peoples viewpoints are. But especially around these parts.
[deleted]
So what? Saying "this is a place for Arabs" is no better than saying "this is a place for whites". Doesn't matter what the place is or what the ethnic group is - claiming ethnic ownership is backwards (though all too common) thinking.
"This is a place for Arabs" says the Berber.
It makes me think of an, "On the one hand/On the other hand," sort of deal. I know OP wasn't trying to say this, but it seems that's the impression many get from reading it,  and so regard it as some statement of equivalency. Not sure if I'm being very clear, trying to suss out the reasoning behind a gut reaction.   Edit: Any responses to go with the downvotes? I'd like to know what people are finding so objectionable. After all, the downvote button isn't the disagree button. 
Got a source for that claim? First time I'm hearing about this. 
The US doesn't care whether a country is democratic or authoritarian, and that you apparently don't know this makes sense given the degree of duplicity in US foreign policy and PR.  There isn't anything more to say in this conversation, if you want to insist on your right not to know anything important going on in the world, by all means vote for whatever politician has the most contempt for you.  Your worldview is riddled with fallacies and makes little sense on multiple levels.  You point to the existence of enemies as a rationale for secrecy, but fail to realize (or don't care) that the people who you trust to keep secrets have the ability to determine who is to be considered an enemy, and don't need to be upfront about their metric.  Go back to Reagan's 1st rendition of the "war on terror", or more recently to the lies and crimes of the Iraq war to gauge how well those you place such faith in return your fidelity.  March onward, O patriot, keep the faith, for no one else is.  The beautiful thing about being perpetually moronic is you're usually too think to realize it.
leaders*
Since never?... Arabs can be so black they look purple, and so white they look Norweigan.   Edit: Down-votes for stating a simple fact. Fuck me right?
&gt;You're a drain not just on this website, but on the minds of everyone you encounter. Take responsibility for your surroundings and stop justifying complacency and imagining oppression.  That's actually one of the better descriptions I've heard of SRS. Maybe you should take your own advice. 
LOLOL so were the jerks on Mavi Mara asshole Erdogan.
Oh /r/worldnews... how very similar you are to Stormfront. 
I'll cherish that.
they are afraid because racism is seen as one way. I mean its "worse" to be racist towards a minority than it is for a minority to be racist towards a majority. and as immigrants are the minority (kind of by definition).  people feel like they have to adapt to the immigrants or risk being called a racist. but they don't really see the immigrants adapting to the majorities culture (likely because the ones that do adapt to the majorities culture don't appear on the news).  also people associate Arabs with things like Sharia law, whether that's the right thing to do or not is irrelevant. you don't really get such negative connotations with European countries (we don't stone or hang people, women and men have largely equal rights)  whether its true or not, you get the impression that overall immigrants don't adapt to the country they are in, but the people already in the country must adapt to the newcomers.   it also doesn't help that you get "Muslim communities" or "&lt;insert culture&gt; communities". it makes that culture "over there, away from me, not my problem, not for me to think about"  which makes it unknown so you generalise, also because they are immigrant communities they are typically seen as poorer than the rest of the country, because they've simply had less time to make their way on the country, this doesn't help their image either. whereas if these communities had never formed in the first place and the people had spread across the country integration o f both sides would have been easier. 
/r/murica is a joke.  Its not meant to be taken serioisly.
1) Hep A shot was only recently recommended as routine for the general population; previously it was only advised for special at-risk groups/phased in higher-risk geographic regions.  It is not a typical pre-req vaccine for school.  2) No vaccine is perfect.  Hep A shot is pretty good - conveys immunity to about 95%.  In other words, 5% of vaccinated people are still at risk.  3) The effect diminishes - after about 15 years for one shot or 25 years for 2.  If you haven't gotten one within those periods, talk to your doctor.  
this is terrible, my cat was 10kgs, due to kidney issues, it wasnt because we were neglecting her, she lived a happy 10years but her conditions got the better of her. 
I think it's more along the lines of "don't put yourself in a possibly extremely dangerous situation and be surprised when something bad happens." As it turns out, hitch hiking alone at 1 am as a woman in India is about as potentially dangerous as it gets for a woman. Don't get me wrong, those men are absolutely disgusting human beings, but she should have had the common sense to know that would more than likely not end well.
You can have your views, that's cool. Don't spread misinformation.
Condemning the attackers isn't a mantra you can use like a ward. Those comments do condemn the attackers, but the thrust of these posts are thinly veiled criticisms of the victim for her audacity to hitchhike.  To answer your main point, you don't really need to comment on it. If you're in a position to give advice, obviously you want to recommend against risky actions. But after the fact... the woman did nothing wrong. Even if you condemn the attackers, it is still blaming the victim to call her stupid or retarded -- the attackers are 100% at fault here, she did *not* cause this to herself.
[deleted]
Fight the power.
&gt;The U.S. has less reason to feel that it needs to protect its heritage.  Haha I can tell you haven't ever been to the US. Let me invite you over to my buddy's place in North Carolina sometime.
But think about the fact that you can get your stuff made in china. And with such mass production it would not cost as much. Also you could go 100% recycled material.
[deleted]
Mississippi...what a surprise...
Have you heard of the cultural mosaic? That's basically what we have in Canada and imho it works pretty well
If only there were a way to sticky it at the top or something...
It's a third world country that's been getting rapped incessantly for it's useful position as a means to transfer oil (pipelines). Cuba is nowhere near as turbulent but "personal property" is fairly a loose concept there as well. It has nothing to do with race and everything to do with being poor in a poor country.   I'm not saying they can't possibly be lying about the bodies but I am saying that your multiple deployments there if anything serve as a bias against them and not some sort of enlightenment.  Final note, they are living in a shitty country in the worst of conditions and nothing has gotten any better since the US went in. Topped by the fact that they consider you "outsiders" meddling in their affairs. It's pretty difficult NOT to establish an "Us vs Them" mentality. At least you guys have the hope of returning to a nice 1st world country.  EDIT: Facts.
You can't buy alcohol between 8 pm and 8 am or on Sundays in Sweden (except in bars), so it could be worse. That's an old and frequently criticized law, though; I don't think it would be possible to implement it today.
Anyone who tries to silence or censor conversation or free thought is probably doing or saying something messed up.   From not allowing comments on youtube to real-world stuff like this, its a pretty consistent observation. 
Indeed it was. SOrry I'm delirious with flu. 
or else.
Works for me (edit: in Sweden).
Don't worry about it my friend.
Yup, iranians have suffered at the hands of idiot islamists for 34 years. Learned the hard way.  I'll just leave this here in memory of what broke out 4 (!) years ago (hard to believe it's been that long :( ):  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SNocyz1NRjA  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=px9tCJPj0wg   edit: just to make it clear, this recent protest was a singular event at a dissident ayatollah's funeral. its not a resurgence of the mass protests we saw before.
Is it? Why does Iran need Hezbollah to repress protesters?
This isn't an environmental issue. It's a general uprising against an authoritarian government. Nice try, please try again.
They are a blow to democracy to preserve human rights you say, but my point is that they're not just a blow to democracy, but also to human rights. They're the textbook example of a cure that's worse than the disease.
True - but pitching the situation in Turkey to a Western populace in terms that are designed to make it sound like they are being more oppressed than westerners in this regard is dishonest.
not world news
[deleted]
I love how quickly Redditors forget, I am sure there are people out there thinking they are witnessing the first protest ever in Iran.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2009%E2%80%9310_Iranian_election_protests
Check out the [RealTimeWW2](https://twitter.com/RealTimeWWII) tweets as well. They have been going for years now and are the inspiration for this Six Day War version. 
Iranian Here. The last time we did this I was home.  It's elections now. I remember the day before the voting day, I went to Mirdamad to meet my friends and join a group in the protests. Well, long story. One of the guys in that group is still in Gohar Dasht Prison. I miss everything and everyone in that group. Though I know this is not going to change anything. This is just like 4 years ago.  Even though we have great culture and we are strong, the power of people is absolute nonsense in Iran.   Well, I'll try to seat, and stare at the monitor. Maybe the pain will go away.
Chanting is perfectly fine, just don't do it on a public walkway or street, or a park with 'no loitering' signs or if you didn't get a permit or if it's actually a private park with some public availability.
I've read enough.
